AMERICAN HISTORY: During the naval battle for this Alabama bay, David Farragut uttered, "Damn the torpedoes!  Full speed ahead!"
Mobile Bay
The state ranges in elevation from sea level at Mobile Bay to over 1,800 feet (550 m) in the Appalachian Mountains in the northeast.
2
A company of cavalry soldiers from Huntsville, Alabama joined Nathan Bedford Forrest's battalion in Hopkinsville, Kentucky.
Jackson, Harvey H. Inside Alabama: A Personal History of My State (2004)
TRAVEL & TOURISM: This Alabama city has a collection of spacecraft at the U.S. Space & Rocket Center
Huntsville
The largest city by population is Birmingham, which has long been the most industrialized city, and largest city by total land area is Huntsville.
3
After disfranchising most African Americans and many poor whites in the 1901 constitution, the Alabama legislature passed more Jim Crow laws at the beginning of the 20th century to impose segregation in everyday life.
The 2011 Super Outbreak produced a record amount of tornadoes in the state.
+ Top 10 Non-English Languages Spoken in Alabama Language  Percentage of population(as of 2010) Spanish 2.2% German  0.4% French (incl.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: This mountain system stretches about 1,500 miles from Alabama to Canada's Gaspe Peninsula
Appalachians
Alabama is home to a diverse array of flora and fauna, due largely to a variety of habitats that range from the Tennessee Valley, Appalachian Plateau, and Ridge-and-Valley Appalachians of the north to the Piedmont, Canebrake and Black Belt of the central region to the Gulf Coastal Plain and beaches along the Gulf of Mexico in the south.
3
Huntsville served as the temporary capital of Alabama from 1819 to 1820, when the seat of state government was moved to Cahaba in Dallas County.
At the same time, many rural people, both White and African American, migrated to the city of Birmingham to work in new industrial jobs.
County and Local governments  Alabama has 67 counties.
THE BOD SQUAD: The Achilles tendon is in this part of the foot, the only spot where the hero Achilles was vulnerable
the heel
Although the death of Achilles is not presented in the Iliad, other sources concur that he was killed near the end of the Trojan War by Paris, who shot him in the heel with an arrow.
3
Accepting his fate, Hector begs Achilles, not to spare his life, but to treat his body with respect after killing him.
Commentators from classical antiquity to the present have often interpreted the relationship through the lens of their own cultures.
The kings of the Epirus claimed to be descended from Achilles through his son, Neoptolemus.
MAID: In this epic poem, Achilles leaves the battlefield after Agamemnon confiscates his prize of war, the maid Briseis
The Iliad
Although the death of Achilles is not presented in the Iliad, other sources concur that he was killed near the end of the Trojan War by Paris, who shot him in the heel with an arrow.
3
Zeus himself takes note of Achilles' rage and sends the gods to restrain him so that he will not go on to sack Troy itself before the time allotted for its destruction, seeming to show that the unhindered rage of Achilles can defy fate itself.
Dio Cassius 78.16.7.
In Plato's Symposium, Phaedrus points out that Aeschylus portrayed Achilles as the lover and Patroclus as the beloved; Phaedrus argues that this is incorrect because Achilles, being the younger and more beautiful of the two, was the beloved, who loved his lover so much that he chose to die to revenge him.
CROSSWORD CLUES "P": Aristotle's teacher(5)
Plato
At eighteen, he joined Plato's Academy in Athens and remained there until the age of thirty-seven (c. 347 BC).
3
Aristotle, of course, is not responsible for the later use made of this idea by clerics.
This kind of soul is capable of the same powers as the other kinds: Like the vegetative soul it can grow and nourish itself; like the sensitive soul it can experience sensations and move locally.
Moreover, he considered the city to be prior in importance to the family which in turn is prior to the individual, "for the whole must of necessity be prior to the part".Politics
GOING GLOBAL: It's only about 50 miles from Alaska to Russia when you cross this strait
the Bering Strait
To the west and south is the Pacific Ocean, with Russia (specifically, Chukotka Autonomous Okrug and Kamchatka Krai) farther west across the Bering Strait.
3
Individual Native allotments can be and are sold on the open market, however.
2000.
In 1932 an expedition set out from MGM's studios in Hollywood to Alaska to film what was then billed as "The Biggest Picture Ever Made."
LITERATURE: Time in this futuristic Aldous Huxley novel is measured from the invention of the Model T Ford
"Brave New World"
In our time: "Brave New World". Huxley and the novel. 9 April 2009.
3
Salon  Huxley wrote an introduction to the posthumous publication of J. D. Unwin's 1940 book Hopousia or The Sexual and Economic Foundations of a New Society..
His application was continuously deferred on the grounds that he would not say he would take up arms to defend the U.S. He claimed a philosophical, rather than a religious objection, and therefore was not exempt under the McCarran Act.
He even tried driving a car along the dirt road beside the ranch.
FAMOUS LAST WORD: In "America the Beautiful"
sea
God shed His grace on thee, Till souls wax fair as earth and air And music-hearted sea!
3
America the Beautiful" for various reasons, saying it is easier to sing, more melodic, and more adaptable to new orchestrations while still remaining as easily recognizable as "The Star-Spangled Banner".
Currently, it is used by Shanghai Alumni Primary School in Hong Kong and Hujiang High School in Taiwan as the melody of their school song.
O beautiful for patriot dream That sees beyond the years Thine alabaster cities gleam Undimmed by human tears! America!
WHERE: In area, it's the largest country in both Europe & Asia
Russia
Asia–Europe boundary The Don River became unsatisfactory to northern Europeans when Peter the Great, king of the Tsardom of Russia, defeating rival claims of Sweden and the Ottoman Empire to the eastern lands, and armed resistance by the tribes of Siberia, synthesized a new Russian Empire extending to the Ural Mountains and beyond, founded in 1721.
3
As the earliest evidence of the name is Greek, it is likely circumstantially that Asia came from Ἀσία, but ancient transitions, due to the lack of literary contexts, are difficult to catch in the act.
Iran is the largest Shi'a country and Pakistan has the largest Ahmadiyya population.
As of 2012, Hinduism has around 1.1 billion adherents.
FACTS & FIGURES: The U.N. estimates there are about 8.4 million of these, including 1.9 million from Afghanistan
refugees
The Soviet war in Afghanistan resulted in the deaths of over 1 million Afghans, mostly civilians,UNICEF, Land-mines: A deadly inheritance  and the creation of about 6million refugees who fled Afghanistan, mainly to Pakistan and Iran.
3
–
by Ann Marlowe in Forbes 2 September 2009.
Since 2002, press restrictions have been gradually relaxed and private media diversified.
EASTERN EUROPE: Albania broke diplomatic relations with the Soviet Union in 1961 & became allied with this Asian power
China
In the 1990s, the country scrapped enormous amounts of obsolete hardware, such as tanks and SAM systems from China.
3
The conflict resulted in Roman victory and the end of Illyrian independence by 167 BC. After his defeat, the Romans split the region into three administrative divisions.
Clayer, Nathalie. " Albania ." Encyclopaedia of Islam, THREE. Edited by: Gudrun Krämer, Denis Matringe, John Nawas, Everett Rowson.
About 3,000 different species of plants grow in Albania, many of which are used for medicinal purposes.
BODIES OF WATER: Albania lies on the eastern shore of this sea, an arm of the Mediterranean
Adriatic
It has a coast on the Adriatic Sea to the west and on the Ionian Sea to the southwest.
3
An important gateway to the Balkan Peninsula, Albania's ever-growing road network provides juncture to reach its neighbors in north south, east, and west.
The international television service via satellite was launched since 1993 and aims at Albanian communities in Kosovo, Serbia, Macedonia, Montenegro and northern Greece, plus the Albanian diaspora in the rest of Europe.
In 1996, the incidence of tuberculosis was 23 in 100,000 people.
THE EXCHANGE STUDENT: Asked if he'd ever seen snow before, Ekrem explained that Ankara in this country is farther north than Denver
Turkey
Ankara (English ; Turkish ), formerly known as Ancyra and Angora, is the capital of Turkey, located in Central Anatolia.
3
The oldest settlements in and around the city center of Ankara belonged to the Hattic civilization which existed during the Bronze Age and was gradually absorbed ca.
They were not the only ones to use the Roman highway network, which was equally convenient for invaders.
The exhibits include industrial/technological artifacts from the 1850s onwards.
THE MIDEAST: Nomadic people whose name is Arabic for "desert dweller"
Bedouins
To solve this problem, grammarians and scholars asked Bedouins to recite poems in order to hear how they pronounced the poem as their voices were believed to be pure.
3
Or, a short vowel is added only if an otherwise unpronounceable sequence occurs, typically due to a violation of the sonority hierarchy (e.g., -rtn- is pronounced as a three-consonant cluster, but -trn- needs to be broken up).
For example, in Moroccan Arabic, it spreads as far as the first full vowel (i.e. sound derived from a long vowel or diphthong) on either side; in many Levantine dialects, it spreads indefinitely, but is blocked by any  or ; while in Egyptian Arabic, it usually spreads throughout the entire word, including prefixes and suffixes.
ISBN 978-0-415-15757-5  In modern times, the educated upper classes in the Arab world have taken a nearly opposite view.
2001: A CATEGORY ODYSSEY: He directed "2001: A Space Odyssey" between "Dr. Stangelove" & "A Clockwork Orange"
Stanley Kubrick
The film adaptation, directed by Stanley Kubrick, is based on the American edition of the book (which Burgess considered to be "badly flawed").
3
Later, after Alex is released from prison, Billyboy (along with Dim, who like Billyboy has become a police officer) rescue Alex from a mob, then subsequently beat him, in a location out of town.
The term's association with aesthetic violence has led to its use in the media.
(photo: Peter Zuehlke)  In February 1990, another musical version was produced at the Barbican Theatre in London by the Royal Shakespeare Company.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: The Rhine Valley occupies one-third of this 62-square-mile country; the Alps cover the rest
Liechtenstein
The Alps (;  ;  ;  ;  ) are the highest and most extensive mountain range system that lies entirely in Europe, stretching approximately  across eight Alpine countries: Austria, France, Germany, Italy, Liechtenstein, Monaco, Slovenia, and Switzerland."Alpine Convention".
3
(2010), 9Fleming (2000), 1 To the south it dips into northern Italy and to the north extends to the south border of Bavaria in Germany.
The pass was used by Napoleon Bonaparte to cross 40,000 troops in 1800.
Flora   thumb|Stemless gentian (Gentiana acaulis)  Thirteen thousand species of plants have been identified in the Alpine regions.
20th CENTURY NOVELISTS: It wasn't "The Plague" that killed this French author but, sadly, a 1960 car accident
Camus
The Plague (French: La Peste) is a novel by Albert Camus, published in 1947, that tells the story of a plague sweeping the Algerian city of Oran.
3
Violence and looting break out on a small scale, and the authorities respond by declaring martial law and imposing a curfew.
Rieux regards him as "the true embodiment of the quiet courage that inspired the sanitary groups." Grand catches the plague himself and asks Rieux to burn his manuscript, but then makes an unexpected recovery.
Gray 2007:167
1922: On August 22 Michael Collins was ambushed by Independent Republicans in this country
Ireland
1798 – French troops land in Kilcummin harbour, County Mayo, Ireland to aid Wolfe Tone's United Irishmen's Irish Rebellion.
3
–
Colm Feore, American-Canadian actor   1958   – Stevie Ray, American wrestler and sportscaster   1958   –
Boris Pugo, Russian soldier and politician, Soviet Minister of Interior (b. 1937) 1994 – Gilles Groulx, Canadian director and screenwriter (b. 1931)   1994   – Allan Houser, American sculptor and painter (b. 1914) 1995 – Johnny Carey, Irish footballer and manager (b. 1919) 1996 – Erwin Komenda, Austrian car designer and engineer (b. 1904) 2000 –
LITERARY TRANSLATIONS: Aristophanes' ribbit-tickler:"Batrachoi"
The Frogs
We know however from a combination of these sources,D.Welsh, IG ii2 2343, Philonides and Aristophanes' Banqueters, Classical Quarterly 33 (1983) and especially from comments in The KnightsKnights 512-14</ref> and The Clouds,Clouds 530-33 that Aristophanes' first three plays were not directed by him — they were instead directed by Callistratus and Philoneides,Ian Storey, General Introduction, in Clouds, Wasps, Birds By Aristophanes, Peter Meineck (translator), Hackett Publishing 1998, page xiii an arrangement that seemed to suit Aristophanes since he appears to have used these same directors in many later plays as well (Philoneides for example later directed The Frogs and he was also credited, perhaps wrongly, with directing The Wasps.)MacDowell (1971) p.124 Aristophanes's use of directors complicates our reliance on the plays as sources of biographical information because apparent self-references might have been made with reference to his directors instead.
3
17th edition.
Plato's Aristophanes is in fact a genial character and this has been interpreted as evidence of Plato's own friendship with himAristophanes:
The major confrontation (agon) between the 'good' and 'bad' characters in a play is often resolved decisively in favour of the former long before the end of the play.
GREECE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew stands in front of the Parthenon in Athens, Greece.)  Built in the 400s B.C., the temple of Athena, known as the Parthenon, is the greatest example of this ancient architectural style
doric
Athena (; Attic Greek: , Athēnā, or , Athēnaia; Epic: , Athēnaiē; Doric: , Athānā) or Athene (; Ionic: , Athēnē), often given the epithet Pallas (; ), is the goddess of wisdom, courage, inspiration, civilization, law and justice, mathematics, olive oil, strength, war strategy, the arts, crafts, and skill in ancient Greek religion and mythology.
3
Jasanoff, Jay H. and Nussbaum, Alan, Word games: the Linguistic Evidence in Black Athena, in: Mary R. Lefkowitz, Guy MacLean Rogers (eds.), Black Athena Revisited, The University of North Carolina Press, 1996, p. 194.
The various Athena subgroups, or cults, all branching from the central goddess herself often proctored various initiation rites of Grecian youth, for example, the passage into citizenship by young men and for women the elevation to the status of citizen wife.
Most noticeable in the face is perhaps the full round strong, chin with a high nose that has a high bridge as a natural extension of the forehead.
A TOUR OF GREECE: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from Athens, Greece.) In 480 BC, Athens and the monuments on the Acropolis were destroyed by these invaders under the command of Xerxes I
the Persians
In the ensuing Greco-Persian Wars Athens, together with Sparta, led the coalition of Greek states that would eventually repel the Persians, defeating them decisively at Marathon in 490 BC, and crucially at Salamis in 480 BC.
3
Unlike other Mycenaean centers, such as Mycenae and Pylos, it is not known whether Athens suffered destruction in about 1200 BC, an event often attributed to a Dorian invasion, and the Athenians always maintained that they were "pure" Ionians with no Dorian element.
The basin is bounded by four large mountains: Mount Aegaleo to the west, Mount Parnitha to the north, Mount Penteli to the northeast and Mount Hymettus to the east.
Although the heavy cost was criticized, estimated at $1.5 billion, Athens was transformed into a more functional city that enjoys modern technology both in transportation and in modern urban development.
HISTORY: The outbreak of this war in 431 B.C. put an end to Athens' Golden Age of Pericles
The Peloponnesian War
thumb|Delian League, under the leadership of Athens before the Peloponnesian War in 431 BC thumb|The Roman-era Philopappos Monument  By the 6th century BC, widespread social unrest led to the reforms of Solon.
3
Some of them are PAO Rouf (Rouf) with earlier presence in Gamma Ethniki, Petralona F.C.(el) (Petralona), football club founded in 1963, with earlier presence in Beta Ethniki, Attikos F.C.(el) (Kolonos), football club founded in 1919 with short presence in Gamma Ethniki, Athinais Kypselis(el) (Kypseli), football club founded in 1938 with short presence in Gamma Ethniki, Gyziakos (Gyzi), basketball club founded in 1937 with short presence in Beta Ethniki basketball and Aetos B.C.(el) (Agios Panteleimonas), basketball club founded in 1992 with earlier presence in A2 Ethniki Basketball.
Its network consists of about 300 bus lines which span the Athens Metropolitan Area, with an operating staff of 5,327, and a fleet of 1,839 buses.
The Athens Metro has an operating staff of 387 and runs two of the three metro lines; namely the Red (line 2) and Blue (line 3) lines, which were constructed largely during the 1990s, with the initial sections opened in January 2000.
LETTER AFTER P: In the name of a retail store on an Army installation
X
thumb|400px|Countries by number of active soldiers (2009)  An army (from Latin arma "arms, weapons" via Old French armée, "armed" (feminine)) or ground force is a fighting force that fights primarily on land.
2
History  India India has had some of the earliest armies in the world.
Thus the scutage was introduced, whereby most Englishmen paid to escape their service and this money was used to create a permanent army.
GENESIS: She conceived and bore Abraham a son, Isaac, in his old age
Sarah
Abraham was extremely wealthy and powerful, but his wife Sarah was barren, so his servant Eliezer, and Ishmael the son of Sarah's handmaid Hagar might have been candidates to inherit him.
2
Judaism In Jewish tradition, Abraham is called Avraham Avinu (אברהם אבינו), "our father Abraham," signifying that he is both the biological progenitor of the Jews (including converts, according to Jewish tradition), and the father of Judaism, the first Jew.
For a very thorough online collection of links to artwork about Abraham see: Artwork Depicting Scenes from Abraham's Life Accessed 25 March 2011
"AE": Call me this son of Abraham & Hagar from Genesis 16
Ishmael
Abraham was extremely wealthy and powerful, but his wife Sarah was barren, so his servant Eliezer, and Ishmael the son of Sarah's handmaid Hagar might have been candidates to inherit him.
2
Abraham later married Keturah and had six more sons, but on his death, when he was buried beside Sarah, it was Isaac who received "all Abraham's goods", while the other sons received only "gifts".
Then Abraham turned to God and pleaded decrementally with Him (from fifty persons to less) that "if there were at least ten righteous men found in the city, would not God spare the city?"
1970: Concerns over the environment led to the first national observance of this day on April 22
Earth Day
The first Earth Day is celebrated.
3
Keith Crisco, American businessman and politician (d. 2014)   1943   – Janet Evanovich, American author   1943   –
Catherine Mary Stewart, Canadian actress   1959   – Ryan Stiles, American-Canadian actor and producer   1959   – Musa Uzunlar, Turkish actor 1960
Wu Zong, Chinese emperor (b. 814) 1616
THE SOUTH: This Arkansas capital is nicknamed "The City of Roses" for its many gardens
Little Rock
The capital and most populous city is Little Rock, located in the central portion of the state, a hub for transportation, business, culture, and government.
3
Smith 1989, p. 15.
These results were expected due to the large increase in the number of students taking the exam since the establishment of the Academic Challenge Scholarship.
Office holders are term-limited to two full terms plus any partial terms before the first full term.
STATE NICKNAMES: Arbor Day likely helped it become "the Tree Planters State"
Nebraska
Additionally, the small Spanish village of Villanueva de la Sierra held the first modern Arbor Day, an initiative launched in 1805 by the local priest with the enthusiastic support of the entire population.[1]   First American Arbor Day  thumb|Birdsey Northrop The first American Arbor Day was originated in Nebraska City, Nebraska, United States by J. Sterling Morton.
3
McCreight urged President Roosevelt to make a public statement to school children about trees and the destruction of American forests.
Six million more were planted in November the same year, and another 12,5 million trees in 2009.
The oldest environmentalist festival in the world was celebrated in Villanueva.
ANTHONY HOPKINS FILMS: It was Anthony Hopkins for whom death (Brad Pitt) came calling in this 1998 film
Meet Joe Black
Other notable films include The Mask of Zorro, The Bounty, Meet Joe Black, The Elephant Man, Magic, 84 Charing Cross Road, Bram Stoker's Dracula, Legends of the Fall, Thor, The Remains of the Day, Amistad, Nixon, The World's Fastest Indian, Instinct, and Fracture.
3
Retrieved 19 October 2011."Hopkins gives a million to save Snowdonia", BBC. Retrieved 19 October 2011.
He was a Guest of Honour at a Gala Fundraiser for Women in Recovery, Inc., a Venice, California-based non-profit organisation offering rehabilitation assistance to women in recovery from substance abuse.
His first screenplay, an experimental drama called Slipstream, which he also directed and scored, premiered at the Sundance Film Festival in 2007.
UH-OH, DEATH: Apoptosis, a necessary part of embryonic development, is the "programmed" death of these biological units
cells
Between 50 and 70 billion cells die each day due to apoptosis in the average human adult.
2
The word "apoptosis" () is used in Greek to describe the "dropping off" or "falling off" of petals from flowers, or leaves from trees.
The nucleus breaks into several discrete chromatin bodies or nucleosomal units due to the degradation of DNA.  The cell membrane shows irregular buds known as blebs.
WHERE'S THE BEEF FROM?: Angus
Scotland
Angus () is one of the 32 local government council areas of Scotland, a registration county and a lieutenancy area.
3
In the 2001 census the population of Angus was recorded as 108,400.
This is the area of the five Angus Glens, which is sparsely populated and where the main industry is hill-farming.
Civil Parish map.https://archive.org/stream/imperialgazettee01wils#page/n805/mode/1up Boundaries outlined in red  Towns  Arbroath, the largest town Brechin Carnoustie Forfar, the county town and administrative centre Kirriemuir Monifieth Montrose  Villages  Aberlemno Arbirlot Auchmithie Auchterhouse Birkhill Bridge of Craigisla Carmyllie Dunnichen East Haven Edzell Farnell Friockheim Finavon Glamis Guthrie Inverkeilor Hillside Kingsmuir Letham Liff Newbigging Newtyle Noranside Memus Menmuir Monikie Muirhead Murroes St Vigeans Tannadice Tarfside Tealing Unthank  Places of interest  Aberlemno Sculptured Stones (Pictish symbols) Angus Folk Museum, Glamis Arbroath Abbey, place of signing of the Declaration of ArbroathAngus Council:
THE GRAMMYS: A hit for Judy Collins, this tune from Stephen Sondheim's "A Little Night Music" was 1975's Song of the Year
"Send In The Clowns"
The musical includes the popular song "Send in the Clowns".
3
They reflect on their new lives, and Fredrik tries to explain how much he loves Anne ("You Must Meet My Wife").
At dinner, Charlotte attempts to flirt with Fredrik, while Anne and Desiree trade insults.
It Rich?:
SNACKS ON A PLANE: This Atlanta-based airline's "flight delights" includes hummus, pita chips & a deck of miniature playing cards
Delta
Atlanta contains the country's third largest concentration of Fortune 500 companies, and the city is the global headquarters of corporations such as The Coca-Cola Company, The Home Depot, Delta Air Lines, AT&T Mobility, Chick-fil-A, UPS, and Newell-Rubbermaid.
3
However, despite these improvements, Atlanta lost over 100,000 residents between 1970 and 1990, over 20% of its population.
The Chattahoochee River National Recreation Area, located in the northwestern corner of the city, preserves a  stretch of the river for public recreation opportunities.
Golf and tennis are also popular in Atlanta, and the city contains six public golf courses and 182 tennis courts.
THE DE NIRO CODE: As Al Capone in this 1987 film: "You can get further with a kind word and a gun than you can with just a kind word"
The Untouchables
He did not even have a bank account, but always used Western Union for cash delivery, not more than $1,000.The Real Story: The Untouchables, Smithsonian Channel (2009 Documentary)   Political alliances
3
J. Campbell Bruce, Escape from Alcatraz, Random House Digital, Inc. (2005), p 32.
The New York Times.
Schoenberg, Robert J. Mr. Capone.
NOTABLE NAMES: This great German composer of "Fur Elise" was born in Bonn in 1770
Beethoven
Bonn is the birthplace of Ludwig van Beethoven (born 1770).
3
Climate  Bonn has an oceanic climate (Cfb).
Deutsche Post, Haribo, German Academic Exchange Service, and SolarWorld are in Bonn.
The city also has an amateur football team Bonner SC which was formed in 1965 through the merger of Bonner FV and Tura Bonn.
HOLLYWOOD QUOTES: Frank Capra dubbed this director of "The Birth of a Nation" "The Poor Man's Shakespeare"
D.W. Griffith
Stagestruck Filmmaker: D.W. Griffith & the American Theatre.
3
Cast   Lillian Gish as Elsie Stoneman  Mae Marsh as Flora Cameron  Henry B. Walthall as Colonel Ben Cameron  Miriam Cooper as Margaret Cameron  Mary Alden as Lydia Brown  Ralph Lewis as Austin Stoneman  George Siegmann as Silas Lynch  Walter Long as Gus  Robert Harron as Tod Stoneman  Wallace Reid as Jeff the blacksmith  Joseph Henabery as Abraham Lincoln  Elmer Clifton as Phil Stoneman  Josephine Crowell as Mrs. Cameron  Spottiswoode Aitken as Dr. Cameron  George Beranger as Wade Cameron  Maxfield Stanley as Duke Cameron  Jennie Lee as Mammy  Donald Crisp as General Ulysses S. Grant  Howard Gaye as General Robert E. Lee  Uncredited:
The film historian Richard Schickel says that under the state's rights contracts, Epoch typically received about 10% of the box office gross—which theater owners often underreported—and concludes that "Birth certainly generated more than $60 million in box-office business in its first run".
Those evolved enough to understand what they are looking at find the early and wartime scenes brilliant, but cringe during the postwar and Reconstruction scenes, which are racist in the ham-handed way of an old minstrel show or a vile comic pamphlet." "Birth of a Nation was the first picture that really made people take the motion picture industry seriously," said Mary Pickford.
WORLD CAPITALS: Once the capital of the Spanish Netherlands, today it's the capital of Belgium
Brussels
The Brussels-Capital Region, officially bilingual, is a mostly French-speaking enclave within the Flemish Region.
3
From the 16th century until the Belgian Revolution in 1830, when Belgium seceded from the Netherlands, the area of Belgium served as the battleground between many European powers, causing it to be dubbed the "Battlefield of Europe,"—The book reviewer, Haß, attributes the expression in English to James Howell in 1640.
The Eighty Years' War (1568–1648) divided the Low Countries into the northern United Provinces (Belgica Foederata in Latin, the "Federated Netherlands") and the Southern Netherlands (Belgica Regia, the "Royal Netherlands").
Belgium's political institutions are complex; most political power is organized around the need to represent the main cultural communities.
SCIENTISTS: He published his quantum theory in 1900 while a professor of physics in Berlin
Max Planck
The city has a high density of research institutions, such as the Fraunhofer Society, Leibniz Association and the Max Planck Society, which are independent of, or only loosely connected to its universities.
3
Although it was possible for Westerners to pass from one to the other side through strictly controlled checkpoints, for most Easterners travel to West Berlin or West Germany was prohibited by government of East Germany.
Many internationally publishing bloggers, journalists and writers live and work in Berlin.
The modern history of medicine has been significantly influenced by scientists from Berlin.
NAME THAT NATION: Despite its larger resources, Brazil lost an 1820s war with Argentina that resulted in this new country between them
Uruguay
Long after the Cisplatine War that resulted in independence for Uruguay,Levine, Robert M. "The history of Brazil" Greenwood Publishing Group, Inc. 1999, page 62, last paragraph View on Google Books Brazil won three international wars during the 58-year reign of Pedro II.
3
Vianna, p. 418
Brazilian roads are the primary carriers of freight and passenger traffic.
Among the achievements in the water supply and sanitation sector is an increase in access to water piped on premises  from 79% to 92% between 1990 and 2010; an increase in access to Improved sanitation from 68% to 79% in the same period;WHO/UNICEF: Progress on Drinking Water and Sanitation, 2008, pp.
SCIENTIFIC SOUTH AMERICAN: Sometimes credited with inventing the torpedo, Andre Reboucas helped torpedo this in Brazil; it was abolished in 1888
slavery
Ibidem Fausto 2000 Slavery among the Indians had a different meaning than it had for Europeans, since it originated from a diverse socio-economic organization, in which asymmetries were translated into kinship relations.
3
Skidmore, pp.
The economy of the resource-rich nation had been booming until 2010, but stagnation followed and a recession is now underway, along with inflation and charges of corruption and the bankruptcy of a major oil business.
São Paulo, Companhia das Letras, 1997.
WITCHCRAFT: Though it's not one of the 10 Commandments, "Thou shalt not suffer a witch to live" is in this book of the Bible
Exodus
The oldest extant manuscripts of the Masoretic Text date from approximately the 9th century CE,A 7th-century fragment containing the Song of the Sea (Exodus 13:19–16:1) is one of the few surviving texts from the "silent era" of Hebrew biblical texts between the Dead Sea Scrolls and the Aleppo Codex.
3
Modern Protestant traditions do not accept the deuterocanonical books as canonical, although Protestant Bibles included them in Apocrypha sections until the 1820s.
ISBN 0-310-39281-0 associate inspiration with only the original text; for example some American Protestants adhere to the 1978 Chicago Statement on Biblical Inerrancy which asserted that inspiration applied only to the autographic text of Scripture.
For example, Rastafaris view the Bible as essential to their religionBecoming Rasta: Origins of Rastafari Identity in Jamaica –
POP GOES THE EASEL: Heh-heh, heh-heh, this cartoonist who created "Beavis and Butt-head" was influenced by Monty Python
Mike Judge
Beavis and Butt-Head is an American adult animated sitcom created and designed by Mike Judge.
3
The series originated from Frog Baseball, a 1992 short film by Judge originally aired on Liquid Television.
A preview of the episode "Holy Cornholio" was also shown.
Petersburg Times and a track by themselves called "Come to Butt-Head".
FLAG-WAVING: The green field on the flag of Bangladesh represents this religion
Islam
It is a member of the Commonwealth of Nations, the Organization of Islamic Cooperation and the Non-Aligned Movement.
2
Retrieved 17 April 2015.
Military   thumb|A Bangladesh Navy frigate in the Bay of Bengal , the current strength of the army is around 300,000 including reservists,Bangladesh troops lead global peacekeeping.
BERMUDA SHORTS: Bermuda's almost due east of this state's Cape Hatteras
North Carolina
Geography right|thumb|180px|View from the top of Gibb's Hill Lighthouse right|thumb|180px|Landsat 8 satellite image right|thumb|180px|Bermuda pictured from the International Space Station right|thumb|180px|Topographic map of Bermuda  Bermuda is a group of low-forming volcanoes located in the Atlantic Ocean, near the western edge of the Sargasso Sea, roughly 578 nautical miles () east-southeast of Cape Hatteras on the Outer Banks of North Carolina and about 594 nautical miles () southeast of Martha's Vineyard of Massachusetts.
3
The islands does get some cooler temperatures in January, February, and March (average 63F-64F).
The Exchange specialises in listing and trading of capital market instruments such as equities, debt issues, funds (including hedge fund structures) and depository receipt programmes.
The event returned to Bermuda in 2008 and 2009.
ISLANDS: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew shows a map on the monitor.)  Planes and ships have mysteriously disappeared in the Bermuda triangle, an area roughly from Miami to Bermuda to this island commonwealth
Puerto Rico
It is about  south of Cape Sable Island, Canada, and  north of Puerto Rico.
3
Perhaps most interesting is its closeness to acrolectal English compared to other varieties in the West Indies.
Maritime economy Bermudians rapidly abandoned agriculture for shipbuilding, replanting farmland with the native juniper (Juniperus bermudiana, called Bermuda cedar) trees that grew thickly over the whole island.
Somers Isles Insurance Company Ltd.
BELLY UP TO THE BAROQUE: This Baroque artist painted dozens of self-portraits & went "Baroque" with a 1656 bankruptcy
Rembrandt
While the Baroque nature of Rembrandt's art is clear, the label is less often used for Vermeer and many other Dutch artists.
3
She was a popular saint of the Catholic Reformation.
The angelic figure is not preparing to plunge the arrow into her heart—rather, he has withdrawn it.
Town planning of this period featured radiating avenues intersecting in squares, which took cues from Baroque garden plans.
DESIGN: The bold, extravagant churrigueresque style originated in this Iberian country during the Baroque era
Spain
Spain The Baroque had a Catholic and conservative character in Spain, following an Italian literary models during the Renaissance.
3
Development
González Mas , Ezequiel (1980).
ISBN 0-06-435332-X (cloth); ISBN 0-06-430077-3 (pbk.)
CROSSWORD CLUES "A": Blackjack's one or eleven(3)
ace
Face cards (kings, queens, and jacks) are counted as ten points.
2
Signal: The request to surrender is made verbally, there being no standard hand signal.
In the event of a disagreement between a player's hand signals and their words, the hand signal takes precedence.
MOVIE LOCATIONS: In the 1989 film "Batman", England's Knebworth House, seen here, played this stately home
Wayne Manor
Bruce is brought up in Wayne Manor, and leads a happy and privileged existence until the age of eight, when his parents are killed by a small-time criminal named Joe Chill while on their way home from a movie theater.
3
An American cultural icon, Batman has been licensed and adapted into a variety of media, from radio to television and film, and appears on a variety of merchandise sold all over the world, such as toys and video games.
Golden Age  In Batman's first appearance in Detective Comics #27, he is already operating as a crime-fighter.
These have included, for varying lengths of time:   Jean Paul Valley, also known as Azrael, who assumed the cowl after the events of the Knightfall saga  James Gordon, who donned a mech-suit after the events of Batman: Endgame, and currently serves as Batman  Additionally, members of the group Batman, Incorporated, Bruce Wayne's experiment at franchising his brand of vigilantism, stand in as the official Batman in cities around the world.
SPORTS INITIALS: Boston Red Sox player Jonathan David
Drew
Injuries would take a toll on the Red Sox offense during the season, most notably when David Ortiz missed 45 games with an injured wrist, Mike Lowell missed weeks with a torn hip labrum, and outfielder J. D. Drew aggravated a back injury that shelved him for much of the second half of the season.
3
Further, providing the Yankees with a box office attraction would help that mediocre club, which had sided with him against Johnson and "the Loyal Five" clubs.
1975  The Red Sox won the AL pennant in .
Their initials are shown in two stripes on the left field wall in Morse code.
CHILDREN'S BOOK NAMES: Beatrix Potter: "The Tale of   ___ Bunny" (not "The Curious Case of ___ Bunny")
Benjamin
In 1890 the firm of Hildesheimer and Faulkner bought several of her drawings of her rabbit Benjamin Bunny to illustrate verses by Frederic Weatherly titled A Happy Pair.
3
Potter was eclectic in her tastes: collecting fossils,Brian G. Gardiner, "Beatrix Potter's fossils and her interest in Geology," The Linnean: Newsletter and Proceedings of the Linnean Society of London 16/1 (January 2000), pp.
Wayside & Woodland Fungi
Potter is also featured in Susan Wittig Albert's series of light mysteries called The Cottage Tales of Beatrix Potter.
AT AUCTION: In September 1999 Billy Crystal paid $239,000 for a glove used in a game by this Yankee great
Mickey Mantle
He directed the made-for-television movie 61* (2001) based on Roger Maris's and Mickey Mantle's race to break Babe Ruth's single-season home run record in 1961.
3
He has hosted the Academy Awards 9 times, beginning in 1990 and most recently in 2012; second only to that of Bob Hope, who hosted 14 times.
He did perform on episode 17 of that first season, doing a monologue of an old jazz man capped by the line "Can you dig it?
Crystal appeared briefly in the Rob Reiner "rockumentary"
U.S. STAMPS: The Classic Movie Monsters stamps from 1997 included Bela Lugosi as him
Dracula
Béla Ferenc Dezső Blaskó (20 October 1882 – 16 August 1956), better known as Bela Lugosi, was a Hungarian-American actor, famous for portraying Count Dracula in the original 1931 film and for his roles in various other horror films.
2
He first went to Vienna and then settled in Berlin in the Langestrasse where he continued acting.
The studio then rehired Lugosi to star in new films.
SMART STUPID ANSWERS: He formed United Artists with Griffith, Pickford & Fairbanks & in 1915 lost a Charlie Chaplin look-alike contest
Charles Chaplin
Background and childhood hardship   Charles Spencer Chaplin was born on 16 April 1889 to Hannah Chaplin (born Hannah Harriet Pedlingham Hill) and Charles Chaplin, Sr.
3
340–345.
while the film scholar Donald McCaffrey sees it as an indication that Chaplin never completely understood film as a medium.
Hennessy, Mike (22 April 1967). "Chaplin's 'Song' Catches Fire in Europe".
MY CHARLEMAGNE MAN: In 814 Charlemagne was succeeded by his son, the first of many French kings of this name
Louis
His son Louis the Pious succeeded him.
3
The question of whether these jurisdictions were joint shares reverting to the other brother if one brother died or were inherited property passed on to the descendants of the brother who died was never definitely settled by the Frankish people.
Their mother was regent at Toledo, but Roderic, army chief of staff, staged a rebellion, capturing Cordova.
One year before, Pepin had finally defeated Waifer, Duke of Aquitaine, after waging a destructive, ten-year war against Aquitaine.
COLORADO: Toot toot!  By the late 1930s, this northwest Colorado town shipped itself out as "Ski Town, USA"
Steamboat Springs
Higher education in and near the Western Slope can be found at Colorado Mesa University in Grand Junction, Western State College of Colorado in Gunnison, Fort Lewis College in Durango, and Colorado Mountain College in Glenwood Springs and Steamboat Springs.
3
Much of the alpine snow melts by mid-August with the exception of a few snowcapped peaks and a few small glaciers.
Its isolated peak is visible from nearly the Kansas border on clear days, and also far to the north and the south.
thumb|upright|Pepsi Center, home of the Denver Nuggets, the Colorado Avalanche, and the Colorado Mammoth.
WORLD LEADERS: This "Paramount Leader" of China died February 19, 1997 at age 92
Deng Xiaoping
In 1976, Mao died, the Gang of Four was arrested, and Deng Xiaoping took power.
3
The journal was translated and published in England in 1555.Eden, Richard (1555).
p.459.
China also invests abroad, with a total outward FDI of $62.4 billion in 2012, and a number of major takeovers of foreign firms by Chinese companies.
THE 17th CENTURY: The 1689 Treaty of Nerchinsk fixed China's border with this country along the Amur River valley
Russia
Geography  Political geography  The People's Republic of China is the second-largest country in the world by land area after Russia, and is either the third- or fourth-largest by total area, after Russia, Canada and, depending on the definition of total area, the United States.
3
Communism in History and Theory.
Between 2007 and 2011, China's economic growth rate was equivalent to all of the G7 countries' growth combined.
Retrieved 18 July 2015.
THE IVORY TOWER: The White Pagoda in Lanzhou, China was originally built in memory of a monk of this religion
Buddhism
The Song dynasty also saw a revival of Confucianism, in response to the growth of Buddhism during the Tang, and a flourishing of philosophy and the arts, as landscape art and porcelain were brought to new levels of maturity and complexity."从汝窑、修内司窑和郊坛窑的技术传承看宋代瓷业的发展".
3
Monthly Review.
Financial Times.
News.xinhuanet.com (18 April 2013).
HISTORY 101: The lid seen here depicts a bird in this dynasty that was ruling China in 101
Han
It exercises jurisdiction over 22 provinces, five autonomous regions, four direct-controlled municipalities (Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing), and two mostly self-governing special administrative regions (Hong Kong and Macau); while claiming sovereignty over Taiwan.
3
ISBN 0-415-36447-7.
2010.
Military Power of the People's Republic of China 2009 (PDF).
CHINESE CULTURE: 3-letter English term for the ethnic group that makes up more than 90% of China's population
Han
It exercises jurisdiction over 22 provinces, five autonomous regions, four direct-controlled municipalities (Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing), and two mostly self-governing special administrative regions (Hong Kong and Macau); while claiming sovereignty over Taiwan.
3
Modern Chinese Warfare.
which is beyond the normal range of around 105 boys for every 100 girls.
Basketball is currently the most popular spectator sport in China."2014年6岁至69岁人群体育健身活动和体质状况抽测结果发布".
ANTHROPOLOGISTS: Hortense Powdermaker did fieldwork in this California place & wrote a book calling it "The Dream Factory"
Hollywood
20th century thumb|Hollywood film studios, 1922 Migration to California accelerated during the early 20th century with the completion of major transcontinental highways like the Lincoln Highway and Route 66.
3
Although only 1.5% of the State's economy, California's agriculture industry has the highest output of any U.S. State.
The UC system was originally given exclusive authority in awarding Ph.
New York: Cambridge University Press, 2012.
MUSIC OLDER THAN YOU: JFK was president when this California band hit the charts for the first time with "Surfin' Safari"
The Beach Boys
In the 1960s, popular music groups such as The Beach Boys promoted the image of Californians as laid-back, tanned beach-goers.
3
Several major tributaries feed into the Sacramento and the San Joaquin, including the Pit River, the Tuolumne River, and the Feather River.
Computers and electronic products are California's top export, accounting for 42 percent of all the state's exports in 2008.
In 2011, that number grew to $43.5 billion products revenue.
FOUNDER'S DAY: In 1776 Juan Bautista de Anza claimed the site for this California city's Presidio
San Francisco
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
2
The name California is most commonly believed to have derived from a fictional paradise peopled by Black Amazons and ruled by Queen Calafia.
The table below lists average temperatures for August and December in some of the major urban areas of California.
NORTHERN CALIFORNIA HISTORY: Sonoma was the site for this "beastly" 1846 rebellion against Mexican rule of California
the Bear Flag Revolt
In 1846 settlers rebelled against Mexican rule during the Bear Flag Revolt.
3
By 1854 over 300,000 settlers had come.
Jurupa Valley became the state's most recent and 482nd incorporated municipality on July 1, 2011.
A 2007 study concluded that California's public school system was "broken" in that it suffered from over-regulation.
MAYORS: Before representing California in the Senate, she was mayor of San Francisco
Dianne Feinstein
California's U.S. Senators are Dianne Feinstein, a native and former mayor of San Francisco, and Barbara Boxer, a former congresswoman from Marin County.
3
p. 40.
This dialect, known as California English, has a vowel shift and several other phonological processes that are different from the dialects used in other regions of the country.
California is also home to such notable private universities as Stanford University, the University of Southern California, the California Institute of Technology, and the Claremont Colleges.
BOTTLES OF WATER: Calistoga Water calls itself the original mineral water of this California valley better known for wine
Napa
In partciular, illegal immigrants tended to be concentrated in Los Angeles, Monterey, San Benito, Imperial, and Napa Counties – the latter four of which have significant agricultural industries that depend on manual labor.
3
Divided in two by the Sacramento-San Joaquin River Delta, the northern portion, the Sacramento Valley serves as the watershed of the Sacramento River, while the southern portion, the San Joaquin Valley is the watershed for the San Joaquin River.
Along the California coast are several major metropolitan areas, including the Greater Los Angeles Area, the San Francisco Bay Area, and the San Diego metropolitan area.
California's wind farms include Altamont Pass, San Gorgonio Pass, and Tehachapi Pass.
CALIFORNIA DREAMIN': Home to Theo Kearney, the Raisin King of California, this city grew up around a train station
Fresno
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
Alta California became a part of Mexico in 1821 following its successful war for independence, but was ceded to the United States in 1848 after the Mexican–American War.
Reptiles such as the garter snakes and rattlesnakes inhabit the zone.
It is currently projected that Hispanics will rise to 49% of the population by 2060, primarily due to domestic births rather than immigration.
COMING TO AMERICA: Chinese immigrants began to arrive in California just before this 1849 "rush"
Gold Rush
The California Gold Rush starting in 1848 led to dramatic social and demographic change, with large-scale immigration from the east and abroad with an accompanying economic boom.
3
Water from the Delta provides drinking water for nearly 23 million people, almost two-thirds of the state's population as well as water for farmers on the west side of the San Joaquin Valley.
Members of the Assembly are subject to term limits of three terms, and members of the Senate are subject to term limits of two terms.
Local government  Counties  California is divided into 58 counties.
TREES: A national park in California is named for this yucca plant that grows there
the Joshua tree
The Joshua tree is found in the Mojave Desert.
3
California's diverse geography ranges from the Sierra Nevada in the east to the Pacific Coast in the west, from the redwood–Douglas fir forests of the northwest, to the Mojave Desert areas in the southeast.
Subsequent locations included Vallejo (1852–1853), and nearby Benicia (1853–1854); these locations eventually proved to be inadequate as well.
The county government provides countywide services such as law enforcement, jails, elections and voter registration, vital records, property assessment and records, tax collection, public health, health care, social services, libraries, flood control, fire protection, animal control, agricultural regulations, building inspections, ambulance services, and education departments in charge of maintaining statewide standards.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: Chile's Juan Fernandez islands include a pair named for Alexander Selkirk & this fictional character
Robinson Crusoe
Chile controls Easter Island and Sala y Gómez Island, the easternmost islands of Polynesia, which it incorporated to its territory in 1888, and Robinson Crusoe Island, more than  from the mainland, in the Juan Fernández Islands.
3
Stone tool evidence indicates humans sporadically frequented the Monte Verde valley area as long as 18,500 years ago.
A rescue effort organized by the Chilean government located the miners 17 days later.
The country is an active member of the UN family of agencies and participates in UN peacekeeping activities.
"B.O.": Chile's liberator
Bernardo O'Higgins
Independence and nation building  thumb|upright|Bernardo O'Higgins, The Supreme Director of Chile.
3
At the end of his term, Frei had not fully achieved his party's ambitious goals.
The territory would be shaped by millions of years due to the folding of the rocks, forming the current relief.
The Chilean Army is one of the most professional and technologically advanced armies in Latin America.
EASTERN EUROPE: You can "spot" Croatia's tourist cities Split & Dubrovnik in this coastal region for which a dog breed is named
Dalmatia
right|thumb|Coronation of King Tomislav by Oton Iveković. The Venetians gained control over most of Dalmatia by 1428, with exception of the city-state of Dubrovnik which became independent.
3
Emperor Diocletian built a large palace in Split when he retired in AD 305.
The 1921 constitution defining the country as a unitary state and abolition of historical administrative divisions effectively ended Croatian autonomy.
The busiest motorways are the A1, connecting Zagreb to Split and the A3, passing east–west through northwest Croatia and Slavonia.
PERIOD: As evidenced by Dover, England, the Cretaceous period's name derives from this type of limestone
chalk
The Cretaceous (, ), derived from the Latin "creta" (chalk), usually abbreviated K for its German translation Kreide (chalk), is a geologic period and system from   to  years (Ma) ago.
3
(129.4-132.9 MYA)
279–81
Insects diversified during the Cretaceous, and the oldest known ants, termites and some lepidopterans, akin to butterflies and moths, appeared.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: A state park in Columbus in this state is named for Pancho Villa
New Mexico
1920, who had to fight 20 years later  Scott Columbus, long-time drummer for the heavy metal band Manowar   Places named Columbus  In the United States, Columbus may refer to:   Populated places   Columbus, Georgia  Columbus, Illinois  Columbus, Indiana  Columbus, Kansas  Columbus, Kentucky  Columbus, Minnesota  Columbus, Mississippi  Columbus, Missouri  Columbus, Montana  Columbus, Nebraska  Columbus, New Jersey  Columbus, New Mexico  Columbus, New York  Columbus, North Carolina  Columbus, North Dakota  Columbus, Ohio   Columbus, Texas  Columbus, Wisconsin  Columbus (town), Wisconsin   Other uses   Columbus (2015 film), an Indian film  Columbus (ISS module), the European module for the International Space Station  Columbus (novel), a 1941 novel by the British writer Rafael Sabatini depicting the explorations of Christopher Columbus  Columbus (song), a song by the band Kent from their album Tillbaka till samtiden  Columbus (spacecraft), a program to develop a European space station 1986–1991  Columbus (Star Trek), a shuttlecraft in Star Trek series  COLUMBUS, ab initio quantum chemistry software  Columbus Communications, a cable television and broadband speed Internet service provider in the Caribbean region  Columbus hops, a variety of hops  Columbus Salame, an American food processing company  Columbus Tubing, an Italian manufacturer of bicycle frame tubing  ColumBus, former name of Howard Transit in Howard County, Maryland  MS Columbus, a cruise ship owned by Hapag-Lloyd  SS Christopher Columbus, Great Lakes excursion liner (1893–1933)  SS City of Columbus, a passenger steamer that sailed from Boston to Savannah and sank off Martha's Vineyard in 1884  SS Columbus (1873), an American merchantman converted in 1878 into the Russian cruiser Asia  SS Columbus (1924), a transatlantic ocean liner for the North German Lloyd steamship line  USS Columbus, various ships of the US Navy   See also   Columbia (disambiguation)  Columbus Day  Columbus Township (disambiguation)  St. Columba  Carry On Columbus, a 1992 film  Waiting For Columbus, 1978 live album by the rock band Little Feat
2
Columbus is a Latinized version of the Italian surname "Colombo".
It most commonly refers to:   Christopher Columbus  Columbus, Ohio, United States  Columbus may also refer to:   People   Bartholomew Columbus, younger brother of Christopher Columbus  Chris Columbus (filmmaker), American film maker  Columbus Caldwell, American politician   Columbus Edwards, the character known as Lum of Lum and Abner  Columbus Germain, American politician  Columbus Short, American choreographer and actor  Diego Columbus, eldest son of Christopher Columbus  Ferdinand Columbus, the second son of Christopher Columbus  Generation of Columbuses, tragic generation of Poles born ca.
ROYAL WOMEN: Christopher Marlowe lived his whole life as her subject
Elizabeth I
The Massacre at Paris is considered his most dangerous play, as agitators in London seized on its theme to advocate the murders of refugees from the low countries and, indeed, it warns Elizabeth I of this possibility in its last scene.
3
He also implies that Marlowe had Catholic sympathies.
When these thinges shalbe Called in question the witnes shalbe produced.
" This appears to be a reference to Marlowe's murder which involved a fight over the "reckoning", the bill, as well as to a line in Marlowe's Jew of Malta"Infinite riches in a little room".
LITERATURE: Despite its title, this 1848 Charles Dickens novel is ultimately about a father & his daughter, not his son
Dombey and Son
Huffam is thought to be the inspiration for Paul Dombey, the owner of a shipping company in Dickens's eponymous Dombey and Son (1848).
3
Simon Callow, Charles Dickens and the Great theatre of the World, p.60
he was laid to rest in the Poets' Corner of Westminster Abbey.
In Robert Louis Stevenson's novel "The Wrecker", there is a comment by Captain Nares, investigating an abandoned ship:  "See!
THE EX FILES: Few recall that she played Frasier's first ex-wife on "Cheers"; now she's Kenneth Branagh's ex
Emma Thompson
Emma Thompson guest starred as Nanny G/Nannette Guzman, a famous singing nanny and Frasier's ex-wife.
3
Sam had a long-running feud with the upscale restaurant above the bar, Melville's Fine Sea Food.
Cheers owners thumb|The Cheers sign in 2005.
The Pub itself is at 84 Beacon Street.
THIS LAND IS YOUR LAND: Of Pittsburgh, Cleveland & Detroit, the city that's farthest east
Pittsburgh
The wedding and reception scenes in The Deer Hunter (1978), while set in the small Pittsburgh suburb of Clairton, were actually shot in the Cleveland neighborhood of Tremont; U.S. Steel also permitted the production to film in one of its Cleveland mills.
3
National Weather Service.
Local mainstays of Cleveland's cuisine include an abundance of Polish and Central European contributions, such as kielbasa, stuffed cabbage and pierogies.
The two downtown avenues which span the Cuyahoga change names on the west side of the river.
C IS FOR...: Circe, who turned this seafarer's men into swine
Odysseus
thumb|Circe Offering the Cup to Odysseus (1891) by John William Waterhouse  In Greek mythology, Circe (; Greek Κίρκη Kírkē ) is a goddess of magic (or sometimes a nymph, witch, enchantress or sorceress).
3
Her sister was Pasiphaë, the wife of King Minos and mother of the Minotaur.
In later Christian opinion, Circe was an abominable witch using miraculous powers to evil ends.
Lactantius Placidus, Commentarii in Statii Thebaida Ovid, Metamorphoses xiv.248-308
ALPHABETICALLY LAST: ...of the 7 nations of Central America
Panama
Central America consists of seven countries: Belize, Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, Nicaragua, and Panama.
2
The Captaincy General formally ended on 15 September 1821, with the signing of the Act of Independence of Central America.
Nicaragua is the second poorest country in the western hemisphere (only Haiti is poorer).
THE MASTERS: Born in Crete, this painter studied under Titian in Venice before becoming a master of Spanish art
El Greco
The most notable representatives of this Cretan renaissance were the painter El Greco and the writers Nicholas Kalliakis (1645–1707), Georgios Kalafatis (professor) (c. 1652–1720), Andreas Musalus (c. 1665–1721) and Vitsentzos Kornaros.
3
During the Cretan summer, average temperatures reach the high 20s-low 30s Celsius (mid 80s to mid 90s Fahrenheit), with maxima touching the upper 30s-mid 40s.
Butterfly species include the swallowtail butterfly.
thumb|200px|Small Byzantine church Holy spirit(Agiou pneumatos) in Limnakaro plateau; dates back to the second Byzantine period.
HISTORIC PEOPLE: On December 16, 1653 the British parliament installed him as Lord Protector of the Commonwealth
Oliver Cromwell
England  The Commonwealth of England was the official name of the political unit (de facto military rule in the name of parliamentary supremacy) that replaced the Kingdom of England (after the English Civil War) from 1649–53 and 1659–60, under the rule of Oliver Cromwell and his son and successor Richard.
3
In the 17th century the definition of "commonwealth" expanded from its original sense of "public welfare" or "commonweal" to mean "a state in which the supreme power is vested in the people; a republic or democratic state".
The name was used officially for the confederal country formed by Poland and Lithuania 1569–1795.
U.S. insular areas  "Commonwealth" is also used in the United States to describe the political relationship between the United States and the overseas unincorporated territories:  Commonwealth of the Philippines – formed in 1934, and became independent in 1946, upon which "Commonwealth" was replaced by "Republic".
FAITH IN AMERICA: Illinois has the Diocese of Peoria, Diocese of Joliet & this of Chicago, headed by cardinal George
archdiocese
According to Reboot Illinois, the largest employers in the city of Chicago are:  #Employer# of Employees1U.S. Government49,8602Chicago Public Schools39,0943City of Chicago30,3404Cook County, Illinois21,4825Advocate Health System18,5126JPMorgan Chase16,0457University of Chicago15,4528State of Illinois14,7319United Continental Holdings14,00010AT&T Illinois14,00011Walgreens13,65712Abbott Laboratories12,00013Presence Health 11,95914Chicago Transit Authority11,10015University of Illinois at Chicago9,90016Northwestern Memorial Healthcare9,61417American Airlines9,60018Jewel-Osco9,15519Northwestern University9,12120Allstate7,80821AON7,66722Rush University Medical Center7,50023Archdiocese of Chicago7,50024Walmart7,26025Northern Trust Company6,644  Culture and contemporary life  thumb|upright|left|A Chicago jazz club thumb|upright|right|The National Hellenic Museum in Greektown is one of several ethnic museums comprising the Chicago Cultural Alliance.
3
A flourishing economy brought residents from rural communities and immigrants from abroad.
thumb|left|Court of Honor at the World's Columbian Exposition in 1893 Chicago's flourishing economy attracted huge numbers of new immigrants from Europe and migrants from the Eastern United States.
Most conventions are held at McCormick Place, just south of Soldier Field.
FAMOUS NAMES: A knife cut to his cheek gave this Chicago gangster the nickname "Scarface"
Al Capone
The 1920s saw gangsters, including Al Capone, Dion O'Banion, Bugs Moran and Tony Accardo battle law enforcement and each other on the streets of Chicago during the Prohibition era.
3
Downtown is the center of Chicago's financial, cultural, governmental and commercial institutions and the site of Grant Park and many of the city's skyscrapers.
Enthusiasts of the Chicago-style dog frown upon the use of ketchup as a garnish, but may prefer to add giardiniera.
The Chicago campus of Northwestern University includes the Feinberg School of Medicine; Northwestern Memorial Hospital, which is ranked as the best hospital in the Chicago metropolitan area by U.S. News & World Report for 2010–11; the Rehabilitation Institute of Chicago, which is ranked the best U.S. rehabilitation hospital by U.S. News & World Report; the new Prentice Women's Hospital; and Ann & Robert H. Lurie Children's Hospital of Chicago.
STUPID ANSWERS: In June 1997 this Chicago department store marshalled its forces for a "Field Days Sale"
Marshall Field
Chicago was the base of commercial operations for industrialists John Crerar, John Whitfield Bunn, Richard Teller Crane, Marshall Field, John Farwell, Julius Rosenwald and many other commercial visionaries who laid the foundation for Midwestern and global industry.
3
These set a precedent for worldwide construction.
What would become the influential Poetry magazine was founded in 1912 by Harriet Monroe, who was working as an art critic for the Chicago Tribune.
William Rainey Harper, the first president of the University of Chicago, was instrumental in the creation of the junior college concept, establishing nearby Joliet Junior College as the first in the nation in 1901.
THAT'S THE CHICAGO WAY!: On Feb. 14, 1929 it was that's all folks for 7 members of this Chicago mobster's gang
Bugs Moran
The 1920s saw gangsters, including Al Capone, Dion O'Banion, Bugs Moran and Tony Accardo battle law enforcement and each other on the streets of Chicago during the Prohibition era.
3
About 18.3% of families and 22.1% of the population lived below the poverty line.
The headquarters of United Continental Holdings, are in the United Building and its operations center and its United Airlines subsidiary are in the Willis Tower in Chicago.
Many of the city's financial institutions, such as the CBOT and the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago, are located within a section of downtown called "The Loop", which is an eight-block by five-block area of city streets that is encircled by elevated rail tracks.
HEY, SPORT!: On January 13, 1999 this Chicago Bulls player retired after 13 seasons in which he averaged 31.5 points a game
Michael Jordan
A number of statues also honor recent local heroes such as Michael Jordan (by Amrany and Rotblatt-Amrany), Stan Mikita, and Bobby Hull outside of the United Center; Harry Caray (by Amrany and Cella) outside Wrigley field, Jack Brickhouse (by McKenna) next to the WGN studios, and Irv Kupcinet at the Wabash Avenue Bridge.
3
In the mid-18th century, the area was inhabited by a Native American tribe known as the Potawatomi, who had taken the place of the Miami and Sauk and Fox peoples.
Lakeview has Boystown, which, along with Andersonville, are the best-known LGBT neighborhoods.
Montejano 1998, pp
VAMPIRE SLAYERS: In this 1985 classic, Roddy McDowall hunts down vampire Chris Sarandon
Fright Night
Christopher "Chris" Sarandon, Jr. (; born July 24, 1942) is an American actor and voice actor who is best known for playing Prince Humperdinck in the film The Princess Bride, the vampire Jerry Dandrige in Fright Night and Detective Mike Norris in the first entry of the Child's Play series, and for providing the speaking voice of Jack Skellington from The Nightmare Before Christmas.
3
He received accolades for his portrayal of Sydney Carton in a made for television version of A Tale of Two Cities (1980), co-starred with Dennis Hopper in The Osterman Weekend (1983), which was based on the Robert Ludlum novel of the same name, and co-starred with Goldie Hawn in Protocol (1984).
He also provided the voice of Jack Skellington, the main character in Tim Burton's animated Disney film The Nightmare Before Christmas (1993), and has since reprised the role in many other subsequent productions, including the Disney/Square video games Kingdom Hearts and Kingdom Hearts II and the Capcom sequel to the original film, Oogie's Revenge.
2000–2002  ER  Dr. Burke  Episodes: "The Greatest of Gifts"  "Piece of Mind"  "It's All in Your Head" 2002–2004  Law & Order  Howard Pincham  Episode: "Gov Love""The Wheel"2002     The Court  Justice Vorhees  3 episodes 2003  The Wild Thornberrys  Myka  Episode: "Look Who's Squawking" Charmed  NecromancerArmand  Episode: "Necromancing the Stone" 2004  Cold Case  Adam Clarke  Episode: "Volunteers" 2006  Law & Order: Special Victims Unit  Weasly Masoner  Episode: "Choreographed" 2010  Psych  Ashton Bonaventure  Episode: "Think Tank" The Good Wife  Judge Howard Matchick  Episode: "Taking Control"
"DAY" OR "NIGHT": On his 20th attempt, Dale Earnhardt won this grueling auto race February 15, 1998
Daytona 500
Considered one of the best NASCAR drivers,http://msn.foxsports.com/nascar/lists/Ranking-the-20-greatest-NASCAR-drivers-of-all-time Earnhardt won a total of 76 Winston Cup races over the course of his career, including one Daytona 500 victory in 1998.
3
His aggressive driving style earned him the nickname "The Intimidator".
He has been inducted into numerous halls of fame, including the inaugural class of the NASCAR Hall of Fame in 2010.
On the strength of those performances, Earnhardt was able to get to second in the standings.
NASCAR SPONSORS: "When you say" this sponsor of Dale Earnhardt, Jr.'s car, "you've said it all"
Budweiser
On June 18, 2006, at Michigan for the 3M Performance 400, Earnhardt, Jr. ran a special vintage Budweiser car to honor his father and his grandfather Ralph Earnhardt.
3
1997 In 1997, Earnhardt went winless for only the second time in his career.
He scored what were considered the two most exciting wins of the year—winning by 0.010 seconds over Bobby Labonte at Atlanta, then gaining seventeen positions in the final four laps to win at Talladega, claiming his only No Bull million dollar bonus along with his record 10th win at the track.
33 while driving that series part-time.)  Richard Childress Racing entered the number 3 in the Daytona Truck race on February 13, 2010, painted identically to when Earnhardt drove it, but with Bass Pro Shops as a sponsor.
FORGOTTEN MUSICALS: He hadn't moved to Mayberry yet when he played the Jimmy Stewart role in the 1959 musical "Destry Rides Again"
Andy Griffith
Produced by David Merrick, the show had a book by Leonard Gershe, music and lyrics by Harold Rome, and starred Andy Griffith as Destry and Dolores Gray as Frenchy.
3
Jimmy Stewart: A Life in Film.
Prendergast, Tom and Sara, eds.
ISBN 0-8065-1081-1.
STATE FLOWERS: Interestingly, this fruit's blossom is the state flower of Delaware, but not of Georgia
peach
Agriculture thumb|right|"Picking Peaches in Delaware" from an 1878 issue of Harper's Weekly Delaware's agricultural output consists of poultry, nursery stock, soybeans, dairy products and corn.
3
It could also be linked with a patronymic from the Old Norse verr.
When John Dickinson freed his slaves in 1777, he was Delaware's largest slave owner with 37 slaves.
Real estate is subject to county property taxes, school district property taxes, vocational school district taxes, and, if located within an incorporated area, municipal property taxes.
HAPPY 200th, LINCOLN & DARWIN: Maiden name of Darwin's wife; she came from the pottery-making family & was shattered by his talk of evolution
Wedgwood
North America  Darwin, California, in Inyo County  Darwin, Fresno County, California  Darwin Falls, a waterfall in California  Darwin Falls Wilderness  Darwin Township, Clark County, Illinois  Darwin School, Manitoba  Darwin, Minnesota  Darwin, Ohio  Darwin, Virginia  Mount Darwin (California)  South America  Cordillera Darwin, Tierra del Fuego  Darwin Channel  Darwin, Falkland Islands  Darwin Island, Galapagos Islands  Darwin Sound  Mount Darwin (Andes), Tierra del Fuego  Darwin, Río Negro, a municipality in Río Negro Province, Argentina  Craters  Darwin (lunar crater)  Darwin (Martian crater), a crater on Mars  Darwin Crater, in Tasmania  Other uses  Darwin Rebellion, a demonstration which took place in Australia in 1918  Darwin Baseball League, North Australian sport  Darwin Rugby League, North Australian sport, see Northern Territory Rugby League  Darwin Airline, based in Switzerland  See also  Darwen (disambiguation)  Darwinia (disambiguation)  Darwin Awards  Darwin glass  Darwin Day  Darwin-Wedgwood family  List of things named after Charles Darwin
2
Darwin most often refers to:   Charles Darwin (1809–1882), English naturalist and writer, best known as the originator of the theory of biological evolution by natural selection  Charles Galton Darwin (1887–1962), English physicist, the grandson of Charles Darwin.
Darwin, Northern Territory, a capital city in Australia  Darwin (surname), a surname (including a list of people with the name) Darwin may also refer to the following:  Science and technology  Darwin (unit), a unit of evolutionary change, defined by J.B.S. Haldane  Darwin (ESA), a European Space Agency project  RRS Charles Darwin, a British ship  1991 Darwin, a main-belt asteroid  Darwin Medal  Darwin Lagrangian  Computing  Darwin (programming game)  Darwin (operating system), the Unix base for Apple's Mac OS X operating system  Darwin Streaming Server  XDarwin  Darwin Information Typing Architecture  Darwin (ADL) An Architecture Description Language  Entertainment  Darwin (2011 film), a 2011 documentary film  Darwin (2015 film), a 2015 science fiction film by Alain Desrochers  Darwin (seaQuest DSV), a dolphin in the TV series seaQuest DSV  Darwin 4078, an arcade game  Darwin (comics), a fictional character in the Marvel Comics Universe, associated with X-Men  Darwin!, a 1972 musical album by Banco del Mutuo Soccorso  Darwin's Nightmare, a 2004 documentary film  Darwin, a fictional fish with legs in the animated TV series "The Amazing World of Gumball"  Darwin, a 1993 television film by Peter Greenaway  Places  Mount Darwin, Zimbabwe  Darwin Glacier (Antarctica)  Darwin Mountains, Antarctica  Darwin Bank, an oil field in Azerbaijan  Australia  Darwin, Northern Territory  Darwin International Airport  Charles Darwin National Park  Charles Darwin Reserve  Charles Darwin University  Darwin River, Northern Territory  Darwin Dam (Tasmania)  Division of Darwin, 1903–1955 election division  Mount Darwin (Tasmania)  Darwin, Tasmania  United Kingdom  Darwin College, Cambridge  Darwin College, Kent  Darwin Shopping Centre, Shrewsbury  The Darwin Centre, of the Natural History Museum, London  Darwin (ward), an electoral ward in the London Borough of Bromley.
SPORTS STARS: In 1999 this Denver Broncos quarterback retired after 16 seasons & 2 Super Bowl championships
John Elway
They have won eight AFC Championships and two Super Bowl championships, and have four players in the Pro Football Hall of Fame: John Elway, Floyd Little, Gary Zimmerman and Shannon Sharpe.
3
Denver took a 21–3 lead, but Browns' quarterback Bernie Kosar threw four touchdown passes to tie the game at 31–31 halfway through the 4th quarter.
Cleveland advanced to Denver's 8-yard line with 1:12 left, but Broncos' safety Jeremiah Castille stripped Browns' running back Earnest Byner of the football at the 2-yard line — a play that has been called The Fumble by Browns' fans.
When the Broncos debuted in , their original uniforms drew as much attention as their play on the field.
ENGLISH LIT: A 1719 work by Daniel Defoe told of "The Life and Strange Surprizing Adventures of" this man, "of York, Mariner"
Robinson Crusoe
The day of his death is also uncertain." born Daniel Foe, was an English trader, writer, journalist, pamphleteer, and spy, most famous for his novel Robinson Crusoe.
3
Carroll & Graf.
It caused severe damage to London and Bristol, uprooted millions of trees, and killed more than 8,000 people, mostly at sea.
Thanks to books such as The Letters of Daniel Defoe (edited by G. H. Healey, Oxford 1955), far more is known about his activities than is usual with such agents.
HOLLYWOOD: David Mamet wrote the screenplay for this 1987 film about Eliot Ness & Co.
The Untouchables
Always Rings Twice (1981), directed by Bob Rafelson, The Untouchables (1987) directed by Brian De Palma, Hoffa (1992), Ronin (1998), Wag
3
The Guardian.
Newsweek / The Daily Beast.
George Aaronow and Dave Moss equivocate on the meaning of "talk" and "speak", turning language and meaning to deceptive purposes:  Moss  No.
WORD ORIGINS: This residential district of Dublin held an annual fair from 1204 to 1855, when it was closed due to frequent fights
Donnybrook
RTÉ is Ireland's national state broadcaster, and is based in Donnybrook.
3
One of the memorials to commemorate that time is the Garden of Remembrance.
In 2009, Dublin was listed as the fourth richest city in the world by purchasing power and 10th richest by personal income.
thumb|left|Book of Kells There are several theatres within the city centre, and various world famous actors have emerged from the Dublin theatrical scene, including Noel Purcell, Sir Michael Gambon, Brendan Gleeson, Stephen Rea, Colin Farrell, Colm Meaney and Gabriel Byrne.
BIG SCREEN BLOODSUCKERS: Before taking a bite out of Susan Sarandon, this French actress put David Bowie in a box in 1983's "The Hunger"
Catherine Deneuve
Sandford (1997); p. 208 Bowie starred in The Hunger (1983), with Catherine Deneuve and Susan Sarandon.
3
After a disastrous opening gig at the London Roundhouse, they reverted to a configuration presenting Bowie as a solo artist.
In a 2014 analysis of 77 "top" artists' vocal ranges, Bowie was 8th, just behind Christina Aguilera and just ahead of Paul McCartney.
In the ensuing decades he has been honoured with numerous awards for his music and its accompanying videos, receiving, among others, two Grammy Awards and three Brit Awards—winning Best British Male Artist twice and in 1996 the award for Outstanding Contribution to Music.
ROLE: Danny Kaye sang about "Wonderful Copenhagen" when he played this role on film in 1952
Hans Christian Andersen
Kaye starred in 17 movies, notably Wonder Man (1945), The Kid from Brooklyn (1946), The Secret Life of Walter Mitty (1947), The Inspector General (1949), Hans Christian Andersen (1952), White Christmas (1954), and The Court Jester (1956).
2
The strong wind hurled a piece of the hotel's cornice into Kaye's room; had he been hit, he might well have been killed.
Jack Benny or Dore Schary might say, "Kaplan, why do you hate unions so?
STAMPS: A series honoring DC Comics super heroes included this former king of the Seven Seas
Aquaman
DC Comics is one of the largest and most successful companies operating in American comic books, and produces material featuring numerous well-known heroic characters, including Batman, Superman,  Wonder Woman, Green Lantern, Flash, Aquaman, Shazam, Hawkman and Green Arrow.
3
When the popularity of superheroes faded in the late 1940s, the company focused on such genres as science fiction, Westerns, humor, and romance.
In 2005, the critically lauded Batman Begins film was released; also, the company published several limited series establishing increasingly escalated conflicts among DC's heroes, with events climaxing in the Infinite Crisis limited series.
The logo was designed by Josh Beatman of Brainchild StudiosDC Comics Brand History by Brainchild Studios.
EARTH, WIND OR FIRE: Boreas was a Greek god of this
wind
By , Earth's magnetic field was established, which helped prevent the atmosphere from being stripped away by the solar wind.
3
This equates to  (139.43 million sq mi).
Another anomaly is the impact of landmass on temperature, manifested by the fact that Earth is much warmer at aphelion, where the planet is at a more distant position from the Sun.
During these approaches, it can orbit Earth for brief periods of time.
"GEN"ERAL SCIENCE: The atmosphere around the Dead Sea should make you feel good; it has more of this than anywhere else on Earth
oxygen
The development of photosynthesis allowed the Sun's energy to be harvested directly by life forms; the resultant molecular oxygen (O2) accumulated in the atmosphere and due to interaction with ultraviolet solar radiation, formed a layer of protective ozone (O3) in the upper atmosphere.
3
Earth is expected to be effectively habitable for about another  from that point, although this may be extended up to  if the nitrogen is removed from the atmosphere.
Without this tilt, there would be an eclipse every two weeks, alternating between lunar eclipses and solar eclipses.
Astronaut Photography Gateway –
IT'S A WEIRD WORLD: In Earth's history, this field has flipped over many times switching its north & south poles
Magnetic field
Earth's interior remains active with a solid iron inner core, a liquid outer core that generates the magnetic field, and a convecting mantle that drives plate tectonics.
3
Surface  thumb|left|Present-day Earth altimetry and bathymetry.
The highest air temperature ever measured on Earth was  in Furnace Creek, California, in Death Valley, in 1913.
The Moon may have dramatically affected the development of life by moderating the planet's climate.
HARVARD MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from the Harvard Museum of Natural History in Cambridge, MA.)  The Harvard Museum has part of the famous Zagami meteorite, which fell to the Earth in Nigeria in 1962; gases trapped inside match those found by Viking spacecraft, confirming the rock's distant origin on this planet
Mars
The working hypothesis is that it formed by accretion from material loosed from Earth after a Mars-sized object, named Theia, impacted with Earth.
3
Instead, most of the hydrogen loss comes from the destruction of methane in the upper atmosphere.
The convection movements in the core are chaotic; the magnetic poles drift and periodically change alignment.
In addition to an annual component to this motion, there is a 14-month cycle called the Chandler wobble.
ASTRONOMY: When "shadow bands" are seen on Earth, it means this is about to happen up in the heavens
an eclipse
Without this tilt, there would be an eclipse every two weeks, alternating between lunar eclipses and solar eclipses.
3
On time scales lasting hundreds of millions of years, the supercontinents have formed and broken up three times.
Local topography deviates from this idealized spheroid, although on a global scale these deviations are small compared to Earth's radius: The maximum deviation of only 0.17% is at the Mariana Trench ( below local sea level), whereas Mount Everest ( above local sea level) represents a deviation of 0.14%.
The estimated amount of irrigated land in 1993 was .
GEOGRAPHER'S DICTIONARY: From the Latin for "to gnaw", it's the natural process by which material is worn away from the Earth's surface
Erosion
The planetary surface undergoes reshaping over geological time periods due to tectonics and erosion.
3
The luminosity of the Sun will grow by 10% over the next  and by 40% over the next .
This last phenomenon is known as the greenhouse effect: trace molecules within the atmosphere serve to capture thermal energy emitted from the ground, thereby raising the average temperature.
Because the southern hemisphere is tilted toward the Sun at about the same time that Earth reaches the closest approach to the Sun, the southern hemisphere receives slightly more energy from the Sun than does the northern over the course of a year.
4-LETTER WORDS: The Anti-Grigori Efimovich Society believes in this type of Earth
Flat
In theory, a solar nebula partitions a volume out of a molecular cloud by gravitational collapse, which begins to spin and flatten into a circumstellar disk, and then the planets grow out of that along with the Sun.
3
Earth  (also the world, in  Gaia, or in Latin: TerraOxford English Dictionary),  "terra, n." Oxford University Press (Oxford), 1911.) is the third planet from the Sun, the densest planet in the Solar System, the largest of the Solar System's four terrestrial planets, and the only astronomical object known to harbor life.
Angela Hall as Dictionary of Northern Mythology,  D.S. Brewer, 2007.
Earth's surface is traditionally divided into seven continents and various seas.
ALSO A VEGAS CASINO: It extends upwards from the tropopause to about 30 miles above the Earth
the stratosphere
Above the troposphere, the atmosphere is usually divided into the stratosphere, mesosphere, and thermosphere.
3
The present pattern of ice ages began about  and then intensified during the Pleistocene about .
In modern times, Earth's perihelion occurs around January 3, and its aphelion around July 4.
Most of the growth is expected to take place in developing nations.
THE "U"SUAL PLACES: Now the second-largest country in Europe, it hosted the Yalta Conference in 1945
Ukraine
Further east, the Nogai Horde and Kazakh Khanate frequently raided the Slavic-speaking areas of Russia, Ukraine and Poland for hundreds of years, until the Russian expansion and conquest of most of northern Eurasia (i.e. Eastern Europe, Central Asia and Siberia).
3
(Jan. 1943), pp.
Napoleon's Grande Armée had lost about half a million men.
The Gulf Stream is nicknamed "Europe's central heating", because it makes Europe's climate warmer and wetter than it would otherwise be.
EUROPEAN GEOGRAPHY: Until 1940, Lake Ladoga, the largest entirely within Europe, was shared by Russia & this country to the west
Finland
On 24 September, the Soviet Union attacked the Baltic countries and later, Finland.
3
Key: blue: states which straddle the border between Europe and Asia; green: states not geographically in Europe, but closely associated with the continent  thumb|left|Reconstruction of Herodotus' world map thumb|A medieval T and O map from 1472 showing the three continents as domains of the sons of Noah — Asia to Sem (Shem), Europe to Iafeth (Japheth), and Africa to Cham (Ham)
The invention and implementation of new technologies resulted in rapid urban growth, mass employment, and the rise of a new working class.
This extended lowland is known as the Great European Plain, and at its heart lies the North German Plain.
WORLD HERITAGE SITES: This 73-mile-long heritage site was built back in 122 A.D. to keep northern invaders out of England
Hadrian's Wall
Perhaps the best-known example is Hadrian's Wall stretching right across northern England.
3
The Angles were one of the Germanic tribes that settled in Great Britain during the Early Middle Ages.
Sausages are commonly eaten, either as bangers and mash or toad in the hole.
Nick Faldo is the most successful Ryder Cup player ever, having won the most points (25) of any player on either the European or U.S. teams."Sir Nick Faldo drives on in business world".
ENGLAND: He's also known as the primate of all England
the Archbishop of Canterbury
Religion thumb|alt=Large yellow stone ornate building with buttresses and square central tower.|right|Canterbury Cathedral, seat of the Archbishop of Canterbury  According to the 2011 census, 59.4% of the population is Christian, 24.7% non-religious, 5% is Muslim while 3.7% of the population belongs to other religions and 7.2 did not give an answer.
3
It is separated from France by a  sea gap, though the two countries are connected by the Channel Tunnel near Folkestone.
GKN Aerospace – an expert in metallic and composite aerostructures is involved in almost every civil and military fixed and rotary wing aircraft in production is based in Redditch.
Retrieved 17 January 2014 Many successful Hollywood films have been based on English people, stories or events.
MEDIEVAL EUROPE: The Perpendicular style was the last phase of this architectural style in England
Gothic
thumb|Westminster Abbey is a notable example of English Gothic architecture.
2
Rail transport in England is the oldest in the world: passenger railways originated in England in 1825.
They were expelled from England in 1290 following the Edict of Expulsion, only to be allowed back in 1656.
IT'S MY PARTY: This party took power in England after 18 years on the sidelines when Tony Blair won in 1997
Labour
The Conservative party, headed by the prime minister David Cameron, won 98 more seats than the Labour Party, whose leader Ed Miliband subsequently stood down.
3
Hinduism, Sikhism and Buddhism are next in number, adding up to 2.8% combined, introduced from India and South East Asia.
One of his four Coronation Anthems, Zadok the Priest, composed for the coronation of George II, has been performed at every subsequent British coronation, traditionally during the sovereign's anointing.
Famous for recording many motion picture film scores, the London Symphony Orchestra first performed film music in 1935.London Symphony Orchestra and Film Music LSO. Retrieved 30 June 2011  The BFI Top 100 British films includes Monty Python's Life of Brian (1979), a film regularly voted the funniest of all time by the UK public."Life of Brian tops comedy poll".
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: This Coventry, England company made its first motorcycle in 1902 & began making its own engines in 1905
Triumph
With the introduction of Ancient Roman architecture there was a development of basilicas, baths, amphitheaters, triumphal arches, villas, Roman temples, Roman roads, Roman forts, stockades and aqueducts.
3
In 1588, during the Elizabethan period, an English fleet under Francis Drake defeated an invading Spanish Armada.
The physician Edward Jenner's smallpox vaccine is said to have "saved more lives ... than were lost in all the wars of mankind since the beginning of recorded history."
It is blazoned as gules, three lions passant guardant or and it provides one of the most prominent symbols of England; it is similar to the traditional arms of Normandy.
THE ART OF WAR: Far from Trenton, Emanuel Leutze probably used the Rhine as a model for his painting of "Washington Crossing" this
the Delaware
Emanuel Gottlieb Leutze (May 24, 1816July 18, 1868) was a German American history painter best known for his painting Washington Crossing the Delaware.
2
At 14, he was painting portraits for $5 apiece.
Through such work, he supported himself after the death of his father.
THE AGE OF THE AQUARIUS: This French writer knew the future included turning 182 on February 8
Jules Verne
Jules Verne, French author, poet, and playwright (d. 1905) 1829 –
3
1693 –
–
–
SHOCKING ART: 1485 Florence was shocked by this artist's large nude painting of the birth of a goddess
Botticelli
Lorenzo was a great patron of the arts, commissioning works by Michelangelo, Leonardo da Vinci and Botticelli.
3
thumb|left|Palazzo Pitti on Boboli Gardens' side Florence contains numerous museums and art galleries where some of the world's most important works of art are held.
Chinese immigrants to Italy build no ordinary Chinatown, Chicago Tribune, 1 January 2009 The largest immigrant group came from other European countries (mostly Romanians and Albanians): 3.52%, East Asia (mostly Chinese and Filipino): 2.17%, the Americas: 1.41%, and North Africa (mostly Moroccan): 0.9%.
Within  to the west is the Carmignano area, also home to flavorful sangiovese-based reds.
CLASSIC CINEMA: This Fritz Lang film portrayed a futuristic city as a hell of scientific progress & human despair
Metropolis
His most famous films include the groundbreaking Metropolis (1927) – which was the world's most expensive film up to that point – and M (1931), a film noir precursor that was made before he moved to the United States.
3
M remains a powerful work; it was remade in 1951 by Joseph Losey, but this version had little impact on audiences, and has become harder to see than the original film.
In the films of his German period, Lang produced a coherent oeuvre that established the characteristics later attributed to film noir, with its recurring themes of psychological conflict, paranoia, fate and moral ambiguity.
Senses of Cinema –
GEOGRAPHY: This peninsula that accounts for most of Denmark's land area shares a 42-mile-long border with Germany
Jutland
Bismarck successfully concluded war on Denmark in 1864, which promoted German over Danish interests in the Jutland peninsula.
3
Cambridge University Press.
The lumping of Germanic people into the generic term 'Germans' has its roots in the Investiture Controversy according to historian Herwig Wolfram, who claimed it was a defensive move made by the papacy to delineate them as outsiders, partly due to the papacy's insecurity and so as to justify counterattacks upon them.
In the 2005 elections, Angela Merkel became the first female Chancellor of Germany as the leader of a grand coalition.
OH, WHAT A KNIGHT: In 1226 the Teutonic Knights demanded & received this area, later the dominant state in Germany
Prussia
The rise of Pan-Germanism inside the German Confederation resulted in the unification of many of the German states in 1871 into the Prussian-dominated German Empire.
3
Cambridge University Press, pp.
East Germany selected East Berlin as its capital, while West Germany chose Bonn as a provisional capital, to emphasise its stance that the two-state solution was an artificial and temporary status quo.
The governments of Germany and the United States are close political allies.
THE 1930s: The first factory to make these cars was dedicated in Wolfsburg, Germany May 26, 1938
Volkswagen
Well-known international brands include Mercedes-Benz, BMW, SAP, Volkswagen, Audi, Siemens, Allianz, Adidas, Porsche, and DHL.  Germany is recognised for its large portion of specialised small and medium enterprises, known as the Mittelstand model.
3
Germany was a founding member of the European Union in 1993.
Germanic tribes and Frankish Empire  thumb|left|Migrations in Europe (100–500 AD) The Germanic tribes are thought to date from the Nordic Bronze Age or the Pre-Roman Iron Age.
Post-World War II art trends in Germany can broadly be divided into Neo-expressionism, performance art and Conceptualism.
PLAYWRIGHTS: Sophocles, Aeschylus & this man are regarded as the 3 greatest ancient Greek tragedians
Euripides
Greek may refer to:  Greece Anything of, from, or related to Greece, a country in Southern Europe:  Greeks, an ethnic group  Greek language, a branch of the Indo-European language family Proto-Greek language, the assumed last common ancestor of all known varieties of Greek Mycenaean Greek language, most ancient attested form of the language (16th to 11th centuries BC) Ancient Greek, forms of the language used c. 1000–330 BC Koine Greek, common form of Greek spoken and written during Classical antiquity Medieval Greek or Byzantine Greek, language used between the Middle Ages and the Ottoman conquest of Constantinople Modern Greek, varieties spoken in the modern era (from 1453 AD)  Greek alphabet, script used to write the Greek language  Greek Orthodox Church, several Churches of the Eastern Orthodox Church  Ancient Greece, the classical civilization centered in Greece  Other uses  Greek (play), 1980 play by Steven Berkoff  Greek (opera), 1988 opera by Mark-Antony Turnage, based on Steven Berkoff's play  Greek (TV series), an ABC Family show  Greeks (finance), quantities representing the sensitivity of the price of derivatives  Greeking, style of displaying or rendering text or symbols in a computer display or typographic layout  Greek system or fraternities and sororities, social organizations for undergraduate students at North American colleges  Greek Theatre (Los Angeles), a theatre located at Griffith Park in Los Angeles, California  Greek love, a term referring variously to male bonding, homosexuality, pederasty and anal sex  The Greeks 1951 non-fiction book on classical Greece by HDF Kitto  The Greeks, a 1980 cycle of ten plays adapted by John Barton and Kenneth Cavander from the works of Homer, Euripides, Aeschylus and Sophocles  Greeks, a group of scholars in 16th century England.
1
See also   Greek dialects (disambiguation)  Hellenic (disambiguation)  Names of the Greeks, terms for the Greek people  Name of Greece, names for the country  Greek to me, an idiom for something not understandable  Category:Demonyms
ANCIENT MEASURES: Exekiel 45 says that 10 baths of oil equal one of these, also the name of a blind Greek bard
homer
Greek may refer to:  Greece Anything of, from, or related to Greece, a country in Southern Europe:  Greeks, an ethnic group  Greek language, a branch of the Indo-European language family Proto-Greek language, the assumed last common ancestor of all known varieties of Greek Mycenaean Greek language, most ancient attested form of the language (16th to 11th centuries BC) Ancient Greek, forms of the language used c. 1000–330 BC Koine Greek, common form of Greek spoken and written during Classical antiquity Medieval Greek or Byzantine Greek, language used between the Middle Ages and the Ottoman conquest of Constantinople Modern Greek, varieties spoken in the modern era (from 1453 AD)  Greek alphabet, script used to write the Greek language  Greek Orthodox Church, several Churches of the Eastern Orthodox Church  Ancient Greece, the classical civilization centered in Greece  Other uses  Greek (play), 1980 play by Steven Berkoff  Greek (opera), 1988 opera by Mark-Antony Turnage, based on Steven Berkoff's play  Greek (TV series), an ABC Family show  Greeks (finance), quantities representing the sensitivity of the price of derivatives  Greeking, style of displaying or rendering text or symbols in a computer display or typographic layout  Greek system or fraternities and sororities, social organizations for undergraduate students at North American colleges  Greek Theatre (Los Angeles), a theatre located at Griffith Park in Los Angeles, California  Greek love, a term referring variously to male bonding, homosexuality, pederasty and anal sex  The Greeks 1951 non-fiction book on classical Greece by HDF Kitto  The Greeks, a 1980 cycle of ten plays adapted by John Barton and Kenneth Cavander from the works of Homer, Euripides, Aeschylus and Sophocles  Greeks, a group of scholars in 16th century England.
1
See also   Greek dialects (disambiguation)  Hellenic (disambiguation)  Names of the Greeks, terms for the Greek people  Name of Greece, names for the country  Greek to me, an idiom for something not understandable  Category:Demonyms
ESSAY QUESTIONS: A George Orwell essay argues for using this voice rather than the passive
active
The Westropes and Kimche were members of the Independent Labour Party, although at this time Blair was not seriously politically active.
3
His father had retired to Southwold, Suffolk by this time; Blair was enrolled at a crammer there called Craighurst, and brushed up on his Classics, English and History.
I Have Tried to Tell the Truth, p.xv Secker & Warburg, 2001  In November 1943, Orwell was appointed literary editor at Tribune, where his assistant was his old friend Jon Kimche.
At Eton he played tricks on John Crace, his Master in College, among which was to enter a spoof advertisement in a College magazine implying pederasty.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: George Washington was chancellor of this college from 1788 until his death
William and Mary
Paul F. Boller, "George Washington and Religious Liberty." William and Mary Quarterly (1960): 486-506. in JSTOR  Washington frequently accompanied his wife to church services.
3
He owned hundreds of slaves throughout his lifetime, but his views on slavery evolved.
Washington's victories wrecked the British carrot-and-stick strategy of showing overwhelming force then offering generous terms.
His closest advisors formed two factions, setting the framework for the future First Party System.
THE BALKAN PENINSULA: In the 1990s Greece imposed a trade embargo on this nation in a dispute over its name
Macedonia
Situated on the southern tip of the Balkan peninsula, it shares land borders with Albania to the northwest, the Republic of Macedonia and Bulgaria to the north and Turkey to the northeast.
3
Mountains regions in the interior and many islands remained effectively autonomous from the central Ottoman state for many centuries.
Greece's post-compulsory secondary education consists of two school types: unified upper secondary schools (Γενικό Λύκειο, ''Genikό Lykeiό'') and [[technical school|technical]]–[[vocational school|vocational]] educational schools (Τεχνικά και Επαγγελματικά Εκπαιδευτήρια, "TEE").
{{Citation | last = Kalaitzidis | first = Akis | year = 2010 | title = Europe's Greece: A Giant in the Making | publisher = [[Palgrave Macmillan]]}}, 219 pp.
FAMOUS FRENCHMEN: While living in exile on the island of Guernsey, he published "Les Miserables"
Victor Hugo
The French Consulate is based at Victor Hugo's former residence at Hauteville House.
2
During the Marian persecutions, three women, the Guernsey Martyrs, were burned at the stake for their Protestant beliefs.
For immigration and nationality purposes it is UK law, and not Guernsey law, which applies (technically the Immigration Act 1971, extended to Guernsey by Order-in-Council).
SMALL AFRICAN COUNTRIES: Guinea is bordered by this country that also has Guinea in its name
Guinea-Bissau
Formerly known as French Guinea (), the modern country is sometimes referred to as Guinea-Conakry in order to distinguish it from other parts of the wider region of the same name, such as Guinea-Bissau and Equatorial Guinea.
3
The 2013 Guinean legislative election were held on 24 September 2013.
The dead included people who were killed with machetes and burned alive.
Maternal and child healthcare In June 2011, the United Nations Population Fund released a report on The State of the World's Midwifery.
HE'S THE COACH: Green Bay Packers, 1959-1967
Vince Lombardi
The Vince Lombardi Trophy is named after the Packers head coach of the same name, who guided them to their first two Super Bowls.
3
Nickname, logos, and uniforms thumb|Packers logo (1961–present)Packers Logo History  thumb|Packers gold wordmark logo (1959–present) thumb|left|upright|The Packers' first alternate uniform, a throwback first introduced in 2010.
The team would go throwback again for two Thanksgiving Day games against the Detroit Lions, in blue and gold 1930s-era uniforms in 2001, and 1960s green and gold (only slightly different from the current ones) in 2003.Packers Uniform History, 1921–2004 from Packers.com.
[[Curly Lambeau]] || Milwaukee, WI || New York Giants || 27-0 || 9-2 |- style="text-align:center;" | 1944||
1970s TV CASTS: Gavin MacLeod, Bernie Kopell & Ted Lange as your bartender
The Love Boat
He was also best known for his starring role on The Love Boat (1977–1986), in which MacLeod played Captain Merrill Stubing.
3
MacLeod became the spokesperson for Princess Cruises in 1986.
The book recalls his upbringing in upstate New York during The Great Depression, as well as his life after over 50 years in Hollywood.
Kathie Lee Gifford of the Today Show said, "Gavin epitomizes the old-fashioned concept of a gentleman.
NERDS RULE!: Dave Arneson & Gary Gygax created geek heaven with this '70s fantasy tabletop role-playing game
Dungeons & Dragons
Ernest Gary Gygax ( ) (July 27, 1938 – March 4, 2008) was an American game designer and author best known for co-creating with Dave Arneson the pioneering role-playing game Dungeons & Dragons (D&D).
3
He also took anthropology classes at University of Chicago.
His ownership eventually dropped to 30% of the company, leaving him a minority stockholder.
He engineered the removal of Kevin Blume as CEO in 1984, but the Blume brothers subsequently sold their majority shares in the company to Lorraine Williams.
A WALK UP FIFTH AVENUE: Fifth Avenue starts at this square in Greenwich Village
Washington Square
Geography  Boundaries thumb|left|MacDougal Street in Greenwich Village The neighborhood is bordered by Broadway to the east, the North River (part of the Hudson River) to the west, Houston Street to the south, and 14th Street to the north, and roughly centered on Washington Square Park and New York University.
3
From the late 19th century through the 21st century, the Hotel Albert has served as a cultural icon of Greenwich Village.
Founded by New York-based artist Mercedes Matter and her students, the New York Studio School of Drawing, Painting and Sculpture is an art school formed in the mid-1960s in the Village.
Recent examples of the university clashing with the community, often led by the Greenwich Village Society for Historic Preservation, include the destruction of the 85 West Third Street house where Edgar Allan Poe lived from 1844-5, which NYU promised to rebuild using original materials, but then claimed not to have enough bricks to do so; the construction of the 26-story Founders Hall dorm behind the façade of demolished St. Ann’s Church at 120 East Twelfth Street, which advocates protested as being out of scale for the low-rise area, and received assurances from NYU, which then built all 26 stories anyway; and the demolition in 2009 of the Provincetown Playhouse and Apartments, over protests.
VIVA LA REVOLUTION!: The June 27, 1969 police raid at this Greenwich Village bar sparked a gay & lesbian revolution
The Stonewall Inn
Postwar thumb|left|250px|The Stonewall Inn at 53 Christopher Street, a designated National Historic Landmark as the site of the 1969 Stonewall riots, which led to the modern gay rights movement.
3
History  Early years thumb|right|250px|Map of old Greenwich Village.
that led from Greenwich Lane (now Greenwich Avenue) down to a landing on the North River.
Opened during the 1880s and originally located at 11th Street and University Place, called the Hotel St. Stephan and then after 1902, called the Hotel Albert while under the ownership of William Ryder it served as a meeting place, restaurant and dwelling for several important artists and writers from the late 19th century well into the 20th century.
PLACES TO PAY IN PESOS: You may have to change your gourdes into pesos after you cross the border from Haiti into this country
the Dominican Republic
It occupies the western three-eighths of the island which it shares with the Dominican Republic.
3
Among them was Bertrand d'Ogeron, who succeeded in growing tobacco.
Haiti had no recorded music until 1937 when Jazz Guignard was recorded non-commercially.
15 August  Assumption of Mary  L'Assomption de Marie  17 October  Anniversary of the death of Dessalines  Anniversaire de la mort de Dessalines  commemorates the death of Jean-Jacques Dessalines.
IT'S OUR ISLAND: Hong Kong
China
Hong Kong (), officially Hong Kong Special Administrative Region of the People's Republic of China, is an autonomous territory on the southern coast of China at the Pearl River Estuary and the South China Sea.
3
Film.
There are major multipurpose venues like Hong Kong Coliseum and MacPherson Stadium.
The tallest building prior to the ICC is Two International Finance Centre, at  high.
ASIAN GEOGRAPHY: This "gem" of a river becomes a 20-mile-wide estuary between Hong Kong & Macao
the Pearl River
Hong Kong (), officially Hong Kong Special Administrative Region of the People's Republic of China, is an autonomous territory on the southern coast of China at the Pearl River Estuary and the South China Sea.
3
It was ratified in 1990.
Awareness of the environment is growing as Hong Kong suffers from increasing pollution compounded by its geography and tall buildings.
However, the influx of immigrants from mainland China, approximating 45,000 per year, is a significant contributor to its population growth –
NOVELS: An 1895 novel by Nobel Prize winner Henryk Sienkiewicz, or Latin for “where are you going”
Quo Vadis
He is best remembered for his historical novels, especially for his internationally known best-seller Quo Vadis (1896).
3
In 1876 Sienkiewicz went to the United States with Helena Modrzejewska (soon to become famous in the U.S. as actress Helena Modjeska) and her husband.
His travels were financed by Gazeta Polska (The Polish Gazette) in exchange for a series of travel essays: Sienkiewicz wrote Listy z podróży (Letters from a Journey) and Listy Litwosa z Podróży (Litwos' Letters from a Journey), which were published in The Polish Gazette in 1876–78 and republished as a book in 1880.
This story of early Christianity in Rome, with protagonists struggling against the Emperor Nero's regime, draws parallels between repressed early Christians and contemporary Poles; and, due to its focus on Christianity, it became widely popular in the Christian West.
2-LETTER ABBREV.: Heinrich Himmler headed this dreaded organization
SS
Heinrich Luitpold Himmler (; 7 October 1900 – 23 May 1945) was Reichsführer of the Schutzstaffel (Protection Squadron; SS), and a leading member of the Nazi Party (NSDAP) of Nazi Germany.
2
Consolidation of power   In early 1934, Hitler and other Nazi leaders became concerned that Röhm was planning a coup d'état.
On 15 September 1935, Hitler presented two laws—known as the Nuremberg Laws—to the Reichstag.
MYTHOLOGY: This king of Ithaca, Odysseus' father, has the same name as Ophelia's brother in "Hamlet"
Laertes
True friend to Hamlet Laertes – Son to Polonius Voltimand and Cornelius –
3
Hamlet, Methuen, 1982, p. 35.
Retrieved: 30 December 2007.
2002. "Twentieth-century Performance: The Stratford and London Companies".
RELIGION: The Trimurti, or trinity of Hindu gods, consists of Brahma, Shiva & this one
Vishnu
Pollock notes that the Yadava king Ramacandra is described as a devotee of deity Shiva (Shaivism), yet his political achievements and temple construction sponsorship in Varanasi, far from his kingdom's location in the Deccan region, is described in the historical records in Vaishnavism terms of Rama, a deity Vishnu avatar.
3
The actual term '' first occurs, states Gavin Flood, as "a Persian geographical term for the people who lived beyond the river Indus (Sanskrit: Sindhu)", more specifically in the 6th-century BCE inscription of Darius I. The Punjab region, called Sapta Sindhava in the Vedas, is called Hapta Hindu in Zend Avesta.
One may be polytheistic or monotheistic, monistic or pantheistic, even an agnostic, humanist or atheist, and still be considered a Hindu."Lester Kurtz (Ed.), Encyclopedia of Violence, Peace and Conflict, ISBN 978-0123695031, Academic Press, 2008MK Gandhi,  The Essence of Hinduism, Editor: VB Kher, Navajivan Publishing, see page 3;
The 14th-century Sanskrit text, Madhuravijayam, a memoir written by Gangadevi, the wife of Vijayanagara prince, for example describes the consequences of war using religious terms,  The historiographic writings in Telugu language from the 13th- and 14th-century Kakatiya dynasty period presents a similar "alien other (Turk)" and "self-identity (Hindu)" contrast.
THE DISAPPOINTING 21st CENTURY: Type of city we don't live in, or type of stadium replaced by retractable-roof ones in Houston & Indianapolis
domed
The Astrodome, nicknamed the "Eighth Wonder of the World", opened in 1965 as the world's first indoor domed sports stadium.
3
Blacks or African Americans made up 25% of Houston's population.
Retrieved on February 18, 2007.
Several private institutions of higher learning—ranging from liberal arts colleges, such as The University of St. Thomas, Houston's only Catholic university, to Rice University, the nationally recognized research university—are located within the city.
HISTORY: When Hannibal was 9, his father forced him to swear eternal hatred for this city
Rome
In his first few years in Italy, he won three dramatic victories—Trebia, Trasimene, and Cannae, in which he distinguished himself for his ability to determine his and his opponent's strengths and weaknesses, and to play the battle to his strengths and the enemy's weaknesses—and won over many allies of Rome.
3
In light of Hamilcar Barca's cognomen, historians refer to Hamilcar's family as the Barcids.
Hoyos, D. Hannibal's Dynasty: Power and Politics in the Western Mediterranean, 247-183 BC, p.89-91, 2003
Additionally, he would have to contend with opposition from the Gauls, whose territory he passed through.
REAL U.S. LOCALES: This Ohio town shares its name with Hosea's Old Testament wife & the first name of a TV military hayseed
Gomer
According to the Book of Hosea, he married the prostitute Gomer, the daughter of Diblaim, at God's command.
3
Christians see in this book a comparable call to the church not to forsake the Lord Jesus Christ.
Hosea 1:7 in his sermon NO. 2057, December 16TH, 1888.
The Book of Hosea has also been used in Qur'anic exegesis by Abdullah Yusuf Ali, especially in reference to Qur'anic verses which speak of the backsliding of Israel.
OCTOBER FEST: In late October 1922, he became premier of Italy
Benito Mussolini
Fascist Regime   thumb|upright|Benito Mussolini, Duce of Fascist Italy.
3
In the 18th century, as a result of the War of Spanish Succession, Austria replaced Spain as the dominant foreign power, while the House of Savoy emerged as a regional power expanding to Piedmont and Sardinia.
Peter's Basilica, the largest church of Christendom, seen from the city of Rome.
thumb|left|Luciano Pavarotti, one of the most influential tenors of all time.
1965: Italy's & France's presidents did the ribbon-cutting on a new tunnel through this mountain
Mont Blanc
The Apennine Mountains form the peninsula's backbone and the Alps form most of its northern boundary, where Italy's highest point is located on Mont Blanc (4,810 m/15,782 ft).Official French maps show the border detouring south of the main summit, and claim the highest point in Italy is Mont Blanc de Courmayeur (4,748 m), but these are inconsistent with an 1861 convention and topographic watershed analysis.
3
Inst.1.5.18), and so scanned in Lucil.825, but in dactylic verse lengthened metri gratia." was borrowed through Greek from the Oscan Víteliú, meaning "land of young cattle" (cf.
Page 4.
It is estimated that there are about 64 million native Italian speakersItalian language Ethnologue.com, February 2006Nationalencyklopedin "Världens 100 största språk 2007" The World's 100 Largest Languages in 2007 while the total number of Italian speakers, including those who use it as a second language, is about 85 million.
PERFECTION IN SPORTS: In 1988 Italy's Alberto Tomba won both the slalom & giant slalom events in this winter Olympic sport
Skiing
Alpine skiing is also a very widespread sport in Italy, and the country is a popular international skiing destination, known for its ski resorts.
3
Most of the remaining seats were won by a short-lived electoral bloc formed to support the outgoing Prime Minister Mario Monti, the far left party Left, Ecology, Freedom or by parties that contest elections only in one part of Italy: the Northern League, the South Tyrolean People's Party, Vallée d'Aoste and Great South.
Modern literary figures and Nobel laureates are nationalist poet Giosuè Carducci in 1906, realist writer Grazia Deledda in 1926, modern theatre author Luigi Pirandello in 1936, poets Salvatore Quasimodo in 1959 and Eugenio Montale in 1975, satirist and theatre author Dario Fo in 1997.
Modern Italian cuisine has developed through centuries of social and political changes, with roots as far back as the 4th century BC. Italian cuisine in itself takes heavy influences, including Etruscan, ancient Greek, ancient Roman, Byzantine, and  Jewish.
HISTORIC NAMESAKES: Born in Predappio, Italy in 1883, he was named for a famous politician born in Oaxaca, Mexico in 1806
Benito Mussolini
Fascist Regime   thumb|upright|Benito Mussolini, Duce of Fascist Italy.
3
Italian explorers such as Marco Polo, Christopher Columbus, Amerigo Vespucci, and Giovanni da Verrazzano discovered new routes to the Far East and the New World, helping to usher in the European Age of Discovery.
The Italian food industry is well known for the high quality and variety of its products.
At the end of 2013, Italy had 60,782,668 inhabitants.
LET'S VISIT INDIA: Eden Gardens in Calcutta is the world's largest stadium for this sport popular in India
cricket
India has also played a major role in popularising cricket.
3
Indian merchants, scholars, and sometimes armies were involved in this transmission; South-East Asians took the initiative as well, with many sojourning in Indian seminaries and translating Buddhist and Hindu texts into their languages.
According to a 2011 PricewaterhouseCoopers report, India's GDP at purchasing power parity could overtake that of the United States by 2045.
Child marriages are common, especially in rural areas; many women in India wed before reaching 18, which is their legal marriageable age.
A TREK TO NEPAL: Nepal, Pakistan & India all use this as their basic monetary unit
rupee
The Indian biotech industry grew by 15.1% in 2012–13, increasing its revenues from 204.4 Billion INR (Indian Rupees) to 235.24 Billion INR (3.94 B US$ - exchange rate June 2013: 1 US$ approx.
3
Early modern India thumb|left|upright|Writing the will and testament of the Mughal king court in Persian, 1590–1595  In the early 16th century, northern India, being then under mainly Muslim rulers, fell again to the superior mobility and firepower of a new generation of Central Asian warriors.
All but two of the Lok Sabha's 545 members are directly elected by popular vote; they represent individual constituencies via five-year terms.
Kerala22.
INDONESIA: Following a bitter war for independence, this European nation granted Indonesia self-rule in 1949
the Netherlands
Instead, they used the terms Malay Archipelago (Maleische Archipel); the Netherlands East Indies (Nederlandsch Oost Indië), popularly Indië; the East (de Oost); and Insulinde.
3
Adolf Bastian, of the University of Berlin, popularised the name through his book Indonesien oder die Inseln des Malayischen Archipels, 1884–1894.
foreign investment flowed into Indonesia, particularly into the rapidly developing export-oriented manufacturing sector, and from 1989 to 1997, the Indonesian economy grew by an average of over 7%.Schwarz, pp.
Some of these works are Syair Raja Siak, Syair Abdul Muluk, Hikayat Abdullah, Hikayat Bayan Budiman, Hikayat Hang Tuah, Sulalatus Salatin, and Babad Tanah Jawi.
NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBES: In 1877 this tribe, including Chief Joseph, was removed from Idaho to Oklahoma for 8 years
Nez Perce
According to local knowledge, the name Idaho originated from the Nez Perce language and stands for "the Land of many Waters", a kidney-shaped drainage area in north central Idaho in which a multitude of rivers come together.
3
Food is taxed, but prescription drugs are not.
The energy landscape of Idaho is favorable to the development of renewable energy systems.
Montana Rail Link also operates between Billings, Montana and Sandpoint, Idaho.
THE 2005 FORTUNE 500: This Redmond, Washington mega-corporation clicked in at 48, one spot ahead of Intel
Microsoft
During this period Intel became the dominant supplier of microprocessors for PCs, and was known for aggressive and sometimes illegal tactics in defense of its market position, particularly against Advanced Micro Devices (AMD), as well as a struggle with Microsoft for control over the direction of the PC industry.
3
Indysis explains that its artificial intelligence (AI) technology "is a human image, which converses fluently and with common sense in multiple languages and also works in different platforms."
Sept 2011Intel SSD 710 and 720 Series Specifications Revealed.
Intel LSI BF29AS41BB0 (LSI SandForce SF-2281)
JOE THE FARMER: Joe's dream vacation is a tour of this company's Technology Center in Moline, Illinois
John Deere
John Deere's invention of the self-scouring steel plow turned Illinois' rich prairie into some of the world's most productive and valuable farmlands, attracting immigrant farmers from Germany and Sweden.
3
Average yearly precipitation for Illinois varies from just over  at the southern tip to around  in the northern portion of the state.
Barooah, Jahnabi (June 27, 2012). "PHOTOS: Most And Least Muslim States
Accessed online April 16, 2012
OPERA: In Sir Arthur Sullivan's "Ivanhoe", "Ho, Jolly Jenkin" is an aria for this Friar
Friar Tuck
Friar Tuck  Sir Brian de Bois-Guilbert –
3
The book was written and published during a period of increasing struggle for the emancipation of the Jews in England, and there are frequent references to injustices against them.
Ivanhoe and Richard represent the hope of reconciliation for a unified future.
This particular time-frame was popularised by Scott.
WAR: This term for a member of Japan's powerful warrior class comes from the Japanese word meaning "guard"
samurai
thumb|Samurai warriors face Mongols, during the Mongol invasions of Japan.
3
Accordingly, the great powers after the Cold War are Britain, China, France, Germany, Japan, Russia, and the United States p.59
World War
Sports  thumb|Sumo wrestlers form around the referee during the ring-entering ceremony Traditionally, sumo is considered Japan's national sport.
AMERICAN HISTORY: This commodore became a friend to Japan in 1854, showing them the telegraph & a daguerreotype camera
Matthew Perry
On March 31, 1854, Commodore Matthew Perry and the "Black Ships" of the United States Navy forced the opening of Japan to the outside world with the Convention of Kanagawa.
3
Japan has a developed system for the protection and promotion of both tangible and intangible Cultural Properties and National Treasures.
A 1993 survey by the Cultural Affairs Agency found that more Japanese had sung karaoke that year than had participated in traditional pursuits such as flower arranging (ikebana) or tea ceremonies.
IOC selects Tokyo as host of 2020 Summer Olympic Games Japan is the most successful Asian Rugby Union country, winning the Asian Five Nations a record 6 times and winning the newly formed IRB Pacific Nations Cup in 2011.
ISLANDS: About 80% of Japan's butter & cheese is produced on this northernmost of its 4 main islands
Hokkaido
The four largest are Honshu, Hokkaido, Kyushu, and Shikoku, which make up about ninety-seven percent of Japan's land area.
3
Economy  thumb|The Tokyo Stock Exchange, one of the largest stock exchanges in Asia  Economic history Modern Japan's economic growth began in the Edo period.
Some 250 high-speed Shinkansen trains connect major cities and Japanese trains are known for their safety and punctuality.
Since 1947, compulsory education in Japan comprises elementary and middle school, which together last for nine years (from age 6 to age 15).
PLAYWRIGHTS: This "Endgame" author was a friend of James Joyce but, contrary to rumor, was not his secretary
Samuel Beckett
Also destroyed were some postcards and one telegram from Samuel Beckett to Lucia.
3
Ellmann (1982), pp. 60, 190, 340, 342; Cf.
George Antheil's unfinished setting of 'Cyclops' as an opera attests this attempt.
Joyce's work has been subject to intense scrutiny by scholars of all types.
DOUBLE L WORDS: Coined by Jonathan Swift, it's come to mean any tiny person
Lilliputian
For instance, the episode in which the giant Gulliver puts out the Lilliputian palace fire by urinating on it can be seen as a metaphor for the Tories' illegal peace treaty; having done a good thing in an unfortunate manner.
3
Jonathan Swift wrote his own epitaph: Here is laid the Body of Jonathan Swift, Doctor of Sacred Theology, Dean of this Cathedral Church,  where fierce Indignation can no longer injure the Heart.
Text at Project Gutenberg:
MathPages –
DEATH SENTENCES: Joseph Stalin reportedly said, "A single death is a tragedy, a million deaths is" this type of number
a statistic
See  The phrase "death of one man is a tragedy, death of a million is a statistic" is sometimes attributed to Stalin, although there is no proof of his saying that.
3
Routledge, ISBN 0-415-77757-7 p.17: "We now know as well beyond a reasonable doubt that there were more than 13 million Red Holocaust victims 1929–53, and this figure could rise above 20 million."<ref>Naimark, Norman (2010)
ISBN 978-0875010533  Implementing the division of Eastern Europe and other invasions On 1 September 1939, the German invasion of its agreed upon portion of Poland started World War II. On 17 September the Red Army invaded eastern Poland and occupied the Polish territory assigned to it by the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact, followed by co-ordination with German forces in Poland.
All these dachas, estates, and palaces were staffed, well-furnished and equipped, kept safe by security forces, and were mainly used privately, rarely for diplomatic purposes.
POTENT POTABLES: Cocktails with "Jamaica" in their names usually contain this liquor
rum
Jamaica's agricultural exports are sugar, bananas, coffee, rum, and yams.
3
In 2011, a survey done showed that approximately 60% of Jamaicans would push to once again become a British territory; citing years of social and fiscal mismanagement in the country.
Wednesday, 12 April 2006  Major cities  Religion  thumb|Mandeville Church in Manchester Parish.
Norman Manley and Sangster International airports are home to the country's national airline, Air Jamaica.
CENTRAL PARK ENTERTAINMENT: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from Central Park.)  Central Park is dangerous & menacing in this film, when Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis are attacked by softball players
The Out-of-Towners
He starred in over 60 films, such as Some Like It Hot, The Apartment, Mister Roberts (for which he won the 1955 Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor), Days of Wine and Roses, The Great Race, Irma la Douce, The Odd Couple, Save the Tiger (for which he won the 1973 Academy Award for Best Actor), The Out-of-Towners, The China Syndrome, Missing (for which he won Best Actor at the 1982 Cannes Film Festival), Glengarry Glen Ross, Grumpy Old Men and Grumpier Old Men.
2
It was the only movie that Lemmon directed and Matthau was nominated for the Best Actor Oscar for his performance.
Lemmon won the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Miniseries or a Movie for his role as Morrie Schwartz in his final television role, Tuesdays with Morrie.
VICE PRESIDENTS: This vice president had the same July 8 birthday as his very wealthy grandfather
Rockefeller
John D. Rockefeller, American businessman and philanthropist, founded the Standard Oil Company (d. 1937) 1851 – Arthur Evans, English archaeologist and academic (d. 1941) 1857 – Alfred Binet, French psychologist and graphologist (d. 1911) 1867 –
3
Melville Ruick, American actor (d. 1972) 1900 –
Henri Cartan, French mathematician and academic (d. 2008) 1905
Dario Gradi, Italian-English footballer, coach, and manager 1942 – Phil Gramm, American economist and politician   1942   – Janice Pennington, American model and actress, co-founded the Hollywood Film Festival 1944 –
15 MINUTES OF FAME: William Figueroa's moment came in 1992 when he spelled this word for Dan Quayle
Potato
During the 1992 presidential campaign, Quayle told the news media that he believed homosexuality was a choice, and "the wrong choice."  "Potatoe" On June 15, 1992, Quayle altered 12-year-old student William Figueroa's correct spelling of "potato" to "potatoe" at the Muñoz Rivera Elementary School spelling bee in Trenton, New Jersey.
3
Throughout his time as vice president, Quayle was widely ridiculed in the media and by many in the general public, both in the U.S. and overseas, as an intellectual lightweight and generally incompetent.
Columbia Journalism Review, September/October 1993 "http://archives.cjr.org/year/93/5/books-rosensteil.asp It ultimately proved to be a minor factor in the election, which Bush and Quayle subsequently lost.
Category:Cerberus Capital Management Category:DePauw University alumni Category:George H. W. Bush administration personnel Category:Indiana Republicans Category:Indiana University – Purdue University Indianapolis alumni Category:Indiana University Robert H. McKinney School of Law alumni Category:Members of the United States House of Representatives from Indiana Category:Politicians from Indianapolis, Indiana Category:People from Paradise Valley, Arizona Category:Pulliam family Category:Republican Party United States Senators Category:Republican Party (United States) vice presidential nominees Category:Republican Party Vice Presidents of the United States Category:United States Army soldiers Category:United States presidential candidates, 2000 Category:United States Senators from Indiana Category:United States vice-presidential candidates, 1988 Category:United States vice-presidential candidates, 1992 Category:Vice Presidents of the United States Category:Writers from Arizona Category:Writers from Indianapolis, Indiana Category:20th-century American writers   Category:Republican Party members of the United States House of Representatives Category:People from Huntington, Indiana
A ROYAL SUM-UP: King of Judah from 873 to 849 B.C.; succeeded by son Jehoram; name now generally found after "jumpin'"
Jehoshaphat
Jehoram of Israel or Joram, the King of Israel Jehoram of Judah, the King of Judah The son of Toi, King of Hamath who was sent by his father to congratulate David on the occasion of his victory over Hadadezer (2 Books of Samuel 8:10) A Levite of the family of Gershom (1 Chronicles 26:25) A priest sent by Jehoshaphat to instruct the people in Judah (2 Chronicles 17:8)  In modern days, it is also the name of:  Yehoram Gaon (born 1939), Israeli singer and actor
2
Jehoram (meaning "Jehovah is exalted" in Biblical Hebrew) was the name of several individuals in the Tanakh.
The female version of this name is Athaliah.
HANCOCK: With a fancy flourish, John Hancock became the first to do this July 4, 1776
sign the Declaration of Independence
He served more than two years in the Continental Congress in Philadelphia, and as president of Congress, was the first to sign the Declaration of Independence.
3
Nevertheless, Hancock used the improved relationship to resolve an ongoing dispute.
In October 1777, after more than two years in Congress, President Hancock requested a leave of absence.
When he had resigned as governor in 1785, Hancock was again elected as a delegate to the Continental Congress, known as the Confederation Congress after the ratification of the Articles of Confederation in 1781.
MORE OF "DE" BEST PEOPLE: This existential pal of Jean-Paul Sartre wrote "The Second Sex"
Simone de Beauvoir
Sartre has also been noted for his open relationship with the prominent feminist theorist Simone de Beauvoir.
3
Jean-Paul Sartre:
157–176 Author Richard Webster considers Sartre one of many modern thinkers who have reconstructed Judaeo-Christian orthodoxies in secular form.
Jean-Paul Sartre.
SEINFELD: This Jason Alexander character: "She doesn't deserve a baby shower. She deserves a baby monsoon"
George Costanza
Alexander is best known for his leading role as George Costanza in the television series Seinfeld.
3
Accessed February 24, 2011.
Role !!
Along Joe 1984 The Rink Lino/Lenny/Punk/Uncle Fausto 1986–1988 Broadway Bound Stanley 1989–1990
SHE WAS IN THAT?: Laura San Giacomo of "Just Shoot Me" appeared as a hooker pal of Julia Roberts in this 1990 film
Pretty Woman
She became a Hollywood star after headlining the romantic comedy Pretty Woman (1990), which grossed $464 million worldwide.
3
From 1972, Roberts lived in Smyrna, Georgia, where she attended Fitzhugh Lee Elementary School, Griffin Middle School, and Campbell High School."Julia Roberts.
thumb|left|Roberts at the Deauville American Film Festival in Normandy, France, September 1990.
Film production Roberts runs the production company Red Om Films with her sister, Lisa Roberts Gillan, and Marisa Yeres Gill.
HALLS OF FAME: We hope you aren't assigned any homework after visiting the National Hall for these in Emporia, Kansas
teachers
Around the state Located midway between Kansas City, Topeka, and Wichita in the heart of the Bluestem Region of the Flint Hills, the city of Emporia has several nationally registered historic places and is the home of Emporia State University, well known for its Teachers College.
3
For millennia, the land that is currently Kansas was inhabited by Native Americans.
The land gradually rises from east to west; its altitude ranges from  along the Verdigris River at Coffeyville in Montgomery County, to  at Mount Sunflower, one half mile from the Colorado border, in Wallace County.
Southeast Kansas Southeast Kansas has a unique history with a number of nationally registered historic places in this coal-mining region.
OZ: This character gets a ride (likely to his home in Omaha) in the balloon meant to take Dorothy to Kansas
the Wizard
Film  As was the case with the novel, the main character in the 1939 fantasy film The Wizard of Oz was a young girl who lived in Kansas with her aunt and uncle.
3
In response to demands of Methodists and other evangelical Protestants, in 1881 Kansas became the first U.S. state to adopt a constitutional amendment prohibiting all alcoholic beverages, which was only repealed in 1948.
The 2014 Pew Religious Landscape Survey showed the religious makeup of Kansas was as follows:Pew Research Center, "Religious Landscape Study"Kansas" online  Christian 76%,  31% Evangelical Protestant 24% Mainline Protestant  2% Black Protestant 18% Catholic   1% Mormon   1% Jehovah's Witness  Non-Christian Faiths 4%  Unaffiliated 20%  As of 2010, the Association of Religion Data Archives (ARDA) reported that the Catholic Church has the highest number of adherents in Kansas (at 426,611), followed by the United Methodist Church with 202,989 members, and the Southern Baptist Convention, reporting 99,329 adherents.
U.S. Route 69 (US-69) travels south to north, from Oklahoma to Missouri.
LIVING IN "L": Founded in 1854, it's the oldest city in Kansas; some "citizens" would rather be living elsewhere
Leavenworth
In 1827, Fort Leavenworth became the first permanent settlement of white Americans in the future state.
3
Kansas is prone to severe weather, especially in the spring and early summer.
South of Salina is the small city of Lindsborg with its numerous Dala horses.
Manhattan Regional Airport in Manhattan offers daily flights to Dallas/Fort Worth International Airport and Chicago's O'Hare International Airport, making it the second-largest commercial airport in the state.
THE BRITISH ISLES: On a clear day you can see France from a castle named for this seaport in the county of Kent
Dover Castle
The ports Richborough Castle and Dover Castle and the two strategic sites along Watling street, were fortified by the Romans, and Normans.
3
This naming followed the invasion of Britain by William of Normandy.
However, in recent years, there has been a significant drop in agriculture, and industry and services are increasing their utilisation of the area.
Upnor Castle, Great Lines, Fort Amherst.
AMERICANA: The Actors Theatre of this Kentucky city is housed in a national historic landmark
Louisville
One of the major regions in Kentucky is the Bluegrass Region in central Kentucky which houses two of its major cities, Louisville and Lexington.
2
However, during most decades of the 20th century there was also net out-migration from Kentucky.
28, No. 3 (August 1991), pp.
THE BRITISH ARE COMING!: In 1978, 2 months after calling Keith Moon irreplaceable, this group hired Kenney Jones as drummer
The Who
Keith John Moon (23 August 1946 – 7 September 1978) was an English drummer who played with the English rock band the Who.
3
While the other three members handled the lion's share of onstage vocals, Moon would attempt to sing backup (particularly on "I Can't Explain").
He watched a film (The Abominable Dr. Phibes), and asked Walter-Lax to cook him steak and eggs.
2 on the 2011 Rolling Stone "Best Drummers of All Time" readers' poll.
THE KENTUCKY DERBY: (Sofia of the Clue Crew at the Kentucky Derby Museum in Louisville)  On May 10, 1919, Sir Barton won the Kentucky Derby; a month & a day later, he became the first winner of this
Triple Crown
It is the first leg of the American Triple Crown and is followed by the Preakness Stakes, then the Belmont Stakes.
3
From there, Clark went on to Paris, France, where in 1863, a group of racing enthusiasts had formed the French Jockey Club and had organized the Grand Prix de Paris at Longchamp, which at the time was the greatest race in France.
Eddie Arcaro Ben A. Jones Calumet Farm2:05.401947 Jet Pilot Eric Guerin Tom Smith Maine Chance Farm2:06.801946 Assault †
Attending the Kentucky Derby (includes future dates)
LIBYA, LIBYA, LIBYA: Libya's history & economy were forever changed when this was found there in 1959
oil
Libya has the 10th-largest proven oil reserves of any country in the world.
3
Minutilli."Bibliografia della Libia"; Bertarelli, p. 177.
Under the terms of the 1947 peace treaty with the Allies, Italy relinquished all claims to Libya.
Many Libyans frequent the country's beach and they also visit Libya's archaeological sites—especially Leptis Magna, which is widely considered to be one of the best preserved Roman archaeological sites in the world.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: The Neman River, Lithuania's longest, begins in Belarus & empties into this sea
Baltic Sea
One of the three Baltic states, it is situated along the southeastern shore of the Baltic Sea, to the east of Sweden and Denmark.
3
The Polish occupation of Vilnius was greatly resented by Lithuania; there were no diplomatic relations between the two states for most of the period between the two World Wars.
Sweden has the next highest FTTH penetration with 23%.
Lithuania also has the highest homicide rate in the EU.   Religion   thumb|left|Hill of Crosses near Šiauliai As per the 2011 census, 77.2% of Lithuanians belonged to the Roman Catholic Church.
ABBR.: The abbreviation for pound, lb., stands for this Latin word that means pound
libra
Their works were published in manuscript form before the invention of printing and now exist in carefully annotated printed editions such as the Loeb Classical Library, published by Harvard University Press, or the Oxford Classical Texts, published by Oxford University Press.
3
It is available at the Vatican and at some institutions in the U.S., such as the University of Kentucky and Iowa State University.
Over the ages, Latin-speaking populations produced new adjectives, nouns, and verbs by affixing or compounding meaningful segments.
The numbers 1, 2 and 3, and every whole hundred from 200 to 900, are declined as nouns and adjectives with some differences.
A WORLD OF MEMOIRS: (I'm author and journalist Helene Cooper.)  In "The House at Sugar Beach", my memoir of a childhood in Liberia, I recount the event that changed my life: the 1980 coup by Sgt. Doe against President Tolbert in this capital city named for the USA's 5th president
Monrovia
It built the Freeport of Monrovia and Roberts International Airport under the Lend-Lease program before its entry into the world.
3
Nimba is the largest of the counties in size at , while Montserrado is the smallest at .
Bushmeat is often exported to neighboring Sierra Leone and Ivory Coast, despite a ban on the cross-border sale of wild animals.
A small number of people are Bahá'í, Hindu, Sikh, or Buddhist.
A LITTLE TASTE OF LIECHTENSTEIN: This river provides the entire western border of Liechtenstein
Rhine
Napoleon reorganized much of the Empire into the Confederation of the Rhine.
3
In a national referendum in March 2003, nearly two-thirds of the electorate voted in support of Hans-Adam II's proposed new constitution to replace the 1921 version.
2000  1990 Catholics  78.4%  84.9% Reformed Church  7.9%  9.4% Christian-Orthodox Churches  1.1%  0.7% Undeclared / no religion  7.0%  2.4% Other Christian Churches  0.4%  0.1% Muslims  4.8%  2.4% Jewish  0.1%  0.0% Other religions
The Swiss army later informed Liechtenstein of the incursion and offered official apologies.
STUPID ANSWERS: Like the one in London, this D.C. gallery, an arm of the Smithsonian, is full of portraits of national heroes
the National Portrait Gallery
The National Portrait Gallery was founded in 1856 to house depictions of figures from British history; its holdings now comprise the world's most extensive collection of portraits.
3
They indicate that 2000 species of flowering plant have been found growing there and that the tidal Thames supports 120 species of fish.
a 35-per-cent reduction of vehicles driven per day.
The London School of Economics has been described as the world's leading social science institution for both teaching and research.
BRITISHISMS: If you order bangers & mash at a London restaurant, you'll receive these & mashed potatoes
sausages
while the BBC Two programme "Natural World: Unnatural History of London" shows pigeons using the London Underground to get around the city, a seal that takes fish from fishmongers outside Billingsgate Fish Market, and foxes that will "sit" if given sausages.
3
During the 2003 European heat wave there were 14 consecutive days above  and 2 consecutive days where temperatures reached , leading to hundreds of heat related deaths.
The system serves 270 stations and was formed from several private companies, including the world's first underground electric line, the City and South London Railway.
In 2003, the gardens were put on the UNESCO list of World Heritage Sites.
SPANS: Unlike many London sites, this bridge seen here is only about a century old:
Tower Bridge
Other famous landmarks include Buckingham Palace, the London Eye, Piccadilly Circus, St Paul's Cathedral, Tower Bridge, Trafalgar Square, and The Shard.
2
The Airports Commission is due to report in Summer 2015 on future expansion of airport capacity.
London government initially expected the Congestion Charge Zone to increase daily peak period Underground and bus users by 20,000 people, reduce road traffic by 10 to 15 per cent, increase traffic speeds by 10 to 15 per cent, and reduce queues by 20 to 30 per cent.
LANDMARKS THE SPOT: Designed for millennium celebrations, it's the London "body part" seen here
the London Eye
Other famous landmarks include Buckingham Palace, the London Eye, Piccadilly Circus, St Paul's Cathedral, Tower Bridge, Trafalgar Square, and The Shard.
3
There are three recorded Viking assaults on London; two of which were successful in 851 and 886 AD, although they were defeated during the attack of 994 AD. thumb|upright|The Lancastrian siege of London in 1471 is attacked by a Yorkist sally.
London is not a city in the sense that the word applies in the United Kingdom, that of having city status granted by the Crown.
Stansted Airport, north east of London in Essex, is a local UK hub and Luton Airport to the north of London in Bedfordshire, caters mostly for cheap short-haul flights.
THE NEW YORK TIMES MOVIES: The Times liked the "smoky, greasy, steam-punk rendering of Victorian London" in this 2009 Robert Downey Jr. caper
Sherlock Holmes
left|thumb|Sherlock Holmes Museum in Baker Street, bearing the number 221B The pilgrims in Geoffrey Chaucer's late 14th-century Canterbury Tales set out for Canterbury from London – specifically, from the Tabard inn, Southwark.
3
The Thames was once a much broader, shallower river with extensive marshlands; at high tide, its shores reached five times their present width.
Further out is, for example, the Tudor period Hampton Court Palace, England's oldest surviving Tudor palace, built by Cardinal Thomas Wolsey 1515.
In 2003, a congestion charge was introduced to reduce traffic volumes in the city centre.
U.S. CITIES: It's the easternmost port on Lake Erie
Buffalo
Other major contributors to Lake Erie include the Grand River, the Huron River, the Maumee River, the Sandusky River, the Buffalo River, and the Cuyahoga River.
3
American soldiers swept through the Ontario area around Port Rowan burning towns and villages, but spared a gristmill owned by a Canadian mason named John Backhouse, according to one report.
When the difference in temperature between the relatively warm surface water and the colder air reaches a threshold value of 18 to 23 degrees Fahrenheit (10 to 13 degrees Celsius), then "lake-effect snow becomes possible:"  Heavy lake-effect snowfalls can occur when cold air travels  or longer over a large unfrozen lake.
The commission makes assessments using sophisticated mathematical modeling systems.
ERIE COINCIDENCE: Reporting his 1813 naval battle on Lake Erie, he remarked, "We have met the enemy and they are ours"
Oliver Hazard Perry
During the War of 1812, Oliver Hazard Perry captured an entire British fleet in 1813 near Put-in-Bay, Ohio, despite having inferior numbers.
3
Lake Erie's fish populations are the most abundant of the Great Lakes, partially because of the lake's relatively mild temperatures and plentiful supply of plankton, which is the basic building block of the food chain.
According to one report, the Canadian town of Port Dover is the home of the lake's largest fishing fleet, and the town features miniature golf, dairy bars, French-fry stands, and restaurants serving perch.
Pelee Island, Canada's southernmost point and only three miles away from Ohio, is a place that "forces you to do nothing":  Pleasure cruises Pleasure boat operators offer dinner cruises in the Cleveland area on the Cuyahoga River as well as Lake Erie.
SORRY, SPORTS FANS: Los Angeles
NFL
Many of these native species, such as the Los Angeles sunflower, have become so rare as to be considered endangered.
3
Museums and galleries  There are 841 museums and art galleries in Los Angeles County.https://www.lmu.edu/about/The_Los_Angeles_Region.htm
A significant number of art galleries are located on Gallery Row, and tens of thousands attend the monthly Downtown Art Walk there.
Los Angeles and New York City are the only two media markets to have seven VHF allocations assigned to them.
UNOFFICIAL STATE NICKNAMES: Because of the way it was formed, Louisiana is sometimes called "The Child of" this river
Mississippi
Louisiana is bordered by Arkansas to the north, Mississippi to the east, Texas to the west, and the Gulf of Mexico to the south.
3
Tornadoes are more common from January to March in the southern part of the state, and from February through March in the northern part of the state.
At Sabine Bank, 17 miles offshore the Mouth of the Sabine, damage was noted.
The United States continued to protect the domestic slave trade, including the coastwise trade, the transport of slaves by ship along the Atlantic Coast and to New Orleans and other Gulf ports.
U.S. LAKES & RIVERS: This large Louisiana lake is named for Louis XIV's marine minister
Lake Pontchartrain
The system of protected cypress swamps around Lake Pontchartrain provides another large and important natural area, with southern wetland species including egrets, alligators, and sturgeon.
3
France ceded most of its territory to the east of the Mississippi to Great Britain in 1763, in the aftermath of Britain's victory in the Seven Years' War (generally referred to in North America as the French and Indian War).
When the United States won its independence from Great Britain in 1783, one of its major concerns was having a European power on its western boundary, and the need for unrestricted access to the Mississippi River.
The boll weevil infestation and agricultural problems had cost sharecroppers and farmers their jobs.
COLONIAL AMERICA: This city became the capital of the Louisiana territory in 1722
New Orleans
Its capital is Baton Rouge and largest city is New Orleans.
3
In more elevated areas, fire is a natural process in the landscape, and has produced extensive areas of longleaf pine forest and wet savannas.
The Code forbade mixed marriages (article VI) but did little to protect slave women from sexual advances by masters, overseers or other slaves.
By the terms of the Treaty of Amiens of 1802, Great Britain returned ownership of the islands of Martinique and Guadaloupe to the French.
BE AFRAID...: Lucrezia Borgia may not be a good choice as a dinner guest if you're toxiphobic, afraid of this
poison
Many of these concern allegations of incest, poisoning, and murder on her part; however, no historical basis for these rumours has ever been brought forward beyond allegations made by rival parties.
2
p. 169
Rafael Sabatini wrote the 1912 non-fiction book, The Life of Cesare Borgia, that attempts to treat the Borgias historically.
PAY THE "BILL": It was Michael Jackson's first music video to play on MTV
"Billie Jean"
Breaking the "color barrier" (1981–83) 180px|thumb|right|Michael Jackson, whose discography included music videos such as "Beat It", "Billie Jean", and "Thriller".
3
A few markets also launched music-only channels including Las Vegas' KVMY (channel 21), which debuted in the summer of 1984 as KRLR-TV and branded as "Vusic 21".
The Vote Campaign to motivate adults to register and vote.
The channel was launched in January 2006 as MHD (Music: High Definition).
WHERE AM I?: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reports from Michigan.)I'm not at Gerald R. Ford's presidential library in Ann Arbor, but at his museum in this city, Michigan's second largest
Grand Rapids
thumb|left|Skyscrapers in downtown Detroit Grand Rapids, the second-largest city in Michigan, is also an important center of manufacturing.
3
Jesuit missionaries were well received by the Indian populations in the area, with relatively few difficulties or hostilities.
Democratic U.S. Senator Gary Peters was elected in 2014, beating former Republican Michigan Secretary of State Terri Lynn Land.
In 2008, Michigan placed third in a site selection survey among the states for luring new business which measured capital investment and new job creation per one million population.
THEY ALSO RAN: This industrialist from Michigan ran for the Senate in 1918, & lost
Henry Ford
Many individuals, including Ransom E. Olds, John and Horace Dodge, Henry Leland, David Dunbar Buick, Henry Joy, Charles King, and Henry Ford, provided the concentration of engineering know-how and technological enthusiasm to start the birth of the automotive industry.
3
It was part of Greater New England, the northern tier of states settled chiefly by migrants from New England who carried their culture with them.
It is  long from north to south and  from east to west and occupies nearly two-thirds of the state's land area.
General Motors, Ford, and Chrysler reached agreements with the United Auto Workers Union to transfer the liabilities for their respective health care and benefit funds to a 501(c)(9) Voluntary Employee Beneficiary Association (VEBA).
A "D" IN HISTORY: On the summit of this hill in Scotland are the remains of Macbeth's castle
Dunsinane
Thirdly, a crowned child holding a tree states that Macbeth will be safe until Great Birnam Wood comes to Dunsinane Hill.
3
More actors have died during performances of Hamlet than in the "Scottish play" as the profession still calls it.
The existing enmity between the two men (Forrest had openly hissed Macready at a recent performance of Hamlet in Britain) was taken up by Forrest's supporters – formed from the working class and lower middle class and anti-British agitators, keen to attack the upper-class pro-British patrons of the Opera House and the colonially-minded Macready.
thumb|left|Jack Carter and Edna Thomas in the Federal Theatre Project production that came to be known as the Voodoo Macbeth (1936)  In 1936, a decade before his film adaptation of the play, Orson Welles directed Macbeth for the Negro Theatre Unit of the Federal Theatre Project at the Lafayette Theatre in Harlem, using black actors and setting the action in Haiti: with drums and Voodoo rituals to establish the Witches scenes.
BEASTLY NOVELS BY CHARACTER: Badger, Mole, Rat & Toad
The Wind In The Willows
Mole, The Mole or variants may refer to:   Animals   Mole (animal) or "true mole", many of the mammals in the family Talpidae, found in Eurasia and North America  Golden moles, southern African mammals, similar to but unrelated to Talpidae moles  Marsupial moles, Australian mammals, similar to but unrelated to Talpidae moles   Other common meanings   Mole (architecture), a pier, jetty, breakwater, or junction between places separated by water  Mole (espionage), a spy who has worked his or her way into an organization or country  Mole (sauce), a Mexican sauce made from chili peppers, other spices, and chocolate  Mole (skin marking) or melanocytic nevus, a benign tumor on human skin, usually with darker pigment  Mole (unit), an SI unit in chemistry   Places    Australia   Mole Creek, Tasmania, a town  Mole River (New South Wales)   England   River Mole, Surrey  River Mole, Devon   France   La Môle, a commune of the Var Département  Le Môle, a mountain peak in the French Alps   Ghana   Mole River, a tributary of the White Volta  Mole National Park, named after the Mole River  India  Mole, Karnataka, a village in Karnataka state  Mole, a village in Andhra Pradesh state  Art,  entertainment,  and media  Television  The Mole (TV series), a reality television series  The Mole (Australian TV series) Australian version  The Mole (U.S. TV series) U.S. version  The Mole (UK TV series) UK version  The Mole, a tunnelling machine in the TV series Thunderbirds   Fictional entities  Mole (Zdeněk Miler character), a Czech animated character  The Mole (Happy Tree Friends), from the cartoon series Happy Tree Friends  Adrian Mole, the central character in a series of novels by Sue Townsend  Monty Mole, a video game character  Mole, an anthropomorphic mole, a main character in the children's novel The Wind in the Willows by Kenneth Grahame  Morocco Mole, Secret Squirrel's sidekick  The Mole, from the animated musical film South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut  The Mole, in three fantasy novels in Terry Brooks' Shannara series  The Mole, Gaetan Moliére, in the animated film Atlantis: The Lost Empire and its sequel, Atlantis: Milo's Return  People  Mole (surname)  Other uses  Mole, the NATO reporting name of the Soviet Beriev Be-8 amphibian aircraft  Mole, an informal name for Cultivator No.
2
6, a Second World War trench-digging machine  Mole, a tunnel boring machine  Mole-Richardson or Mole, a stage and motion picture lighting manufacturing company  Mole, variant spelling of Moll (slang) in Australian English   See also   Mol (disambiguation)
Molé (disambiguation)  Moles (disambiguation)  Moll (disambiguation)  El Topo (The Mole), a 1970 film  Category:Animal common name disambiguation pages
“STREETS”: 1973 Martin Scorsese film starring Robert De Niro about hoodlums in NYC's Little Italy
Mean Streets
He has directed landmark films such as the crime film Mean Streets (1973), the vigilante-thriller Taxi Driver (1976), the biographical sports drama Raging Bull (1980), the black comedy The King of Comedy (1983), and the crime films Goodfellas (1990) and Casino (1995), all of which he collaborated on with actor and close friend Robert De Niro.
2
In March 2015, it was announced that Scorsese will direct a Mike Tyson biopic.
On August 10, 2015, it was announced that Scorsese will direct an adaptation of The Devil in the White City, which will star Leonardo DiCaprio and be written by Billy Ray.
ISLANDS: During WWII Malta controlled the sea lanes between North Africa & this Italian island 50 miles from Malta
Sicily
History  Prehistory  Pottery found by archaeologists at Skorba resembles that found in Italy, and suggests that the Maltese islands were first settled in 5200 BC mainly by stone age hunters or farmers who had arrived from the Italian island of Sicily, possibly the Sicani.
3
Average annual temperature of the sea is  , from  in February to  in August.
Its roots can be traced back to the pagan Roman feast of Luminaria (literally, "the illumination"), when torches and bonfires lit up the early summer night of 29 June.
For reference the latest census counts 139,583 households in Malta.
"G" MOVIES: Musical in which Marilyn Monroe, as Lorelei Lee, asked, "Is this the way to Europe, France?"
Gentlemen Prefer Blondes
By 1953, Monroe was one of the most bankable Hollywood stars, with leading roles in three films: the noir Niagara, which focused on her sex appeal, and the comedies Gentlemen Prefer Blondes and How to Marry a Millionaire, which established her star image as a "dumb blonde".
3
It was released in June 1957 to mixed reviews, and proved unpopular with American audiences.
Its filming in the Nevada desert between July and November 1960 was again difficult.
For example, when she was asked whether she had anything on during the 1949 nude photo shoot, she replied, "I had the radio on".
SPORT OF KINGS: Only Johnny Longden has ridden, then trained a winner of this legendary May race
the Kentucky Derby
Most common day of the year for local and general elections in the United Kingdom  Arbor Day (Nova Scotia, Canada)  National Day of Prayer (United States)  National Day of Reason (United States)  Friday preceding Mother's Day - 2016 date: May 6  Military Spouse Day (United States)  National Public Gardens Day (United States)  First Saturday - 2016 date: May 7  In Kentucky, United States, the Kentucky Derby  Free Comic Book Day
3
May symbols thumb|right|150px|The Lily of the Valley May's birthstone is the emerald which is emblematic of love and success.
Skin Cancer Awareness Month  National Smile Month (United Kingdom)
2016 date: May 22.
ANNUAL EVENTS: Sedalia, Missouri has a June festival honoring this "King of Ragtime" who once studied music there
Scott Joplin
Ragtime composer Scott Joplin lived in St. Louis and Sedalia.
3
They provided a variety of goods to traders, for sale and trade with their Native American clients.
The expansion of railroads to the West transformed Kansas City into a major transportation hub within the nation.
, a sidewheel frigate launched in 1841 and destroyed by fire in 1843  , a  in service from 1900 to 1922  , an  in service from 1944 to 1998; site of the official Japanese surrender of World War II; decommissioned in 1998; now a floating war memorial at Pearl Harbor Naval Base in Hawaii  , a , joined the fleet after a commissioning ceremony July 31, 2010 at the Naval Submarine Base New London.
THE BLUES: A famous 1914 composition by W.C. Handy or Missouri's professional hockey team
St. Louis Blues
thumb|250px|Missouri has four major sports teams: the Royals and Cardinals of MLB, the Chiefs of the NFL, and the Blues of the NHL.  Professional major league teams  MLB: St. Louis Cardinals and Kansas City Royals  NFL: Kansas City Chiefs   NHL: St. Louis Blues  MLS: Sporting Kansas City  Former professional major league teams  National Football League:  St. Louis Cardinals (moved from Chicago in 1960; moved to Tempe, Arizona in 1988 and are now the Arizona Cardinals)  St. Louis All Stars (active in 1923 only)  Kansas City Blues/Cowboys (active 1924–1926, folded)  St. Louis Gunners (independent team, joined the NFL for the last three weeks of the 1934 season and folded thereafter)  St. Louis Rams 1995-2015 moved from Los Angeles and then back to Los Angeles  Major League Baseball (American League):  St. Louis Browns (moved from Milwaukee in 1902; moved to Baltimore, Maryland after the 1953 season and are now the Baltimore Orioles)
3
Further pronunciations also exist in Missouri or elsewhere in the United States, involving the realization of the first syllable as either  or ; the medial consonant as either  or ; the stressed second syllable as either  or ;Oxford English Dictionary and the third syllable as  ,  ,  centralized  ([ɪ̈]), or even ∅ (in other words, a non-existent third syllable).
This addition increased the land area of what was already the largest state in the Union at the time (about  to Virginia's 65,000 square miles, which then included West Virginia).Meinig, D.W. (1993).
HOV Lanes are also being striped on Interstate 70 in St. Charles County through Interstate 270 in Saint Louis County, and on the North-South corridor of Interstate 270 in central St. Louis County.
THE 1840s: The U.S. gained ownership of this iron-rich range of Minnesota via the Webster-Ashburton Treaty of 1842
the Mesabi Range
thumb|left|upright|Phelps Mill in Otter Tail County The state's iron-mining industry was established with the discovery of iron in the Vermilion Range and the Mesabi Range in the 1880s, and in the Cuyuna Range in the early 20th century.
3
Minnesota's center of population is in Hennepin County.
The mining boom created the port of Duluth which continues to be important for shipping ore, coal, and agricultural products.
The strong interest of Minnesotans in environmentalism has been attributed to the popularity of these pursuits.
THE IDES OF MARCH: March 15, 1917:The Romanov Dynasty ends when this czar abdicates
Nicholas II
1917 – Tsar Nicholas II of Russia abdicates the Russian throne and his brother the Grand Duke becomes Tsar.
3
933 –
Jai Courtney, Australian actor 1987
1939 – Luis Barceló, Spanish colonel (b. 1896) 1941 – Alexej von Jawlensky, Russian-German painter (b. 1864)
"C" IN SCIENCE: The one named for Max Planck is 6.6260755 X 10 (to the negative 34) joule-second, symbolized simply h
constant
The central assumption behind his new derivation, presented to the DPG on 14 December 1900, was the supposition, now known as the Planck postulate, that electromagnetic energy could be emitted only in quantized form, in other words, the energy could only be a multiple of an elementary unit , where  is Planck's constant, also known as Planck's action quantum (introduced already in 1899), and  (the Greek letter nu, not the Roman letter v) is the frequency of the radiation.
3
He was the 6th child in the family, though two of his siblings were from his father's first marriage.
However, instead of music he chose to study physics.
Einstein and the theory of relativity  In 1905, the three epochal papers of the hitherto completely unknown Albert Einstein were published in the journal Annalen der Physik.
TALES FROM THE SCRIPT: Marlon Brando returned the script to this 1954 Elia Kazan classic unread; the part nearly went to Frank Sinatra
On the Waterfront
A cultural icon, Brando is most famous for his Academy Award-winning performances as Terry Malloy in On the Waterfront (1954) and Vito Corleone in The Godfather (1972), as well as influential performances in A Streetcar Named Desire (1951), Viva Zapata! (1952), Julius Caesar (1953), The Wild One (1953), Reflections in a Golden Eye (1967), Last Tango in Paris (1972), and Apocalypse Now (1979).
3
Based on the 1958 novel of the same name that Pennebaker had optioned, the movie, which featured Brando's sister Jocelyn, was rated fairly positively but died at the box office.
Candy was especially appalling for many; a 1968 sex farce film directed by Christian Marquand and based on the 1958 novel by Terry Southern, the movie satirizes pornographic stories through the adventures of its naive heroine, Candy, played by Ewa Aulin.
Brando for Breakfast.
ROYAL FEMALE NICKNAMES: Mark Antony called her "The Queen of Queens"
Cleopatra
Antony was assigned Rome's eastern provinces, including the client kingdom of Egypt, then ruled by Cleopatra VII Philopator, and was given the command in Rome's war against Parthia.
3
Antony fled Rome, fearing for his life, and returned to Caesar's camp on the banks of the Rubicon River, the southern limit of Caesar's lawful command.
The Senatorial Republicans increasingly viewed Antony as a new tyrant.
Meanwhile, Sextus' admiral Menas betrayed him, shifting his loyalty to Octavian and thereby granting him control of Corsica, Sardinia, three of Sextus' legions, and a larger naval force.
NORTH AMERICAN GEOGRAPHY: Long before it empties into the Bay of Fundy, the Saint John River divides Maine from this province
New Brunswick
It is bordered by New Hampshire to the west, the Atlantic Ocean to the east, and the Canadian provinces of Quebec and New Brunswick to the north.
3
They were relocated at St. Francis, Canada, which was destroyed by Rogers' Rangers in 1759, and is now Odanak.
Sharing the Dream: White Males in a Multicultural America
Western Maine aquifers and springs are a major source of bottled water.
TV DETECTIVES: Mystery author Jessica Fletcher solved crimes in Cabot Cove, Maine on this show
Murder, She Wrote
Murder, She Wrote, a detective series starring Angela Lansbury, is set in the fictional Maine village of Cabot Cove, but filmed in Mendocino, California.
3
January temperatures range from highs near  on the southern coast to overnight lows averaging below  in the far north.
Dreamcatcher, 2003 film adaptation of the Stephen King novel, is set in and around the fictional town of Derry, Maine.
Wet Hot American Summer is set near Waterville, Maine.
NATIONAL MONUMENTS: This Montana site was designated a national cemetery in 1879; it became a national monument in 1946
Little Big Horn
Poplar  Little Big Horn College – Crow Agency  Salish Kootenai College –
3
thumb|Chief Joseph and Col.
Harlem  Blackfeet Community College –
Montana is ranked as the least obese state in the U.S., at 19.6%, according to the 2014 Gallup Poll.
THE EARTH: From French for "hillock", it resembles a mesa, but is smaller; it's also the name of a Montana city
Butte
Three buttes south of Great Falls are major landmarks: Cascade, Crown, Square, Shaw and Buttes.
3
Over 40 spent time in prison.
The Montana Territorial Legislative Assembly had its inaugural meeting in 1864.
For this accomplishment, the horse was admitted to the Montana Cowboy Hall of Fame in 2008.
RULE BRITANNIA: This son of Mary, Queen of Scots, was the first to call himself King of Great Britain
James I
Maryam (sura) "Mary", 19th sura (chapter) of the Qur'an Royalty  Mary I of England (1516–1558), aka "Bloody Mary", Queen of England and Ireland  Mary II of England (1662–1694), Queen of England, Scotland, and Ireland  Mary of Modena (1658–1718), Queen Consort of King James II of England and VII of Scotland  Mary of Teck (1867–1953), Queen Consort of George V of the United Kingdom  Mary, Queen of Scots (1542–1587),mother of James I of England  Mary of Guise (1515–1560), Queen Consort of James V of Scotland and mother of Mary, Queen of Scots  Mary, Crown Princess of Denmark (born 1972), wife of Crown Prince Frederik  Mary I of Portugal, daughter of King Joseph I of Portugal  Mary II of Portugal, daughter of the future King Pedro IV  Mary of Guelders (c. 1434–1463), daughter of Arnold, Duke of Guelders  Mary of Hungary, daughter of Louis I the Great of Hungary  Mary of Burgundy (1457–1482), daughter of Charles the Bold, Duke of Burgundy  Mary of Woodstock (1278–1332), daughter of Edward I of England Geography  Mary Province, in southeast Turkmenistan  Mary District, in Mary Province  Mary, Turkmenistan, capital city of the province, located in Mary District  Islas Marías (Mary Islands), Mexico  Mary, Saône-et-Loire, France  Mary River (disambiguation)  Mary's Point, New Brunswick, Canada  Mary, Turkmenistan, capital of Mary Province Books  Mary (Nabokov novel), by Vladimir Nabokov  Mary: A Fiction, a 1788 novel by Mary Wollstonecraft  Film and television  Mary (1931 film), a 1931 Alfred Hitchcock film  Mary (1978 TV series), a variety follow-up to  The Mary Tyler Moore Show  Mary (1985 TV series), a sitcom follow-up to  The Mary Tyler Moore Show  Mary (2005 film), a film directed by Abel Ferrara about an actress playing Mary Magdalene  Music  Mary Mary, Contemporary Gospel Musical Duo Albums  Mary (Mary J. Blige album), 1999  Mary (Mary Travers album), 1971  Mary (Sarkodie album), 2015 Songs  "Mary", Russian-language art song by Alexander Egorovich Varlamov  Mary (Sarah Slean song), a track on the 2004 album Day One by Sarah Slean  Mary (Scissor Sisters song), a 2004 song by American rock band Scissor Sisters  Mary (Supergrass song), a 1999 song by British band Supergrass  "Proud Mary", a 1969 song by John Fogerty  "Mary," a song by Kings of Leon on the album Come Around Sundown  "Mary," a song by The 4 of Us on the album Songs for the Tempted  "Mary," a song by Tori Amos on the album Tales of a Librarian  "Mary," a song by John Cale from the album Shifty Adventures in Nookie Wood  "Mary," a song by Oingo Boingo on Boingo  "Mary," a song by Robert Fripp on Exposure  "Mary," a song by Sarah McLachlan on the album Fumbling Towards Ecstasy  "Mary", a song by Buffy Sainte-Marie on Illuminations  "Mary," a song by Sublime on the album Robbin' the Hood  "Mary," a song by The Subways on the album Young for Eternity  "Mary," a song by Pete Townshend written for the concept album Lifehouse  "Mary Is a Grand Old Name", a song by George M. Cohan  "Mary (I'm in Love with You)," a song written by J. Fred Coots and Ozzie Nelson  Ships and boats  HMS Queen Mary, a Royal Navy battlecruiser  RMS Queen Mary, an ocean liner in service from 1936 to 1967  RMS Queen Mary 2, an ocean liner that began sailing in 2004  TS Queen Mary, a steamboat in service from 1933 to 1977  Mary Rose, a Tudor warship that sank in 1545  , the proposed naval name and designation for a motorboat the United States Navy planned to take over in 1918 but never actually acquired  Other uses  Mary (elephant), an elephant from the Sparks World Famous Shows circus  Mary Melody, a character from Tiny Toon Adventures  Mary (programming language)  Mary's room, a philosophical thought experiment  See also  Mari (disambiguation)  Marie (disambiguation)  Marie Louise (disambiguation)  Miss Mary (disambiguation)  Saint Mary (disambiguation)  Virgin Mary (cocktail)
2
Mary may refer to: Mary (name), a female given name  People Religious contexts  New Testament people named Mary is an overview article linking to many of those below  Mary (mother of Jesus), also called the Blessed Virgin Mary  Mary Magdalene, devoted follower of Jesus  Mary of Bethany, follower of Jesus, considered by Western medieval tradition to be the same person as Mary Magdalene  Mary (mother of James the Less)  Mary of Clopas, follower of Jesus  Mary, mother of John Mark  Mary of Rome, a New Testament woman  Mary, mother of Zechariah and sister of Moses and Aaron; mostly known by the Hebrew name: Miriam  Mary the Jewess one of the reputed founders of alchemy, referred to by Zosimus.
All pages beginning with Mary  Category:Human name disambiguation pages
TONY: Don't cry for Mandy Patinkin; he won a 1980 Tony Award for this musical
Evita
He is a noted interpreter of the musical works of Stephen Sondheim and is known for his work in musical theater, originating iconic roles such as Georges Seurat in Sunday in the Park with George and Ché in the original Broadway production of Evita.
3
Early life Patinkin was born Mandel Bruce Patinkin in Chicago, Illinois, on November 30, 1952, the son of Doris "Doralee" (née Sinton), a homemaker, and Lester Patinkin, who operated two large Chicago-area metal factories, the People's Iron & Metal Company and the Scrap Corporation of America.
He returned to Broadway in 2000 in the New York Shakespeare Festival production of John LaChiusa's The Wild Party, earning another Tony Award nomination for Best Actor (Musical).The Wild Party playbillvault.com, accessed May 24, 2015
In 2005, he became a vegan.
PUBLISHING: "The Budget" is a weekly paper published nationally for members of this Mennonite sect
Amish
There are about 2.1 million Anabaptists worldwide as of 2015 (including Mennonites, Amish, Mennonite Brethren, and many other Anabaptist groups formally part of the Mennonite World Conference).
3
The Alliance of Mennonite Evangelical Congregations represents one expression of the disappointment with the merger and the events that led up to it.
The vast majority of Anabaptists of Swiss/South German ancestry today lives in the US and Canada, while the largest group of Dutch/North German Anabaptists are the Russian Mennonites, who live today mostly in Latin America.
Latino Mennonites: Civil Rights, Faith, and Evangelical Culture.
MUSICALS: Mary Tyler Moore stepped lightly as Holly Golightly in a short-lived musical based on this short novel
Breakfast At Tiffany's
She was the star of a new musical version of Breakfast at Tiffany's in December 1966, but the show, titled Holly Golightly, was a notorious flop that closed in previews before opening on Broadway.
3
Early life Moore was born in the Brooklyn Heights section of Brooklyn, New York, to Marjorie (née Hackett) (1916–92) and George Tyler Moore (1913–2006), a clerk.
When she was eight years old, Moore moved with her family to Los Angeles.
She also starred in the short-lived Annie McGuire in 1988.
CALL OUT THE VOICE SQUAD: He was the voice of Mickey Mouse in "Steamboat Willie"
Walt Disney
Mickey Mouse is a funny animal cartoon character and the official mascot of The Walt Disney Company.
3
In animation in the 1940s Mickey's ears were animated in a more realistic perspective.
Color films (1935–1953)
Instead of having solid black eyes, Mickey was given white eyes with pupils, a Caucasian skin colored face, and a pear-shaped body.
"R" TOWN: Situated on the road to Mecca, it became the seat of the Saud dynasty around 1824
Riyadh
During that time, telephone lines were extended to Jeddah and Ta’if, but not to the capital Riyadh.
3
During this expansion, Mecca has lost some historical structures and archaeological sites, such as the Ajyad Fortress.
Thamudic Inscriptions  Some Thamudic inscriptions which were discovered in south Jordan contained names of some individuals such as "Abd Mekkat" which means in English "Servant of Mecca".G. Lankester Harding & Enno Littman, Some Thamudic Inscriptions from the Hashimite Kingdom of the Jordan (Leiden, Netherlands – 1952), Page: 19, Inscription
The mixture of different ethnicities and nationalities amongst Meccan residents has significantly impacted Mecca's traditional cuisine.
A CINEMATIC TRIP TO VEGAS: Felons skyjack a plane with Nicolas Cage (who else?) on board & crash-land on the Vegas Strip in this 1997 thriller
Con Air
Cage received an Academy Award, a Golden Globe, and Screen Actors Guild Award for his performance as an alcoholic Hollywood writer in Leaving Las Vegas (1995) before coming to the attention of wider audiences with mainstream films, such as The Rock (1996), Face/Off (1997), Con Air (1997), City of Angels (1998), and National Treasure (2004).
3
He has also donated one million dollars to the victims of Hurricane Katrina.
In May 2006, he bought a  island in the Exuma archipelago, some  southeast of Nassau and close to a similar island owned by Faith Hill and Tim McGraw.
Levin's filing states that "instead of listening to Levin, cross-defendant Cage (Coppola) spent most of his free time shopping for high ticket purchases, and wound up with 15 personal residences", Levin's complaint continued: "Likewise, Levin advised Coppola against buying a Gulfstream jet, against buying and owning a flotilla of yachts, against buying and owning a squadron of Rolls Royces, against buying millions of dollars in jewelry and art."
THE EUROPEAN PAST: In 1323 this current part of the Netherlands gained control of Zeeland
Holland
The name Holland is also frequently used to informally refer to the whole of the country of the Netherlands.
2
In 2007, the Betuweroute, a new fast freight railway from Rotterdam to Germany, was completed.
Sports  thumb|Dutch star football players Arjen Robben and Robin van Persie in a match in 2012  Approximately 4.5 million of the 16.8 million people in the Netherlands are registered to one of the 35,000 sports clubs in the country.
HISTORY: In 1840 regular transatlantic steamship service was inaugurated between Great Britain & this Nova Scotia capital
Halifax
Its provincial capital is Halifax.
3
17th and 18th centuries   thumb|right|Fort Edward –
More recently, the high value of the Canadian dollar relative to the US dollar has hurt the forestry industry, leading to the shut down of a long-running pulp and paper mill near Liverpool.
Some of the award winning feature films that have been made in the province are: Titanic (starring Leonardo DiCaprio and Kate Winslet); Bowling for Columbine (starring Michael Moore); and The Shipping News (starring Kevin Spacey and Cate Blanchett).
SCANDINAVIANS: King Canute the Great ruled Denmark, Norway & this non-Scandinavian country in the 11th century
England
When Ohthere of Hålogaland visited King Alfred the Great in England in the end of the 9th century, the land was called Norðwegr (lit.
3
About 70 Roman bronze cauldrons, often used as burial urns, have been found.
Upon the death of Haakon VI, in 1379, his son, Olaf IV, was only 10 years old.
Chess is also gaining popularity in Norway.
EXPLORING AFRICA: John Hanning Speke & this fellow Brit had a long-running feud as to the real source of the Nile
Sir Richard Burton
In the Years 1857–1859, Sir Richard Burton.
3
etc.
However, Krapf was correct and had seen Mounts Kilimanjaro and Kenya, the first European to do so.
His subsequent adventures as a consul in Africa were published in a later work.
YOU'RE IN DE-NILE: In 1902 construction was completed on the first dam on the Nile, at this southern Egyptian city
Aswan
Most of the population and cities of Egypt lie along those parts of the Nile valley north of Aswan, and nearly all the cultural and historical sites of Ancient Egypt are found along riverbanks.
3
Beyond that, however, the etymology is disputed.
At Khartoum the river is joined by the Blue Nile.
Drought has proven to be a major cause of fatality in the Nile River basin.
WORLD CITIES: Like London, this capital of Northern Ireland was damaged by WWII German bombs
Belfast
A rebellion in 1798 led by the cross-community Belfast-based Society of the United Irishmen and inspired by the French Revolution sought to break the constitutional ties between Ireland and Britain and unite Irish people of all religions.
2
Parliamentary debate: "The British government agree that it is for the people of the island of Ireland alone, by agreement between the two parts respectively, to exercise their right of self-determination on the basis of consent, freely and concurrently given, North and South, to bring about a united Ireland, if that is their wish."
Module:Community Relations.
TOUCHED BY AN ANGEL: A Michigan realtor claimed that this New Testament man (& his head) appeared to him 30 times between 1927 & 1933
John the Baptist
This gospel begins with the preaching of John the Baptist and the baptism of Jesus.
3
The book order is the same in the Greek Orthodox, Roman Catholic, and Protestant tradition.
Grand Rapids:
See Gamble, Harry Y.: The New Testament Canon: Its Making and Meaning.
THE CALENDAR: In the U.S. it's the latest date in November on which Thanksgiving can fall
November 28
National Bavarian Cream Pie Day (United States) Teacher's Day (Spain) November 28 Independence Day (Albania) November 29 November 30 Bonifacio Day (Philippines) St Andrews Day (official national holiday in Scotland)  November symbols thumb|Chrysanthemum November's birthstones are the topaz (particularly, yellow) which symbolizes friendship and the citrine.
3
November is a month of spring in the Southern Hemisphere and autumn in the Northern Hemisphere.
Day of Discovery of Puerto Rico (Puerto Rico)
Garifuna Settlement Day (Belize) Have a Bad Day Day International Men's Day Monaco National Day (Monaco) Women's Entrepreneurship Day World Toilet Day November 20 Day of National Sovereignty (Argentina) Día de la Revolución (Mexico) Transgender Day of Remembrance  November 21 November 22 November 23 Independence Day (Lebanon)  November 23 Rudolf Maister day (Slovenia) November 24  Start of Brumalia (Ancient Rome) Lachit Divas (Assam, India) November 25 Blasé Day Evacuation Day (New York) (United States) National Parfait Day (United States) Independence Day (Suriname) International Day for the Elimination of Violence against Women  National Day (Bosnia and Herzegovina) St Catherine's Day Teachers' Day or Hari Guru (Indonesia) Vajiravudh Day (Thailand) November 26 Day of the Covenant (Bahá'í Faith) Constitution Day (India) National Cake Day (United States) Republic Day (Mongolia) November 27 Maaveerar Day
ST. ELSEWHERE: This Caribbean island that's paired with Nevis is also known as St. Christopher
St. Kitts
Simmonds, Keith C. (1987). "Political and Economic Factors Influencing the St. Kitts-Nevis Polity: An Historical Perspective".
3
Lennox Honychurch (D. Phil. in Anthropology) from Dominica, a leading scholar in the history and culture of Caribs, traces the European use of the term "Carib" to refer to the Leeward Island aborigines to Columbus, who picked it up from the Taínos on Hispaniola.
The final decision by the federal government was to not rebuild the old hospital after all, but to instead convert the old Government House in Nevis into a hospital, named Alexandra Hospital after Queen Alexandra, wife of King Edward VII.
The list included the Federation of Saint Kitts and Nevis, as well as Liechtenstein, Monaco, Luxembourg, the British Channel Islands, Israel, and Russia.
THE NAVY: While they've served in the Navy since before WWI, they weren't admitted to the academy until 1976
Women
However, it was long considered bad luck to permit women to sail on board naval vessels.
2
In ancient China, large naval battles were known since the Qin Dynasty (also see Battle of Red Cliffs, 208), employing the war junk during the Han Dynasty.
The development of large capacity, sail-powered ships carrying cannon led to a rapid expansion of European navies, especially the Spanish and Portuguese navies which dominated in the 16th and early 17th centuries, and helped propel the age of exploration and colonialism.
MIND YOUR BUSINESS: The USA's second-largest floor-based stock exchange, it joined forces with NASDAQ in 1998
American Stock Exchange
thumb|Studio  The NASDAQ Stock Market (), commonly known as the NASDAQ (currently stylized as Nasdaq), is an American stock exchange.
3
It is the second-largest exchange in the world by market capitalization, behind only the New York Stock Exchange.
History thumb|Former logo  In 1972, NASDAQ stood for National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations.
Every October, the Nasdaq Listing Qualifications Department reviews the Global Market Composite to determine if any of its stocks have become eligible for listing on the Global Select Market.
BIG APPLE CIRCUS: The equestrian, Sultan, is seen here riding in this style that also describes the city of emperor Nero
Roman
Cassius Dio, Roman History LXII.3 and Josephus, War of the Jews IV, say Nero's rule was 13 years, 8 months which would be until 11 June.
3
According to Suetonius, Nero "showed neither discrimination nor moderation in putting to death whomsoever he pleased" during this period.
Isaac, Benjamin (2004)
Sutton Publishing, 2000 (paperback ISBN 0-7509-2876-X).
DO YA THINK I'M "SEX"Y?: A borough in New Jersey, or a former English county now part of Greater London
Middlesex
The regions are:  Gateway Region, encompassing Middlesex County, Union County, Essex County, Hudson County, Bergen County, and Passaic County.
3
Around 180 million years ago, during the Jurassic Period, New Jersey bordered North Africa.
Britain believed that he was an ineffective and corrupt ruler, taking bribes and speculating on land.
Natural resources Forests cover 45%, or approximately 2.1 million acres, of New Jersey's land area.
"STUPID" ANSWERS: 1967 No. 1 hit for Frank & Nancy Sinatra
"Somethin' Stupid"
Other defining recordings include "Sugar Town", the 1967 number one "Somethin' Stupid" (a duet with her father), the title song from the James Bond film You Only Live Twice, several collaborations with Lee Hazlewood such as "Jackson", and her cover of Cher's "Bang Bang", which was used in the opening sequence of Quentin Tarantino's 2003 film Kill Bill: Volume 1.
3
Their biggest hit was a cover of the country song, "Jackson".
In 1967, she recorded the theme song for the James Bond film You Only Live Twice.
September 2009 saw the release of Sinatra's digital-only album Cherry Smiles: The Rare Singles, featuring previously unreleased tracks and songs only available on 45.
'90s SITCOMS: This NBC series was named for the autobiographical comic strip written by its perky heroine
Caroline in the City
About You, Sisters, Frasier, Friends, ER, Homicide: Life on the Street, Caroline in the City, NewsRadio, 3rd Rock from the Sun,
3
In 1925, AT&T decided that WEAF and its embryonic network were incompatible with the company's primary goal of providing a telephone service.
Overall, NBC retook its first place lead that year, and spent much of the next four years (with the exception of the 2002–03 season, when it was briefly jumped again by CBS for first) in the top spot.
All eleven NBC owned-and-operated stations owned by NBCUniversal Owned Television Stations' were the first stations to offer streams of their programming on NBC's website and mobile app, with intentions to reach agreements with other station groups to provide streams of NBC-affiliated stations in other markets.
TV COMEDY: David Hyde Pierce, on this NBC sitcom: "Her lips were saying 'No' but her eyes were saying 'Read my lips'"
Frasier
About You, Wings, Sisters, Frasier, Friends, ER and Will & Grace.
3
An executive at NBC's New York headquarters heard the WSB version of the notes during the networked broadcast of a Georgia Tech football game and asked permission to use it on the national network.
Some blamed Littlefield for losing David Letterman to CBS after naming Jay Leno as the successor to Johnny Carson on The Tonight Show, following the latter's retirement as host in May 1992.
Jeff Zucker  2000–2004
MOVIE "&" TV: Harry Connick Jr. has been seen as Dr. Leo Markus on this NBC show
Will & Grace
About You, Wings, Sisters, Frasier, Friends, ER and Will & Grace.
3
Citing complaints from many affiliates, which saw their late-evening newscasts drop significantly in the local ratings during The Jay Leno Shows run, NBC announced on January 10, 2010 that it would drop Leno's show from the 10:00 p.m. slot – with Zucker announcing plans to shift the program (which would have been reduced to a half-hour) into the 11:35 p.m. slot and shift its existing late night lineup (including The Tonight Show) by 30 minutes.
However, withholding the new season of The Voice and benching Revolution until late March, the network's midseason ratings suffered, falling to fifth place behind Spanish-language network Univision during the February sweeps period.
Tartikoff wrote in his memoirs that his biggest professional regret was cancelling the series Buffalo Bill, which he later went on to include in a fantasy "dream schedule" created for a TV Guide article that detailed his idea of "The Greatest Network Ever."
MASONS: This actress received 3 of her 4 Academy Award nominations for films written by Neil Simon
Marsha Mason
Lawrence Grobel, in fact, calls him "the Shakespeare of his time", and possibly the "most successful playwright in history." He states:  Broadway critic Walter Kerr tries to rationalize why Simon's work has been underrated:  Personal life Simon has been married five times, to dancer Joan Baim (1953–1973), actress Marsha Mason (1973–1981), twice to actress Diane Lander (1987–1988 and 1990–1998), and currently actress Elaine Joyce.
3
Simon states that among the reasons he became a writer was to fulfill his need to be independent of such emotional family issues, a need he recognized when he was seven or eight: "I'd better start taking care of myself somehow . . .
Barefoot in the Park (1963)
Columbia: University of South Carolina Press, 2002.
U.S. CITIES: An A to Z list of Ohio cities might run from Aberdeen to this birthplace of a famous western author
Zanesville
Ohio cities that function as centers of United States micropolitan areas include: Ashland (home of Ashland University) Ashtabula Athens (home of Ohio University) Bellefontaine Bucyrus Cambridge Celina Chillicothe (home of Ohio University-Chillicothe) Coshocton Defiance (home of Defiance College) Findlay (home of The University of Findlay) Fremont Greenville Marion (home of Marion Popcorn Festival) Mount Vernon (home of Mount Vernon Nazarene University) New Philadelphia-Dover Norwalk (home of the NHRA venue Summit Motorsports Park, headquarters of the International Hot Rod Association, and pioneer automobile company Fisher Body) Oxford (home of Miami University) Portsmouth (home of Shawnee State University) Salem Sidney Tiffin (home of Heidelberg College and Tiffin University) Urbana (home of Urbana University) Van Wert Wapakoneta (birthplace of Apollo 11 astronaut Neil Armstrong) Washington Court House Wilmington (home of Wilmington College) Wooster (home of The College of Wooster) Zanesville (home of Zane State College).
3
Although few have registered as noticeable to the average resident, more than 30 earthquakes occurred in Ohio between 2002 and 2007, and more than 200 quakes with a magnitude of 2.0 or higher have occurred since 1776.ODNR Updates Ohio Earthquake Map to Reflect Statewide Seismic Activity Since 2002 (news release), Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Geological Survey (September 18, 2007)
For 2008, 31 of Ohio's library systems were all ranked in the top ten for American cities of their population category.
Ohio and Its People.
GEEK LETTER SOCIETIES: The OSI is the "Initiative" to promote this, free access to software code
open source
Options Symbology Initiative, a plan to change the way that exchange-traded options are named   Technology   Open Systems Interconnection, (ISO 7498) a joint ISO and ITU-T standard for computer networks and communication protocols  OSI model, a layered description for communications and computer network protocol design  OSI protocols  Open Source Initiative, an organization dedicated to promoting open source software  Ohio Scientific Inc., a microcomputer manufacturer from the late 1970s to the early 1980s  Open Switching Interval, a type of disconnect supervision  On-Site Inspection, an advanced measure technique combining several methods - especially used in order to detect nuclear tests  Officine Stampaggi Industriali, Italian coachbuilder   Entertainment   OSI (band), an American progressive rock supergroup named after the former Office of Strategic Influence government agency  Office of Strategic Influence (album), the 2003 debut album by the band OSI  Origin Systems, a former United States computer game developer  Orchestra della Svizzera Italiana, an orchestra in southern Switzerland in the city of Lugano which is in the canton of Ticino.
2
OSI may refer to:   Places   Osijek Airport, with IATA code "OSI", an airport in Croatia  Ősi, Veszprém county, Hungary; a village  Oši, an archaeological site in Semigallia, Latvia  Ido-Osi, Ekiti State, Nigeria; which contains a village called "Osi"   Companies   OSI Group, an American holding company of meat processors that service the retail and food service industries  OSI Pharmaceuticals, an American pharmaceutical company  OSI Restaurant Partners, the restaurant and entertainment group that includes Outback Steakhouse  OSI Systems, a company that manufactures security scanners and medical equipment based in California  OSIsoft, a privately held company that develops devcie connectivity software  Objective Systems Integrators, a company that provides monitoring software for communication networks  Open Systems International, an automation software vendor for the electric, petroleum, transportation and water industries  Officine Stampaggi Industriali, defunct Italian coachbuilder   Government   Office of Scientific Intelligence, former name of a department of the Central Intelligence Agency now called the Directorate of Science and Technology  Office of Strategic Influence, a short-lived former American government agency created in 2001, part of the Department of Defense and focused on psychological warfare  Office of Special Investigations (disambiguation), a name shared by several government agencies  U.S. Air Force Office of Special Investigations  Office of Special Investigations (Government Accountability Office)  Office of Special Investigations (United States Department of Justice)  Office of Scientific Integrity, now United States Office of Research Integrity  Office of Special Investigation (Republic of Korea), a secret intelligence unit of Republic of Korea Air Force  Organizations  Olomouc Summer Institute, an educational program for high-school students  Open Space Institute, an organization that seeks to preserve scenic, natural and historic landscapes  Open Society Institute, a private charitable foundation established by George Soros to promote open societies around the world  Ordnance Survey Ireland (Suirbhéireacht Ordanáis Éireann)  Otto-Suhr-Institut, the political-science institute of the Free University of Berlin   Business, Finance  OSI, acronym for Official Sector Involvement in sovereign debt restructuring deals, as opposed to PSI (Private Sector Involvement).
Fiction   "Office of Scientific Intelligence", a fictional United States government agency in several television programs and movies  "Office of Secret Intelligence", a fictional United States government secret agency in the animated series The Venture Bros.   People   Osi (ancient tribe), an ancient tribe in Europe  Osi, ancient term for the Alans, an ancient tribe in the Caucasus  Osi Umenyiora, defensive end for the Atlanta Falcons  Osi Rhys Osmond, Welsh painter  See also  Osis (disambiguation)
THE ACADEMY AWARDS: The only person named Oscar to win an Oscar, he won twice
Oscar Hammerstein II
In  Oscar Blaketon, character in Heartbeat  Oscar Branning, a fictional child from EastEnders  Oscar Osborne,  a fictional child from Hollyoaks  Oscar, a fictional knight in the video game Dark Souls  Oscar, a kidnapped infant character in the film Ghostbusters II  Military , a Soviet/Russian submarine class Nakajima Ki-43, a World War II Japanese aircraft, codenamed "Oscar" by the Allies Oscar, the letter O in the NATO phonetic alphabet  Opera Oscar (opera), a 2013 opera about Oscar Wilde, by Theodore Morrison   People   Ansgar, French religious figure  Oscar (footballer, born 1991), Brazilian footballer who plays for Chelsea  Oscar I of Sweden, Swedish king of Sweden and Norway  Oscar II of Sweden, Swedish king of Sweden and Norway  Óscar Arias, Costa Rican politician  Oscar Cantoni, an Italian bishop  Oscar Cardozo, Paraguayan footballer  Oscar van Dillen, Dutch composer  Óscar Gutiérrez, American wrestler  Oscar Hammerstein II, American lyricist  Oskar Kokoschka, Austrian painter  Oskar Lafontaine, German politician  Oscar F. Mayer, American food company founder  Oscar Niemeyer, Brazilian architect  Oscar Peterson, Canadian musician (jazz pianist and composer)  Oscar Pistorius, South African athlete  Oscar de la Renta, (Dominican) American fashion designer  Oscar Robertson, American basketball player  Oscar F. Roessler, American politician  Óscar Romero, Salvadoran religious figure  Oscar dos Santos, Brazilian footballer  Oscar Scalfaro, Italian politician (President of the Italy)  Oskar Schindler, Czech businessperson  Oscar Wilde, Irish writer and poet  Geography  Oscar, Kentucky, U.S.  Oscar, Louisiana, U.S.  Oscar, Oklahoma, U.S.  Oscar, West Virginia, U.S.  Lake Oscar (disambiguation), two lakes in Minnesota  Technology and transport OSCAR, Orbital Satellite Carrying Amateur Radio OScar (open source car), a project aiming to design an open source vehicle CityRail H set or Outer Suburban CARs (OSCARs), a type of train in Australia  Computing OSCAR McMaster, an electronic medical record system OSCAR protocol, a protocol used by AOL Instant Messenger Open Source Cluster Application Resources (OSCAR), a Linux-based software installation   Other   Oscar (Irish mythology), the warrior son of Oisín and Niamh  Oscar (video game), a 1993 platform game  Psycho-Nics Oscar, an arcade game usually shortened to Oscar in American arcades  OSC OSCar, a synthesizer manufactured by the Oxford Synthesizer Company  Out of School Care and Recreation  , a 1958 comedy play by Claude Magnier twice adapted for cinema  Oscar, starring Louis de Funès  Oscar, starring Sylvester Stallone  Oscar Health, a U.S. health insurance company  See also  Office of the Scottish Charity Regulator, OSCR
2
Oscar, The Oscar or OSCAR may refer to: Academy Awards or Oscar, presented by the American Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences (AMPAS) for cinematic film achievements OSCAR Radio, a radio station run by the pupils of Oundle School Oscar (given name), an Irish- and English-language name; the article includes the names Osgar, Oskar, and Oskari OSCAR, Near-realtime global ocean surface current data set, see Ocean current  Animals Oscar (fish), Astronotus ocellatus Oscar (therapy cat), cat who can purportedly predict the deaths of hospice patients Oscar (bionic cat), a cat which had implants after losing both hind paws Unsinkable Sam, World War II ship's cat also known as Oscar oskar, a gene required for the development of the Drosophila embryo OSCAR (gene) Beast of Busco, a North American cryptid turtle named Oscar  Fictional characters  Oscar (Irish mythology), the warrior son of Oisín and Niamh  Oscar, a page in Verdi's opera Un ballo in maschera  Oscar Bluth, a character from the television series Arrested Development  Oscar François de Jarjayes, the main character of the manga and anime series Rose of Versailles  Oscar Goldman, a character from The Six Million Dollar Man and The Bionic Woman  Oscar the Grouch, a Muppet on Sesame Street  Oskar Kokoshka, a character from Hey Arnold!
Oscar Madison, a character from The Odd Couple  Oscar Martinez (The Office), a character from The Office  Oskar Matzerath, main character of The Tin Drum  Oscar Shales, a fictional fugitive from the television series Prison Break  Oskar Schell, the fictional protagonist from the novel Extremely Loud and Incredibly Close  Oscar, a Lance Knight in the game Fire Emblem: Path of Radiance  Oscar, a fish in Fish Hooks  Oscar, a fish from Shark Tale  Oskar Eriksson, the main character in Let the Right One
JOE RANFT: PIXAR LEGEND: Not only the voice of Peterbilt, Joe Ranft co-directed & helped write this Oscar-nominated 2006 Pixar hit
Cars
In  Oscar Blaketon, character in Heartbeat  Oscar Branning, a fictional child from EastEnders  Oscar Osborne,  a fictional child from Hollyoaks  Oscar, a fictional knight in the video game Dark Souls  Oscar, a kidnapped infant character in the film Ghostbusters II  Military , a Soviet/Russian submarine class Nakajima Ki-43, a World War II Japanese aircraft, codenamed "Oscar" by the Allies Oscar, the letter O in the NATO phonetic alphabet  Opera Oscar (opera), a 2013 opera about Oscar Wilde, by Theodore Morrison   People   Ansgar, French religious figure  Oscar (footballer, born 1991), Brazilian footballer who plays for Chelsea  Oscar I of Sweden, Swedish king of Sweden and Norway  Oscar II of Sweden, Swedish king of Sweden and Norway  Óscar Arias, Costa Rican politician  Oscar Cantoni, an Italian bishop  Oscar Cardozo, Paraguayan footballer  Oscar van Dillen, Dutch composer  Óscar Gutiérrez, American wrestler  Oscar Hammerstein II, American lyricist  Oskar Kokoschka, Austrian painter  Oskar Lafontaine, German politician  Oscar F. Mayer, American food company founder  Oscar Niemeyer, Brazilian architect  Oscar Peterson, Canadian musician (jazz pianist and composer)  Oscar Pistorius, South African athlete  Oscar de la Renta, (Dominican) American fashion designer  Oscar Robertson, American basketball player  Oscar F. Roessler, American politician  Óscar Romero, Salvadoran religious figure  Oscar dos Santos, Brazilian footballer  Oscar Scalfaro, Italian politician (President of the Italy)  Oskar Schindler, Czech businessperson  Oscar Wilde, Irish writer and poet  Geography  Oscar, Kentucky, U.S.  Oscar, Louisiana, U.S.  Oscar, Oklahoma, U.S.  Oscar, West Virginia, U.S.  Lake Oscar (disambiguation), two lakes in Minnesota  Technology and transport OSCAR, Orbital Satellite Carrying Amateur Radio OScar (open source car), a project aiming to design an open source vehicle CityRail H set or Outer Suburban CARs (OSCARs), a type of train in Australia  Computing OSCAR McMaster, an electronic medical record system OSCAR protocol, a protocol used by AOL Instant Messenger Open Source Cluster Application Resources (OSCAR), a Linux-based software installation   Other   Oscar (Irish mythology), the warrior son of Oisín and Niamh  Oscar (video game), a 1993 platform game  Psycho-Nics Oscar, an arcade game usually shortened to Oscar in American arcades  OSC OSCar, a synthesizer manufactured by the Oxford Synthesizer Company  Out of School Care and Recreation  , a 1958 comedy play by Claude Magnier twice adapted for cinema  Oscar, starring Louis de Funès  Oscar, starring Sylvester Stallone  Oscar Health, a U.S. health insurance company  See also  Office of the Scottish Charity Regulator, OSCR
2
Oscar, The Oscar or OSCAR may refer to: Academy Awards or Oscar, presented by the American Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences (AMPAS) for cinematic film achievements OSCAR Radio, a radio station run by the pupils of Oundle School Oscar (given name), an Irish- and English-language name; the article includes the names Osgar, Oskar, and Oskari OSCAR, Near-realtime global ocean surface current data set, see Ocean current  Animals Oscar (fish), Astronotus ocellatus Oscar (therapy cat), cat who can purportedly predict the deaths of hospice patients Oscar (bionic cat), a cat which had implants after losing both hind paws Unsinkable Sam, World War II ship's cat also known as Oscar oskar, a gene required for the development of the Drosophila embryo OSCAR (gene) Beast of Busco, a North American cryptid turtle named Oscar  Fictional characters  Oscar (Irish mythology), the warrior son of Oisín and Niamh  Oscar, a page in Verdi's opera Un ballo in maschera  Oscar Bluth, a character from the television series Arrested Development  Oscar François de Jarjayes, the main character of the manga and anime series Rose of Versailles  Oscar Goldman, a character from The Six Million Dollar Man and The Bionic Woman  Oscar the Grouch, a Muppet on Sesame Street  Oskar Kokoshka, a character from Hey Arnold!
Oscar Madison, a character from The Odd Couple  Oscar Martinez (The Office), a character from The Office  Oskar Matzerath, main character of The Tin Drum  Oscar Shales, a fictional fugitive from the television series Prison Break  Oskar Schell, the fictional protagonist from the novel Extremely Loud and Incredibly Close  Oscar, a Lance Knight in the game Fire Emblem: Path of Radiance  Oscar, a fish in Fish Hooks  Oscar, a fish from Shark Tale  Oskar Eriksson, the main character in Let the Right One
POLISH HISTORY: In August 1939 Germany & this country secretly agreed to divide Poland
the Soviet Union
In September 1939, World War II started with the invasions of Poland by Nazi Germany and the Soviet Union (as part of the Molotov–Ribbentrop Pact).
3
The richness of Polish forest (per SoEF 2011 statistics) is more than twice as high as European average (with Germany and France at the top), containing 2.304 billion cubic metres of trees.
Poland is thought to have around 164,800,000,000 m3 of proven natural gas reserves and around 96,380,000 barrels of proven oil reserves.
Many important events in the history of Poland involved the postal service, like the heroic defence of the Polish Post Office in Gdańsk in 1939, and the participation of the Polish Scouts' Postal Service in the Warsaw Uprising.
THE GREEK GOD'S ROMAN NAME: Poseidon had new adventures under this name
Neptune
The name of the sea-god Nethuns in Etruscan was adopted in Latin for Neptune in Roman mythology; both were sea gods analogous to Poseidon.
3
Ventris/Chadwick,Documents in Mycenean Greek p.242: B.Dietriech (2004):The origins of the Greek religion Bristol Phoenix Press.
There was a fest "Tavreia" in Ephesos.
"Petraios" (Πετραίος: related with rocks) in Thessaly.
WORLD LITERATURE: This student of Plato's wrote treatises on metaphysics, physics, poetics & rhetoric
Aristotle
Along with his teacher, Socrates, and his most famous student, Aristotle, Plato laid the very foundations of Western philosophy and science.
2
A more detailed analysis is given by .
Important authors for testimony include Olympiodorus the Younger, Plutarch, Proclus, Iamblichus, Eusebius, and Stobaeus.
AIRLINE & HUB: This airline's Paris-Charles De Gaulle 2 hub opened in 1996
Air France
Today it is the 4th busiest airport in the world by international traffic, and is the hub for the nation's flag carrier Air France.
3
A new project for La Defense, called Hermitage Plaza, launched in 2009, proposes to build two towers, 85 and 86 stories or 320 metres high, which would be the tallest buildings in the European Union, just slightly shorter than the Eiffel Tower.
Sculptors such as Girardon, Coysevox and Coustou acquired reputations as the finest artists in the royal court in 17th-century France.
The hospitals receive more than 5.8 million annual patient visits.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1429, while leading an attack on Paris, she was wounded by an arrow
Joan of Arc
They repelled an attempt by Joan of Arc to liberate the city in 1429.
3
Since the late 19th century, Paris is also known as Panam(e) () in French slang.
thumb|right|The Palais-Royal, residence of the Conseil d'État|340x340px France's highest courts are located in Paris.
Paris' department store district in the 1st, 6th, 8th and 9th arrondissements employ 10 percent of mostly female Paris workers, with 100,000 of these registered in the retail trade.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1785 this future French emperor graduated from military school in Paris, 42nd in his class of 58
Napoleon
thumb|The Paris Opera was the centrepiece of Napoleon III's new Paris.
3
Most of France's major universities and grandes écoles are located in Paris, as are France's major newspapers, including Le Monde, Le Figaro, and Libération.
From the 1860 area of , the city limits were expanded marginally to  in the 1920s.
Paris became a major centre for jazz and still attracts jazz musicians from all around the world to its clubs and cafés.
ALMOST ASSASSINATED: August 22, 1962 when his limousine was attacked near Paris
Charles de Gaulle
The city is a major rail, highway, and air-transport hub, served by the two international airports Paris-Charles de Gaulle and Paris-Orly.
3
The May 1968 events in France resulted in the breakup of the University of Paris into 13 independent campuses.
Each of Paris' 20 arrondissements has its own town hall and a directly elected council (conseil d'arrondissement), which, in turn, elects an arrondissement mayor.
In middle of the 19th century, there were three other active and competing opera houses: the Opéra-Comique (which still exists), Théâtre-Italien, and Théâtre Lyrique (which in modern times changed its profile and name to Théâtre de la Ville).
AIRPORTS: CDG, the international code for this Paris airport, stands for the name of a former French president
Charles de Gaulle
The city is a major rail, highway, and air-transport hub, served by the two international airports Paris-Charles de Gaulle and Paris-Orly.
3
In addition to the Sorbonne location, there are branches in Malesherbes, Clignancourt-Championnet, Michelet-Institut d'Art et d'Archéologie, Serpente-Maison de la Recherche, and Institut des Etudes Ibériques.
Also hosted at the Stade de France, two UEFA Champions League Finals in the current century: 2000 and 2006 editions.
Solo Parigi è degna di Roma; solo Roma è degna di Parigi.
MUTILATED ART: In Paris you can see this sculptor's 1901 creation, which he considered a finished work
Auguste Rodin
The most prestigious names of French and foreign sculptors, who made their reputation in Paris in the modern era, are Frédéric Auguste Bartholdi (Statue of Liberty), Auguste Rodin, Camille Claudel, Antoine Bourdelle, Paul Landowski (statue of Christ the Redeemer in Rio de Janeiro) and Aristide Maillol.
3
Fortification of the Île-de-France failed to prevent sacking by Vikings in 845 but Paris' strategic importance—with its bridges preventing ships from passing—was established by successful defence in the Siege of Paris (885–86).
In September 2014, Mayor Hidalgo announced that the city would have budget shortfall of €400 million, largely because of a cut in support from the national government.
It is composed of 209 members representing the different communes within the region.
IN PARIS: The landmark seen here rises above this crowded avenue, one of the world's most famous streets
Champs-Elysées
The final stage of the most famous bicycle racing in the world, Tour de France, always finishes in Paris, and, since 1975, the race has finished on the Champs-Elysées.
3
Contemporary architecture includes the Musée du Quai Branly by Jean Nouvel (2006) and the new contemporary art museum of the Louis Vuitton Foundation by Frank Gehry (2014).
In 2010 it was the workplace of 500,000 salaried employees, about thirty percent of the salaried employees in Paris and ten percent of those in the Île-de-France.
The Marais-quarter Agoudas Hakehilos Synagogue, built in 1913 by architect Hector Guimard, is a Paris landmark.
IT'S A COUP D'ETAT: In Pakistan Nawaz Sharif tried to dismiss this military leader in 1999 but was overthrown by him instead
Musharraf
left|thumb|President Bush meets with President Musharraf in Islamabad during his 2006 visit to Pakistan.
3
Traditional madrasahs – primary institutions of higher learning for Muslims in the subcontinent – were no longer supported by the English Crown, and nearly all of the madrasahs lost their financial endowment.
Pakistan's Olympic medal tally stands at 10 of which 8 were earned in hockey.
ISBN 978-0-415-14966-2  Cohen, Stephen Philip (2006).
ASIAN CITIES: The tomb of Pakistan's founder, Muhammad Ali Jinnah, is a landmark in this former capital
Karachi
Administrative divisions   Administrative DivisionCapitalPopulation Quetta  7,914,000   Lahore  101,000,000  Karachi  42,400,000   Peshawar  28,000,00020px Gilgit–Baltistan  Gilgit 1,800,000   3,176,331   Muzaffarabad 4,567,98220px Islamabad Capital Territory Islamabad 1,151,868 A federal parliamentary republic state, Pakistan is a federation that comprises four provinces: Punjab, Khyber-Pakhtunkhwa, Sindh, and Balochistan.
3
Members of the National Assembly are elected through the first-past-the-post system under universal adult suffrage, representing electoral districts known as National Assembly constituencies.
Pakistan is home to several mountain peaks over 7000 m.  thumb|left|120px|Daman-e-Koh is a garden overlooking the city of Islamabad.
Pakistanis wear clothes range from exquisite colors and designs to the type of fabric (silk, chiffon, cotton, etc).
NATIONS' MOST POPULOUS CITIES: Pakistan
Karachi
Administrative divisions   Administrative DivisionCapitalPopulation Quetta  7,914,000   Lahore  101,000,000  Karachi  42,400,000   Peshawar  28,000,00020px Gilgit–Baltistan  Gilgit 1,800,000   3,176,331   Muzaffarabad 4,567,98220px Islamabad Capital Territory Islamabad 1,151,868 A federal parliamentary republic state, Pakistan is a federation that comprises four provinces: Punjab, Khyber-Pakhtunkhwa, Sindh, and Balochistan.
3
The superior judiciary is composed of the Supreme Court of Pakistan, the Federal Shariat Court and five High Courts, with the Supreme Court at the apex.
The Islamabad has its own police component, the Capital Police, to maintain law and order in the capital.
Sports
ARCHAEOLOGY: The bricks used around 2000 B.C. in Mohenjo-Daro, in Pakistan, were the standard size used all over this valley
Indus Valley
The territory that now constitutes Pakistan was previously home to several ancient cultures, including the Mehrgarh of the Neolithic and the Bronze Age Indus Valley Civilisation, and was later home to kingdoms ruled by people of different faiths and cultures, including Hindus, Indo-Greeks, Muslims, Turco-Mongols, Afghans and Sikhs.
3
Currently, Pakistan maintains a policy of credible minimum deterrence, calling its program vital nuclear deterrence against foreign aggression.
Lahore  1,490  Energy Pakistan Refinery  Karachi  1,440  Petroleum and Gas Sui Southern Gas Pipelines  Karachi  1,380  Natural gas Pakistan International Airlines  Karachi  1,360  Aviation Engro Corporation  Karachi  1,290  Food and Wholesale  Nuclear power and energy  thumb||Jhampir Wind Power Plants|  Jhimpir Wind Power Projects are currently producing around 250 mega-watt, are expected produce 3200 mega-watt in near future Energy from the nuclear power source is provided by three licensed-commercial nuclear power plants, as of 2012 data.
The most important Indo-Islamic-style building still standing is the tomb of the Shah Rukn-i-Alam in Multan.
1812: In October the capital of Pennsylvania moved permanently from Lancaster to this city
Harrisburg
The state capital is Harrisburg.
2
It is closest to Palatine German.
Other companies such as Herr's Snacks, Martin's Potato Chips, Snyder's of Berlin (not associated with Snyder's of Hanover) and Troyer Farms Potato Products are popular chip manufacturers.
PENNSYLVANIA CITIES: Its old city hall housed the U.S. Supreme Court from 1791 to 1800
Philadelphia
The state's five most populous cities are Philadelphia (1,560,297), Pittsburgh (305,801), Allentown (118,577), Erie (100,671), and Reading (89,893).
3
Pennsylvania's reported population of Hispanics, especially among the Black race, has markedly increased in recent years.
High Point Raceway in located in Mt. Morris, Pennsylvania, and Steel City is located in Delmont, Pennsylvania.
PGA tournaments in Pennsylvania include the 84 Lumber Classic, played at Nemacolin Woodlands Resort, in Farmington and the Northeast Pennsylvania Classic, played at Glenmaura National Golf Club, in Moosic.
OUR NATIONAL PASTIME: (Sofia of the Clue Crew at the Louisville Slugger Museum)  Forests in Pennsylvania & New York provide the white type of this wood, used in most of today's major league bats
ash
This charter, granted by Charles II (England) to William Penn, constituted him and his heirs proprietors of the province, which, in honor of his father, Admiral William Penn, (whose cash advances and services were thus requited,) was called Pennsylvania.
3
Pennsylvania has  of coastline along Lake Erie and  of shoreline along the Delaware Estuary.
The state has 5 regions, namely the Allegheny Plateau, Ridge and Valley, Atlantic Coastal Plain, Piedmont, and the Erie Plain.
The Pennsylvania Turnpike system is  long, with the mainline portion stretching from Ohio to Philadelphia and New Jersey.
MIND IF I LEAD?: Syngman Rhee of Korea & Ferdinand Marcos of the Philippines had to find Asylum in this U.S. state
Hawaii
Marcos and his allies fled to Hawaii and Corazón Aquino was recognized as president.
3
The galleons sailed once or twice a year, between the 16th and 19th centuries.
The country is an active participant in the Human Rights Council as well as in peacekeeping missions, particularly in East Timor.
In Merriam-Webster Online Dictionary.
"BO"s: Someone from Prague, or a person who lives & acts free of regard for conventional rules
Bohemian
Habsburg era thumb|Prague panorama in 1650 In 1526, the Bohemian estates elected Ferdinand I of the House of Habsburg.
3
This bridge was destroyed by a flood in 1342.
In 1993, after the split of Czechoslovakia, Prague became the capital city of the new Czech Republic.
As of 2008, there were 13,000 researchers (out of 30,000 in the Czech Republic, counted in full-time equivalent), representing 3% share of Prague's economically active population.
MUSEUMS: Bertramka Villa in Prague, a museum devoted to this "Don Giovanni" composer, has his harpsichord in display
Mozart
Some of the significant cultural institutions include the National Theatre (Národní Divadlo) and the Estates Theatre (Stavovské or Tylovo or Nosticovo divadlo), where the premières of Mozart's Don Giovanni and La clemenza di Tito were held.
3
The city played major roles in the Protestant Reformation, the Thirty Years' War, and in 20th-century history, during both World Wars and the post-war Communist era.
Inner Ring Road (The City Ring "MO"): Once completed it will surround the wider central part of the city.
Another airport in the proximity is Aero Vodochody aircraft factory to the north, used for testing purposes, as well as for aeroclub aviation.
BIBLICAL QUOTES: The Philistines took him "and put out his eyes, and brought him down to Gaza, and bound him with fetters of brass"
Samson
On the basis of the LXX's regular translation into "allophyloi", Robert Drews states that the term "Philistines" means simply "non-Israelites of the Promised Land" when used in the context of Samson, Saul and David.
3
During the 10th–7th centuries BC the distinctiveness of the material culture appears to have been absorbed with that of surrounding peoples..
The Bible does not mention any language problems between the Israelites and the Philistines, as it does with other groups.
Although most Philistine names are semitic (such as Ahimelech, Mitinti, Hanun, and Dagon) some of the Philistine names, such as Goliath, Achish, and Phicol, appear to be of non-Semitic origin, and Indo-European etymologies have been suggested.
AWARDS: His "New Hampshire:  A Poem With Notes and Grace Notes" won a 1924 Pulitzer Prize
Robert Frost
Arts & Letters  Four prizes  Robert Frost, Poetry  Eugene O'Neill, Drama  Robert E. Sherwood, Drama (3) and Biography  Three prizes  Edward Albee, Drama  Archibald MacLeish, Poetry (2) and Drama  Edwin Arlington Robinson, Poetry  Carl Sandburg, Poetry (2) and Biography  Robert Penn Warren, Poetry (2) and Fiction  Thornton Wilder, Drama (2) and the Novel  Two prizes  Bernard Bailyn, History  Samuel Barber, Music Composition  Walter Jackson Bate, Biography  Samuel Flagg Bemis, History and Biography  Stephen Vincent Benét, Poetry  Robert Caro, Biography  Elliott Carter, Music Composition  David Herbert Donald, Biography  Horst Faas, Photography  William Faulkner, Fiction  Douglas Southall Freeman, Biography  Burton J. Hendrick, Biography  Paul Horgan, History  Marquis James, Biography  George S. Kaufman, Drama (both shared)  Margaret Leech, History  David Levering Lewis, Biography  Robert Lowell, Poetry  Norman Mailer, Fiction and Nonfiction  David McCullough, Biography  Gian Carlo Menotti, Music Composition  William S. Merwin, Poetry  Samuel Eliot Morison, Biography  Allan Nevins, Biography  Walter Piston, Music Composition  Booth Tarkington, Novel  Alan Taylor, History  Barbara W. Tuchman, Nonfiction
3
It was established in 1917 by provisions in the will of American (Hungarian-born) publisher Joseph Pulitzer, and is administered by Columbia University in New York City.
It allocated $250,000 to the prize and scholarships.
Updated 2013 by Sig Gissler.
LITERARY TERMS: This term for stories about larger-than-life characters is most appropriate for the towering Paul Bunyan
tall tales
His exploits revolve around the tall tales of his superhuman labors, and he is customarily accompanied by Babe the Blue Ox.
3
In contrast to the lengthy narratives abundant in published material, Paul Bunyan "stories" when told in the lumbercamp bunkhouses were presented in short fragments.
A significant portion of these were produced from the 1960s thru the 1970s by the company International Fiberglass as part of their "Muffler Men" series of giant, fiberglass sculptures.
Legends of Paul Bunyan (1947) was the first book published by the prolific tall tale writer Harold Felton.
SCRIPT DOCTORS: 1964: Peter Sellers as this German scientist who helped us love the bomb
Dr. Strangelove
Films demonstrating his artistic range include I'm All Right Jack (1959), Stanley Kubrick's Lolita (1962) and Dr. Strangelove (1964), What's New, Pussycat? (1965), Casino Royale (1967), The Party (1968), Being There (1979) and the five films of the Pink Panther series (1963–78).
3
He was also offered some small acting parts.
Second World War (1939–45)
I won't tell you what I think of you.
MOUNTAINS: Aneto in the Pyrenees is this country's highest point
Spain
The Pyrenees (;  ,  , , , ,  or ) is a range of mountains in southwest Europe that forms a natural border between France and Spain.
3
The annual snow-line varies in different parts of the Pyrenees from about 2,700 to 2,800 metres above sea level.
The principal languages spoken in the area are Spanish, French, Aragonese, Catalan (in Catalonia and Andorra), and Basque.
Pre-Pyrenees Sub-Pyrenees  Mountain passes of the Pyrenees List of mountains in Aragon Montcalm Massif  References  Further reading         Tony Milne, 10 Manuels and a Manolete, A carpark-to-peak guide to the high Pyrenees, Handmaid Books, 2013.
COUNTRIES: This small country in the Pyrenees uses the money of its neighbors, France & Spain
Andorra
For the most part, the main crest forms a massive divider between France and Spain, with the microstate of Andorra sandwiched in between.
2
Basa Mora, in Gistain valley, Aragon.
Ski resorts thumb|Ski Center, Cerler (Spain)  Ski resorts in the Pyrenees include:   Alp 2500 (Spain)  Arette (France)  Astún (Spain)  Artouste (France)  Ax-les-Thermes (France)  Baqueira-Beret (Spain)  Boí Taüll Resort (Spain)  Bareges-La Mongie (Tourmalet) (France)  Luz Ardiden (France)  Bourg-d'Oueil (France)  Cauterets (France)  Candanchú (Spain)  Cerler (Spain)  Espot Esquí (Spain)  Font-Romeu (France)  Formigal (Spain)  Gavarnie GèdrePays Toy Ski Resort (France)  Gourette (France)  Guzet-Neige (France)  Hautacam (France)  La Molina (Spain)
FLAGS: The staff & hat of the Bishop of Urgel can be found on this tiny Pyrenees country's flag
Andorra
For the most part, the main crest forms a massive divider between France and Spain, with the microstate of Andorra sandwiched in between.
2
The Pyrenees are older than the Alps: their sediments were first deposited in coastal basins during the Paleozoic and Mesozoic eras.
The Pyrenean desman is found only in some of the streams of the northern slopes of these mountains; the only other member of this genus is confined to the rivers of the Caucasus in southern Russia.
SHAKESPEAREAN LAST SCENES: Puck's last speech in this play begins, "If we shadows have offended, think but this--and all is mended"
A Midsummer Night's Dream
Puck may refer to:  Objects  Hockey puck  Puck, a graphics tablet accessory  Puck, the coffee grounds inside an espresso machine portafilter  Fictional characters  Puck (mythology), a folklore character  Puck (A Midsummer Night's Dream), a character from Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream  Puck, from the Faeries CBS TV special  Puck, from Gargoyles animated series  Puck, the eponymous character from Rudyard Kipling's Puck of Pook's Hill and its sequel  Puck, from The Sandman series of comic books  Puck, from The Sisters Grimm series of novels  Puck (comics), the codename of two Marvel characters  Puck (Glee), from the musical comedy-drama Glee  Puck (Love Birds), youngest penguin from the Robert J. Sherman musical Love Birds  Peter Puck, a hockey-puck-shaped cartoon character  Puck, a character from the Berserk  manga and anime series
1
Literature  Puck (magazine), an 1871–1918 humor publication  Puck (literary magazine), a 1990s publication  Puck, a novel by Ouida  Places  Puck, Poland  Puck (moon), a moon of Uranus  Puck Building, a Manhattan landmark  Bay of Puck, in the Baltic Sea  People  David "Puck" Rainey, reality TV personality  Theodore Puck (1916–2005), American geneticist  Wolfgang Puck (born 1949), Austrian celebrity chef and restaurateur  Other uses  Puck Fair, an Irish festival  Puck, a monotypic genus of dreamer from the family Oneirodidae.
SO YOU WANT TO BE A 19th CENTURY HEROINE: Even if you're 27 & still single, like Anne in this author's "Persuasion", your life may not be over
Jane Austen
thumb|Persuasion, novel by Jane Austen.
3
Fundamental attribution error occurs when people wrongly attribute either a shortcoming or accomplishment to internal factors, and disregarding any external factors.
There are two major reasons why the scarcity principle works: when things are difficult to get, they are usually more valuable so that can make it seem to have better quality; and when things become less available, we could lose the chance to acquire them.
Thus it is important to be able to see the topic from different angles in order to anticipate the reaction others have to a proposal.
WE MAKE THAT: Play around with its PlayStation 3
Sony
The PlayStation 3 (PS3) is a home video game console produced by Sony Computer Entertainment.
2
OtherOS support  PlayStation 3 initially shipped with the ability to install an alternative operating system alongside the main system software; Linux and other Unix based operating systems were available.
Criticism was placed on the new disc loader, stating: "The cover can be moved by hand if you wish, there's also an eject button to do the work for you, but there is no software eject from the triangle button menus in the Xross Media Bar (XMB) interface.
1994 FILMS: Quentin Tarantino directed this film & also had a bit role as Jimmy of Toluca Lake
Pulp Fiction
Its popularity was boosted by his second film, Pulp Fiction (1994), a black-comedy crime film that was a major success both among critics and audiences.
3
He had so much knowledge of films, that he would try to get people to watch really cool movies."  Film career
I listen to what everyone says, I watch little idiosyncratic behavior, people tell me a joke and I remember it.
Tarantino has yet to refile a claim but retains the legal right to do so in the future.
THINGS THAT HAPPENED: It was under this czar that Russia went on the Julian calendar used in the West; he liked Western stuff
Peter the Great
Imperial Russia  thumb|upright|Peter the Great, the first Emperor of Russia Under Peter the Great, Russia was proclaimed an Empire in 1721 and became recognized as a world power.
3
Russia was the world's second biggest exporter of major arms in 2010-14, according to SIPRI data.
In 1916, the Brusilov Offensive of the Russian Army almost completely destroyed the military of Austria-Hungary.
Note: several different routes have the same number. and Kiev–Vladivostok ().CIS railway timetable, route No. 350, Kiev-Vladivostok, August 2009.
"COLD" CASE: Post-WWII conflict between the U.S. & Russia
the Cold War
Becoming the world's second nuclear weapons power, the USSR established the Warsaw Pact alliance and entered into a struggle for global dominance, known as the Cold War, with the United States and NATO.
3
p. 62.
Aleksandr Butlerov was one of the creators of the theory of chemical structure, playing a central role in organic chemistry.
The Soviet Red Stars are also encountered, often on military equipment and war memorials.
FOREIGN-BORN LEADERS: Born in what was then Prussia, she became ruler of Russia following the murder of her husband Peter III
Catherine the Great
The reigns of Catherine the Great and her grandson Alexander I saw the flourishing of Neoclassical architecture, most notably in the capital city of Saint Petersburg.
3
A Companion to Russian History.
Wall Street Journal, 22 September 2010Did A New Pipeline Just Make Russia The Most Important Energy Superpower By Far by Graham Winfrey.
It is an international professional ice hockey league in Eurasia and consists of 28 teams, of which 21 are based in Russia and 7 more are located in Latvia, Kazakhstan, Belarus, Finland, Slovakia, and Croatia.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Russia's Lena River lies within this large, cold eastern region of the country
Siberia
During his long reign, Ivan the Terrible nearly doubled the already large Russian territory by annexing the three Tatar khanates (parts of the disintegrated Golden Horde): Kazan and Astrakhan along the Volga River, and the Siberian Khanate in southwestern Siberia.
3
The Stockholm International Peace Research Institute, SIPRI, found that Russia was the second biggest exporter of arms in 2010-14, increasing their exports by 37 per cent from the period 2005-2009.
The Soviet Union won all the Bandy World Championships for men between 1957–79 and some thereafter too.
The imperial motto God is with us and the Soviet motto Proletarians of all countries, unite! are now obsolete and no new motto has replaced them.
"NEW" ENGLAND: Tennis Hall of Fame, anyone?  It's located in this seaside city in Rhode Island
Newport
Rhode Island colony was founded on what is now commonly called Aquidneck Island, the largest of several islands in Narragansett Bay, and included the settlements of Newport and Portsmouth.
3
In the 1920s and 1930s, rural Rhode Island saw a surge in Ku Klux Klan membership, largely in reaction to large waves of immigrants moving to the state.
Based on its area, Rhode Island even has the highest density of electoral votes.
The quintessential summer meal in Rhode Island is chowder and clam cakes.
FAMOUS WOMEN: From 1973 to 1983 she was Rolling Stone magazine's chief photographer
Annie Leibovitz
Notable staff   Robert Altman  Michael Azerrad  Lester Bangs  Robert Christgau  J. D. Considine  Brian Cookman  Timothy Crouse  Cameron Crowe  Anthony DeCurtis  Jancee Dunn  Eric Ehrmann  Sabrina Erdely  Joe Eszterhas  Owen Fegan  Timothy Ferris  Dana Leslie FieldsMedia Industry Newsletter http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1G1-132689996.html  Ben Fong-Torres  David Fricke  Ralph J. Gleason  William Greider  Michael Hastings  Jerry Hopkins  Lenny Kaye  Caroline Kennedy  Joe Klein  David LaChapelle  Jon Landau  Annie Leibovitz  Steven Levy  Kurt Loder  Greil Marcus  Dave Marsh  Richard Meltzer  John Mendelsohn  Paul Nelson  P. J. O'Rourke  Rob Sheffield  Ralph Steadman  Neil Strauss  Matt Taibbi  Hunter S. Thompson  Nick Tosches  Touré  Peter Travers  Jann Wenner  Baron Wolman  Evan Wright  In popular culture  "The Cover of Rolling Stone" is a 1973 song satirizing success in the music business.
3
Muddy Waters used the name for a song he wrote.
Bill Moyers, Matt Taibbi and Yves Smith on the Follies of Big Banks and Government, June 22, 2012  The printed format has gone through several changes.
Rolling Stones film critic, Peter Travers, has been criticized for his high number of repetitively used blurbs.
"I" LADS: Born in Romania in 1912, this absurdist playwright died in 1994
Ionesco
Mircea Eliade, Nicolae Grigorescu, Marin Preda, Liviu Rebreanu, Eugène Ionesco, Emil Cioran, and Constantin Brâncuși.
3
however, according to Strabo, the Dacians and the Getae spoke the same language.
Again foreign powers created heavy pressure on Romania, by means of the Molotov–Ribbentrop Pact of non-aggression from 23 August 1939.
In 2005, the government replaced Romania's progressive tax system with a flat tax of 16% for both personal income and corporate profit, among the lowest rates in the European Union.
CAPITAL RIVERS: Rome
the Tiber
17  From Rumon or Rumen, archaic name of the Tiber, which in turn has the same root as the Greek verb ῥέω (rhèo) and the Latin verb ruo, which both mean "flow";This hypothesis originates from the Roman Grammarian Maurus Servius Honoratus.
3
In World War II, due to its art treasuries and the presence of Vatican, Rome largely escaped the tragic destiny of other European cities.
Overlooking Piazza del Popolo and the Spanish Steps are the gardens of Pincio and Villa Medici.
According to the Encyclopædia Britannica, the finest ancient bridge remaining in Rome is the Ponte Sant'Angelo, which was completed in 135 AD, and was decorated with ten statues of the angels, designed by Bernini in 1688.
THE "I"'s HAVE IT: The first Pope to bear this name tried to prevent Alaric from sacking Rome; it didn't work
Innocent
Under Pope Innocent III, whose reign marked the apogee of the papacy, the commune liquidated the senate, and replaced it with a Senatore, who was subject to the pope.
3
During this period, the years of la dolce vita ("the sweet life"), Rome became a fashionable city, with popular classic films such as Ben Hur, Quo Vadis, Roman Holiday and La Dolce Vita filmed in the city's iconic Cinecittà film studios.
Outside the Walls, the Basilica di San Clemente, San Carlo alle Quattro Fontane and the Church of the Gesu.
It is one of Rome's most ambitious modern architecture projects alongside Renzo Piano's Auditorium Parco della Musica and Massimiliano Fuksas' Rome Convention Center, Centro Congressi Italia EUR, in the EUR district, due to open in 2016.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: When in Rome, it's hard to miss this ancient monument seen here; it's over 100 feet tall
Trajan's Column
A list of important monuments and sites of ancient Rome includes the Roman Forum, the Domus Aurea, the Pantheon, Trajan's Column, Trajan's Market, the Catacombs, the Circus Maximus, the Baths of Caracalla, Castel Sant'Angelo, the Mausoleum of Augustus, the Ara Pacis, the Arch of Constantine, the Pyramid of Cestius, and the Bocca della Verità.  Medieval The middle age boroughs of the city, lying mainly around the Capitol, have been largely pulled down between the end of the 19th century and the fascist period, but many notable buildings still stay.
3
PUQ. p.185.
The ruling popes until the first half of the 16th century, from Nicholas V, founder of the Vatican Library,  to Pius II, humanist and literate, from Sixtus IV, a warrior pope, to Alexander VI, immoral and nepotist, from Julius II, soldier and patron, to Leo X, who gave his name to this period ("the century of Leo X"), all devoted their energy to the greatness and the beauty of the Eternal City, to the power of their stock, and to the patronage of the arts.
Beginning with the Council of Trent in 1545, the Church began the Counter-Reformation as an answer to the Reformation, a large-scale questioning of the Church's authority on spiritual matters and governmental affairs.
YEARS: Following his resignation in this year, we didn't have Richard Nixon to kick around anymore
1974
Richard Milhous Nixon (January 9, 1913 – April 22, 1994) was the 37th President of the United States, serving from 1969 to 1974 when he became the only U.S. president to resign the office.
3
Donald is to the left of his brother.
He faced little opposition in the Republican primaries and chose former Massachusetts Senator Henry Cabot Lodge Jr. as his running mate.
Throughout the 1980s, Nixon maintained an ambitious schedule of speaking engagements and writing, traveled, and met with many foreign leaders, especially those of Third World countries.
EVILDOERS: When the eastern Roman Empire refused to pay his tribute demands, this Hun attacked
Attila
The Romans were successful in fighting off all invaders, most famously Attila the Hun, though the Empire had assimilated so many Germanic peoples of dubious loyalty to Rome that the Empire started to dismember itself.
3
From the First Century A.D. to the Third (Johns Hopkins University Press, 1976, 1979), p. 30.
Suetonius, Life of Vitellius 13.2; Gowers, The Loaded Table, p. 20.
The military produced a vast amount of written reports and service records,Sara Elise Phang, "Military Documents, Languages, and Literacy," in A Companion to the Roman Army (Blackwell, 2011), pp.
KID'S TOUGH: As this title duo, Carmen & Juni Cortez have a secret-agent mom & dad in 3 Robert Rodriguez movies
Spy Kids
Rodriguez also directed the Spy Kids films, The Faculty, as well as The Adventures of Sharkboy and Lavagirl in 3-D, Planet Terror, and Machete.
3
It was selected by Film/Video Curator Sally Berger, for the Black Maria 20th-anniversary retrospective at MoMA in 2006.
Predators right|200px|thumb|Rodríguez at the premiere of Grindhouse, Austin, Texas, 2007  On April 23, 2009, it was announced that Rodríguez would produce a new Predator sequel, entitled Predators.
This has earned him the nickname of "the one-man film crew".
MAY THE "FOR"s BE WITH YOU: Formerly, Taiwan's name
Formosa
The island of Taiwan (formerly known as "Formosa") was mainly inhabited by Taiwanese aborigines until the Dutch and Spanish settlement during the Age of Discovery in the 17th century, when Han Chinese began immigrating to the island.
3
thumb|With President Chiang Kai-shek, the U.S. President Dwight D. Eisenhower waved to crowds during his visit to Taipei in June 1960.
Government  thumb|right|The Presidential Building in Taipei has housed the Office of the President of the Republic of China since 1950|alt=A tall and large building with a tower in its center.
The Republic of China has its own currency, the New Taiwan dollar.
A TALE OF ONE CITY: William Shakespeare's "Romeo and Juliet"
Verona
Characters  Ruling house of Verona Prince Escalus is the ruling Prince of Verona.
3
Romeo describes Juliet as being like the sun,Romeo and Juliet, II.ii.
Switchblades replaced swords, feasts and balls became drug-laden rock parties, and Romeo committed suicide by hypodermic needle.
Sanders (2007: 66–67)  In 1977, Michael Smuin's production of one of the play's most dramatic and impassioned dance interpretations was debuted in its entirety by San Francisco Ballet.
TRAVEL EUROPE: A cliff above a dangerous part of the Rhine, or a siren said to lure boatmen to their doom there
Lorelei
Seerhein   thumb|left|Distances markers along the Rhine indicate distances from this bridge in Constance thumb|right|upright|The 555km marker, downstream from the Lorelei The Seerhein is only four km long.
3
Reichenau Island was formed at the same time as the Seerhein, when the water level was lowered to its current level.
At present, the branches Waal and Nederrijn-Lek discharge to the North Sea, through the former Meuse estuary, near Rotterdam.
right|thumb|Allied soldiers crossing the Rhine into Germany after the end of WWI, December 1918 The Rhine became an important symbol in German nationalism during the formation of the German state in the 19th century (see Rhine romanticism).
THE RIVER RHINE: Before it empties into the North Sea, the Rhine splits into 3 branches in this country
the Netherlands
The Rhine () is a European river that begins in the Swiss canton of Graubünden in the southeastern Swiss Alps, forms part of the  Swiss-Austrian, Swiss-Liechtenstein border, Swiss-German and then the Franco-German border, then flows through the Rhineland and eventually empties into the North Sea in the Netherlands.
3
Nearby, on the other side of the Sertig, is the Rinerhorn.
It is here that the Rhine encounters some more of its main tributaries, such as the Neckar, the Main and, later, the Moselle, which contributes an average discharge of more than .
The northern flow keeps the name IJssel until it flows into Lake IJsselmeer.
MAY-DECEMBER MOVIES: This 1971 cult film's title characters were a 20-year-old (Bud Cort) & a 79-year old (Ruth Gordon)
Harold And Maude
Her later work included performances in Rosemary's Baby (1968), Harold and Maude (1971), and the Clint Eastwood films Every Which Way but Loose (1978) and Any Which Way You Can (1980).
3
After a three-month recovery, she and Kelly relocated to Indianapolis where they started a repertory company.
ArkwrightFilmed in 1984 and released after Gordon's death  Television  Year Title Role Notes1950The Prudential Family Playhouse Paula Wharton episode:
Miller TV movie1978Perfect GentlemenMrs.
ROBIN HOOD: It's the royal forest in Nottinghamshire in which Robin lived & poached
Sherwood Forest
Robin Hood and Little John or The Merry Men of Sherwood Forest.
2
Largely a paraphrase of the Gest, it also contains material revealing that the author was familiar with early versions of a number of the Robin Hood broadside ballads.
The 17th century introduced the minstrel Alan-a-Dale.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1200 Africa's Shona people had a mighty city called "Great" this, adopted in 1979 as Rhodesia's new name
Zimbabwe
Rhodesia (), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe.
2
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU.
Selby thesis :ZWnews.com, p84
ISLANDS: It's the second-largest of Spain's Balearic Islands: Majorca is first
Minorca
Island  Population Tenerife  899,833 Majorca (Mallorca)  862,397 Gran Canaria  838,397 Lanzarote  141,938 Ibiza  125,053 Fuerteventura  103,107 Minorca (Menorca)  92,434 La Palma  85,933   Mountains and rivers  thumb|right|Ordesa y Monte Perdido National Park, World Heritage Site in the Pyrenees.
3
Despite the conditions, some important scientists and engineers emerged.
Spain is one of the countries with the most number of laureates with the Nobel Prize in Literature, and with Latin American laureates they made the Spanish language literature one of the most laureates of all.
While its most famous event is the encierro, or the running of the bulls, which happens at 8:00 am from 7 to 14 July, the week-long celebration involves many other traditional and folkloric events.
READER'S DIGEST: Jake Barnes, Lady Brett & friends go to Spain; Lady Brett has an affair with a bullfighter, then returns to her fiance
The Sun Also Rises
Its events were central to the plot of The Sun Also Rises, by Ernest Hemingway, which brought it to the general attention of English-speaking people.
3
Territorial disputes Spain claims Gibraltar, a  Overseas Territory of the United Kingdom in the southernmost part of the Iberian Peninsula.
Other agricultural products that benefited from irrigation included grapes, cotton, sugar beets, potatoes, legumes, olive trees, mangos, strawberries, tomatoes, and fodder grasses.
It is this last feature of "shared identity" between the more local level or Autonomous Community and the Spanish level which makes the identity question in Spain complex and far from univocal.
1491: The siege of this kingdom, the last Moorish stronghold in Spain, began in late 1491
Granada
Over time, large Moorish populations became established, especially in the Guadalquivir River valley, the coastal plain of Valencia, the Ebro River valley and (towards the end of this period) in the mountainous region of Granada.
3
6b-7a, Lemberg 1846 (Hebrew)   History   thumb|Altamira Cave paintings, in Cantabria.
Retrieved 9 September 2013.
Currently there are around 62,000 Jews in Spain, or 0.14% of the total population.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Deep granite gorges of this river have led some to call it "the crease in the map of Spain"
the Tagus
There are several major rivers in Spain such as the Tagus (Tajo), Ebro, Guadiana, Douro (Duero), Guadalquivir, Júcar, Segura, Turia and Minho (Miño).
3
The Napoleonic invasions of Spain led to chaos, triggering independence movements that tore apart most of the empire and left the country politically unstable.
The legislative branch is made up of the Congress of Deputies (Congreso de los Diputados) with 350 members, elected by popular vote on block lists by proportional representation to serve four-year terms, and a Senate (Senado) with 259 seats of which 208 are directly elected by popular vote and the other 51 appointed by the regional legislatures to also serve four-year terms.
Ideal growing conditions, combined with proximity to important north European markets, made citrus fruits Spain's leading export.
THE 1490s: In 1492 Spain took Grenada, the last kingdom of these people in Spain
Moors
In the Middle Ages, the area was conquered by Germanic tribes and later by the Moors.
3
Muslim armies had also moved north of the Pyrenees but they were defeated by Frankish forces at the Battle of Poitiers, Frankia.
Damasus I, Calixtus III, Alexander VI and Benedict XIII. Spanish misticism was an important intellectual fight against Protestantism with Teresa of Ávila, a reformist nun, ahead.
Cuisine   thumb|Paella, a traditional Valencian dish Spanish cuisine consists of a great variety of dishes which stem from differences in geography, culture and climate.
NAME THAT COUNTRY: It's about the same size as Washington, D.C.; it's a principality; it's next to Switzerland
Liechtenstein
See Geography of Switzerland#Western or Central Europe?. and is bordered by Italy to the south, France to the west, Germany to the north, and Austria and Liechtenstein to the east.
3
The Swiss Parliament consists of two houses: the Council of States which has 46 representatives (two from each canton and one from each half-canton) who are elected under a system determined by each canton, and the National Council, which consists of 200 members who are elected under a system of proportional representation, depending on the population of each canton.
In 2006, Switzerland approved 1 billion francs of supportive investment in the poorer Southern and Central European countries in support of cooperation and positive ties to the EU as a whole.
It also became World Vice-Champion in 2013.
AROUND THE WORLD: Of the 5 largest countries in area, the one in South America
Brazil
Argentina, Bolivia, Brazil, Chile, Colombia, Ecuador, Guyana, Paraguay, Peru, Suriname, Uruguay, and Venezuela – and two non-sovereign areas –
2
(General Editor).
Population densityper km2 (per sq mi)
CANADIAN GEOGRAPHY: In Saskatchewan a national park & a big city are named for this prince consort
Albert
Saskatchewan is bordered on the west by Alberta, on the north by the Northwest Territories, on the east by Manitoba, and on the south by the American states of Montana and North Dakota.
3
half of the flag represents the northern Saskatchewan forest lands, while the golden lower half of the flag symbolizes the southern wheat fields and prairies.
The Francophones of Saskatchewan: A History.
Lipset, Seymour M. Agrarian Socialism: The Cooperative Commonwealth Federation in Saskatchewan: A Study in Political Sociology.
FUN WITH PROBABILITY: The probability of the first card dealt being an ace is 4 in 52, so the probability of the second card being an ace is 1 in this number
17
The Earth's motion was described in Newcomb's Tables of the Sun (1895), which provided a formula for estimating the motion of the Sun relative to the epoch 1900 based on astronomical observations made between 1750 and 1892.
3
In 1997 CIPM added that the periods would be defined for a caesium atom at rest, and approaching the theoretical temperature of absolute zero (0 K), and in 1999, it included corrections from ambient radiation.
The British Association for the Advancement of Science (BAAS) in 1862 stated that "All men of science are agreed to use the second of mean solar time as the unit of time."
See magneto-optical trap and  Such uncertainties rival that of the NIST-F1 caesium atomic clock in the microwave region, estimated as a few parts in 1016 averaged over a day.
THE MOVIES: Glenn Close had a bit role as a male pirate in this 1991 Steven Spielberg fantasy about Peter Pan
Hook
1990s In 1991, Spielberg directed Hook, about a middle-aged Peter Pan, played by Robin Williams, who returns to Neverland.
3
His paternal grandparents were immigrants from Ukraine who settled in Cincinnati in the first decade of the 1900s.
In high school, I got smacked and kicked around.
p. 80.
MOVIES THAT ARE ALL WET: Steven Spielberg named the mechanical shark in this 1975 classic "Bruce" after his lawyer
Jaws
Spielberg won the Academy Award for Best Director for Schindler's List (1993) and Saving Private Ryan (1998).Directors with two or more Oscars Three of Spielberg's films—Jaws (1975), E.T. the Extra-Terrestrial (1982), and Jurassic Park (1993)—achieved box office records, originated and came to epitomize the blockbuster film.
3
Between 1982 and 1985, Spielberg produced three high-grossing films: Poltergeist (for which he also co-wrote the screenplay), a big-screen adaptation of The Twilight Zone (for which he directed the segment "Kick
He has been giving thanks to his games of his division DreamWorks Interactive most notable as Someone's in the Kitchen with script written by Animaniacs' Paul Rugg, Goosebumps:
”
NEWSPAPERS: "The newspaper of Silicon Valley", this San Jose paper got its name from another element mined in the area
the San Jose Mercury News
San Jose-based media serving Silicon Valley include the San Jose Mercury News daily and the Metro Silicon Valley weekly.
3
Its first published use is credited to Don Hoefler, a friend of Vaerst's, who used the phrase as the title of a series of articles in the weekly trade newspaper Electronic News.
By the late 1960s, his promotion of the concept had inspired a primitive version of his vision called ARPANET, which expanded into a network of networks in the 1970s that became the Internet.
There is a stratum of well-compensated technical employees and managers, including 10s of thousands of "single-digit millionaires.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: This narrow lake, part of Scotland's Caledonian Canal, is home to a famous monster
Loch Ness
There are numerous bodies of freshwater including Loch Lomond and Loch Ness.
3
thumb|upright|left|The Wallace Monument commemorates William Wallace, the 13th-century Scottish hero.
Ulster's Protestant population is mainly of lowland Scottish descent, and it is estimated that there are more than 27 million descendants of the Scots-Irish migration now living in the US.
The clàrsach (harp), fiddle and accordion are also traditional Scottish instruments, the latter two heavily featured in Scottish country dance bands.
IT BORDERS JUST ONE OTHER COUNTRY: South Korea
North Korea
A North Korean invasion lead to the Korean War (1950–53).
3
King Taejo declared the new name of Korea as "Joseon" in reference to Gojoseon, and moved the capital to Hanseong (old name of Seoul).
The expanded martial law closed universities, banned political activities and further curtailed the press.
It is the country's largest island, with an area of .
"HEAD"S UP!: Malietola Tanumafili II, Samoa's leader, holds this 3-word post for life
head of state
Tupua Tamasese Mea'ole died in 1963, leaving Malietoa Tanumafili II sole head of state until his death on 11 May 2007, upon which Samoa changed from a constitutional monarchy to a parliamentary republic de facto.
3
This brought Samoa into line with many other countries in the region.
As with other Polynesian cultures (Hawaiian, Tahitian and Māori) with significant and unique tattoos, Samoans have two gender specific and culturally significant tattoos.
1928, Coming of Age in Samoa: A Study of Adolescence and Sex in Primitive Societies.
ANNUAL EVENTS: Shelley, Idaho celebrates this tuber each September
Potato
National Ovarian Cancer Month National Preparedness Month  National Prostate Health Month  National Sickle Cell Awareness Month National Yoga Month  National Bourbon Heritage Month   Better Breakfast Month  California Wine Month  National Chicken Month  National Honey Month  National Mushroom Month  National Papaya Month  National Potato Month  National Rice Month  National Whole Grains Month  National Wild Rice Month  Other observances
3
Metoffice.gov.uk
September is mostly in the sixth month of the astrological calendar (and the first part of the seventh), which begins at the end of March/Mars/Aries.
September 11 Battle of Tendra Day (Russia) Death Anniversary of Quaid-e-Azam Muhammad Ali Jinnah, a former holiday.
BRITISH HISTORY DATEBOOK: September 2, 1666:This deadly conflagration begins
the Great Fire of London
The Great Fire of London breaks out and burns for three days, destroying 10,000 buildings including St Paul's Cathedral.
3
Albert Spalding, American baseball player, manager, and businessman, co-founded the Spalding Sporting Goods Company (d. 1915)   1850   –
Alexandre Pato, Brazilian footballer 1990 – Marcus Ericsson, Swedish race car driver   1990   –
–
IT'S A PLAIN!: Stonehenge stands out on the landscape of this largely treeless 300-square-mile area
Salisbury Plain
Salisbury Plain was then still wooded but 4,000 years later, during the earlier Neolithic, people built a causewayed enclosure at Robin Hood's Ball and long barrow tombs in the surrounding landscape.
3
Etymology The Oxford English Dictionary cites Ælfric's tenth-century glossary, in which henge-cliff is given the meaning "precipice", or stone, thus the stanenges or Stanheng "not far from Salisbury" recorded by eleventh-century writers are "supported stones".
The access situation and the proximity of the two roads has drawn widespread criticism, highlighted by a 2006 National Geographic survey.
Richard Atkinson, Stuart Piggott and John F. S. Stone re-excavated much of Hawley's work in the 1940s and 1950s, and discovered the carved axes and daggers on the Sarsen Stones.
WORLD CAPITAL BURIAL PLACES: Playwright Samuel Beckett
Paris
Samuel Barclay Beckett (; 13 April 1906 – 22 December 1989) was an Irish avant-garde novelist, playwright, theatre director, and poet, who lived in Paris for most of his adult life and wrote in both English and French.
3
and he took many notes.
Retrieved 24 August 2010.
"Knowing me, knowing you".
TRAVEL U.S.A.: Open to the public, a St. Louis farm once owned by Ulysses Grant is now operated by this brewery
Anheuser-Busch
Major corporations such as the Anheuser-Busch brewery and Ralston-Purina company were established.
3
Historic Native American tribes in the area included the Siouan-speaking Osage people, whose territory extended west, and the Illiniwek.
Genevieve in the 1730s.
The largest and most ornate of these is the Cathedral Basilica of St. Louis, designed by Thomas P. Barnett and constructed between 1907 and 1914 in the Neo-Byzantine style.
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES: More than 542,000 complaints flooded this agency after the 2004 broadcast of the Super Bowl halftime show
the FCC
This also led to the FCC tightening controls on indecency and fining CBS and CBS-owned stations a total of $550,000 for the incident.
3
The Steelers' dynasty was interrupted only by the Cowboys winning their second Super Bowl of the decade and the Oakland Raiders' Super Bowl XI win.
The Washington Redskins and New York Giants were also top teams of this period; the Redskins won Super Bowls XVII, XXII, and XXVI.
The tense game came down to the final play in which Tennessee had the opportunity to tie the game and send it to overtime.
ABBREVIATIONS: Sydney is its capital:NSW
New South Wales
Sydney  is the state capital of New South Wales and the most populous city in Australia and Oceania.
3
This was to be the location for the new colony.
There were 1.5 million dwellings in Sydney in 2006 including 940,000 detached houses and 180,000 semi-detached terrace houses.
Obtaining sufficient fresh water was difficult during early colonial times.
THE U.S. BEFORE 1900: On Nov. 18, 1872 Susan B. Anthony was arrested for doing this; she refused to pay "a dollar of your unjust penalty"
voting
In 1872, Anthony was arrested for voting in her hometown of Rochester, New York, and convicted in a widely publicized trial.
3
An entry in her diary in 1861 read, "Fitted out a fugitive slave for Canada with the help of Harriet Tubman."Harper (1898–1908), Vol. 1, p. 216
Her lectures in Washington and four other states led directly to invitations for her to address the state legislatures there.
115–16, 158  Anthony's trial was a major step in the transition of the women's rights movement into the women's suffrage movement.
MIDDLE INITIAL C.: Born in South Carolina in 1782, he was known as a "war hawk" because he supported the War of 1812
John C. Calhoun
Coit, Margaret L. John C. Calhoun: American Portrait (1950)ISBN 9780872497757.
3
Also located in this area is Caesars Head State Park.
Slaves and their descendants comprised a majority of the population of the state through the American Civil War and to the turn of the 20th century.
It is affiliated with South Carolina Baptist Convention and the Southern Baptist Convention, and is accredited by the Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools.
N.E.W.S.: Of North Park, East Park, West Park or South Park, it's where Kenny is killed...& killed, & killed
South Park
South Park is an American adult animated sitcom created by Trey Parker and Matt Stone for the Comedy Central television network.
1
Their movements are animated in an intentionally jerky fashion, as they are purposely not offered the same free range of motion associated with hand-drawn characters.
"M"-A-NATIONS: The city of Tangier in this country lies on the strategically important Strait of Gibraltar
Morocco
The Strait of Gibraltar (, ) is a narrow strait that connects the Atlantic Ocean to the Mediterranean Sea and separates Gibraltar and Peninsular Spain in Europe from Morocco  and Ceuta (Spain) in Africa.
3
Geology thumb|right|A view across the Strait of Gibraltar taken from the hills above Tarifa, Spain.
Since that time, the straits have come to foster the development of two very distinct and varied cultures on either side of the straits after sharing much the same culture and greater degrees of tolerance for over 300+ years from the 8th century to the early 13th century.
(Mediterranean Sea in upper right.)  Through the strait, water generally flows more or less continually in both an eastward and a westward direction.
MANLY HITMAKERS: 2001: "Superman (It's Not Easy)"
Five For Fighting
Five for Fighting released "Superman (It's Not Easy)" in 2000, which is from Superman's point of view, although Superman is never mentioned by name.
3
DC Comics offered Shuster's heirs a stipend in exchange for not challenging ownership of Superman, which they accepted for some years.
ISBN 978-1-56389-974-4 and has been depicted occasionally as a former childhood friend of Clark Kent.
Andrew Arnold, writing in the early 21st century, has noted Superman's partial role in exploring assimilation, the character's alien status allowing the reader to explore attempts to fit in on a somewhat superficial level.
TAO: Tao's tenet of wuwei is to "do" this, something Seinfeld could handle
Nothing
Some stories were inspired by headlines and rumors, as explained in the DVD features "Notes About Nothing", "Inside Look", and "Audio Commentary." In "The Maestro", Kramer's lawsuit is roughly similar to the McDonald's coffee case.
3
That same year, Entertainment Weekly named it the No.
These ratings were high enough to secure a second season.
Home video releases  DVD releases Sony Pictures Home Entertainment released all nine seasons of Seinfeld on DVD in Regions 1, 2 and 4 between 2004 and 2007.
UNSEEN TV FACES: We never saw the face of this Yankees owner on "Seinfeld"; it was really Larry David voicing the part
Steinbrenner
Two prominent recurring characters were based on well-known people: Jacopo Peterman of the J. Peterman catalog (based on John Peterman), and George Steinbrenner, owner of the New York Yankees.
3
Set predominantly in an apartment block in Manhattan's Upper West Side in New York City, the show features a handful of Jerry's friends and acquaintances, particularly best friend George Costanza (Jason Alexander), former girlfriend Elaine Benes (Julia Louis-Dreyfus), and neighbor across the hall Cosmo Kramer (Michael Richards).
He often uses the alias Art Vandelay when lying or concocting a cover story.
Apart from the Super Bowl spot, Larry David, Michael Richards and Julia Louis-Dreyfus have appeared as guests on regular episodes of Comedians in Cars Getting Coffee.
MAMMALS: In Sumatra they call this tree-dwelling ape mawas
Orangutan
Sumatra has a wide range of plant and animal species but has lost almost 50% of its tropical rainforest in the last 35 years, and many species are critically endangered such as the Sumatran Ground-cuckoo, Sumatran tiger, Sumatran elephant, Sumatran rhinoceros, and Sumatran orangutan.
3
At the same time, Islam made its way to Sumatra through Arabs and Indian traders in the 6th and 7th centuries AD.G.R. Tibbets,Pre-Islamic Arabia and South East Asia, in D.S. Richards (ed.),1970, Islam and The Trade of Asia, Oxford: Bruno Cassirer Pub.
| align="right"|201,217 | 17 August 2001 | align="right"|419.80 |}   Flora and fauna  thumb|Sumatran tiger thumb|upright|Rafflesia arnoldii  Sumatra supports a wide range of vegetation types which are home to a rich variety of species, including 17 endemic genera of plants.
The people of Sumatra are multi-lingual, multi-diverse and multi-religious.
MUSIC TO MY EARS: Salman Rushdie wrote the lyrics to "The Ground Beneath Her Feet", performed by this group
U2
The song of the same name by U2 is one of many song lyrics included in the book; hence Rushdie is credited as the lyricist.
3
On 26 August 2008, Rushdie received an apology at the High Court in London from all three parties.
Laura M. Holson, "From Exile to Everywhere", The New York Times, 23 March 2012 (online), 25 March 2012 (print).
Retrieved 26 March 2012.
BOOK"S": Salman Rushdie won the Whitbread Prize for this controversial novel
The Satanic Verses
His fourth novel, The Satanic Verses (1988), was the centre of a major controversy, provoking protests from Muslims in several countries.
3
He wrote in his 2012 memoir that his father adopted the name Rushdie in honour of Averroes (Ibn Rushd).
In September 2008, and again in March 2009, he appeared as a panellist on the HBO program "Real Time with Bill Maher".
Facing the New Totalitarianism, a statement warning of the dangers of religious extremism.
ARE YOU BEING SERBED?: It's the capital of Serbia
Belgrade
The capital of Serbia, Belgrade, is one of the largest cities in Southeast Europe.
3
All rail services are operated by public rail company, Serbian Railways.
Also, the media are now more heavily dependent on advertising contracts and government subsidies to survive financially.
KK Partizan was the 1992 European champion.
CAPITAL CITY BIRTHPLACES: Sonja Henie
Oslo
Biography  Early life Henie was born in Kristiania, current Oslo, the only daughter of Wilhelm Henie (1872–1937), a prosperous Norwegian furrier, and his wife Selma Lochmann-Nielsen (1888–1961).
3
Henie went on to win first of her three Olympic gold medals the following year.
Henie's connections with Adolf Hitler and other high-ranking Nazi officials made her the subject of controversy before, during, and after World War II.
After the war, Henie was mindful that many of her countrymen considered her to be a quisling.
TENNIS, ANYONE?: Held in Melbourne in January, it's the first of the 4 tennis Grand Slam events every year
the Australian Open
The four Grand Slam tournaments (also referred to as the "Majors") are especially popular: the Australian Open played on hard courts, the French Open played on red clay courts, Wimbledon played on grass courts, and the US Open played also on hard courts.
3
Once a player turned pro he or she could not compete in the major (amateur) tournaments.
In these cases, sets are played indefinitely until one player has a two-game lead, leading to some remarkably long matches.
Ball changes  Balls wear out quickly in serious play and, therefore, in ATP and WTA tournaments, they are changed after every nine games with the first change occurring after only seven games, because the first set of balls is also used for the pre-match warm-up.
THE 2004 FORTUNE 500: This Round Rock, Texas computer maker was No. 28, up 3 spots from 2003
Dell
Texas has the headquarters of many high technology companies, such as Dell, Inc., Texas Instruments, Perot Systems, Rackspace and AT&T.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration's Lyndon B. Johnson Space Center (NASA JSC) located in Southeast Houston, sits as the crown jewel of Texas's aeronautics industry.
3
Snow falls south of San Antonio or on the coast in rare circumstances only.
Nine years later, shipwrecked Spanish explorer Álvar Núñez Cabeza de Vaca and his cohort became the first Europeans in what is now Texas.
The Energy Information Administration states that the state's large agriculture and forestry industries could give Texas an enormous amount biomass for use in biofuels.
18th CENTURY AMERICA: Like his father Peter, Thomas Jefferson was a member of this Virginia legislative "House"
House of Burgesses
Though he had intended to pay off some of his large debt, he resumed collecting for his personal library, writing to John Adams, "I cannot live without books".Library of Congress  Lawyer and House of Burgesses thumb|alt=Chamber of House of Burgesses|House of Burgesses in Williamsburg, Virginia, where Jefferson served 1769–1775 Jefferson was admitted to the Virginia bar in 1767 and then lived with his mother at Shadwell.
3
She was a frequent hostess for Jefferson and managed the large household.
The U.S. economy suffered, criticism grew, and opponents began evading the embargo.
Meacham, 2012, pp.
MOUNTAINS: This home of Thomas Jefferson sits atop a "little mountain", which is what its name means in Italian
Monticello
Malone, 1948, pp. 31–33 Thomas inherited approximately  of land, including Monticello.
3
Jefferson had Patsy educated at the Pentemont Abbey.
Jefferson used agrarian resistance to banks and speculators as the first defining principle of an opposition party, recruiting candidates for Congress on the issue as early as 1792.Ferling, 2013, pp.
As early as 1809, Benjamin Rush, signer of the Declaration of Independence, desired that Jefferson and Adams reconcile and through correspondence began to prod the two to reestablish contact.
"IN" THE MOVIES: Bill Murray hangs out with Scarlett Johansson in Tokyo in this 2003 treat
Lost in Translation
Well-known postwar examples include Tokyo Joe, My Geisha, Tokyo Story and the James Bond film You Only Live Twice; well-known recent examples include Kill Bill, The Fast and the Furious: Tokyo Drift, Lost in Translation, Babel, Inception, and the Paramount and Michael Bay's upcoming film Transformers 5.
3
The city hosts 51 of the Fortune Global 500 companies, the highest number of any city in the world.
These plans have been controversial within Japan and have yet to be realized.
For an extensive list, see List of universities in Tokyo.
IT'S ALL ABOUT "U": As Schliemann is to Troy, Woolley is to this city
Ur
Wilusa or Truwisa; ) was a city situated in what is known from Classical sources as Asia Minor, now northwest Anatolia in modern Turkey, located south of the southwest end of the Dardanelles/Hellespont and northwest of Mount Ida at Hisarlık.
3
Ilium is a more poetic term:  Hittite:
It lies within the province  of Çanakkale, some 30 km  south-west of the provincial capital, also called Çanakkale.
(publicani), 73 (pirates).
ISLANDS: It put the "zan" in Tanzania
Zanzibar
The mainland was governed as Tanganyika, with the Zanzibar Archipelago remaining a separate colonial jurisdiction.
3
It is bordered by Kenya and Uganda to the north; Rwanda, Burundi, and the Democratic Republic of the Congo to the west; Zambia, Malawi, and Mozambique to the south; and the Indian Ocean to the east.
Politics  Government  Tanzania is a one party dominant state with the Chama Cha Mapinduzi (CCM) party in power.
A newer natural gas field in Mnazi Bay in 2013 produced about one-seventh of the amount produced near Songo Songo Island but has proven, probable, and possible reserves of 2.2 trillion cubic feet.
ANCIENT TIMES: The ancient Ban Chiang poetry of Thailand resembles that of this country's neolithic Yang-Shao period
China
Thailand retained a tradition of trade with its neighbouring states, from China to India, Persia, and Arab lands.
3
The junta also appointed a 250-member legislature, called by some critics a "chamber of generals" while others claimed that it lacks representatives from the poor majority.
After Indonesia, it is the largest coal producer in SE Asia, but must import additional coal to meet domestic demand.
Thais have a strong sense of hospitality and generosity, but also a strong sense of social hierarchy.
ELLA FITZGERALD: Ella forgot the words during a live version of this song from "The Threepenny Opera" but still made it a hit in '60
"Mack The Knife"
Macheath ("Mackie," or "Mack the Knife") marries Polly Peachum.
3
Stephen Hinton ed, The Threepenny OperaBertolt Brecht, The Theatre of Bertolt BrechtPhilip Reed, On Mahler and Britten: Essays in Honour of Donald Mitchell on His Seventieth  The Threepenny Opera has been translated into 18 languages and performed more than 10,000 times.
The brevity of the run has been attributed to the stylistic gap between the Weill-Brecht work and the typical Broadway musical during a busy and vintage period in Broadway history.
Scenes with Sammy Davis Jr. were added for its American release.
I THEE DIVORCE: 2001: Ted Turner
Jane Fonda
thumb|right|Turner with Jane Fonda.
3
This increased his viewers and advertising.
Broadcasting the events of these games provided his super-station the ability to provide Olympic-style sports programming that had been offered by only one of the three major networks (ABC, CBS and NBC) up to that time.
Turner, Ted.
SALT: In Leonardo da Vinci's "Last Supper", an overturned salt cellar lies in front of him
Judas
Prediction of Judas' betrayal  In , ,  and  during the meal, Jesus predicted that one of his Apostles would betray him.
3
Reformed worship by Howard L. Rice, James C. Huffstutler 2001 ISBN 0-664-50147-8 pages 66-68Calvin's Passion for the Church and the Holy Spirit by David S. Chen 2008 ISBN 978-1-60647-346-7 pages 62-68 Calvin related the Synoptic Gospel accounts of the Last Supper with the Bread of Life Discourse in  that states: "I am the bread of life.
HarperSanFrancisco. 1998. "Mark,"
The depictions here are generally melancholy, as Jesus prepares his disciples for his departure.
THE HEART: Research cited in the New York Times says heart attacks are most common on this day of the week
Monday
On April 21, 1861, The New York Times departed from its original Monday–Saturday publishing schedule and joined other major dailies in adding a Sunday edition to offer daily coverage of the Civil War.
3
When the Post refused, the U.S. Justice Department sought another injunction.
>  The paper's website was hacked on August 29, 2013, by the Syrian Electronic Army, a hacking group that supports the government of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.
World War II On November 14, 2001, in The New York Times 150th anniversary issue, former executive editor Max Frankel wrote that before and during World War II, the NY Times had maintained a consistent policy to minimize reports on the Holocaust in their news pages.
SIGNIFICANT OLD BOOKS: Greek historian & soldier Thucydides' firsthand account "The History of" this peninsular war
the Peloponnesian War
His History of the Peloponnesian War recounts the 5th century BC war between Sparta and Athens to the year 411 BC. Thucydides has been dubbed the father of "scientific history" because of his strict standards of evidence-gathering and analysis of cause and effect without reference to intervention by the gods, as outlined in his introduction to his work.
3
"The cause of all these evils was the lust for power arising from greed and ambition; and from these passions proceeded the violence of parties once engaged in contention."
A quotation frequently attributed to Thucydides but was in fact from Sir William Francis Butler:"Charles George Gordon by William Francis Butler", p. 89, MacMillan & Co 1889  "The nation that will insist upon drawing a broad line of demarcation between the fighting man and the thinking man is liable to find its fighting done by fools and its thinking by cowards." More frequently, this quotation is truncated as follows:  "The State that separates its scholars from its warriors will have its thinking done by cowards and its fighting by fools."
Finley, John Huston, Jr., Thucydides, Cambridge, Massachusetts : Harvard University Press, 1947.
SAMUEL JOHNSON: Johnson was a staunch Tory, or supporter of the king, & referred to foes in this party as "dogs"
the Whigs
A significant faction took part in the ousting of James II with the Whigs to defend the Anglican Church or definitive protestantism.
2
Hist.
The Tories preferred to preserve the economic, political, and social gains that they enjoyed as citizens of Mexico, and the revolution threatened to jeopardize the security of their world.
WRITERS ON FILM: Gwyneth Paltrow was this poet, struggling with depression & hubby Ted Hughes
Sylvia Plath
Hughes was married to American poet Sylvia Plath from 1956 until her suicide in 1963 at the age of 30.Joanny Moulin (2004).
3
He wrote, "I might say, that I had as much talent for Leavis-style dismantling of texts as anyone else, I even had a special bent for it, nearly a sadistic streak there, but it seemed to me not only a foolish game, but deeply destructive of myself." In his third year he transferred to anthropology and archaeology, both of which would later inform his poetry.
The photograph, taken just before the First World War, was of six young men who were all soon to lose their lives in the war.
1977  Gaudete 1979  Remains of Elmet (with photographs by Fay Godwin)
MOVERS & QUAKERS: Thomas Mifflin, a Constitution signer from this state, irritated fellow Quakers by fighting in the Revolution
Pennsylvania
Thomas Mifflin (January 10, 1744January 20, 1800) was an American merchant and politician from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.
2
He then returned to the state legislature, where he served until his death the following month.
The marker, dedicated in 1975, is located on Duke Street in Lancaster.
EARLY TIBET: Following this large country's 1911 revolution, its influence in Tibet was greatly reduced
China
"Greater Tibet" as claimed by Tibetan exile groups  Tibetan autonomous areas, as designated by China  Tibet Autonomous Region, within China Chinese-controlled, claimed by India as part of Aksai Chin Indian-controlled, claimed by China as South TibetOther areas historically within the Tibetan cultural sphere  Tibet (; , ; ) is a region on the Tibetan Plateau in Eastern Asia.
3
The eastern regions of Kham and Amdo often maintained a more decentralized indigenous political structure, being divided among a number of small principalities and tribal groups, while also often falling more directly under Chinese rule after the Battle of Chamdo; most of this area was eventually incorporated into the Chinese provinces of Sichuan and Qinghai.
The British Empire was encroaching from northern India into the Himalayas, the Emirate of Afghanistan and the Russian Empire were expanding into Central Asia and each power became suspicious of the others' intentions in Tibet.
ISBN 0-8021-1827-5
IN A FESTIVAL MOOD: This annual event in Park City, Utah gives out the Waldo Salt Screenwriting Award
the Sundance Film Festival
Utah features many cultural attractions such as Temple Square, the Sundance Film Festival, the Red Rock Film Festival, the DOCUTAH Film Festival, and the Utah Shakespearean Festival.
3
The author is also quick to admit that the difference in usage between states is relatively small.
Among all U.S. states, only Wyoming granted suffrage to women earlier.
thumb|The otherworldly look of the Bonneville Salt Flats has been used in many movies and commercials  See Category:Films shot in Utah  Utah's Monument Valley has been location to several productions, such as 127 Hours (2010), Tim Burton's Planet of the Apes (2001), and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969).
UKRAINE ON THE BRAIN: After conquering the region, this empress introduced serfdom to Ukraine in 1795
Catherine the Great
After the Russo-Turkish War (1768–1774), Catherine the Great and her immediate successors encouraged German immigration into Ukraine and especially into Crimea, to thin the previously dominant Turk population and encourage agriculture.
3
The Goths stayed in the area but came under the sway of the Huns from the 370s AD.
trade.ec.europa.eu.
Sources differ on interpreting various statements from different branches of different governments as to whether they amount to the official recognition of the Famine as Genocide by the country.
IN THE KITCHEN WITH IVAN: Ivan makes this chicken dish, named for Ukraine's capital, so the butter squirts out when you cut it
Chicken Kiev
Ukrainian specialties also include Chicken Kiev and Kiev Cake.
3
On 26 April 1986, a reactor in the Chernobyl Nuclear Power Plant exploded, resulting in the Chernobyl disaster, the worst nuclear reactor accident in history.
23 June 2009.
However, widespread resistance to reforms within the government and from a significant part of the population soon stalled the reform efforts.
HISTORICAL ROLES: In 2006, Forest Whitaker played this man who led a coup in Uganda in 1971
Idi Amin
1971 (after the coup)–1979 (end of Amin regime)  After a military coup on 25 January 1971, Obote was deposed from power and the dictator Idi Amin seized control of the country.
3
This led to the return of Obote, who was deposed again in 1985 by General Tito Okello.
There are now over 100 districts.
Paper 3892.
QUOTATIONS: This Russian empress wrote to Voltaire, "Your wit makes others witty"
Catherine the Great
Catherine the Great had been reading Voltaire for sixteen years prior to becoming Empress of Russia in 1762.
3
Il extrait quelques paroles de divers endroits de l'Alcoran, dont il admire le Sublime.
De l'Alcoran, et de la loi musulmane.
McGraw-Hill.
VALLEYS: A fungal infection common in this state's San Joaquin valley is now called Valley fever
California
thumb|River Indus running through Kohistan valley in Pakistan  Famous valleys thumb|The Valley of Flowers in Uttarakhand, India thumb|The Harau Valley in West Sumatra, Indonesia thumb|Hell's Gate, British Columbia thumb|A view of Orosí, Costa Rica thumb|The Gudbrand Valley in Eastern Norway near Gålå  Aburra Valley (Colombia)  Barossa Valley (Australia)  Cauca Valley (Colombia)  Central Valley (California) (California, United States)  Dalen, Telemark (Telemark, Norway)  Danube Valley (Eastern Europe)  Death Valley (California, United States)  Fraser Canyon (British Columbia, Canada)  Fraser Valley (British Columbia, Canada)  Glen Coe (Scotland, United Kingdom)  Grand Canyon (Arizona, United States)  Great Glen (Scotland, United Kingdom)  Gudbrand Valley (Oppland, Norway)  Hallingdalen (Buskerud, Norway)  Hell's Gate (British Columbia, Canada)  Heddal (Telemark, Norway)  Hudson Valley (New York, United States)  Hunter Region (Australia)  Hunza Valley (Pakistan)  Hutt Valley (New Zealand)  Ihlara, Turkey  Indus Valley (Pakistan)  Iron Gate (Romania/Serbia)  Jordan Valley  Kaghan Valley (Pakistan)  Kathmandu (Kathmandu, Nepal)  Las Vegas Valley (Nevada, United States)  Lauterbrunnen Valley (Bern, Switzerland)  Little Cottonwood Creek Valley (Utah, United States)  Loire Valley with its famous castles (France)  Valley of the Moon, San Juan Argentina  Midt-Telemark (Telemark, Norway)  Monument Valley (United States)  Nant Ffrancon (Wales, United Kingdom)  Napa Valley (California, United States)  Neelum Valley (Pakistan)  Nile Valley (Egypt/Sudan/Ethiopia/Uganda)  Numedalen (Buskerud, Norway)  Okanagan Valley (British Columbia, Canada)  Ottawa Valley (Ontario/Quebec, Canada)  Palo Duro Canyon (Texas, United States)  Panjshir Valley (Afghanistan)  Upper Rhine Valley or Upper Rhine Plain, an old graben system.
3
The valley becomes visible upon the recession of the glacier that forms it.
They are most commonly associated with U-shaped valleys when a tributary glacier flows into a glacier of larger volume.
Since the surfaces of the glaciers were originally at the same elevation, the shallower valley appears to be 'hanging' above the main valley.
HOOKED ON PHOENIX: The city of Phoenix lies in the huge sprawling Valley of this
Valley of the Sun
San Fernando Valley (California, United States)  Setesdal (Agder, Norway)  Shenandoah Valley (Virginia/West Virginia, United States)  Silicon Valley, (California, United States)  Sonoma Valley, (California, United States)  South Wales Valleys (Wales, United Kingdom)  Swat Valley (Pakistan)  Valley of flowers (India)  Valley of the Gods (United States)  Valley of the Kings (Egypt)  Valley of Mexico (Mexico), also known as "El Valle de México", see Mexico City  Valley of the Sun (Arizona, United States)  Vestfjorddalen (Norway)  Willamette Valley, (Oregon, United States)  Jordan Rift Valley (Israel)  Østerdalen (Hedmark, Norway)  Rift valleys  Rift valleys, such as the Albertine Rift, are formed by the expansion of the Earth's crust due to tectonic activity beneath the Earth's surface.
2
Many villages are located here (esp.
They are most commonly associated with U-shaped valleys when a tributary glacier flows into a glacier of larger volume.
U.S. PRESIDENTS: In 1749 he was appointed surveyor of Culpeper County, Virginia
George Washington
Stories about historic figures, such as those surrounding Pocahontas and John Smith, George Washington's childhood, or the plantation elite in the slave society of the antebellum period, have also created potent myths of state history, and have served as rationales for Virginia's ideology.
3
The Atlantic ocean has a strong effect on eastern and southeastern coastal areas of the state.
Fairfax County also sponsors Celebrate Fairfax! with popular and traditional music performances.
Health thumb|The A.D. Williams Clinic and West Hospital at VCU Medical Center in Richmond|alt=A red brick high-rise building with several wings and levels in front of a bright blue sky with a traffic light and street sign visible at the bottom.
JULY: On July 30, 1619 the first representative assembly in America convened in this Virginia city
Jamestown
"Jamestown 1607" marked Virginia's quadricentennial year, celebrating 400 years since the establishment of the Jamestown Colony.
3
Virginia has an annual average of 35–45 days of thunderstorm activity, particularly in the western part of the state, and an average annual precipitation of .
It was one of the targets of the September 11 attacks; 189 people died at the site when a jet passenger plane was crashed into the building.
Health thumb|The A.D. Williams Clinic and West Hospital at VCU Medical Center in Richmond|alt=A red brick high-rise building with several wings and levels in front of a bright blue sky with a traffic light and street sign visible at the bottom.
OFFICIAL STATE THINGS: When Virginia got a state one of these animals, the gov.'s office released a poem that mentioned Adam West
bat
Other mammals include: nutria, fox squirrel, gray squirrel, flying squirrel, chipmunk, brown bat, and weasel.
3
Virginia also operates 23 community colleges on 40 campuses serving over 260,000 students.
The Governor and Lieutenant Governor are elected every four years in separate elections.
Their rivalry is followed statewide.
GEORGE WASHINGTON SLEPT HERE: At one time George owned a townhouse in this Virginia city that shares its name with an Egyptian city
Alexandria
thumb|left|Christ Church in Alexandria was frequented by George Washington and Robert E. Lee.|alt=An 18th-century red brick church with white steeple behind a modern road in autumn.
3
In 1607, the native Tidewater population was between 13,000 and 14,000.
The shift to a system of African slavery in Virginia was propelled by the legal cases of John Punch, who was sentenced to lifetime slavery in 1640 for attempting to run away, and of John Casor, who was claimed by Anthony Johnson as his servant for life in 1655.
Virginia also ranks 21st among the states in the rate of premature deaths, 6,816 per 100,000.
WORLD OF AUTHORS: Vladimir Nabokov
Russia
Random House Webster's Unabridged Dictionary. , , also known by the pen name Vladimir Sirin; c2 July 1977) was a Russian-American novelist.
3
In 1976 he was hospitalised with a fever doctors were unable to diagnose.
Nabokov published under the pseudonym "Vladimir Sirin" in the 1920s to 1940s, occasionally to mask his identity from critics.
1987. 978-0872494954.
CLASSICAL MUSIC: At 7 he wrote a polonaise in G minor; a year later he performed for Czar Alexander I, who was in Warsaw at the time
Chopin
Another important monument, the statue of Little Insurgent located at the ramparts of the Old Town, commemorates the children who served as messengers and frontline troops in the Warsaw Uprising, while the impressive Warsaw Uprising Monument by Wincenty Kućma was erected in memory of the largest insurrection of World War II.  In Warsaw there are many places connected with the life and work of Frédéric Chopin.
3
Warsaw is ranked as 48th in the List of cities with the most skyscrapers around the world.
Warsaw lacks a good ring road system and most traffic goes directly through the city centre, leading to the third highest level of congestion in continental Europe.
Another is located on the bank of the Vistula River near Świętokrzyski Bridge and another on Karowa Street.
GOING THE DISTANCE: The P-51 Mustang fighter had great range; Goering saw Mustangs over this city & said he knew the Axis had lost World War II
Berlin
The war in Europe concluded with an invasion of Germany by the Western Allies and the Soviet Union, culminating in the capture of Berlin by Soviet and Polish troops and the subsequent German unconditional surrender on 8 May 1945.
3
A month later, Germany and Japan signed the Anti-Comintern Pact, which Italy would join in the following year.
By early February 1943, the German Army had taken tremendous losses; German troops at Stalingrad had been forced to surrender,. and the front-line had been pushed back beyond its position before the summer offensive.
Materski and Szarota.
MILITARY MEN: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reports from the Pentagon pool.) A gym and pool were built at the Pentagon after World War II, at the suggestion of this man, then Army Chief of Staff
Eisenhower
When he learned such a rescue would not occur he desperately attempted to call off his bargain with Eisenhower, who cut short the matter on September 8 by announcing news of its existence.
3
The bombing of Guernica by the German Condor Legion in April 1937 heightened widespread concerns that the next major war would include extensive terror bombing attacks on civilians..Tony Judt said that the "communist strategy in Spain turns out to have been a dry run for the seizure of power in Eastern Europe after 1945.
They were joined shortly by Finland and Hungary.
The period featured massacres with victims in the hundreds at Civitella (; ), Fosse Ardeatine (), and Sant'Anna di Stazzema (), and is capped with the Marzabotto massacre.
A BANNER YEAR IN THE NEW YORK TIMES: Post World War II-year of the headline seen here
1948
In an effort to maintain peace,. the Allies formed the United Nations, which officially came into existence on 24 October 1945, and adopted the Universal Declaration of Human Rights in 1948, as a common standard for all member nations..The UDHR is viewable here .
3
6.Wells, Anne Sharp (2014) Historical Dictionary of World War II: The War against Germany and Italy.
ISBN 0-7641-1973-7.There is also the viewpoint that both World War I and World War II are part of the same "European Civil War" or "Second Thirty Years War": ; .
of the British Commonwealth.—Australia (3 September), Canada (10 September), New Zealand (3 September), and South Africa (6 September)—declared war on Germany.
ANIMAL GROUPS: Gather a group of these animals in Wisconsin & you'll have a cete
Badgers
Some miners found shelter in the holes they had dug and earned the nickname "badgers", leading to Wisconsin's identity as the "Badger State."
3
Areas under the management of the National Park Service include the following:  Apostle Islands National Lakeshore along Lake Superior  Ice Age National Scenic Trail  North Country National Scenic Trail  Saint Croix National Scenic Riverway  There is one national forest managed by the U.S. Forest Service in Wisconsin, Chequamegon-Nicolet National Forest.
The first Socialist mayor of a large city in the United States was Emil Seidel, elected mayor of Milwaukee in 1910; another Socialist, Daniel Hoan, was mayor of Milwaukee from 1916 to 1940; and a third, Frank P. Zeidler, from 1948 to 1960.
Wisconsin is also home to the Madison Mallards, the La Crosse Loggers, the Lakeshore Chinooks, the Eau Claire Express, the Green Bay Bullfrogs, the Wisconsin Woodchucks, and the Wisconsin Rapids Rafters of the Northwoods League, a collegiate all-star summer league.
LOTS OF "OIL": One of the 4 things Winston Churchill offered the British people in his first speech as prime minister
toil
His first as prime minister was the famous, "I have nothing to offer but blood, toil, tears, and sweat" speech.
3
Churchill was also a very emotional man, unafraid to shed tears when appropriate.
22–23, 27.
Anthony Montague Browne, Personal Secretary to Churchill during the latter's final ten years of life, wrote that he never heard Churchill make reference to Black Dog, and he vigorously contested the suggestion that the former prime minister, his health progressively ravaged by advanced old age, multiple strokes and other serious illness, was, independently of circumstances, afflicted also by inherent depression.
ROCK GROUPS: This rock group took its name from a Johnny Cash album, whose title came from a Winston Churchill speech
Blood, Sweat and Tears
the first of which, Into Battle, was published in the United States under the title Blood, Sweat and Tears, and was included in Life Magazine's list of the 100 outstanding books of 1924–1944.Canby, Henry Seidel. "The 100 Outstanding Books of 1924–1944".
3
239, 241  On 15 September 1922, the Churchills' last child, Mary, was born.
Winston S. Churchill: The Prophet of Truth: 1922–1939.
Churchill: A Study in Failure, 1900–1939 (1970)
AN "F" IN HISTORY: In 1918 Woodrow Wilson proposed this numbered set of principles, one being the removal of trade barriers between nations
the Fourteen Points
Early in 1918, he issued his principles for peace, the Fourteen Points, and in 1919, following armistice, he traveled to Paris, promoting the formation of a League of Nations, concluding the Treaty of Versailles.
3
In 1888, Wilson left Bryn Mawr for Wesleyan University; it was a controversial move, as he had signed a three-year contract with Bryn Mawr in 1887.
Heckscher, pp.
401–403, 430.
WYOMING: Settlement began in earnest when this railroad pushed across the state in the 1860s
the Union Pacific
In 1850, Jim Bridger located what is now known as Bridger Pass, which the Union Pacific Railroad used in 1868—as did Interstate 80, in ninety years' time.
3
The Wind River Range in the west central part of the state is remote and includes more than 40 mountain peaks in excess of  tall in addition to Gannett Peak, the highest peak in the state.
Month Jan Feb Mar Apr
Trona:
LITERATURE: The 2 leading French Absurdists were Ionesco, from Romania, & this Irish author of "Waiting for Godot"
Samuel Beckett
Waiting for Godot ( ) is an absurdist play by Samuel Beckett, in which two characters, Vladimir and Estragon, wait endlessly and in vain for the arrival of someone named Godot.
3
This leads to his waking Estragon and involving him in a frenetic hat-swapping scene.
"Beckett said to Peter Woodthorpe that he regretted calling the absent character 'Godot', because of all the theories involving God to which this had given rise.
Of course you use it."An undated interview with Lawrence Harvey.
WILLIAM FAULKNER: (Jon of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from Rowan Oak in Oxford, Mississippi.)  Speaking at the rededication of Faulkner's home, John Grisham said this 1929 book at first baffled him; guess he thought it was signifying nothing
The Sound and the Fury
In 1998, the Modern Library ranked his 1929 novel The Sound and the Fury sixth on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century; also on the list were As I Lay Dying (1930) and Light in August (1932).
3
There he worked with director Howard Hawks, with whom he quickly developed a friendship, as they both enjoyed drinking and hunting.
Faulkner detested the fame and glory that resulted from his recognition.
It is noteworthy that Faulkner had once served as Postmaster at the University of Mississippi, and in his letter of resignation in 1923 wrote: As long as I live under the capitalistic system, I expect to have my life influenced by the demands of moneyed people.
WORLD CITIES: In 1995 the new World Trade Organization established its headquarters in this Swiss city
Geneva
GROUPS IN THE WTO Updated 1 July 2013  The WTO's current Director-General is Roberto Azevêdo, who leads a staff of over 600 people in Geneva, Switzerland.
3
(Note that the document's printed folio numbers do not match the pdf page numbers.) and ratified by their parliaments.
The shortest accession negotiation was that of the Kyrgyz Republic, while the longest was that of Russia, which, having first applied to join GATT in 1993, was approved for membership in December 2011 and became a WTO member on 22 August 2012.Ministerial Conference approves Russia's WTO membership WTO News Item, 16 December 2011 The second longest was that of Vanuatu, whose Working Party on the Accession of Vanuatu was established on 11 July 1995.
The procedures for the appointment of the WTO director-general were published in January 2003.
2-LETTER WORDS: According to lyrics in "West Side Story", it's whom "There's a place for"
us
West Side Story  is an American musical with a book by Arthur Laurents, music by Leonard Bernstein, lyrics by Stephen Sondheim and conception and choreography by Jerome Robbins.http://www.sondheimguide.com/wss.html It was inspired by William Shakespeare's play Romeo and Juliet.
3
The sound of approaching police sirens is heard, and everyone scatters, except Tony, who stands in shock at what he has done.
2009 Broadway revival  In 2007, Arthur Laurents stated, "I've come up with a way of doing [West Side Story] that will make it absolutely contemporary without changing a word or a note."Riedel, Michael. "Director's Cut –
85–92: 'Sid Ramin and Irwin Kostal: Orchestrating the Show'  Ramin, Kostal, and Bernstein are billed as orchestrators for the show.
20th CENTURY SLANG: A shmatte in Yiddish, it meant "to dance" early in the century & "to make fun of" in the '20s & '90s
Rag
It is not known when the Yiddish writing system first developed but the oldest surviving literary document using it is a blessing in the Worms mahzor, a Hebrew prayer book from 1272 (with a scalable image online at the indicated reference; described extensively in Frakes, 2004 and Baumgarten/Frakes, 2005):   Yiddish  Transliterated gut tak im betage se vaer dis makhazor in beis hakneses trage Translated May a good day come to him who carries this prayer book into the synagogue.
3
In 1991, Paul Wexler proposed a highly heterodox model that took Yiddish, by which he means primarily eastern Yiddish, not to be genetically grounded in a Germanic language, but rather as "Judeo-Sorbian" (a proposed Western Slavic language) whose vocabulary had been largely replaced by High German in the 9th to 12th centuries, when, according to his theory, large numbers of German-speakers settled in Sorbian and Polabian lands, and some of them, after converting, developed a Judeo-Slavic tongue which was subsequently relexified with Old High German.
Notable Yiddish writers of the late 19th and early 20th centuries are Sholem Yankev Abramovitch, writing as Mendele Mocher Sforim; Sholem Rabinovitsh, widely known as Sholem Aleichem, whose stories about  (tevye der milkhiker = Tevye the Dairyman) inspired the Broadway musical and film Fiddler on the Roof; and Isaac Leib Peretz.
Kiryas Joel, New York is one such; in the 2000 census, nearly 90% of residents of Kiryas Joel reported speaking Yiddish at home.
BEAUTY & THE GREEK: Zeus allowed this underworld goddess to spend part of her time in the world above
Persephone
These resulted in many godly and heroic offspring, including Athena, Apollo, Artemis, Hermes, Persephone, Dionysus, Perseus, Heracles, Helen of Troy, Minos, and the Muses.
3
He fathered many of the heroes  and was featured in many of their local cults.
hymn.
In the Hellenistic period a small sanctuary dedicated to Zeus Velchanos was founded at the Hagia Triada site of a long-ruined Minoan palace.
HISTORY OF PASSION: Paris just had to have this beautiful daughter of Zeus, & the rest is history
Helen of Troy
These resulted in many godly and heroic offspring, including Athena, Apollo, Artemis, Hermes, Persephone, Dionysus, Perseus, Heracles, Helen of Troy, Minos, and the Muses.
3
Unknown mother Aletheia Unknown mother Ate Unknown mother Caerus Unknown mother Litae  Semi-divine/mortal offspring   Mother  Children Aegina Aeacus  DamocrateiaScholia on Pindar, Olympian Ode 9, 107 Alcmene Heracles Antiope Amphion  Zethus Anaxithea Olenus Asterope, Oceanid Acragas Callisto Arcas Calyce Aethlius (possibly) Callirhoe (daughter of Achelous)
The hero Amphiaraus was honored as Zeus Amphiaraus at Oropus outside of Thebes, and the Spartans even had a shrine to Zeus Agamemnon.
v.1, Chapter II, Religion of the Early Greeks  Moore, Clifford H., The Religious Thought of the Greeks, 1916.  Nilsson, Martin P., Greek Popular Religion, 1940.
ZANY FOR ZAMBIA: Levy Mwanawasa holds this governmental position as Zambia's chief of state
president
On 24 October 1964, Zambia became independent of the United Kingdom and prime minister Kenneth Kaunda became the inaugural president.
3
The Rhodesian giraffe and Kafue Lechwe are some of the well-known species that are endemic to Zambia.
The total number of languages spoken in Zambia is 73.
inverness-courier.co.uk.
IT'S AN OLYMPIC YEAR: Playing on their native soil, this country's Hockeyroos won gold in 2000
Australia
The 2000 Summer Olympics are held in Sydney, Australia.
3
Events  January  January 1 – The piece Longplayer begins.
August 8 –
October 22 –
AMERICAN NICKNAMES: 1977's "Son of Sam"
David Berkowitz
August 10 – David Berkowitz is captured in Yonkers, New York, after over a year of murders in New York City as the Son of Sam.
3
February   February 2 –
North Korean agents abduct Yutaka Kume from Noto Peninsula starting the North Korean abductions of Japanese citizens.
Orlando Bloom, British actor  January 14 – Ruco Chan, Hong Kong actor  January 17 –
ROYALTY: In 1999 Abdullah II succeeded his late father, King Hussein, as this country's monarch
Jordan
The Diallo Verdict: The Overview; 4 Officers in Diallo Shooting Are Acquitted of All Charges The New York Times  February 7 – King Hussein of Jordan dies from cancer, and his son Abdullah II inherits the throne.
3
The 71st Academy Awards are held at the Dorothy Chandler Pavilion in Los Angeles with Shakespeare in Love winning Best Picture.
April 8 –
The first of a series of Russian apartment bombings occurs.
PROFESSIONAL SPORTS: Except for 1988, he was selected Most Valuable Player of the National Hockey League every year of the 1980s
Wayne Gretzky
Canadian hockey player Wayne Gretzky's rise to fame in the NHL coincided with the Edmonton Oilers' first 4 Stanley Cup championships (1984, 1985, 1987, and 1988) and becoming the second NHL dynasty team of the 1980s.
3
On June 8, 1986 the Boston Celtics defeat the Houston Rockets in Game 6 of the 1986 NBA Finals to capture a record 16th championship.
On March 31, 1985
The primary gaming computers of the 1980s emerged in 1982: the Commodore 64 and ZX Spectrum.
WORLD OF WORDS: The 1980s program of reforms in the USSR included this, Russian for "restructuring"
perestroika
By 1986 nationalism was making a comeback in the Eastern Bloc and desire for democracy in communist-led socialist states combined with economic recession resulted in Mikhail Gorbachev's glasnost and perestroika, which reduced Communist Party power, legalized dissent and sanctioned limited forms of capitalism such as joint ventures with Western firms.
3
On May 9, 1987, an uncontained engine failure on LOT Flight 5055 caused an in-flight fire on board the airliner, which subsequently crashed, killing all 183 passengers and crew.
By the middle of the decade, almost 70% of the American population had cable television and over 85% were paying for cable services such as HBO or Showtime.
The Jamaica national bobsled team received major media attention and stunned the world at the 1988 Winter Olympics in Calgary, Canada for its unexpected good performance.
18th CENTURY AMERICANS: About 60% of the essays in "The Federalist" were written by him
Alexander Hamilton
Ricklefs (1991), page 106  Significant people  World leaders, politicians, military  thumb|upright|Peter the Great thumb|upright|Louis XV thumb|upright|Queen Anne upright|thumb|Marie Antoinette, Queen of France and Archduchess of Austria thumb|upright|Ferdinand VI, King of Spain upright|thumb|Prince Alexander Suvorov upright|thumb|Horatio Nelson, Vice Admiral in the British navy thumb|upright|Toussaint Louverture thumb|upright|Benjamin Franklin upright|thumb|Joseph II of Austria thumb|upright|Louis XVI thumb|upright|Robespierre thumb|upright|Yeongjo, King of the Joseon Dynasty in Korea  John Adams, American statesman  Samuel Adams, American statesman  Ahmad Shah Abdali, Afghan King  Ahmed III, Sultan of the Ottoman Empire  Hyder Ali, Ruler of Mysore  Ethan Allen, American Revolutionary Army  Anne, Queen of Great Britain  Marie Antoinette, Austrian-born Queen of France  Ferdinand VI, King of Spain  Augustus III, Elector of Saxony, King of Poland, and Grand Duke of Lithuania  Aurangzeb, Mughal Emperor  Boromakot, King of Ayutthaya  Boromaracha V, King of Ayutthaya  Aaron Burr, American statesman  William Cavendish, Anglo-Irish politician  William Pitt the Younger, Prime Minister of Britain   John Carteret, Anglo-Irish politician  Catherine the Great, Empress of Russia  Charles III, King of Spain, Naples, and Sicily  Charles VI, Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, King of Bohemia and Hungary  Charles XII, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends;  Charlotte Corday, French revolutionary  Georges Danton, French revolutionary   Elizabeth of Russia, Empress of Russia  Farrukhsiyar, Emperor of Mughal  Ferdinand I, King of Naples, Sicily, and the Two Sicilies  Benjamin Franklin, American leader, scientist and statesman  Juan Francisco, Spanish naval officer and explorer  Adolf Frederick, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends  Frederick the Great, King of Prussia  George I, King of Great Britain and Ireland  George II, King of Great Britain and Ireland  George III, King of Great Britain and Ireland  Olympe de Gouges, French feminist  Robert Gray, American revolutionary, merchant, and explorer  Gustav III, King of Sweden, the Goths and the Wends  Guru Gobind Singh, tenth of the eleven Sikh Gurus  Gyeongjong, King of Joseon Dynasty  Nathan Hale, American patriot, executed for espionage by the British  Abdul Hamid I, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Alexander Hamilton, American statesman  Patrick Henry, American statesman  Emperor Higashiyama, Emperor of Japan  John Jay, American statesman  Thomas Jefferson, American statesman  Jeongjo, King of Joseon Dynasty  John Paul Jones, American naval commander  Joseph I, King of Portugal  Joseph II, Austrian Emperor  Kangxi Emperor, Chinese Emperor  Karim Khan, Shah of Iran and King of Persia  Marquis de Lafayette, Continental Army officer  Louis XIV, King of France  Louis XV, King of France  Louis XVI, King of France  Louis XVII, imprisoned King of France, never ruled  James Madison, American statesman  Madhavrao I, Peshwa/Prime Minister of Maratha Empire  Madhavrao I Scindia, Marathan leader  Mahmud I, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Alessandro Malaspina, Spanish explorer  George Mason, American statesman  Prince Aleksandr Menshikov, Russian statesman, generalissimo  Michikinikwa, Miami chief and warrior  José Moñino y Redondo, Spanish statesman  Louis-Joseph de Montcalm, French officer  Mustafa III, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Nader Shah, King of Persia  Nakamikado, Emperor of Japan  Horatio Nelson, British admiral  Nanasaheb, Peshwa/Prime Minister of Maratha Empire  Shivappa Nayaka, King of Keladi Nayaka  Osman III, Sultan of Ottoman Empire  Peter I (Peter the Great), Emperor of Russia  Philip V, King of Spain  Pontiac, Ottawa chief and warrior  Prince Grigory Potyomkin, Russian statesman and general  Nguyen Hue, Emperor of Tây Sơn Dynasty of Vietnam  Qianlong Emperor, Emperor of China  Rajaram II of Satara, Monarch of the Maratha Confederacy  Francis II Rákóczi, Prince of Hungary and Transylvania, revolutionary leader  Tadeusz Rejtan, Polish politician  Paul Revere, American revolutionary leader and silversmith  Maximilien Robespierre, French revolutionary leader  Betsy Ross, American flag maker  Count Pyotr Rumyantsev, Russian general  Shah Rukh of Persia, King of Persia.
3
1769–1773: The Bengal famine of 1770 kills one-third of the Bengal population.
1785–1791:
(1998) John Wiley & Sons, Inc. p 146 ISBN 978-0-471-29198-5  1799: Rosetta stone discovered by Napoleon's troops  Literary and philosophical achievements   1703: The Love Suicides at Sonezaki by Chikamatsu first performed  1704–1717: One Thousand and One Nights translated into French by Antoine Galland.
THE 1980s: Suffering from a little overexposure, Vanessa Williams resigned as this in July, 1984
Miss America
Vanessa L. Williams becomes the first Miss America to resign when she surrenders her crown, after nude photos of her appear in Penthouse magazine.
3
The Provisional Irish Republican Army (PIRA) attempts to assassinate Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher and the British Cabinet in the Brighton hotel bombing.
Ray Moore, American comic writer (b. 1905)  January 14  Brooks Atkinson, American theater critic (b. 1894)  Ray Kroc, American entrepreneur (b. 1902)  Saad Haddad, Lebanese military officer and militia leader (b. 1936)  January 17 –
Mary Hamman, American writer and editor, modern living editor LIFE and editor in chief Bride & Home (b. 1907)   December  thumb|150px|Peter Lawford  December 1 – Roelof Frankot, Dutch painter (b. 1911)  December 4 – Jack Mercer, Voice of Popeye the Sailor (b. 1910)  December 8  Luther Adler, American actor (b. 1903)  Razzle, English drummer (Hanoi Rocks) (b. 1960)  Robert Jay Mathews, leader of the neo-Nazi terrorist group The Order  December 11  Oskar Seidlin, Silesian-born Jewish-American literary scholar (b. 1911)  George Waggner, American film director (b. 1894)  December 14 –
THE OLYMPICS: Ecaterina Szabo led this country's women's gymnastics team to the gold in the 1984 games
Romania
Asami Kimura, Japanese singer  July 18  Lee Barnard, English footballer  Liv Boeree, English poker player and TV presenter  Josh Harding, Canadian hockey player  July 19  Lasse Gjertsen, Norwegian videographer  Diana Mocanu, Romanian swimmer  Alessandra De Rossi, Italian-Filipina actress  Andrea Libman, Canadian Actress, Voice Actress, Singer  July 21  Paul Davis, American basketball player  Iris Strubegger, Austrian model  July 23 Brandon Roy, American National Basketball Association player Celeste Thorson, Asian American actress, model  July 24 – Tyler Kyte, Canadian actor/singer  July 26 – Kyriakos Ioannou, Cypriot high jumper  July 27 Antoine Bethea, American football player Taylor Schilling, American actress  July 28 – Zach Parise, American hockey player  July 29 –
3
Bell System in the United States is broken up.
April 19 – "Advance Australia Fair" is proclaimed as Australia's national anthem, and green and gold as the national colours.
Frank Lowson English Test Cricketer 1951–1955 (b.1925)  September 9 – Yılmaz Güney Turkish film director (b.1937)  September 10 –
NOBEL PEACE PRIZE WINNERS: In 1993 the prize was given jointly to F.W. de Klerk & this leader who succeeded him
Nelson Mandela
Nelson Mandela and Frederik Willem de Klerk  Physics –
3
The Polish ferry  sinks off the coast of Rügen in the Baltic Sea, killing 54 people.
July 29 –
Dražen Petrović, Croatian basketball Player (b. 1964)  June 8  René Bousquet, head of the Vichy France Police (b. 1909)  Severo Sarduy, Cuban poet (b. 1937)  Nolan Bailey Harmon, bishop of The Methodist Church and the United Methodist Church (b. 1892)  June 9 –
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: In 1993 Louis V. Gerstner became the first outsider to head this computer giant
IBM
IBM announces a $4.97 billion loss for 1992, the largest single-year corporate loss in United States history to date.
3
The Kurdistan Workers' Party announces a unilateral ceasefire in Iraq.
May 29 –
The Congress Party gains a parliamentary majority in India after the defection of 10 Janata Dal party lawmakers.
EASY HISTORY: In 1993 this country split into Slovakia & the Czech Republic
Czechoslovakia
Events    January   January 1  Dissolution of Czechoslovakia: The Czech Republic and Slovakia separate in the so-called Velvet Divorce.
3
In 2011, the event is named the largest public charity on HIV and AIDS in Europe.
The 14th century Kapellbrücke covered wooden truss bridge in Lucerne (Switzerland) is largely destroyed by fire.
George Frederick Ives, last surviving veteran of the Boer Wars (b. 1881)  April 13  Isaac Rojas, Argentinian admiral and statesman (b. 1906)  Wallace Stegner, American writer (b. 1909)  April 15  John Tuzo Wilson, Canadian geophysicist and geologist (b. 1908)  Leslie Charteris, British author (b. 1907)  Robert Westall, British author (b. 1929)  April 17 –
THE MOVIES: (Hi, I'm Danny Nucci)  I played Fabrizio De Rossi, Leonardo DiCaprio's best friend, in this 1997 blockbuster
Titanic
James Cameron's Titanic, the then highest-grossing film of all time, premieres in the U.S.  December 21 – Brazil beats Australia 6–0 in the Confederations Cup final.
3
After at first contesting the results, Serbian President Slobodan Milošević recognizes opposition victories in the November 1996 elections.
March 21  In Zaire, Etienne Tshiksekedi is appointed prime minister; he ejects supporters of Mobutu Sese Seko from his cabinet.
(b. 1896)  May 29  Jeff Buckley, American musician (b. 1966)  George Fenneman, American radio and television announcer (b. 1919)  May 31 – James Bennett Griffin, American archaeologist (b. 1905)   June  thumb|120px|Jacques-Yves Cousteau  June 2 – Helen Jacobs, American tennis champion (b. 1908)  June 3 –
HODGEPODGE: This publisher who died in 1911 set up a prize fund for awards in journalism, literature, music & drama
Joseph Pulitzer
Joseph Pulitzer, Hungarian-born newspaper publisher and journalist (b. 1847)  October 31 –
3
Mexican Revolution:
She left Quarantine at 7:45 a.m., and was saluted on her way up New York Harbor by all kinds of craft as she steamed to Pier 59 in the North River.
Gustavo Díaz Ordaz, Mexican president (d. 1979)  March 13  L. Ron Hubbard, American author and founder of Scientology (d. 1986)  Marie Rudisill, American author (d. 2006)  March 15 –
DISCARDED LITERARY ENDINGS: This 1957 title feline made things splat / I called animal control, then that was that / That was the end of...
The Cat in the Hat
Dr. Seuss' The Cat in the Hat is published in the United States.
3
Three-year-old thoroughbred Gallant Man wins the Peter Pan Stakes at Belmont Park.
July 16 – United States Marine Major John Glenn flies an F8U supersonic jet from California to New York in 3 hours, 23 minutes and 8 seconds, setting a new transcontinental speed record.
October 2 – David Lean's film The Bridge on the River Kwai opens in the U.K.
THERE'S A FIRST TIME FOR EVERYTHING: In 1931 Pangborn & Herndon landed a Bellanca CH-200 at Wenatchee, Wash., ending the first nonstop flight across this
the Pacific
October 5 – American aviators Clyde Edward Pangborn and Hugh Herndon, Jr., complete the first non-stop flight across the Pacific Ocean, from Misawa, Japan, to East Wenatchee, Washington, in 41½ hours.
3
New Delhi becomes India's capital thumb|200x200px|February 21: Ford Trimotor hijacked  March   March 1 –
Meanwhile, as a result of the victory of the Republican Left of Catalonia, Francesc Macià proclaimed in Barcelona the Catalan Republic.
Fernando Henrique Cardoso, President of Brazil  June 20  Olympia Dukakis, American actress  Arne Nordheim, Norwegian composer (d. 2010)  June 21 – Margaret Heckler, American Secretary of Health and Human Services  June 24 – Billy Casper, American golfer  June 25 – Vishwanath Pratap Singh, Prime Minister of India (d. 2008)  June 26 –
HISTORY: From 1954 to 1969 he was president of North Vietnam
Ho Chi Minh
Ho Chi Minh, former president of the Democratic Republic of Vietnam, dies.
3
The landmark art exhibition When Attitudes become Form, curated by Harald Szeemann, opens at the Kunsthalle Bern in Bern, Switzerland.
July 18 –
December 6 –
NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC: This Northeast Asian country came into being in 1948 & 2 years later the U.S. helped fight for its survival
South Korea
Jeju Uprising - residents revolt on Jeju island, South Korea, eventually leading to the deaths of between 14,000 and 30,000.
3
Slaughter, American professional wrestler  August 30   Lewis Black, American comedian  Fred Hampton, American activist (d. 1969)  Victor Skumin, Russian scientist, Professor  August 31  Cyril Jordan, American musician  Holger Osieck, German football manager  September thumb|120px|John Ritter thumb|120px|Jeremy Irons thumb|120px|George R.R. Martin thumb|120px|Olivia Newton-John  September 2  Nate Archibald, American basketball player  Terry Bradshaw, American football player and sportscaster  September 3  Don Brewer, American drummer (Grand Funk Railroad)
George R. R. Martin, American speculative fiction author  September 22  Denis Burke, Australian politician  Mark Phillips, army captain and equestrian, first husband of Anne, Princess Royal  Jim Byrnes, American voice actor, blues musician and actor  September 24 – Phil Hartman, Canadian actor and comedian (d. 1998)  September 25  Cäcilia Rentmeister, German art historian and gender researcher  Vladimir Yevtushenkov, Russian oligarch  September 26  Maurizio Gucci, Italian businessman and murder victim (k. 1995)  Olivia Newton-John, English-born Australian singer and actress  September 27 –
Vicente Huidobro, Chilean poet (b. 1893)  January 5 –
THAT'S ENTERTAINMENT: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from Sony Pictures Studios.)  It's easy to see why Stage 15 here at Sony Studios, the largest soundstage in the Western hemisphere, was used to film hits like "Men in Black" I & II, the "Spider Man" films, & this 1939 magical classic MGM musical
The Wizard of Oz
August 15 – MGM's classic musical film The Wizard of Oz, based on L. Frank Baum's famous novel, and starring Judy Garland as Dorothy, premieres at Grauman's Chinese Theatre in Hollywood.
3
April 14  John Steinbeck's novel
May   May 1 – Batman, created by Bob Kane and Bill Finger makes his first appearance in Detective comics no.
June 14 – Tientsin Incident: The Japanese blockade the British concession in Tianjin, China, beginning a crisis which almost causes an Anglo-Japanese war in the summer of 1939.
AUCTION PACKED: In 2000, shoes she wore in a 1939 film were auctioned off for $666,000
Judy Garland
August 15 – MGM's classic musical film The Wizard of Oz, based on L. Frank Baum's famous novel, and starring Judy Garland as Dorothy, premieres at Grauman's Chinese Theatre in Hollywood.
3
The Golden Gate International Exposition opens in San Francisco.
The Time of Your Life, a drama by William Saroyan, debuts in New York City.
November 4 – Stewart Menzies is appointed head of the British Secret Intelligence Service.
A REALLY BIG CATEGORY: Until it met disaster in 1912, it was the largest & most luxurious passenger ship afloat
Titanic
– Sinking of the RMS Titanic:  strikes an iceberg in the northern Atlantic Ocean and sinks with the loss of 1517 lives.
3
January 6 – New Mexico becomes the 47th state of the United States.
October 17 – Krupp engineers Benno Strauss and Eduard Maurer patent austenitic stainless steel.
Dean Amadon, American ornithologist (d. 2003)  June 6 – Maria Montez, Dominican actress (d. 1951)  June 8  Harry Holtzman, American artist (d. 1987)  Walter Kennedy, former NBA commissioner (d. 1977)  June 9 – Philip Simmons, American ornamental ironworker (d. 2009)  June 11 – Phạm Hùng, Vietnamese prime minister (d. 1988)  June 16 – Enoch Powell, British politician (d. 1998)  June 21 – Kazimierz Leski, Polish engineer, fighter pilot, and intelligence and counter-intelligence officer (d. 2000)  June 23 – Alan Turing, British mathematician (d. 1954)  June 24 –
VIRGINIA: Born in Virginia in 1856 & elected in 1912, he was the last Virginian to become president
Woodrow Wilson
New Jersey Governor Woodrow Wilson wins U.S. presidential election  November 5 – Governor of New Jersey Woodrow Wilson wins U.S. presidential election  November 11 –
3
January 17 – British polar explorer Captain Robert Falcon Scott and a team of four become the second expeditionary group to reach the South Pole.
January 6  Jacques Ellul, French philosopher (d. 1994)  Danny Thomas, American actor and comedian (d. 1991)  January 7  Charles Addams, American cartoonist (d. 1988)  Ivan Yakubovsky, Marshal of Soviet Union (d. 1976)  January 8  José Ferrer, Puerto Rican actor (d. 1992)  Lawrence E. Walsh, American jurist (d. 2014)  January 19 – Leonid Kantorovich, Russian economist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1986)  January 21 – Konrad Emil Bloch, German-born biochemist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (d. 2000)  January 27  Arne Næss, Norwegian philosopher (d. 2009)  Francis Rogallo, American aeronautical engineer (d. 2009)  January 28 – Jackson Pollock, American painter (d. 1956)  January 30  Werner Hartmann, German physicist (d. 1988)  Barbara Tuchman, American historian (d. 1989)  Francis Schaeffer, American Evangelical theologian, philosopher, and Presbyterian pastor (d. 1984)  February 2 – Millvina Dean, youngest passenger and survivor of the RMS Titanic disaster (d. 2009)  February 4  Erich Leinsdorf, Austrian conductor (d. 1993)  Byron Nelson, American golfer (d. 2006)  February 6 – Eva Braun, Adolf Hitler's mistress (d. 1945)  February 7 –
Hanna Reitsch, German aviatrix (d. 1979)  March 31 –
U.S. HISTORY: Passed in 1913, the 17th Amendment allows for the direct election of these members of Congress
Senators
The Seventeenth Amendment to the United States Constitution is passed, dictating the direct election of senators.
3
The British Board of Film Censors receives the authority to classify and censor films.
Supporters of Phan Xích Long begin an attempt to revolt against colonial rule in French Indochina.
Felix Draeseke, German composer (b. 1835)  March 10 – Harriet Tubman, African-American abolitionist, humanitarian and spy (b. c. 1822)  March 11 – John Shaw
MEASURE TIME: The waist of this British Queen was measured at 46 inches when she died in 1901
Queen Victoria
January 22  Queen Victoria of the United Kingdom dies at age 81, after more than 63 years on the throne, and her son the Prince of Wales formally succeeds her as King Edward VII.
3
January 5 – Typhoid fever breaks out in a Seattle jail, the first of two typhoid outbreaks in the USA during the year.
William McKinley assassination: American anarchist Leon Czolgosz shoots U.S. President William McKinley at the Pan-American Exposition in Buffalo, New York.
August 10 – Franco Dino Rasetti, Italian scientist (died 2001)
NEW YORK TIMES HEADLINES: The 1945 headline "Bomber Hits" this skyscraper meant a plane, not a person
Empire State Building
A U.S. Army Air Forces B-25 bomber crashes into the Empire State Building, killing 14 people, including all on board.
3
March 4 – Football club FC Red Star (in Serbian: FK Crvena Zvezda) formed in Belgrade, Yugoslavia.
Italian General Rodolfo Graziani orders the Esercito Nazionale Repubblicano forces under his command to lay down their arms.
Australian Prime Minister John Curtin dies of a heart attack at age 60.
URBAN: This Australian city was founded in 1788 as a penal colony
Sydney
The La Perouse expedition in the Astrolabe and Boussole arrives off Botany Bay just as Captain Arthur Phillip is attempting to move his colony from there to Sydney Cove in Port Jackson.
3
Fire in New Orleans requires rebuilding Jackson Square area.
June 9 –
June 25 –
LEGENDARY LEGENDS: A modern urban legend says the USS Eldridge disappeared in this city's Navy yard in a 1943 "Experiment"
Philadelphia
October 28 – Alleged date of the Philadelphia Experiment, in which the destroyer escort  was supposed to be rendered invisible to human observers for a brief period.
3
WWII: The new government of Italy sides with the Allies and declares war on Germany.
October 21 – Lucie Aubrac and others in her French Resistance cell liberate Raymond Aubrac from Gestapo imprisonment.
Dudley Pound, British admiral (b. 1877)  October 23 – Ben Bernie, American jazz pianist (b. 1891)  October 30 – Max Reinhardt, Austrian director (b. 1873)  November  November 5 – Idhomene Kosturi, 9th Prime Minister of Albania (b. 1873)  November 7 – Dwight Frye, American actor (b. 1899)  November 13 – Maurice Denis, French painter (b. 1870)  November 22 Lorenz Hart, American lyricist (b. 1895) Keiji Shibazaki, Japanese admiral (killed in action) (b. 1894)  November 23 –
HOW SUITE IT IS: "Black, Brown and Beige" is a 1943 suite by this "noble" jazz bandleader
Duke Ellington
Duke Ellington plays at New York City's Carnegie Hall for the first time.
3
Dr. Josef Mengele begins his service as a medical officer in the Auschwitz-Birkenau concentration camp.
Morten Lauridsen, American composer  February 28 –
Alexander Woollcott, American critic (b. 1887)  January 26 – Nikolai Vavilov, Russian and Soviet botanist and geneticist (b. 1887)  January 29   Henriette Caillaux, murderer, French socialite and wife of former French prime minister (b. 1874)  Vladimir Kokovtsov, 4th Chairman of the Council of Ministers of the Russian Empire (b. 1853)  February thumb|right|150px|David Hilbert  February 4 – Frank Calder, the first NHL President (b. 1877)  February 5  Sim Gokkes, Dutch composer (in Auschwitz concentration camp) (b. 1897)  W. S. Van Dyke, American director (b. 1889)  February 11 –
THAT J. ROBERT OPPENHEIMER: Oppie helped draft 1946's Acheson-Lilienthal Plan, which offered to have this body oversee world atomic research
United Nations
thumb|110px|right| January 10: First meeting of UN. thumb|100px|right| January 10: Project Diana  January 10  The first meeting of the United Nations is held at Methodist Central Hall Westminster in London.
3
French Guiana, Guadeloupe, Martinique and Réunion become overseas départements of France.
October 11 –
Seán Neeson, Northern Irish politician  February 13 – Colin Matthews, British composer  February 14  Bernard Dowiyogo, President of Nauru (d. 2003)  Gregory Hines, American dancer and actor (d. 2003)  February 19 –
IN LAS VEGAS: This casino was a fatal flop for Bugsy Siegel when he launched it in 1946
Flamingo
December 26  The Flamingo Hotel opens on the Las Vegas Strip.
3
April 27 – FA Cup:
October 16  The remaining ten Nazi war criminals sentenced to death at the Nuremberg trials are executed by hanging in a gymnasium in the Nuremberg Palace of Justice.
Sally Field, American actress and singer  November 7 –
ALL MY SONS: Gutzon Borglum died in 1941 so his son, Lincoln, finished sculpting the 4 figures of this memorial
Mount Rushmore
Last day of carving on Mount Rushmore in South Dakota.
3
The Lend-Lease Act is introduced into the United States Congress.
The Holocaust:
Henri Lebesgue, French mathematician (b. 1875)  July 29 – James Stephenson, British actor (b. 1889)  July 30 – Mickey Welch, American baseball player and MLB Hall of Famer (b. 1859)  August
MONTHS: A 1941 song asked, "I like New York in" this month, "how about you?"
June
British troops complete the re-occupation of the Kingdom of Iraq, returning Prince 'Abd al-Ilah to power as regent for Faisal II.   June   June 5  Four thousand Chongqing residents are asphyxiated in a bomb shelter during the Bombing of Chongqing.
3
The United States Naval Academy Alumni Association and the United States Naval Academy Foundation website, usna.com; accessed December 4, 2014.
Trent Lott, former United States Senator (R-MS)   October 10 – Peter Coyote, American actor  October 13 –
Harris Laning, American admiral (b. 1873)  February 6 –
THE ARTICLES OF CONFEDERATION: The Articles were in effect from 1781 until replaced by this 1787 document
Constitution
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June  right|thumb|150px|Scene at the Signing of the Constitution of the United States   January 9 –
3
May 25 –
July–December   July 13 –
Mary Russell Mitford, English novelist and dramatist (d. 1855)
SCIENCE OF 1990: This mapping project begun in 1990 is less than 50% done, though a private firm, Celera, claims to have 90% finished
Human Genome Project
Important events of 1990 include the Reunification of Germany and Yemeni unification, the formal beginning of the Human Genome Project (finished in 2003), the launch of the Hubble Space Telescope, the separation of Namibia from South Africa, and the Baltic states declaring independence from the Soviet Union amidst Perestroika.
3
In most western countries the Echo Boom peaked in 1990; fertility rates declined thereafter.http://www.cdc.gov/nchs/data/databriefs/db136.pdf  Encyclopædia Britannica, which ceased printing in 2012, saw its highest all time sales in 1990; 120,000 volumes were sold that year.
The Pale Blue Dot photograph of Earth is sent back from the Voyager 1 probe after completing its primary mission, from around 3.5 billion miles away.
Patricio Aylwin is sworn in as the first democratically elected Chilean president since 1970.
PLAYING POLITICS: A former Secretary of Housing & Urban Development, & Bob Dole's running mate in 1996
Jack Kemp
August 15 – Bob Dole is nominated for President of the United States, and Jack Kemp for Vice President, at the Republican National Convention in San Diego, California.
3
January 9–January 20 –
The Who headlines the event in their first performance since 1989.
August 20
GOVERNMENT & POLITICS: Bob Dole's running mate in 1996, he is co-director of Empower America
Jack Kemp
August 15 – Bob Dole is nominated for President of the United States, and Jack Kemp for Vice President, at the Republican National Convention in San Diego, California.
3
January 30 – Irish National Liberation Army leader Gino Gallagher is killed in an internal feud.
All 35 people on board die, including United States Secretary of Commerce Ron Brown (see 1996 Croatia USAF CT-43 crash).
November  November –
PEOPLE: In 1996 Fatuma Roba became the first woman from this continent to win an Olympic marathon
Africa
May 9  South Africa's National Party pulls out of the 2-year-old coalition government, and the African National Congress assumes full political control.
3
June 13 –
95 percent of the crops are completely destroyed.
December 25 –
BIG-SCREEN EDUCATORS: 1980: Debbie Allen as dance instructor Lydia Grant
Fame
June   June 1 – Rube Marquard, American baseball player (New York Giants) and a member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1886)  June 7  Henry Miller, American writer (b. 1891)  Elizabeth Craig, British chef and writer (b. 1883)  Philip Guston, American painter (b. 1912)  June 8 –
3
April 12  Samuel Kanyon Doe takes over Liberia in a coup d'état, ending over 130 years of democratic presidential succession in that country.
Gwangju Uprising:
July 15  Jasper Pääkkönen, Finnish actor and film producer  Reggie Abercrombie, American baseball player  JW-Jones, Canadian blues musician  July 16  Adam Scott, Australian golfer  Svetlana Feofanova, Russian pole-vaulter  July 17 – Ryan Miller, American ice hockey goaltender  July 18 – Kristen Bell, American actress  July 19  Mark Webber, American actor  Michelle Heaton, English singer (Liberty X)  July 20 – Gisele Bündchen, Brazilian supermodel  July 21 – CC Sabathia, American baseball player  July 22  Dirk Kuyt, Dutch footballer  Kate Ryan, Belgian singer  July 23 –
AROUND THE EQUATOR: This magazine's 1998 swimsuit issue was shot at locations around the world on the Equator
Sports Illustrated
External links  1998 Year in Review - CNN/Sports Illustrated  References
3
China Airlines Flight 676 crashes into a residential area near Chiang Kai-shek International Airport, killing 202 people (all 196 on board and 6 on the ground).
April 10 –
December 16–19 –
COLORS: Of outer ear, Outer Mongolia or outer space, the one that became a Crayola color in 1998
outer space
July 5 – Japan launches a probe to Mars, joining the United States and Russia as an outer space-exploring nation.
3
February 3 – Cavalese cable car disaster: a United States military pilot causes the deaths of 20 people near Trento, Italy, when his low-flying plane severs the cable of a cable-car.
February 20 –
Iraq disarmament crisis: Iraqi President Saddam Hussein negotiates a deal with U.N. Secretary General Kofi Annan, allowing weapons inspectors to return to Baghdad, preventing military action by the United States and Britain.
QUOTES ABOUT TEACHING: In 1963 this pres. said cynics would pay "those to whom they entrust the minds of their children" less than their plumbers
Kennedy
February 8 – Travel, financial and commercial transactions by United States citizens to Cuba are made illegal by the John F. Kennedy Administration.
2
December 7 – Tony Verna, a CBS-TV director, debuts an improved version of instant replay during his direction of a live televised sporting event, the Army–Navy Game of college football played in Philadelphia.
He parachutes to safety at 8,500 feet after vainly battling to gain control of the powerless, rapidly falling craft.
WOMEN'S LIBERATION: In her 1963 book she used the term "Feminine Mystique" to describe the image of women
Betty Friedan
The publication of Betty Friedan's The Feminine Mystique launches the reawakening of the Women's Movement in the United States as women's organizations and consciousness raising groups spread.
3
: Mona Lisa in Washington, D.C.  January 2 – Vietnam War: The Viet Cong win their first major victory in the Battle of Ap Bac.
Berthold Seliger launches near Cuxhaven a 3-stage rocket with a maximum flight altitude of more than 62 miles (the only sounding rocket developed in Germany).
November 6 – 1963 South Vietnamese coup: Coup leader General Dương Văn Minh takes over as leader of South Vietnam.
CLASSIC TEEN CINEMA: Title of a 1963 Frankie & Annette movie; the sequel added "Muscle" before it
Party
Harold Wilson becomes leader of the opposition Labour Party in the United Kingdom; in October 1964 he became prime minister.
3
Leonardo da Vinci's Mona Lisa is exhibited in the United States for the first time, at the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C.  January 14  George Wallace becomes governor of Alabama.
March   March  The divorce case of The Duke and Duchess of Argyll causes scandal in the United Kingdom.
May 23 – Fidel Castro visits the Soviet Union.
ARTISTS: Born in 1904, this wildly eccentric Spaniard was influenced greatly by metaphysical art
Salvador Dalí
Cecil Day-Lewis, English poet (d. 1972)  April 29 – Pedro Vargas, Mexican singer and actor (d. 1989)   May  thumb|110px|Salvador Dali  May 4  Joaquín García Morato, Spanish fighter ace (d. 1939)  Umm Kulthum, Egyptian singer and actress (d. 1975)  May 6  Moshé Feldenkrais, Ukrainian-born engineer (d. 1984)  Harry Martinson, Swedish writer, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1978)  May 8 – John Snagge, British radio personality (d. 1996)  May 10 – James Roy Andersen, American general (d. 1945)  May 11 – Salvador Dalí, Spanish artist (d. 1989)  May 17  Marie-Anne Desmarest, French novelist (d. 1973)  Jean Gabin, French actor (d. 1976)  May 21  Fats Waller, American pianist and comedian (d. 1943)  Robert Montgomery, American actor and director (d. 1981)  May 22 – Anne de Vries, Dutch writer (d. 1964)  May 25 –
3
The Ålesund Fire destroys most buildings in the town of Ålesund, Norway, leaving about 10,000 people without shelter.
April 8  The Entente Cordiale is signed between the UK and France.
Rudolf Arnheim, German-born author (d. 2007)  July 24 – Nikolay Gerasimovich Kuznetsov, Soviet admiral (d. 1974)  July 26 – Edwin Albert Link, American pioneer in aviation, underwater archaeology, submersibles, inventor of aeronautical, navigation, and oceanographic equipment (d. 1981)  July 28 – Pavel Cherenkov, Soviet physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1990)
2 VS, PLEASE: Last name of the 1904 Nobel Prize winner for Physiology or Medicine, dog
Pavlov
Ivan Petrovich Pavlov  Literature – Frédéric Mistral and José Echegaray  Peace –
3
Aleister Crowley begins writing Liber Al vel Legis, better known as The Book of the Law, a text central to Thelema.
October 5 – Alpha Kappa Psi, the co-ed Professional Business Fraternity, is founded on the campus of New York University.
Dorothy Wagner  September 9 – Feroze Khan, Pakistani field hockey player (d. 2005)  September 12 – Lou Moore, American race car driver and team owner (d. 1956)  September 19 – Elvia Allman, American actress (d. 1992)  September 29 – Greer Garson, English actress (d. 1996)  October 1  Irene Craigmile Bolam, American Amelia Earhart look-alike/believed alias (d. 1982)  A. K. Gopalan, Indian communist leader (d. 1977)  October 3 – Charles J. Pedersen, American chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1989)  October 9 – Wally Brown, American actor and comedian (d. 1961)  October 18 – Haim Shirman, Russian-born Israeli professor of medieval Spanish Jewish poetry (d. 1981)  October 20 – Tommy Douglas, Canadian politician (d. 1986)  October 23 – Harvey Penick, American golfer (d. 1995)  October 25 – Vladimir Peter Tytla, American animator (d. 1968)   November–December   November 1
HODGEPODGE: This U.S. crime figure was born Maier Suchowljansky in 1902
Meyer Lansky
William Wyler, American film director (d. 1981)  July 4  Vince Barnett, American actor (d. 1977)  Meyer Lansky, Russian-born American mobster (d. 1983)  George Murphy, American dancer, actor, and politician (d. 1992)  July 8  Richard Barrett Lowe, American governor of both Guam and American Samoa (d. 1972)  Gwendolyn Bennett, American writer (d. 1981)  July 10 –
3
The Commonwealth Public Service Act creates Australia's Public Service.
August 9 – Edward VII is crowned King of the United Kingdom.
Mitsuo Fuchida, Japanese aviator, naval officer, and Christian evangelist (d. 1976)  December 5 –
WORLD HISTORY: In 1929, the kingdom of the Serbs, Croats 8: Slovenes became known as this
Yugoslavia
Yugoslavia was renamed the "Kingdom of Yugoslavia" as King Alexander sought to unite the Balkans under his rule.
3
Once Stalin was in power, he turned his former support for Lenin's New Economic Policy into opposition.
The British Columbian municipalities of Point Grey and South Vancouver are amalgamated into Vancouver.
, au pays des Soviets), begins serialization in children's newspaper supplement, Le Petit Vingtième.
ASSASSINS: Yigal Amir, a student at Bar-Ilan University, is serving a life sentence for assassinating this leader in 1995
Rabin
Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Rabin is assassinated at a peace rally in Tel Aviv.
3
The Million Man March is held in Washington, D.C.
Participants in the Yugoslav Wars begin negotiations at the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base in Dayton, Ohio.
The first-ever full length computer animated feature film, Toy Story, is released by Pixar Animation Studios and Walt Disney Pictures.
1995: Over 200 people from around the world made speeches for this organization's 50th anniversary
the United Nations
In Somalia, the United Nations peacekeeping mission ends.
3
An earthquake hits the regions of Kozani and Grevena in Greece, with an intensity of 6.6 on the Richter scale.
His sales to Cuba, China, North Korea and Iran are believed to have involved Intel and AMD trade secrets worth US$10–20 million.
November 30 – Javier Solana becomes the new NATO General Secretary; Operation Desert Storm officially ends.
BUMPED FROM THE COVER OF TIME: A Time cover called "Wonders of the Cosmos" was bumped after the assassination of this prime minister in 1995
Yitzhak Rabin
Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Rabin is assassinated at a peace rally in Tel Aviv.
3
July 18 –
Participants in the Yugoslav Wars begin negotiations at the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base in Dayton, Ohio.
This equals the record set at Braemar, Aberdeenshire in 1895 and 1982.
NOTABLE NAMES: This sportscaster who gained fame by "telling it like it is" passed away in 1995
Howard Cosell
Howard Cosell, American sportscaster (b. 1918)  April 24  Lodewijk Bruckman, Dutch painter (b. 1903)  Art Fleming, American actor and game show host (b. 1924)  April 25  Andrea Fortunato, Italian football player (b. 1971)  Alexander Knox, Canadian actor (b. 1907)  Ginger Rogers, American actress and dancer (b. 1911)  Lev Shankovsky, Ukrainian military historian (b. 1903)   May  thumb|150px|Elizabeth Montgomery thumb|150px|Harold Wilson May 1 – Antonio Salemme, Italian-born American artist (b. 1895)  May 2   Michael Hordern, English actor (b. 1911)  Werner Veigel, German journalist and news presenter (b. 1928)  May 5  Ye Qianyu, Chinese painter and manhua artist (b. 1907)  Mikhail Botvinnik, Russian chess player (b. 1911)  Al Sanders, American news anchorman (b. 1941)  May 6 – Noel Brotherston, Irish footballer (b. 1956)  May 8 – Teresa Teng, Taiwanese singer (b. 1953)  May 9 – Marguerite Jones, Canadian professional baseball player (b. 1917)  May 12  Arnold Goodman, Baron Goodman, British lawyer and political adviser (b. 1915)  Arthur Lubin, American film director (b. 1898)  May 14 –
2
April  thumb|199px|April 19: A car bomb explodes outside a Federal building in Oklahoma City, killing 168  April 1 – Dialog Telekom launches Sri Lanka's first GSM mobile phone network.
6-year-old Gyaincain Norbu is enthroned as the 11th reincarnation of the Panchen Lama at Tashilhunpo Monastery.
TIME FLIES: A child born in 1995 turns 15 in 2010; a child born in 5 B.C. turned 15 in this year
11
May 11 –
3
A police officer tries to assassinate Takaji Kunimatsu, chief of the National Police Agency of Japan.
May 20 – U.S. President Bill Clinton indefinitely closes part of the street in front of the White House, Pennsylvania Avenue, to vehicular traffic in response to the Oklahoma City bombing.
A total solar eclipse is visible from Iran, India, Thailand, and Southeast Asia.
FOLK MUSIC: In 1961 the Highwaymen urged him to "row the boat ashore, hallelujah"
Michael
Michael Rockefeller, son of New York Governor and later Vice President Nelson Rockefeller, disappears in the jungles of New Guinea.
3
Patrice Lumumba of Republic of Congo is assassinated.
The Soviet submarine K-19 reactor leak occurs in the North Atlantic.
September   September 1   The Eritrean War of Independence officially begins with the shooting of the Ethiopian police by Hamid Idris Awate.
JERSEY SURE: In 1976 Jersey said gambling was OK in this city, as long as each casino was part of a hotel with at least 500 guest rooms
Atlantic City
The New Jersey Legislature passes legislation legalizing casinos in the shore town of Atlantic City commencing in 1978.
3
Poems against the Gang of Four are also displayed, provoking a police crackdown.
July 15 – Jimmy Carter is nominated for U.S. President at the Democratic National Convention in New York City.
June 25 – Johnny Mercer, American songwriter (b. 1909)
1960: On January 9, 1960 President Nasser set off 10 tons of dynamite to start construction of this
Aswan High Dam
January 9–11 – Aswan High Dam construction begins in Egypt.
3
October 12  Cold War:
This is the first time that any chief of the Anglican Church had ever visited the Pope.
– Joseph Williams, American singer and film score composer  September 2 – John S. Hall, American poet and spoken-word artist  September 4  Kim Thayil, American rock guitarist (Soundgarden)  Damon Wayans, African-American actor and comedian  September 5 – Karita Mattila, Finnish soprano  September 6 –
MUHAMMAD ALI AT 70: Ali won a light heavyweight boxing gold medal at the 1960 Summer Olympics in this European capital
Rome
August 25  The 1960 Summer Olympic Games begin in Rome.
3
The 1960 Winter Olympics begin at the Squaw Valley Ski Resort, in Placer County, California.
March  thumb|130px|The iconic picture of Che Guevara."Brand Che: Revolutionary as Marketer's Dream by Michiko Kakutani, The New York Times, April 20, 2009  March 2 - Lucille Ball files for divorce from husband Desi Arnaz after 19 years of marriage.
In the Republic of the Congo (Léopoldville), now the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Albert Kalonji declares the independence of the "Autonomous State of South Kasai".
HISTORIC DOCUMENTS: The last line of this 1848 tract has been translated as "Workers of the world, unite!"
The Communist Manifesto
thumb|February 21: Karl Marx publishes The Communist Manifesto.
3
John Henry Newman founds the first Oratory in the English-speaking world when he establishes the Birmingham Oratory at 'Maryvale', Old Oscott, England.
Vilfredo Pareto, Italian economist (d. 1923)  July 18 – W. G. Grace, cricketer (d. 1915)  July 22  Adolphus Frederick V, Grand Duke of Mecklenburg-Strelitz (d. 1914)  Winfield Scott Stratton, American miner (d. 1902)  July 25  Arthur Balfour, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (d. 1930)  George Robert Aberigh-Mackay, Anglo-Indian writer (d. 1881)  August 24 –
Wilhelmine Reichard, first German women balloonist (b. 1788)  February 23 – John Quincy Adams, 6th President of the United States (b. 1767)
JOHN PAUL II: He visited this Haitian neighbor in 1992 in celebration of Columbus' visit there 500 years earlier
Dominican Republic
October 12 In the Dominican Republic, Pope John Paul II celebrates the 500th anniversary of the meeting of 2 cultures.
3
January 12 –
July 13 – Yitzhak Rabin becomes prime minister of Israel.
Georgia May Jagger, English model January 14 – Nimue Smit, Dutch model January 15 –
POLITICIANS: In 1992 this co-host of CNN's "Crossfire" took 37% of the vote in New Hampshire's GOP primary
Pat Buchanan
The New Hampshire primary is won by Paul Tsongas on the Democratic side; for the Republicans, Pat Buchanan has a surprisingly strong showing (37%) against incumbent president George H. W. Bush.
3
Japan apologizes for forcing Korean women into sexual slavery during World War II. January 15 –
January 19 The Bulgarian presidential election is won by Zhelyu Zhelev, leader of the Union of Democratic Forces.
October 10 –
BLACKJACK: This Wink Martindale-hosted game show that debuted in 1972 was based on the game of blackjack
Gambit
Gambit and The Joker's Wild also premiere.
3
Prompted by the North Vietnamese offensive, the United States resumes bombing of Hanoi and Haiphong.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average closes above 1,000 (1,003.16) for the first time.
November 30  Vietnam War: White House Press Secretary Ron Ziegler tells the press that there will be no more public announcements concerning United States troop withdrawals from Vietnam, due to the fact that troop levels are now down to 27,000.
LONG LIVE THE KING: Clad in white tie & tails on "The Steve Allen Show" in 1956, Elvis sang this hit to an unmoved pooch named Sherlock
Hound Dog
June 5 – Elvis Presley performs "Hound Dog", on The Milton Berle Show, scandalizing the audience with his suggestive hip movements.
3
Events January  January 1 – The Anglo-Egyptian Condominium ends in Sudan.
June 29  Actress Marilyn Monroe marries playwright Arthur Miller.
November 23 –
SEYCHELLES: In 1956 this Cypriot archbishop was exiled to the Seychelles
Makarios
March 9  The British deport Archbishop Makarios from Cyprus to the Seychelles.
3
April 14 –
The British House of Lords defeats the abolition of the death penalty.
Vladimir Lisin, Russian business oligarch  May 7  Jan Peter Balkenende, Prime Minister of the Netherlands  Jean Lapierre, Canadian politician and television host  May 9 – Wendy Crewson, Canadian actress  May 10 – Vladislav Nikolayevich Listyev, Russian journalist (d. 1995)  May 13  Kenneth Eriksson, Swedish rally driver  Sri Sri Ravi Shankar, Indian guru  Kirk Thornton, American voice actor  May 15 – Dan Patrick, American sports commentator  May 17  Sugar Ray Leonard, African American boxer  Bob Saget, American actor and television host  May 20 Ingvar Ambjørnsen, Norwegian author Dean Butler, American actor and producer  May 23  Ursula Plassnik, Austrian politician  Buck Showalter, American baseball player and manager  May 24 – Michael Jackson, Irish Anglican bishop  May 26 – Lisa Niemi, American actress and dancer, widow of Patrick Swayze  May 28  Jerry Douglas, American dobro player  John O'Donoghue, former Irish Fianna Fáil politician  Sayuri Yamauchi, Japanese voice actress (d. 2012)  May 29 –
I'LL GIVE YOU MY IMPRESSIONS: "That's right, Minnie, my first animated talkie was 1928's 'Steamboat Willie'"
Mickey Mouse
November 18 – Mickey Mouse appears in Steamboat Willie, the third Mickey Mouse cartoon released, but the first sound film and the first such film to be generally distributed.
3
The Okeechobee hurricane kills at least 2,500 people in Florida.
The one-movement ballet Boléro with music by Maurice Ravel and choreography by Bronislava Nijinska premières at the Paris Opéra to a commission by Ida Rubinstein.
Nora Bayes, American singer and actress (b. 1880)  March 21 –
HOTEL: Opened in 1920, the 535-room Drake Hotel offers gorgeous views of this city's Lake Shore Drive
Chicago
The League of Women Voters is founded in Chicago.
3
The 1920 Palm Sunday tornado outbreak hits the Great Lakes region and Deep South of the United States.
Harold Shapero, American composer (d. 2013)  May thumb|120px|Pope John Paul II  May 2  Jean-Marie Auberson, Swiss conductor (d. 2004)  Otto Buchsbaum, Austrian-born writer and ecological activist (d. 2000)  Preben Neergaard, Danish actor (d. 1990)  May 6 – Ratu Sir Kamisese Mara, first Prime Minister of Fiji and President of Fiji (d. 2004)  May 8 – Touko Laaksonen, Finnish artist, pseudonym Tom of Finland (d. 1991)  May 8 –
Ewa Paradies, German Nazi war criminal (d. 1946)  December 19 –
20th CENTURY AUTHORS: Born of Norwegian descent in 1916, he was given the first name of a famous Norwegian of the time
Roald Dahl
Elizabeth Hardwick, American literary critic and novelist (d. 2007)  July 28 – David Brown, American producer (d. 2010)  July 30 – Dick Wilson, American actor (d. 2007)  July 31 – Bill Todman, American game show producer (d. 1979)  August 1 – Fiorenzo Angelini, Italian Cardinal (d. 2014)  August 5 – Kermit Love, American puppeteer (d. 2008)  August 6 – Dom Mintoff, Prime Minister of Malta (d. 2012)  August 14 – Ralph de Toledano, American conservationist and author (d. 2007)  August 16 – Iggy Katona, American race car driver (d. 2003)  August 20 – Paul Felix Schmidt, Estonian chess player (d. 1984)  August 21  Frank O. Braynard, American maritime writer and historian (d. 2007)  Geoffrey Keen, English actor (d. 2005)  Consuelo Velázquez, Mexican songwriter (d. 2005)  August 24 – Hal Smith, American actor (d. 1994)  August 25  Van Johnson, American actor (d. 2008)  Frederick Chapman Robbins, American pediatrician and virologist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (d. 2003)  Saburō Sakai, Japanese fighter ace (d. 2000)  August 27  Martha Raye, American actress (d. 1994)  Larry Thor, Canadian actor (d. 1976)  August 28 – Jack Vance, American writer (d. 2013)  August 29 – Luther Davis, American screenwriter (d. 2008)  August 30 – Shag Crawford, American baseball umpire (d. 2007)  August 31  Daniel Schorr, American journalist (d. 2010)  John S. Wold, American politician   September–October  thumb|130px|François Mitterrand thumb|130px|Roald Dahl thumb|120px|Aldo Moro  September 1  Dorothy Cheney, American tennis player (d. 2014)  Joseph Minish, American politician (d. 2007)  September 3 – Tommy J. Smith, Australian trainer (d. 1998)  September 13 – Roald Dahl, Welsh-born author (d. 1990)  September 14  Eric Bentley, English-born American critic and playwright  John Heyer, Australian documentary filmmaker (d. 2001)  September 15  Margaret Lockwood, Indian-born English actress (d. 1990)  Frederick C. Weyand, U.S. Army General (d. 2010)  September 16 – Frank Leslie Walcott, Barbadian labour leader (d. 1999)  September 17 –
3
WWI: During the Battle of Delville Wood 766 men from the South African Brigade are killed in South Africa's biggest loss during World War I.  July 19–20 –
Germany declares war on Romania.
Aldo Moro, Prime Minister of Italy (d. 1978)  September 24 – Ruth Leach Amonette, American businesswoman (d. 2004)  September 27  Frank Handlen, American artist  Trento Longaretti, Italian painter  S. Yizhar (aka Yizhar Smilansky), Israeli author (d. 2006)  October 3  James Herriot, English veterinarian and author (d. 1995)  Shelby Storck, American television producer (d. 1969)  October 4 –
U.S. PRESIDENTS: Although his 1916 campaign slogan was "He kept us out of war", the U.S. entered World War I the following year
Woodrow Wilson
States President Woodrow Wilson sends 12,000 United States troops over the U.S.–Mexico border to pursue Pancho Villa; the 13th Cavalry regiment enters Mexican territory.
3
Brushaber v. Union Pacific Railroad: The Supreme Court of the United States upholds the national income tax.
The Brusilov Offensive, the height of Russian operations in the war, begins with their breaking through Austro-Hungarian lines.
Robert McNamara, U.S. Secretary of Defense (d. 2009)  June 12 – Raúl Héctor Castro, American politician (d. 2015)  June 15  Olga Erteszek, American undergarment designer and lingerie company owner (d. 1989)  Herbert A. Simon, American economist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 2001)  June 16 –
"P"AINTERS & "P"AINTING: In 1937 he painted a masterpiece that depicted the bombing of a Spanish town
Picasso
Picasso completes his painting Guernica.
3
A sit-down strike ends when General Motors recognizes the United Automobile Workers union.
July 25–31 – Sino-Japanese War: Battle of Beiping–Tianjin, a series of actions fought around Beiping and Tianjin, resulting in Japanese victory.
André Bessette, Canadian religious leader (b. 1845) January 12 –
FAMOUS NAMES: Fred Noonan was navigator on the 1937 around-the-world flight on which she disappeared
Amelia Earhart
July 2  Amelia Earhart and navigator Fred Noonan disappear after taking off from New Guinea during Earhart's attempt to become the first woman to fly around the world.
3
The city of Llanes falls to the Falangists.
October 25 – Celâl Bayar forms the new (ninth) government of Turkey.
Robert W. Gore, American inventor  April 16 –
ASTRONOMY: In 1572 this Danish astronomer discovered a supernova in the constellation Cassiopeia
Tycho Brahe
Tycho Brahe, who notes it two days later, will use it to challenge the prevailing view that stars do not change.
3
Georg Braun begins publication of his urban atlas Civitates orbis terrarum in Cologne.
Births   January 22 – John Donne, English poet and Anglican cleric (d. 1631)  February 27 – Francis II, Duke of Lorraine (d. 1632)  March 20 – Sigismund Báthory, Prince of Transylvania and of the Holy Roman Empire (d. 1613)  April 14 –
May 11 – Moses Isserles, rabbi and Talmudist (b. 1530)  June 2 – Thomas Howard, 4th Duke of Norfolk (b. 1536)  June 9 –
THANKSGIVING AT ALEX'S HOUSE: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew has dibs on a drumstick.) We should all give thanks to this U.S. president who proclaimed a national day of Thanksgiving in 1789
George Washington
thumb|145px|right| February 4: First President of the United States, George Washington, elected.
3
In France, the Estates-General convenes for the first time in 175 years.
July 27 –
Date unknown   Joseph II, Holy Roman Emperor, decrees that all peasant labor obligations be converted into cash payments.
HISTORY: The storming of this prison in 1789 is one of the most famous events of the French Revolution
Bastille
The French Revolution (1789–1799) begins with the Storming of the Bastille: Citizens of Paris storm the fortress of the Bastille and free the only seven prisoners held.
2
June 23 – Louis XVI of France makes a conciliatory speech urging reforms to a joint session and orders the three estates to meet together.
Ratification for 10 of these proposals is completed on December 5, 1791, creating the United States Bill of Rights.
HERSTORY: In 1809 Mary Kies became the 1st U.S. woman to receive one of these guaranteeing the right to sell an invention
patent
__NOTOC__   Events   January–March  thumb|130px|right| Jan. 16: Battle of Corunna thumb|130px|right| February 11: Robert Fulton patents steamboat  January 5 –
3
Napoleon I of France orders the annexation of the Papal States to the French Empire.
On the same day, Duke Charles (uncle of the deposed king Gustav IV Adolf) is elected King under the name Charles XIII.  June 7 – Shoja Shah of Afghanistan signs a treaty with the British.
Paul Sandby, English cartographer and painter (b. 1725)   References
MY GIRLFRIEND: Donald Duck started dating this gal pal in the 1940 cartoon "Mr. Duck Steps Out"
Daisy Duck
June 7  Daisy Duck debuts in Mr. Duck Steps Out.
3
January 29 –
Three gasoline-powered trains carrying factory workers crash and explode while approaching Ajikawaguchi Station, Yumesaki Line (Nishinari Line), Osaka, Japan, killing at least 181 people and injuring at least 92.
In Cambodia the Khmer Issarak is formed to overthrow the French Army within the nation.
GREAT MOMENTS IN TRAVEL: In the 1840s Ida Pfeiffer made this trip in 2 1/2 years; in 1889 Nellie Bly did it in 72 days
Around The World
Inspired by Jules Verne, pioneer woman journalist Nellie Bly (Elizabeth Cochrane) begins an attempt to beat travel around the world in less than 80 days (Bly finishes the journey in 72 days, 6 hours and 11 minutes).
3
English Association football team Wimbledon F.C. play their first match.
Brook trout is introduced into the upper Firehole River, Yellowstone National Park.
Norman Scott, American admiral and Medal of Honor recipient (d. 1942)  August 11 –
ART & ARTISTS: In 1888 this painter suffered one of his first attacks of madness, while Paul Gauguin was visiting him
Vincent Van Gogh
During a bout of mental illness (and having quarreled with his friend Paul Gauguin), Dutch painter Vincent van Gogh infamously cuts off the lower part of his own left ear in a brothel and is removed to the local hospital in Arles.
3
The Agriculture College of Utah, (later Utah State University) is founded in Logan, Utah.
Oaths Act permits the oath of allegiance taken to the Sovereign by Members of Parliament to be affirmed rather than sworn to God, thus confirming the ability of atheists to sit in the House of Commons.
Anna Q. Nilsson, Swedish-American silent film star (d. 1974)   April–June   April 3 Sir Neville Cardus, British music and cricket writer (d. 1975) Thomas C. Kinkaid, American admiral (d. 1972)  April 4  Tris Speaker, American professional baseball player, member of the Baseball Hall of Fame (d. 1958)  Zdzisław Żygulski, Sr.
19TH CENTURY WOMEN: In 1893 this Sunday school teacher was the most notorious woman in Fall River, Massachusetts
Lizzie Borden
June 20 – Lizzie Borden acquitted of murdering her parents.
3
Tokushichi Mishima, Japanese inventor, engineer (d. 1975)  February 28 –
March 22 – Kleber Claux, French-born Australian anarchist and nudist (d. 1971)  March 24   Walter Baade, German astronomer (d. 1960)  Emmy Sonnemann, German actress, second wife of Hermann Göring (d. 1973)  March 26 –
Haim Ernst Wertheimer German-born Israeli biochemist, recipient of the Israel Prize (d. 1978)  August 25 –
PLAY TIME: This playwright achieved international fame with his 1897 play "Cyrano de Bergerac"
Edmond Rostand
The play Cyrano de Bergerac, by Edmond Rostand, premieres in Paris.
3
January 31 – Czechoslav Trade Union Association is founded in Prague.
July 26 –
Antoine Thomson d'Abbadie, Irish-born traveler (b. 1810)  April 1 – Jandamarra, Aboriginal insurrectionist in Australia  April 3 – Johannes Brahms, German composer (b. 1833)  April 10 –
AMERICANA: In 1885 America got its first skyscraper, the Home Insurance Building, in this "Windy City"
Chicago
The Home Insurance Building in Chicago, designed by William Le Baron Jenney, is completed.
2
September 12 – Arbroath 36–0 Bon Accord, the highest score ever in professional football.
In Craigellachie, British Columbia, construction ends on a railway extending across Canada.
20th CENTURY SCIENCE: In 1921 it was found that this hormone controlled your carbohydrate metabolism
insulin
Researchers at the University of Toronto led by biochemist Frederick Banting announce the discovery of the hormone insulin.
3
March 14 – Armenian Soghomon Tehlirian assassinates Mehmed Talaat, former Interior Minister of Turkey, in Charlottenburg, Berlin.
December 23 – Visva-Bharati College is founded by Rabindranath Tagore in Santiniketan, Bengal Presidency, British India.
Camille Saint-Saëns, French composer (b. 1835)  December 20 – Julius Richard Petri, German microbiologist (b. 1852)  December 31 – Boies Penrose, U.S. Senator from Pennsylvania (b. 1860)   Nobel Prizes  right|100px  Physics – Albert Einstein  Chemistry –
TUNES FROM REVUES: At 1921's "Shuffle Along", you could sing along with Eubie Blake & Noble Sissle's "I'm Just Wild About" this man
Harry
Hildegard Hamm-Brücher, German politician  May 12  Joseph Beuys, German artist (d.1986)  Farley Mowat, Canadian writer and naturalist (d. 2014)  May 14 – Richard Deacon, American actor (d. 1984)  May 16 – Harry Carey, Jr., American actor (d. 2012)  May 17 –
3
July 22 –
The Spanish Communist Party is founded.
Fred Buscaglione, Italian singer and actor (d.1960)  November 27 – Alexander Dubček, Slovak politician and First Secretary of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of Czechoslovakia (d. 1992)  November 29 –
OPERA: In 1876 he opened an opera house in the Franconian town of Bayreuth
Richard Wagner
August 13 – Richard Wagner inaugurates Bayreuth Festival  August 31 – Murad V, sultan of the Ottoman Empire is deposed and succeeded by his brother Abdul Hamid II.  September 5 –
3
March – American librarian Melvil Dewey first publishes the Dewey Decimal Classification system.
A giant squid, 6.1 meters long, washes ashore at Thimble Tickle Bay in Newfoundland.
November 29 – Porfirio Díaz becomes President of Mexico.
AMERICAN HISTORY: In 1873 President Grant proclaimed this city the site of the Centennial Exposition of 1876
Philadelphia
The Centennial Exposition begins in Philadelphia.
3
Pope Pius XII (d. 1958)  March 4  Léon-Paul Fargue, French poet (d. 1947)  Theodore Hardeen, magician and stunt performer, founder of the Magician's Guild (d. 1945)  March 10 –
Carl Ruggles, American composer (d. 1971)  March 21 –
Eliza McCardle Johnson, First Lady of the United States (b. 1810)  February 18 – Charlotte Cushman, American actress (b. 1816)  March 29 –
ALEXANDER THE GREAT: In 1876 he was granted a patent for "The Method of, and Apparatus for Transmitting Vocal or Other Sounds"
Alexander Graham Bell
March 7 – Alexander Graham Bell is granted a United States patent for an invention he calls the telephone (patent #174,466).
3
Tanzimat ends in the Ottoman Empire.
Pope Pius XII (d. 1958)  March 4  Léon-Paul Fargue, French poet (d. 1947)  Theodore Hardeen, magician and stunt performer, founder of the Magician's Guild (d. 1945)  March 10 –
Paul Henry, Irish artist (d. 1958)  April 14 – Sir Murray Bisset, South African cricketer and Governor of Southern Rhodesia (d. 1931)  April 22 –
THE INTESTATE: As this guitarist died in 1970 with no will (as you do at 27) his $300 mil. estate ended up with an adopted stepsister
Jimi Hendrix
Artists include Jimi Hendrix, The Who, The Doors, Chicago, Richie Havens, John Sebastian, Joan Baez, Ten Years After, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, The Moody Blues and Jethro Tull.
3
Events  January January 1 – Unix time begins at 00:00:00 UTC. January 4 – 1970 Tonghai earthquake: An earthquake of 7.7 Richter magnitude scale in Tonghai County, Yunnan province, China, kills at least 15,621.
The Wichita State University football team's "Gold" plane crashes in Colorado, killing most of the players.
Prince Adalbert of Bavaria (1886–1970) (b. 1886) December 30 – Lenore Ulric, American actress (b. 1892) December 31  Ray Henderson, American songwriter (b. 1896) Cyril Scott, English composer, writer, and poet (b. 1879)  Nobel Prizes right|100px Physics – Hannes Alfvén, Louis Néel Chemistry –
WHERE AM I?: (Sarah of the Clue Crew)  I'm at the historic Chinatown gate, which only dates from 1970, at the corner of Grant & Bush in this city
San Francisco
March 21 The first Earth Day proclamation is issued by San Francisco Mayor Joseph Alioto.
3
In Bolivia, Army Commander General Rogelio Miranda and a group of officers rebel and demand the resignation of President Alfredo Ovando Candía, who fires him.
The U.N. General Assembly supports the isolation of South Africa for its apartheid policies.
December 12 –
CONSERVATION: (Hi, I'm environmental lawyer Robert F. Kennedy, Jr.)  In 1970 it was this president who established the Environmental Protection Agency
Richard Nixon
April April 1 American President Richard Nixon signs the Public Health Cigarette Smoking Act into law, banning cigarette television advertisements in the United States from January 1, 1971.
3
The Greater London Council announces its plans for the Thames Barrier at Woolwich to prevent flooding (the barrier opens in 1981).
February 22 –
Two CS gas canisters are thrown into the chamber of the British House of Commons.
YOU'RE JUST "GR"EAT: In 1967 "The Colonel's Coup" overthrew the monarchy in this country
Greece
In the Aspida case in Greece, 15 officers are sentenced to 2–18 years in prison, accused of treason and intentions of staging a coup.
3
Jeremy Thorpe becomes leader of the UK's Liberal Party.
The guerrillas operate among the impoverished peasants, fighting both the government security forces and private paramilitary groups funded by wealthy landowners.
Tony Siragusa, American football player  May 15   Madhuri Dixit, Indian actress  John Smoltz, American baseball player  May 19  Geraldine Somerville, Irish actress  Massimo Taccon, Italian painter, sculptor and writer  May 20 - Ramzi Yousef, Islamic terrorist; one of the main perpetrators of the 1993 World Trade Center bombing  May 21 – Chris Benoit, Canadian professional wrestler (d. 2007)  May 22 - Brooke Smith, American actress  May 24  Andrey Borodin, Russian banker  Heavy D, Jamaican-born American actor, rapper (d. 2011)  Bruno Putzulu, French actor  May 25 – Poppy Z. Brite, American author  May 26 – Stacy Compton, American racing driver  May 27   Paul Gascoigne, English footballer  Kai Pflaume, German television presenter and game show host  May 28 - Glen Rice, American basketball player  May 29 – Noel Gallagher, British musician (Oasis)  May 31  Phil Keoghan, New Zealand-born television host (The Amazing Race)  Kenny Lofton, American baseball player  June thumb|120px|Paul Giamatti thumb|120px|Nicole Kidman thumb|120px|Yingluck Shinawatra thumb|120px|Jeff Burton  June 1 – Roger Sanchez, American DJ  June 3  Anderson Cooper, American television journalist  Tamás Darnyi, Hungarian swimmer  Christopher Walker, Gibraltarian triathlete and cyclist  June 5  Joe DeLoach, American athlete  Ron Livingston, American actor  June 6 – Paul Giamatti, American actor  June 7 – Olli Mustonen, Finnish pianist and composer  June 8  Efan Ekoku, Nigerian footballer
GEORGIA: In 1964 he closed his restaurant rather than serve blacks; in 1967 he was chosen governor
Lester Maddox
Segregationist Lester Maddox is sworn in as Governor of Georgia.
3
The Philippine province of Davao is split into three: Davao del Norte, Davao del Sur, and Davao Oriental.
The television series The Prisoner has its world broadcast premiere on the CTV Television Network in Canada.
Gunsmoke, after 12 seasons and with declining ratings, almost gets cancelled, but protests from viewers, network affiliates and even members of Congress and especially William S. Paley, the head of the network, lead the network to move the series from its longtime late Saturday time slot to early Mondays for the fall—displacing Gilligan's Island, which initially had been renewed for a fourth season but is cancelled instead.
THE 1960s: This country took over the Golan Heights in 1967
Israel
April 7 – Six-Day War (approach): Israeli fighters shoot down 7 Syrian MIG-21s.
3
Vietnam War: Operation Cedar Falls starts.
Al Carter from Chicago is the first visitor as noted by Expo officials.
July 18 –
TECHNOLOGY: Drawings discovered in 1967 showed this artist invented the chain drive around 1492
Leonardo da Vinci
February 13 – American researchers discover the Madrid Codices by Leonardo da Vinci in the National Library of Spain.
3
Seaboard Air Line Railroad merges with Atlantic Coast Line railroad, to become Seaboard Coast Line railroad, first step to today's CSX Transportation.
The statement, interpreted as support for Quebec independence, delights many Quebecers but angers the Canadian government and many English Canadians.
Gunsmoke, after 12 seasons and with declining ratings, almost gets cancelled, but protests from viewers, network affiliates and even members of Congress and especially William S. Paley, the head of the network, lead the network to move the series from its longtime late Saturday time slot to early Mondays for the fall—displacing Gilligan's Island, which initially had been renewed for a fourth season but is cancelled instead.
PLAY TIME: According to the title, it was "The Subject" of Frank Gilroy's 1965 Pulitzer Prize-winning play
Roses
July 22 – Shawn Michaels, American professional wrestler  July 23 – Slash (Saul Hudson), American rock musician (Guns N' Roses)
3
The British Government announces the cancellation of the TSR-2 aircraft project.
The Post Office Tower opens in London.
October 29  Moors murders: Ian Brady and Myra Hindley appear in court, charged with the murders of Edward Evans (17), Lesley Ann Downey (10), and John Kilbride (12) from Manchester.
SUPER COOPER: In 1965 this one of the original 7 U.S. astronauts became the first person to make 2 orbital flights
Gordon Cooper
August 21 – Gemini 5 (Gordon Cooper, Pete Conrad) is launched on the first 1-week flight, as well as the first test of fuel cells for electrical power.
3
A mining accident in Dhanbad, India kills 274.
November 15 – U.S. racer Craig Breedlove sets a new land speed record of .
November 26 –
THE GENGHIS KHAN FILM FESTIVAL: Robert Morley played the Chinese Emperor & this Egyptian actor played the title character in 1965's "Genghis Khan"
Omar Sharif
David Lean's film of Doctor Zhivago, starring Omar Sharif and Julie Christie, is released.
3
March 25 – Martin Luther King, Jr. and 25,000 civil rights activists successfully end the 4-day march from Selma, Alabama, to the capitol in Montgomery.
Rex Harrison wins an Oscar for Best Actor.
Date unknown   Tokyo officially becomes the largest city of the world, taking the lead from New York City.
WORLD CITIES: In 1973 a highway bridge opened connecting the European & Asian parts of this Turkish city
Istanbul
The Bosphorus Bridge in Istanbul, Turkey is completed, connecting the continents of Europe and Asia over the Bosporus for the first time in history.
3
Second Cod War:
In the United Kingdom, Princess Anne marries Captain Mark Phillips in Westminster Abbey (they divorce in 1992).
thumb|right|120px|Carson Daly thumb|right|120px|Marie N   June 1  Fred Deburghgraeve, Belgian swimmer  Adam Garcia, Australian actor and singer  Heidi Klum, German model  Derek Lowe, American baseball player  June 2  Carlos Acosta, Cuban-born ballet dancer  Kevin Feige, American film producer and president of Marvel Studios  June 8 – Lexa Doig, Canadian actress  June 9 – Tedy Bruschi, American football player  June 10 – Faith Evans, American singer  June 12  Mitsuki Saiga, Japanese voice actress  Darryl White, Australian footballer  June 13  Sam Adams, American football player  Cheryl "Coko" Clemons, African-American singer (SWV)
FEMINISM: A heralded 1973 "Battle of the Sexes" ended 6-4, 6-4, 6-3 in her favor
Billie Jean King
Riggs wins 6-2, 6-1 which leads to the huge Battle of the Sexes match against Billie Jean King later in the year on September 20.
3
The Sears Tower in Chicago is finished, becoming the world's tallest building at 1,451 feet.
November 21 – U.S. President Richard Nixon's attorney, J. Fred Buzhardt, reveals the existence of an 18½-minute gap in one of the White House tape recordings related to Watergate.
In the United Kingdom, due to coal shortages caused by industrial action, the Three-Day Week electricity consumption reduction measure comes into force.
NAME'S THE SAME: This sports superstar of 1973 bears the name of one of the 6 major organs of the United Nations
Secretariat
Secretariat wins the Kentucky Derby in a dramatic come from behind victory and setting a new Derby record of 1:59 2/5ths.
2
May 25  Skylab 2 (Pete Conrad, Paul Weitz, Joseph Kerwin) is launched on a mission to repair damage to the recently launched Skylab space station.
A large Song dynasty trade ship of c. 1277 A.D. is dredged up from the waters near the southern coast of China with 12 compartments in its hull.
FAMOUS NAMES: In 1975 she became the first woman to head a major British political party
Margaret Thatcher
February 11  Margaret Thatcher defeats Edward Heath for the leadership of the opposition UK Conservative Party.
3
Lev Leshchenko revives "Den Pobedy", one of the most popular World War II songs in the USSR. thumb|120px|Flag of Angola  November 11  Angola becomes independent from Portugal; civil war soon erupts.
Paul Marazzi, English singer (A1)  January 25  Mia Kirshner, Canadian actress  Tim Montgomery, American athlete  John Wade, American football player  January 28  Lee Latchford-Evans, English singer (Steps)  David Zingler, American writer  Terri Conn, American actress  January 29  Sharif Atkins, American television actor  Sara Gilbert, American actress  January 30 – Yumi Yoshimura, Japanese singer (Puffy AmiYumi)  January 31  Jackie O, Australian radio DJ and TV presenter  Preity Zinta, Indian actress  February thumb|right|120px|Drew Barrymore  February 1 – Big Boi, American rapper  February 2  Todd Bertuzzi, Canadian hockey player  Ieroklis Stoltidis, Greek footballer  February 4 –
April 6 – Percival Gordon, Canadian lawyer (b. 1884)
INDIANA: This lasagna-loving cartoon character created by Jim Davis was "born" in Indiana in 1978
Garfield
Garfield, which eventually becomes the world's most widely syndicated comic strip, makes its debut.
3
November 5 – Rioters sack the British Embassy in Tehran.
Julia Jentsch, German actress  February 22 –
Warren King, American cartoonist (b. 1916)
BLESSED ARE THE PEACEMAKERS: In 1979 he became the first Israeli Prime Minister to sign a peace treaty with an Arab country
Menachem Begin
In a ceremony at the White House, President Anwar Sadat of Egypt and Prime Minister Menachem Begin of Israel sign a peace treaty.
3
October 6 – Federal Reserve System changes from an interest rate target policy to a money supply target policy.
William Gargan, American actor (b. 1905)  February 22 –
Devendra Goel, Indian film director and producer of Bollywood films (b. 1919)  February 27  John F. Seitz, American Academy Award-nominated cinematographer (b. 1892)  Hanns-Horst von Necker, German Nazi Generalmajor in the Luftwaffe; highly decorated (b. 1903)  February 28 –
BACK HOME: In 1979 the exiled Ayatollah Khomeni made a triumphant return to this country after 14 years of exile
Iran
January 16 – Shah Mohammad Reza Pahlavi flees Iran with his family, relocating to Egypt after a year of turmoil.
3
Süleyman Demirel, of the Justice Party (AP) forms the new government of Turkey (43rd government, a minority government).
Daryl Palumbo, American musician; who fronted bands, such as (Glassjaw)  February 11 –
Victor Kilian, American actor (b. 1891)  March 14 – Robert William Wood, American landscape painter (b. 1889)  March 15 –
BIG BUSINESS: In 1983 this company introduced its 1-2-3 program for managing business spreadsheets
Lotus
Lotus 1-2-3 is released for IBM PC compatible computers.
3
The final episode of M*A*S*H airs, setting a record for most watched television episode and reaching a total audience estimated at 125 million.
January 27 – Rebecca Judd, Australian model and television presenter  January 31  James Sutton, British actor  Belçim Bilgin, Turkish actress   February   thumb|right|150px|Emily Blunt thumb|right|150px|Kate Mara
Subrahmanyan Chandrasekhar, William Alfred Fowler  Chemistry –
ISLANDS OF THE ATLANTIC: (Tom Ritchie of Lindblad Expeditions stands in front of a war monument in the Falkland Islands) Stanley is the only city on the Falkland Islands, and underwent bombing during the 1982 conflict between Britain and this country
Argentina
The Falklands War begins: Argentina invades and occupies the Falkland Islands.
3
In what Indianapolis Motor Speedway historian Donald Davidson and Speedway public address announcer Tom Carnegie later call the greatest moment in the track's history, 1973 winner Gordon Johncock wins his second race over 1979 winner Rick Mears by 0.16 seconds, the closest finish to this date, after Mears draws alongside Johncock with a lap remaining, after erasing a seemingly insurmountable advantage of more than 11 seconds in the final 10 laps.
He releases his main parachute to fall to lower altitude and lands by his reserve parachute.
Births    January   thumb|right|120px|Eddie
SPACE FLIGHT: In 1986 it replaced the Salyut 7 space station
Mir
February 19  The Soviet Union launches the Mir space station.
3
The 58th Academy Awards are held in Los Angeles, with Out of Africa winning Best Picture.
Loukas Giorkas, Greek-Cypriot singer and model   October 20 – Elyse Taylor, Australian model  October 21  Tamerlan Tsarnaev, Russian-American terrorist responsible for the Boston Marathon bombings (d. 2013)  Christopher Uckermann, Mexican actor  October 22  Kyle Gallner, American actor  Kara Lang, Canadian footballer  October 23  Briana Evigan, American actress  Jessica Stroup, American actress and fashion model  October 24 – Drake, Canadian actor and rapper  October 26 –
March 22  Harriette Simpson Arnow, American novelist (b. 1908)  Charles Starrett, American actor (b. 1903)  March 23 – Moshe Feinstein, Orthodox rabbi (b. 1895)  March 24 –
20th CENTURY WORLD LEADERS: In 1986 this president crossed the Pacific & went into exile in Hawaii
Ferdinand Marcos of the Philippines
President Ferdinand Marcos of the Philippines goes into exile in Hawaii after 20 years of rule; Corazon Aquino becomes the first Filipino woman president, first as an interim president.
3
Chernobyl disaster: A mishandled safety test at the Chernobyl Nuclear Power Plant in Pripyat, Ukrainian SSR, Soviet Union "killed at least 4056 people and damaged almost $7 billion of property".
The Phantom of the Opera, the longest running Broadway show in history, opens at Her Majesty's Theatre in London.
Oscar Zariski, Russian mathematician (b. 1899)  July 6 – Jagjivan Ram, Indian politician (b. 1908)  July 8  Hyman G. Rickover, American admiral (b. 1900)  Skeeter Webb, baseball player (b. 1909)  July 12 – Wacław Kisielewski, Polish pianist (b. 1943)  July 14   Raymond Loewy, French-born industrial designer (b. 1893)  Joseph Vogt, German classical historian (b. 1895)  July 15  Florence Halop, American actress (b. 1923)  Billy Haughton, American harness driver and trainer (b. 1923)  July 19 – Alfredo Binda, Italian cyclist (b. 1902)  July 21 –
BJORN AGAIN: After this prime minister's 1986 assassination, journalist Bjorn Ranelid lamented, "Suddenly anything seemed possible"
Olof Palme
February 28 – Assassination of Olof Palme: Swedish Prime Minister Olof Palme is assassinated on his way home from the cinema.
3
The Phantom of the Opera, the longest running Broadway show in history, opens at Her Majesty's Theatre in London.
The first commercially available 3D printer is sold.
Lykke Li, Swedish singer-songwriter.
LET'S GET BIZET!: Bizet penned this 1875 opera where the title gal leaves Don Jose for a bullfighter; big mistake
Carmen
March 3  Bizet’s Carmen is first performed at the Opéra-Comique, Paris.
3
July 1 – General Postal Union established.
– Leslie Green, British architect (d. 1908)  January 7 – Thomas Hicks, American runner (d. 1963)  January 9 – Gertrude Vanderbilt Whitney, American sculptor and socialite (d. 1942)  January 11 – Reinhold Glière, Russian composer (d. 1956)  January 14 –
the 12th Dalai Lama (b. 1857)  May 17 –
HISTORIC AMERICANS: This American educator born in 1796 favored the abolition of corporal punishment in schools
Horace Mann
Jakob Steiner, Swiss mathematician (d. 1863)  May 1 – Junius Brutus Booth, English actor (d. 1852)  May 4 – Horace Mann, American educator and abolitionist (d. 1859)  June 12 –
3
He sends this force along the south bank of the Po River to cross it with boats at Piacenza.
George Bush (biblical scholar), professor of Asian languages (d. 1859)  June 14 – Nikolai Brashman,  Russian mathematician of Czech origin (d. 1866)  July 6 – Emperor Nicholas I of Russia (d. 1855)  July 16 – Jean-Baptiste-Camille Corot, French painter (d. 1875)  July 23 – Franz Berwald, Swedish composer (d. 1868)  August 15 –
Thomas Chandler Haliburton, Canadian author (d. 1865)  December 19 – Breton de los Herreros, Spanish playwright (d. 1873)  December 27 –
THAT 1870s SHOW: The gang holds a buggy wash to raise a million dollars' bail for this Tammany "Boss" when he's arrested in 1871
Boss Tweed
John Taliaferro, In a Far Country: The True Story of a Mission, a Marriage, a Murder, and the Remarkable Reindeer Rescue of 1898 (PublicAffairs, 2007) p179  September 3 – New York City residents, tired of the corruption of Tammany Hall and Boss Tweed, meet to form the "Committee of Seventy" to reform local politics.
3
March 26 –
April 24 –
Tad Lincoln, Youngest son of American President Abraham Lincoln (b. 1853)  July 31 –
STRANGE BUT TRUE: Everything was shipshape, but no one was home when this ghost ship was boarded in 1872
The Mary Celeste
The Mary Celeste sets sail from New York; bound for Genoa, Italy.
3
The Tichborne case is decided in London against the claimant Arthur Orton (who, as a result, is convicted of perjury in 1874).
The magazine Popular Science is first published in the United States.
Archduke Joseph August of Austria, Austrian field marshal (d. 1962)  August 10 – Bill Johnson, American jazz musician (d. 1972)  August 13 – Richard Willstätter, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1942)  August 15 – Sri Aurobindo, Indian nationalist, writer and mystic (d. 1950)  August 21 – Aubrey Beardsley, British artist (d. 1898)  September 20 – Maurice Gamelin, French general (d. 1958)  September 28  David Unaipon, Australian author and inventor (d. 1967)  Charles F. Watkins, American physician (d. 1936)  October 4 – Roger Keyes, 1st Baron Keyes, British admiral (d. 1945)  October 11 –
CLASSICAL COMPOSERS: In 1874 he moved into his Bayreuth home, Wahnfried, which means "peace from illusion"
Wagner
William T. Innes, American writer, ichthyologist, publisher (d. 1969)  February 3 – Gertrude Stein, American writer and patron of the arts (d. 1946)  February 6 – Henry C. Mustin, American naval aviation pioneer (d. 1923)  February 9 – Amy Lowell, American poet (d. 1925)  February 11  Elsa Beskow, Swedish writer (d. 1953)  Fritz Hart, English-born composer (d. 1949)  February 15 – Sir Ernest Shackleton, Irish explorer (d. 1922)  February 17 – Thomas J. Watson, American computer pioneer (d. 1956)  February 20 – Mary Garden, American opera soprano of Scots descent (some sources state her birth year as 1877) (d. 1967)  February 23 – Konstantin Päts, Estonian president (d. 1956)  February 24 – Honus Wagner, baseball player (d. 1955)  March 4 – Stephen Victor Graham, United States Navy Rear Admiral and 18th Governor of American Samoa (d. 1955)  March 12 – Charles Weeghman, American restaurateur and owner of Chicago Cubs (d. 1938)  March 20 – Börries von Münchhausen, German poet (d. 1945)  March 24 –
3
May 27 –
The flag of Estonia is adopted as the flag of the Estonian Students Society in Otepää.  June 14 –
John Ernst Worrell Keely demonstrates his "induction resonance motion motor", a perpetual motion machine which eventually turns out to be a fraud.
THE ELECTRIC COMPANY: In 1882 this U.S. inventor opened a steam-powered electricity generating station
Edison
September 4 – Thomas Edison flips the switch to the first commercial electrical power plant in history, lighting one square mile of lower Manhattan.
3
British gunboats enter Monrovia, with Arthur Havelock demanding that Liberia cede disputed territory to the British colony of Sierra Leone of which he is Governor.
The Chinese Exclusion Act is the first important law which restricts immigration into the U.S.A.  May 20 – The Triple Alliance is formed between Germany, Austria-Hungary and Italy.
August 20 – Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky's 1812 Overture debuts in Moscow.
SEE FOR YOURSELF: This West Coast university that was founded in 1880 uses the logo seen here
the University of Southern California
The University of Southern California opens its doors to 53 students and 10 faculty.
3
June 28 – Australian police capture bank robber Ned Kelly after a gun battle at Glenrowan, Victoria.
November 22 – Vaudeville actress Lillian Russell makes her debut at Tony Pastor's Theatre in New York City.
April–June  thumb|right|110px|Ernst Ludwig Kirchner  April 13 – Charles Christie, Canadian-born film studio owner (d. 1955)  April 15 – Max Wertheimer, father of Gestalt Theory (d. 1943)  April 18 – Sam Crawford, Baseball Hall of Famer (d. 1968)  April 30 –
20th CENTURY ARTISTS: Born in the Jewish village of Vitebsk in 1887, this painter lived till the ripe old age of 97
Chagall
André François-Poncet, French politician and diplomat (d. 1978)  June 22 – Julian Huxley, British biologist (d. 1975)  June 25 – George Abbott, American playwright (d. 1995)   July–September  thumb|110px|Marc Chagall thumb|110px|Gustav Ludwig Hertz thumb|110px|Erwin Schrödinger 125px|thumb|Harry
3
July 12 – Odense Boldklub, the Danish football team, is founded as the Odense Cricket Club.
This was an important step towards the understanding of the quantum nature of light.
Heitor Villa-Lobos, Brazilian composer (d. 1959)  March 9 –
AMERICAN HISTORY: In 1787 Delaware became the 1st state in the Union; in 1860 this became the 1st state to secede
South Carolina
December 20 – South Carolina becomes the first state to secede from the United States Union.
3
The Open Championship, also known as the British Open, is played for the first time at Prestwick Golf Club in Ayrshire, Scotland.
Friedrich Schmidt-Ott, German lawyer, scientific organizer, and science policymaker (d. 1956)  June 20 – Jack Worrall, Australian cricketer, footballer, and coach (d. 1937)  June 22 –
George Warrender, British admiral (d. 1917)   August  thumb|right|110px|Raymond Poincaré thumb|right|110px|Paul Nipkow  August 3 – W. K. Dickson, Scottish inventor (d. 1935)  August 7 – Alan Leo, British astrologer (d. 1917)  August 10 – Vishnu Narayan Bhatkhande, Indian musician (d. 1936)  August 13 –
WORLD LITERATURE: In this 1862 novel, ex-convict Jean Valjean steals the Bishop of Digne's silverware
Les Misérables
c. March 31 – Publication of Victor Hugo's epic French historical novel Les Misérables begins.
3
Both sides claim victory.
This order is rescinded just a few weeks later.
Georges Feydeau, French playwright (d. 1921)  December 12 – J. Bruce Ismay, English shipping magnate, White Star Line (d. 1937)  December 15 –
19TH CENTURY AMERICA: In 1892 the Edison Co. merged with the Thomson-Houston Electrical Co. to form this company
General Electric
The General Electric Company is established through the merger of the Thomson-Houston Company and the Edison General Electric Company.
3
February 29 – St. Petersburg, Florida is incorporated.
thumb||February 27: Rudolf Diesel's patent.
Edna St. Vincent Millay, American writer (d. 1950)  February 23 – Kathleen Harrison, English actress (d. 1995)  February 24 –
ROMAN EMPERORS: In 41 A.D., this Emperor remarked, "Would that the Roman people had a single neck" to cut in a single stroke
Caligula
Events   By place    Roman Empire   Consuls are the emperor Caligula and Gnaeus Sentius Saturninus.
2
Messalina, wife of Claudius, persuades Claudius to have Seneca the Younger banished to Corsica on a charge of adultery with Julia Livilla.
Claudius restores religious freedom to Jews throughout the empire, but prohibits Jews in Rome from proselytising.
NOT NO. 1: Reigning from around 67 to 79 A.D., Linus is considered to be the second man to hold this position
Pope
Pope Linus  Caesius Bassus, Roman poet (killed by Mount Vesuvius eruption)  Empress Ma (b. 40 AD)
3
thumb|Agricola's Campaigns in Scotland __NOTOC__ Year 79 (LXXIX) was a common year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
The fortress is built by Legio II Adiutrix and contains barracks, granaries, military baths and headquarters.
Agricola founds Mamucium, a frontier fort and settlement in the North West of England.
THE 1880S: In 1886 Charles M. Hall developed the electrolytic method for getting this metal from bauxite
Aluminum
An inexpensive method for refining aluminum, the Hall–Héroult process, is discovered.
3
Events    January–March  thumb|210px|right| January 29 – Karl Benz patent.
November 30 –
Willem Drees, Dutch politician, prime minister, and centenarian (d. 1988)  July 12 – Jean Hersholt, Danish-born actor (d. 1956)  July 15 Arthur L. Bristol, American admiral (d. 1942) William Edmunds, Italian stage and screen character actor (d. 1981)  July 18 – Simon Bolivar Buckner, Jr., American general (d. 1945)  July 19 –
SCIENCE: In 1985 a hole was discovered in the ozone layer over this continent
Antarctica
A total solar eclipse occurs over Antarctica at 14:11:22 UTC.  November 13 – Armero tragedy: The Nevado del Ruiz volcano erupts, killing an estimated 23,000 people, including 21,000 killed by lahars in the town of Armero, Colombia.
3
The Greenpeace vessel Rainbow Warrior is bombed and sunk in Auckland Harbour by French DGSE agents.
The Famine in Ethiopia continues; USA for Africa ("We Are the World") and Live Aid raise funds for famine relief.
Brandon Mebane, American football player  January 16  Joe Flacco, American football player  Gintaras Januševičius, Lithuanian pianist  Amy Manson, Scottish actress  January 17  Kangin, Korean singer (Super Junior)  Simone Simons, Dutch singer  January 19  Damien Chazelle, American film director and screenwriter  Rika Ishikawa, Japanese singer and host of television and radio programs  January 20 - Marina Inoue - Japanese voice actress  January 21  Aura Dione, Danish singer-songwriter  Sasha Pivovarova, Russian model  January 22  Akira Nagata, Japanese singer (Run&Gun), actor and voice actor  Orianthi, Australian guitarist and singer  January 23 – Doutzen Kroes, Dutch supermodel  January 25  Tina Karol, Ukrainian singer  Michael Trevino, American actor  January 26  Edwin Hodge, American actor  Rusko, British musician  January 28  J. Cole, American rapper, singer and record producer  Tom Hopper, English actor  András Kállay-Saunders, Hungarian American recording artist, songwriter and record producer  January 29  Bosh Berlin, American drummer (Living Things)  Liu Chunhong, Chinese weightlifter  Marc Gasol, Spanish basketball player  Isabel Lucas, Australian actress  Jessica Marais, Australian actress  January 30 – Richie Porte, Australian professional cyclist (Tasmanian)  January 31 – Kalomira, Greek American singer   February  thumb|right|150px|Cristiano Ronaldo thumb|150px|Trevor Smith thumb|150px|Yulia Volkova 150px|thumbnail|Haylie Duff  February 2 – Fontel Mines, American football player  February 4  Bashy, English recording artist and actor  Bug Hall, American actor  February 5  Laurence Maroney, American football player  Cristiano Ronaldo, Portuguese footballer  February 6  Kris Humphries, American basketball player  Joji Kato, Japanese speedskater  February 7  Donald Moatshe, South African musician  Tegan Moss, Canadian actress  Tina Majorino, American actress  Deborah Ann Woll, American actress  February 8  Jeremy Davis, American bassist (Paramore)  Bob Morris, American singer-songwriter and guitarist (The Hush Sound)  Trevor Smith, Canadian ice hockey player  February 9  David Gallagher, American actor  Rachel Melvin, American actress  February 10 – Anette Sagen, Norwegian ski jumper  February 11  William Beckett, American singer and songwriter  Mike Richards, Canadian hockey player  February 14  Karima Adebibe, English actress and model  Heart Evangelista, Chinese-Filipino actress  Kataxenna Kova, British model  Miki Yeung, Hong Kong actress and singer  February 17 –
1989: When this country held elections in March, 3 cosmonauts voted by radio from space
Soviet Union
It was a historical turning point for the wave of revolutions that swept the Eastern Bloc, starting in Poland that summer with the beginning of a move towards private enterprise, coming to a head with opening of the Berlin Wall in November, embracing the overthrow of the communist dictatorship in Romania in December and ending in December 1991 with the dissolution of the Soviet Union.
3
thumb|200px|The Exxon Valdez  March 23 – Stanley Pons and Martin Fleischmann announce that they have achieved cold fusion at the University of Utah.
The game becomes famous after Terry Butcher sustains a deep cut to his forehead early in the game.
November 13 – Hans-Adam II becomes Prince of Liechtenstein on the death of his father, Prince Franz Joseph II.  November 14 –
INTERNATIONAL DATEBOOK: On trial for his 1953 raid on the Moncada barracks, he declared "History will absolve me"
Fidel Castro
July 26  Fidel Castro and his brother lead a disastrous assault on the Moncada Barracks, preliminary to the Cuban Revolution.
3
May 9 –
September 26 – Rationing of cane sugar ends in the UK.  October  October –
Takashi Yoshimatsu, Japanese composer  March 20 –
THE SILVER SCREEN: "Shadow of the Vampire" starring Willem Dafoe as actor Max Schreck was inspired by this 1922 German film
Nosferatu
The movie Nosferatu is released.
3
February 26 –  A challenge to the Nineteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, allowing women the right to vote, is rebuffed by the Supreme Court of the United States.
July   thumb|200px|May 30: Lincoln Memorial dedicated.
Roscoe Lee Browne, African-American actor (d. 2007)  May 4 – Eugenie Clark, American marine biologist (d. 2015)  May 7  Darren McGavin, American actor (d. 2006)  Joe O'Donnell, American documentary photographer, photojournalist (d. 2007)  May 10 – Nancy Walker, American actress, singer and director (d. 1992)  May 11 – Ameurfina Melencio-Herrera, Filipino Supreme Court jurist  May 12 – Murray Gershenz, American character actor and entrepreneur (d. 2013)  May 13  Otl Aicher, German graphic artist (d. 1991)  Michael Ainsworth, British cricketer (d. 1978)  Bea Arthur, American actress and comedienne (d. 2009)  May 14 – Franjo Tuđman, first President of Croatia (d. 1999)  May 15
ART & ARTISTS: Upon completing the ceiling of the Sistine Chapel in 1512, he wrote to his father, "The pope is well satisfied"
Michelangelo
The ceiling of the Sistine Chapel, painted by Michelangelo Buonarroti, is exhibited to the public for the first time.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 1512 (MDXII) was a leap year starting on Thursday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
April 11 – War of the League of Cambrai: Battle of Ravenna: French forces under Gaston of Foix, Duke of Nemours defeat the Spanish under Raymond of Cardona, but Gaston is killed in the pursuit.
August 10 – War of the League of Cambrai:
POETIC FILL IN THE BLANK: 1618, John Donne:"____, be not proud"
Death
Elisabeth of the Palatinate, German princess, philosopher, and Calvinist (d. 1680)  December 28 – Catharina Hooft, woman of the Dutch Golden Age (d. 1691)  date unknown  Athittayawong, Ayuthian monarch (d. 1629)  Henry Bennet, 1st Earl of Arlington, politician (member of the Cabal, d. 1685)  Lin Yiu, Chinese poet and painter (d. 1664)   Deaths   February 20 – Philip William, Prince of Orange (b. 1554)  March 23 – James Hamilton, 1st Earl of Abercorn, Scottish politician (b. c. 1575)
3
July–December   August 29 –
Johan Frederik von Marschalck, German-born landowner, Chancellor of Norway (d. 1679)  November –
June 7 – Thomas West, 3rd Baron De La Warr, English Governor of Virginia (b. 1577)  August 23 – Gerbrand Adriaenszoon Bredero, Dutch writer (b. 1585)  September 28 –
EARLY AMERICANS: Hamilton used the 1786 Shays Rebellion & this 1794 rebellion as proof of a need for a strong central gov't
Whiskey Rebellion
A Federal army quells the Whiskey Rebellion in the United States.
2
November 19 –
Francis Seymour-Conway, 1st Marquess of Hertford, Viceroy of Ireland (b. 1718)
CONVENTIONS: New England Federalists convened in Hartford in 1814 to denounce this war
War of 1812
March 9 – American naval schooner USS Enterprise reaches Wilmington, North Carolina, returning from participating in the War of 1812 against the United Kingdom in the Caribbean.
3
In northern Alabama, United States forces under General Andrew Jackson defeat the Creek Indians.
In addition, the British cede the island of Banca off the island of Sumatra in exchange for the settlement of Cochin in India.
Julius von Mayer, German physician and physicist and one of the founders of thermodynamics (d. 1878)  December 13 – Ana Néri, Brazilian nurse, matron of nursing in that country (d. 1880)  December 18 –
BALTIMORE: The 1814 bombardment of this nearby site is commemorated on Defenders' Day
Fort McHenry
The British bombard Fort McHenry at Baltimore.
3
Andrew Jackson seizes Pensacola, Florida.
Sheridan Le Fanu, Irish writer (d. 1873)  September 2 –
Adolphe Sax, Belgian musical instrument maker and inventor (d. 1894)  November 13 – Joseph Hooker, American general (d. 1879)  November 22 – Serranus Clinton Hastings, American politician (d. 1893)  November 25 –
SCOTT FREE: Captured & freed in the War of 1812, he was later an 1852 presidential candidate & a Union general
Winfield Scott
November 2 – U.S. presidential election, 1852: Democrat Franklin Pierce of New Hampshire defeated Whig Winfield Scott of Virginia.
3
Charles Taze Russell (Pastor Russell), prominent Protestant reformer and evangelist (d. 1916)  February 26 –
Sir Edward Troubridge, 2nd Baronet, British admiral (b. ca. 1787)  October 13 –
Friedrich Ludwig Jahn, German gymnastics educator (b. 1778)  October 24 –
RULERS: This current king of Jordan was a cousin of King Faisal of Iraq, who was assassinated in 1958
King Hussein
July 17 – British paratroopers arrive in Jordan; King Hussein has asked help against pressure from Iraq.
3
The first of Leonard Bernstein's Young People's Concerts with the New York Philharmonic is telecast by CBS.
The last of the great MGM musicals, it will become a huge critical and box office success and win nine Academy Awards including Best Picture.
May 28 - Real Madrid beats A.C.Milan 3-2 at Heysel Stadium, Brussels and wins the 1957-58 European Cup (football).
LET'S EAT: Let's have these for breakfast, perhaps at the International House of them, around since 1958
pancakes
The first International House of Pancakes (IHOP) opens in Toluca Lake, Los Angeles.
3
The word Aerospace is coined, from the words Aircraft (aero) and Spacecraft (space), taking into consideration that the Earth's atmosphere and outerspace is to be one, or a single realm.
Guinea declares itself independent from France.
During the International Geophysical Year, Earth's magnetosphere is discovered.
AFRICAN HISTORY: (I'm author and journalist Helene Cooper.) In 1847 a government based on that of the U.S. was established by free black men & former slaves in the West African nation they called this
Liberia
July 26 – Liberia gains independence.
3
At the end of this year only 15 law schools exist in the United States.
September 14 – U.S. general Winfield Scott enters Mexico City, marking the end of organized Mexican resistance in the Mexican–American War.
It remains the oldest in the world.
NEW DEAL PROGRAMS: This 1935 act that provides unemployment insurance was born out of the New Deal
the Social Security Act
August 14 – United States President Franklin D. Roosevelt signs the Social Security Act into law.
3
Coopers Inc. sells the world's first men's briefs, as "jockeys", in Chicago.
Opening of the De La Warr Pavilion at Bexhill-on-Sea, designed by Erich Mendelsohn and Serge Chermayeff, a pioneering example of International Style architecture in the British Isles.
Ruth Ann Minner, Governor of Delaware  January 18 – Jon Stallworthy, English poet (d. 2014)  January 19 –
MAG-NIFICENT: This illustrated mag had a shake start in 1954 with unpopular coverage of snooty events like yacht races
Sports Illustrated
The first issue of Sports Illustrated magazine is published in the United States.
3
The common Nordic Labour Market act is signed.
Dieter Bohlen, German music producer and singer-songwriter (Modern Talking, Blue System)  February 9  Chris Gardner, American entrepreneur  Gina Rinehart, Australian mining tycoon.
Angus L. Macdonald, Nova Scotia Premier (b. 1890)  April 15 – Ülo Altermann, Estonian soldier and forest brother (b. 1923)  April 17 – Lucrețiu Pătrășcanu, Romanian communist activist and sociologist (b. 1900)  April 28 – Léon Jouhaux, French labor leader, recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize (b. 1879)  April 29   Kathleen Clarice Groom, British writer (b. 1872)  Joe May, Austrian-born director (b. 1880)  May  May 1 – Tom Tyler, American actor (b. 1903)  May 3 – Józef Garbień, Polish footballer and physician (b. 1896)  May 6 – B. C. Forbes, Scottish-born publisher (b. 1880)  May 14 – Heinz Guderian, German World War II general (b. 1888)  May 15 –
FLOPS: "La Traviata", his modern-dress opera version of "La Dame Aux Camelias", flopped in its 1853 premiere
Giuseppe Verdi
January 19 – Giuseppe Verdi's opera Il Trovatore premieres in performance at Teatro Apollo in Rome.
3
October–December   October 1 – The Bechstein piano company is founded, one of three established in a "Golden year" in the history of the piano (Julius Blüthner and Steinway & Sons being the others).
November 30 (November 18 O.S.)
July–December  thumb|right|110px|Hendrik Lorentz thumb|right|110px|Albrecht Kossel thumb|right|110px|Heike Kamerlingh Onnes  July 4 –
ART: In 1546 Pope Paul III appointed this artist architect of St. Peter's Basilica
Michelangelo
Michelangelo is made chief architect of St. Peter's Basilica in Rome.
3
Events   January–June   May 19 –
Potosí, in modern day Bolivia, is founded by the Spanish as a mining town.
June 14 – Wolfgang, Count of Hohenlohe-Weikersheim, German count (d. 1610)  June 24 – Robert Parsons, English Jesuit priest (d. 1610)  June 29 – Dorothea of Denmark, Duchess of Brunswick-Lüneburg (1561-1592) (d. 1617)  July 4 – Murat III, Ottoman Sultan (d. 1595)  August 10 – Juliana of Nassau-Dillenburg, Dutch prince (d. 1588)  August 13 –
THE BRITISH ARE DIFFERENT: The British don't celebrate this U.S. holiday honoring a 1621 event, but they do have something called St. Swithin's Day
Thanksgiving
The Pilgrims of Plymouth Colony and Wampanoags celebrate a harvest feast (3 days), later regarded as the "First Thanksgiving", noted for peaceful co-existence.
3
June 3 –
Adriaen van Gaesbeeck, Dutch painter of genre subjects and portraits (d. 1650)  August 28 – Sir Richard Grobham Howe, 2nd Baronet, English Member of Parliament (d. 1703)  September 8 – Louis, Grand Condé, French general (d. 1686)  September 9 – Henry X, Count of Reuss-Lobenstein, Rector of the University of Leipzig (d. 1671)  October 3 – Friedrich Werner, German musician (d. 1660)  October 8 – Maximilian Henry of Bavaria, Roman Catholic bishop (d. 1688)  October 21   Richard Standish, English politician (d. 1662)  Nicholas Barré, French Minim friar, priest and founder (d. 1686)  October 23 – Lord John Stewart, Scottish aristocrat, Royalist commander in the English Civil War (d. 1645)  October 24 – Serafina of God, founder of seven Carmelite monasteries of nuns in southern Italy (d. 1699)  November 11 – Israel Tonge, English churchman and anti-Catholic conspirator (d. 1680)  November 15   Henry Mordaunt, 2nd Earl of Peterborough (d. 1697)  Cornelis Geelvinck, Dutch mayor (d. 1689)  December 3 – Bohuslav Balbín, Czech writer and Jesuit (d. 1688)  December 10 – Christian Albert, Burgrave and Count of Dohna, German nobleman and general (d. 1677)  December 12 –
Richard Allestree, English churchman and provost of Eton College (d. 1681)   Deaths   January 28 –
1, 2, 3, 4: By area:1. Asia2. Africa3. North America4. this continent
South America
Americas   Moxos ceases to be a significant religious area in South America (approximate date).
3
Events   By place   Roman Empire   Tiberius, under order of Augustus, quells revolts in Germania (1–5).
Asia   Confucius is given his first royal title (posthumous name) of Lord Baochengxun Ni.
Heraios succeeds him as king.
30 SOMETHING: Youngest age at which you can be sworn in for the U.S. Senate
30
__NOTOC__ Year 30 (XXX) was a common year starting on Sunday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
1
The Kushan Empire is founded (approximate date).
NEW YORK STATE: Chittenango holds an annual 4-day OZFest for this man born there in 1856 & no, Ozzy isn't that old
L. Frank Baum
Sir Joseph Ward, 17th Prime Minister of New Zealand (d. 1930)  April 27 – Tongzhi Emperor of China (d. 1875) thumb|110px|right|Sigmund Freud  May 6  Sigmund Freud, Austrian neurologist (d. 1939)  Robert Peary, American Arctic explorer (d. 1920)  May 15 – L. Frank Baum, American author, poet, playwright, actor and independent filmmaker (The Wizard of Oz) (d. 1919)  May 25 – Louis Franchet d'Espèrey, French general (d. 1942)  June 14 – Andrey Markov, Russian mathematician (d. 1922)  June 29 – Maria Cederschiöld, Swedish journalist   (d. 1935)
3
Costa Rican troops rout Walker's soldiers in Battle of Santa Rosa.
April 16 –
Thaddeus William Harris, American naturalist (b. 1795)  January 31 – Khedrup Gyatso, 11th Dalai Lama (b. 1838)  February 4 – Anna Gottlieb, operatic soprano (b. 1774)  February 17 –
FEMINISM: In 1836 the Grimke sisters pioneered women's right to speak in public when they flounced around denouncing this
slavery
It allows slavery, requires free blacks to petition Congress to live in the country, but prohibits import of slaves from anywhere but the United States.
3
The United States Patent Office burns in Washington, D.C.  December 26 –
The New Board brokerage group is founded in New York City.
William Jackson Palmer, founder of Colorado Springs, Colorado (d. 1909)  September 26 – Thomas Crapper, English plumber and inventor (d. 1910)  September 30 – Remigio Morales Bermúdez, Peruvian politician, 56th President of Peru (d. 1894)  October 4 – Piet Cronjé, Boer general (d. 1911)  October 5 – Enomoto Takeaki, Japanese samurai and admiral (d. 1908)  October 15 – James Tissot, French artist (d. 1902)  November 11 – Thomas Bailey Aldrich, American poet and novelist (d. 1907)  November 18 W. S. Gilbert, British playwright and librettist best known for his collaborations with Arthur Sullivan (d. 1911) Máximo Gómez, Cuban military leader (d. 1905) Ding Ruchang, Chinese army officer and admiral (d. 1895)  December 18 –
IN THE NEWS: Launched in 2004, a spacecraft named MESSENGER is on a mission to study this planet
Mercury
NASA's MESSENGER is launched (it is captured into Mercury's orbit on March 18, 2011).
3
The U.S.-led coalition occupying Iraq transfers sovereignty to an Iraqi Interim Government.
September 3 – Russian forces end the siege at a school in Beslan, Northern Ossetia; 334 people are killed and at least 700 people injured.
Sune Bergström, Swedish biochemist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1916)  August 17 – Gérard Souzay, French baritone (b. 1918)  August 18 –
THE MIDDLE AGES: Some say the Dark Ages began when Byzantine Emperor Justinian closed this city's school of philosophy in 529 A.D.
Athens
By topic    Education   The Academy founded at Athens by Plato in about 387 BC closes down by order of Justinian I on charges of un-Christian activity.
3
Southeast Asia  Rudravarman granted investiture by China as the first king of the fourth dynasty of Champa (modern Vietnam).
The Canons of the Council of Orange are established, approving the  Augustinian doctrine of sin and grace over Pelagianism and Semi-Pelagianism, but without Augustine's absolute predestination.
Births   Wen Xuan Di, emperor of Northern Qi (d. 559)   Deaths   Baderic, king of the Thuringii (b. c. 480)  Theodosius the Cenobiarch, monk and founder of the Monastery of St. Theodosius  Yuan Hao, imperial prince of Northern Wei   References
1798: In Thomas Malthus' "Essay on the Principle of" this, he links it with food supply
Population
Date unknown   The first (anonymous) publication occurs of An Essay on the Principle of Population by Thomas Malthus.
3
April 12 – Helvetic Republic, a French client republic, proclaimed following collapse of the Old Swiss Confederacy on French invasion.
Auguste Comte, French sociologist (d. 1857)  January 20 –
Nikolaus Poda von Neuhaus, German entomologist (b. 1723)  May 19 – William Byron, 5th Baron Byron, English dueler (b. 1722)
THE MEDITERRANEAN ISLE WHERE...: The Knights Hospitaller reigned until 1798
Malta
June 12   The French take Malta.
3
Unitarian Democrat Pieter Vreede makes an end to the power of the parliament (with a conservative-moderate majority).
July–December
August 22 – French troops land at Kilcummin in County Mayo to assist the Irish rebellion.
MESSAGE IN A BATTLE: The English crushed the Highland clans at Culloden Moor in 1746; message to this would-be king: Stop pretending!
Bonnie Prince Charlie
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June   January 8 – Bonnie Prince Charlie occupies Stirling.
3
Royal Colony of North Carolina Governor Gabriel Johnston moves to the province's largest and most prosperous city of New Bern.
Tadeusz Kościuszko, Polish general and nationalist (d. 1817)  February 5 –
July 28 – John Peter Zenger, American printer (b. 1697)  August 6 – Christian VI, King of Denmark and Norway (b. 1699)  October 2 – Josiah Burchett, English Secretary of the Admiralty (b. c. 1666)  November 14 –
IN GOD WE TRUST: It follows "America" in the name of an airline that went into the sunset in 2005
West
A time bomb explodes in a Muslim shrine in Quetta, southwestern Pakistan, killing at least 29 people and wounding 40.
3
Three U.S. Navy SEALs, 16 American Special Operations Forces soldiers, and an unknown number of Taliban insurgents are killed during Operation Red Wings, a failed counter-insurgent mission in Kunar Province, Afghanistan.
August 18 –
September 30 –
THE 21st CENTURY WITH CNN: (I'm Anderson Cooper, anchor of A.C. 360.)  In 2005, this craft put the Space Shuttle program back in flight after Columbia's tragedy 2 years earlier
Discovery
2005 was designated as: The Year of the Volunteer by the UK government The World Year of Physics by the International Union of Pure and Applied Physics The Year of Cork City, Ireland, as European Capital of Culture The Year of the Veteran in Canada The Year of Discovery International Year for Sport and Physical Education International Year of Microcredit  The year 2005 was the end of the International Decade of the World's Indigenous People (1995–2005).
3
March 3  Millionaire Steve Fossett breaks a world record by completing the fastest non-stop, non-refueled, solo flight around the world in the Virgin Atlantic GlobalFlyer.
The Pakistan Army opens fire on insurgents in Balochistan, in the first armed uprising since General Rahimuddin Khan's stabilization of the province in 1978.
The Spanish Parliament votes by a margin of 187 votes to 147 to legalize same-sex marriage in Spain, becoming the fourth country to do so.
THE 11th CENTURY: Canute the Great forced this country's Olaf into exile in 1028 & put his own son on the throne
Norway
Cnut becomes King of Norway   Byzantine Empire   November 12 –
2
__NOTOC__ Year 1028 (MXXVIII) was a leap year starting on Monday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Events   By place   Europe   April 14 – Henry III, son of Conrad II, is elected king of the Germans.
POPULAR SCIENCE TOP STORIES OF 2003: This scientist, a model for Dr. Strangelove, passed away in September at age 95
Edward Teller
Bob Hope, English-born American comedian and actor (b. 1903)  July 30 – Sam Phillips, American record producer (b. 1923)  August thumb|120px|Armand Borel thumb|120px|Idi Amin thumb|120px|Charles Bronson  August 1 – Marie Trintignant, French actress (b. 1962)  August 4  Frederick Chapman Robbins, American pediatrician and virologist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1916)  Brian Trueman, English musician (b. 1930)  August 9 – Gregory Hines, African-American dancer and actor (b. 1946)  August 11 – Armand Borel, Swiss mathematician (b. 1923)  August 14 – Helmut Rahn, German footballer (b. 1929)  August 16 – Idi Amin, Ugandan dictator (b. 1924)  August 19  Sérgio Vieira de Mello, Brazilian diplomat (b. 1948)  Carlos Roberto Reina, President of Honduras (b. 1926)  August 22 – Imperio Argentina, Argentinian singer and actress (b. 1906)  August 23 – Jack Dyer, Australian football player, coach, and commentator (b. 1913)  August 29 – Vladimír Vašíček, Czech painter (b. 1919)  August 30 – Charles Bronson, American actor (b. 1921)  September thumb|120px|John Ritter thumb|120px|Johnny Cash  September 1  Terry Frost, English artist (b. 1915)  John Gould, American humorist, essayist, and columnist (b. 1908)  September 6 – Harry Goz, American actor (b. 1932)  September 7 – Warren Zevon, American singer (b. 1947)  September 8 – Leni Riefenstahl, German film director (b. 1902)  September 9  Larry Hovis, American actor (b. 1936)  Edward Teller, Hungarian-born physicist (b. 1908)  September 11  Anna Lindh, Swedish Minister of Foreign Affairs (b. 1957)  John Ritter, American actor (b. 1948)  September 12 – Johnny Cash, American singer-songwriter and actor (b. 1932)  September 13 –
3
September 15 –
Richard Crenna, American actor (Marooned) (b. 1926)  January 20 –
March 29 – Carlo Urbani, Italian physician (b. 1956)  March 30 – Michael Jeter, American actor (b. 1952)  April thumb|120px|Nina Simone thumb|120px|Wim van Est  April 1 – Leslie Cheung, Hong Kong singer and actor (b. 1956)  April 2 –
WORLD FACTS: This country's ADF sent troops to the Solomon Islands in 2006 to help restore order following riots
Australia
A scramjet jet engine, HyShot III, designed to fly at 7 times the speed of sound, is successfully tested at Woomera, South Australia.
2
November 15 –
January 21 – Ibrahim Rugova, first President of Kosovo (b. 1944)  January 24 –
COME UP TO THE LAB: (Kelly of the Clue Crew shines a flashlight through a prism and the beam is redirected onto a different wall.) The prism refraction experiment that I'm reenacting was first conducted in a laboratory by this man in 1666
Isaac Newton
According to manuscripts, Isaac Newton witnessed the falling of an apple on this day which led him to discover gravity.
3
Second Anglo-Dutch War –
Edmund Calamy the Elder, English Presbyterian leader (b. 1600)  October 29 –
James Shirley, English dramatist (b. 1596)  December 9 –
ALTHING: Formed in 930 A.D., the Althing of this country is one of the oldest legislative assemblies in the world
Iceland
Events   By place   Europe   With the establishment of the Althing, now one of the world's oldest parliaments, the Icelandic Commonwealth is founded.
3
During the siege he was persuaded to revolt against Asfar by letters from Makan and the Sallarid who both promised him aid.
With the help of the sons of the Sallarid he took Shirzad by surprise and killed him together with twenty-nine chiefs of the Varudavand, the tribe of Asfar.
Prince Bei, elder brother of the Khitan Emperor, leaves for China.
MISSING BODY PARTS: This lord protector's body was once buried in Westminster Abbey; it's believed his head is buried in Cambridge
Oliver Cromwell
In 1643 control of the town was given by Parliament to Oliver Cromwell, who had been educated at the University's Sidney Sussex College.
3
Owing to its low lying, inland, and easterly position within the British Isles, summer temperatures tend to be somewhat higher than areas further west, and often rival or even exceed those recorded in the London area.
Cambridge Eagles Rugby League team competed in the National Conference League East Section, but played their home games outside the city in Sawston.
The band's former songwriter, guitarist and vocalist Syd Barrett was born and lived in the city, and he and another founding member, Roger Waters, went to school together at Cambridgeshire High School for Boys.
NATIONAL HISTORIC SITES: The only college listed as a National Historic Site, it was founded by Booker T. Washington
Tuskegee
His base was the Tuskegee Institute, a historically black college in Alabama.
3
After 1909, Washington was criticized by the leaders of the new NAACP, especially W. E. B. Du Bois, who demanded a stronger tone of protest for advancement of civil rights needs.
The Rosenwald Fund helped support the construction and operation of more than 5,000 schools and supporting resources for the betterment of blacks throughout the South in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
Washington also helped with the Progressive Era by forming the National Negro Business League.
FOR THE BIRDS: 100 of these European birds were released in Central Park in 1890; today, there are 200 million in North America
starlings
Central Park was the site of the misguided unleashing of European starlings in North America, a native of Eurasia which has become an invasive species.
3
They also designed Brooklyn's Prospect Park.
There are two versions of how the Central Park Cleopatra's Needle made its way to Central Park: either it was a gift from the Khedive of Egypt, Isma'il Pasha, or it was stolen through the machinations of William H. Vanderbilt who paid the tab to have the obelisk shipped to New York and erected.
The city denied application for a permit, stating that such a mass gathering would be harmful to the grass and that such damage would make it harder to collect private donations to maintain the park.
CLEOPATRA: About 70 feet high each, one of these obelisks is in Central Park, another by the Thames River
Cleopatra's Needle
Attractions  Visitor attractions Visitor attractions include:   Arsenal  Belvedere Castle  Bethesda Terrace and Fountain  Blockhouse  Burnett Memorial Fountain  Carousel  Delacorte Theater  Diana Ross Playground  Fort Clinton  Lasker Rink  Mall  Marionette Theatre  McGowan's Pass  McGown's Pass Tavern  Rumsey Playfield  Tavern on the Green  Victorian Gardens  Wollman Rink  Zoo  Art and architecture  Sculptures  thumb|left|200px|Cleopatra's Needle, Central Park, carved c. 1450 B.C. for Thutmose III, hieroglyphs inscribed c. 1250 B.C. for Rameses II A total of 29 sculptures by sculptors such as Augustus Saint-Gaudens, Emma Stebbins, and John Quincy Adams Ward have been erected over the years, most donated by individuals or organizations.
3
The Lake was the last of Central Park's bodies of water to be renovated by the Central Park Conservancy, in a project to enhance both its ecological"Its increasing significance as a wildlife habitat" was noted on the Conservancy's on-site information boards.
Mammals:  Raccoon (Procyon lotor): nocturnal tree dwellers that come down to ground level to feed at night, have become extremely common in Central Park in recent years, prompting the Parks Department to post rabies warnings around certain areas.
Central Park, 1857-1995: The Birth, Decline, and Renewal of a National Treasure.
IF IT'S TUESDAY...: If it's Kayobi in Kyoto, you're speaking this language
Japanese
Name  thumb|18th century map with the Japanese capital "Meaco" thumb|Kyoto, main street, 1891 In Japanese, the city has been called Kyō (), Miyako (), or Kyō no Miyako ().
3
Kyoto became a city designated by government ordinance on September 1, 1956.
This interior positioning results in hot summers and cold winters.
Bicycles parked in non-permitted areas are impounded.
DYNO-"ITE": One of the USA's most honored TV journalists, he was at CBS for more than 50 years
Walter Cronkite
The broadcast was renamed the CBS Evening News when Walter Cronkite replaced Edwards in 1962.
3
Barnouw, Tower, p. 242
CBS's radio programming after 1972 The retirement of Arthur Godfrey in April 1972 marked the end of long-form programming on CBS radio; programming thereafter consisted of hourly news summaries and news features, known in the 1970s as Dimension, and commentaries, including the Spectrum series that evolved into the "Point/Counterpoint" feature on the television network's 60 Minutes and First Line Report, a news and analysis feature delivered by CBS correspondents.
Two days later, CBS stated that appearing in the ad violated Batiste's contract with the network, which was terminated as a result.
TRAVEL EUROPE: The Viennese summerhouse in which Mozart composed "The Magic Flute" is now in this city, his birthplace
Salzburg
The first recording of The Magic Flute was of a live performance at the 1937 Salzburg Festival, with Arturo Toscanini conducting the Vienna Philharmonic and Vienna State Opera.
3
Monostatos and Papageno are each terrified by the other's strange appearance and both flee.
Sarastro enters, with a crowd of followers.
Pamina begs Sarastro to forgive her mother and he reassures her that revenge and cruelty have no place in his domain (Aria: "").
MADONNA SONGS: An obvious title:"Hey Mister D.J., put a record on, I wanna dance with my baby"
Music
Madonna (from medieval Italian , meaning "my lady") most commonly refers to:  Madonna, Mary (mother of Jesus), a religious figure in Christianity and Islam  Madonna (entertainer) (born 1958), American singer-songwriter and producer  Madonna may also refer to:  People  Madonna, leader of 1990s gang 5T  "Madonna", nickname of American singer Joan Baez during the 1970s  Geography  Madonna, Maryland, a populated place in Maryland  Madonna di Campiglio, a comune in Trento  Madonna di Campagna, a quarter and subway station in Turin  Art, entertainment, and media Art  Madonna (art), pictorial or sculptured representations of Mary, Mother of Jesus  Madonna (Edvard Munch), a painting by the Norwegian expressionist painter Edvard Munch  Film  Madonna (1999 film) (Bogorodica), a 1999 Croatian film  Madonna (2015 film), a 2015 South Korean film  Literature  Madonna (book), a 2001 biography of the entertainer by Andrew Morton  Music Albums and EPs  Madonna (Madonna album), the singer's self-titled first album and related music video collection  Madonna (...
3
And You Will Know Us by the Trail of Dead album), a 1999 album  Madonna (EP), by South Korean band Secret  Songs
"Madonna" (Secret song), a 2011 song from the Secret EP  "Lady Madonna", a 1968 song by The Beatles  "Madonna", a 1988 song by Sparks from Interior Design  "Madonna", a 2015 song by Drake from
If You're Reading This
CHEESY INTERNATIONAL PICKUP LINES: You... me... Carnival in this city!  We party with its nearly 11 million Cariocas & of course I'll wear my Speedo
Rio de Janeiro
Rio de Janeiro's carnival is considered the world's largest, hosting approximately two million participants per day.
3
Penguin Books.
thumb|right|Donkeys of Solsona, hung in the tower bell.
The Bogotá Carnival was renewed in the 21st century.
LETTER SYMBOLISM: In 1706 William Jones made this the symbol of the ratio of a circle's circumference to its diameter
pi
Concluding that Emperor Iyasus I of Ethiopia has abdicated by retiring to a monastery, a council of high officials appoint Tekle Haymanot I Emperor of Ethiopia.
2
Sir George Pocock, British admiral (d. 1792)  January 17 –
Giovanni Battista Martini, Italian musician (d. 1784)  May 17 – Andreas Felix von Oefele, German historian and librarian (d. 1780)  May 20 – Seth Pomeroy, American gunsmith and soldier (d. 1777)  June 10 –
HEALTH & MEDICINE: When this Tudor king died in 1547 he had circulatory disorders & a leg ulcer
Henry VIII
January 28 – Edward VI succeeds his father Henry VIII as King of England.
2
Nicolaus Taurellus, German philosopher and theologian (d. 1606)  December 5 – Ubbo Emmius, Dutch historian and geographer (d. 1625)  December 15 –
Johannes Schöner, German astronomer and cartographer (b. 1477)  January 18 – Pietro Bembo, Italian cardinal and scholar (b. 1470)  January 19 –
OTHER WORKS BY HANDEL: The opera/oratorio title character Semele has the hots for Jupiter, displeasing this wife of the god
Juno
The next probe to visit the planet will be Juno, which is expected to arrive in July 2016.
3
The planet is shaped as an oblate spheroid, meaning that the diameter across its equator is longer than the diameter measured between its poles.
On September 10, 2012, another fireball was detected.
They used Jupiter's roughly 12-year orbit along the ecliptic to define the constellations of their zodiac.
CARY GRANT: Cary turned down roles opposite this leading lady in "Roman Holiday" & "Sabrina" but did act with her in "Charade"
Audrey Hepburn
In 1963, Grant appeared opposite Audrey Hepburn in Charade directed by Stanley Donen.
3
In his first year with the troupe, he performed in the Jack and the Beanstalk Christmas pantomime at Drury Lane's Theatre Royal, donning a bird mask and appearing as a stork.
As Grant later wrote, "I pretended to be somebody I wanted to be and I finally became that person.
Though sophisticated in appearance, he was often cocky and vulgar in his humour, leading Highman and Moseley to summarise him as a "tough, brash, sardonically humorous West County lad screaming to be let out".
SUPER 8: Eric Sevareid & Howard K. Smith were 2 of the 8 newsmen known as this reporter's "Boys"
Edward R. Murrow
He was one of the original Edward R. Murrow boys.
3
, for governor of California.
The endorsement was written on stationery with ABC's letterhead.
He appeared as the Narrator in the 1987 film Escape From Sobibor.
TURNS OF THE CENTURY: In 1301 the future Edward II became the first English recipient of this princely title
Prince of Wales
Edward of Caernarvon (later King Edward II of England) becomes the first Prince of Wales.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 1301 (MCCCI) was a common year starting on Sunday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
February 7 –
date unknown  Ibn Kathir, Islamic scholar (d. 1373)  Ingeborg of Norway, princess consort and regent of Sweden (d. 1361)  William Montagu, 1st Earl of Salisbury, English nobleman (d. 1344)  Ni Zan, Chinese painter (d. 1374)  Nitta Yoshisada, Japanese head of the Nitta clan (d. 1338)  Hélie de Talleyrand-Périgord, French cardinal (d. 1364)   Deaths   January 14 –
FOR OLD CRIMES' SAKE: The man who shot Alexander Hamilton in a duel was vice president under this man
Thomas Jefferson
He led the Federalist Party, created largely in support of his views; he was opposed by the Democratic-Republican Party, led by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, which despised Britain and feared that Hamilton's policies of a strong central government would weaken the American commitment to Republicanism.
3
Burr's shot, however, hit Hamilton in the lower abdomen above the right hip.
Monuments and memorials thumb|Alexander Hamilton on the Series 2004A $10 Federal Reserve Note, based on an 1805 portrait by John Trumbull thumb|The Hamilton Grange National Memorial, now located in St. Nicholas Park.
Historian Manning Marable says Hamilton "vigorously opposed the slave trade and slavery's expansion."
POPCORN COLONELS: Al Pacino played blind ex-army colonel Frank Slade in this movie
Scent of a Woman
And Justice for All (1979) and won the award in 1993 for his performance as a blind Lieutenant Colonel in Scent of a Woman (1992).
3
Pacino's performance earned him an Academy Award nomination, and offered a prime example of his early acting style, described by Halliwell's Film Guide as "intense" and "tightly clenched".
He played a publicist in People I Know, a small film that received little attention despite Pacino's well-received performance.
In Righteous Kill, Pacino and Robert De Niro co-star as New York detectives searching for a serial killer.
BRUCE ALMIGHTY: Dustin Hoffman starred as this controversial entertainer in a 1974 biopic
Lenny Bruce
Lenny was based on the life of stand-up comedian, Lenny Bruce, who died at age 40, and was notable for his open, free-style and critical form of comedy which integrated politics, religion, sex, and vulgarity.
3
The film tells the story of a married couple's divorce and its impact on everyone involved, including the couple's young son.
Stanley (Hoffman) conducts business meetings in tennis clothes or in robe and slippers," notes critic Janet Maslin.
Director Joel Hopkins notes that Hoffman was a perfectionist and self-critical: "He often wanted to try things stripped down, because less is sometimes more.
GEORGE: Asked why he wanted to climb Mount Everest, he famously responded, "Because it is there"
George Mallory
The 1924 expedition resulted in the greatest mystery on Everest to this day: George Mallory and Andrew Irvine made a final summit attempt on June 8 but never returned, sparking debate as to whether they were the first to reach the top.
3
The peak of Mount Everest extends into the upper troposphere and penetrates the stratosphere, which can expose it to the fast and freezing wind of the jet stream.
A set of climbing routes has been established over several decades of climbing expeditions to the mountain.
In Tibet (China) by April 28 it was identified that at least 25 had died and 117 were injured.
HODGEPODGE: A Buick was named for this New York City street that runs parallel to & between Fifth & Lexington
Park Avenue
Park Avenue introduced as trim/option package on Electra 225 Limited.
3
Consequently, when the Buick Century, which shared the Buick Special's smaller body, was reintroduced in 1954, it also received four VentiPorts to denote its engine's greater displacement.
During the two-tone color craze of the 1950s, it separated two different color areas.
GSX models could be ordered with 350, 455, or 455 Stage 1 engines, and were outfitted with the usual GS options such as dual hood scoop hood with functioning "ram-air" intake, and dual exhaust.
UNREAL ESTATE: Mildendo, a metropolis in this country in "Gulliver's Travels" was only 500 feet square
Lilliput
Part I: A Voyage to Lilliput 4 May 1699The Project Gutenberg eBook, Gulliver's Travels: Transcribed from the 1892 George Bell and Sons edition.
1
This book uses coarse metaphors to describe human depravity, and the Houyhnhnms are symbolised as not only perfected nature but also the emotional barrenness which Swift maintained that devotion to reason brought....
BASEBALL HALL OF FAMERS: Yogi Berra
New York Yankees
Lawrence Peter "Yogi" Berra (May 12, 1925 – September 22, 2015) was an American professional baseball catcher, manager, and coach who played 19 seasons in Major League Baseball (MLB) (1946–63, 1965), all but the last for the New York Yankees.
3
Manager and coach thumb|upright|Berra as the New York Mets' first base coach, 1969.
Players, however, said the incident actually solidified his managerial authority and helped him lead them to the Series.
Carmen Berra died on March 6, 2014, of complications from a stroke, the couple having recently celebrated their 65th anniversary.
THE MOVIES: Thandie Newton played the mysterious title role in this 1998 film based on a Toni Morrison novel
Beloved
Among her best known novels are The Bluest Eye (1970), Sula (1973), Song of Solomon (1977), and Beloved (1987).
2
Dave Mote.
Public White institutions do not need our support, they will thrive without.
CLINT EASTWOOD MOVIE QUOTES: John Quade:"Well it appears that there can't be too many guys driving around this valley with an ape"
Every Which Way But Loose
classic Clint Eastwood: fast, furious, and funny." The following year, he starred in Every Which Way But Loose in an uncharacteristic offbeat comedy role.
3
After signing, Eastwood was criticized for his stiff manner, his squint, and for hissing his lines through his teeth, a feature that would become a lifelong trademark.
Schickel, p. 471
Schickel, p. 25Eliot, p. 131
THE CINEMA: The park bench Tom Hanks sat on in much of this 1994 film was in Chippewa Square in Savannah, Georgia
Forrest Gump
He is known for his roles in Splash (1984), Big (1988), Philadelphia (1993), Forrest Gump (1994), Apollo 13 (1995), Saving Private Ryan, You've Got Mail (both 1998), The Green Mile (1999), Cast Away (2000), The Da Vinci Code (2006), Captain Phillips, and Saving Mr. Banks (both 2013), as well as for his voice work in the animated films The Polar Express (2004) and the Toy Story series.
3
Career  Early acting career (1979–85) In 1979, Hanks moved to New York City, where he made his film debut in the low-budget slasher film He Knows You're Alone (1980) and landed a starring role in the television movie Mazes and Monsters.
In Philadelphia, he played a gay lawyer with AIDS who sues his firm for discrimination.
In March 2015, Hanks appeared in the Carly Rae Jepsen music video for "I Really Like You", lip-syncing most of the song's lyrics as he goes through his daily routine.
COPPING OUT AT THE MOVIES: Reach for the sky!  In 2010 Tom Hanks returned for a third time to provide the voice of this sheriff
Woody
Later that year, Hanks starred in Disney/Pixar's computer-animated hit film Toy Story, as the voice of Sheriff Woody.
3
¶ 67.
I spent a lot of time like that, seeing Brecht, Tennessee Williams, Ibsen, and all that."
Tom Hanks endorses Obama for President, 3 May 2008  A proponent of environmentalism, Hanks is an investor in electric vehicles and owns both a Toyota RAV4 EV and the first production AC Propulsion eBox.
TOM HANKS MOVIE ROLES: Airport resident Viktor Navorski
The Terminal
Hanks is also known for his collaboration with film director Steven Spielberg on Saving Private Ryan, Catch Me If You Can (2002), The Terminal (2004), and Bridge of Spies (2015), as well as the 2001 miniseries Band of Brothers, which launched Hanks as a successful director, producer, and writer.
3
In March 2015, Hanks appeared in the Carly Rae Jepsen music video for "I Really Like You", lip-syncing most of the song's lyrics as he goes through his daily routine.
Marlon Hanks, had a minor role as a student in Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull and released a rap single in 2011.
Pfeiffer, Lee, (1996), The Films of Tom Hanks, Secaucus: New Jersey, ISBN 978-0-8065-1717-9  Salamon, Julie, (1991), The Devil's Candy: The Bonfire of the Vanities Goes to Hollywood, Boston, ISBN 978-0-385-30824-3  Trakin, Roy, (1995), Tom Hanks: Journey to Stardom, ISBN 978-0-312-95596-0  Wallner, Rosemary, (1994), Tom Hanks: Academy Award-Winning Actor, Edina: Minnesota  External links         Category:1956 births Category:Living people Category:20th-century American male actors Category:21st-century American male actors Category:American film producers Category:American male film actors Category:American male television actors Category:American male voice actors Category:American people of English descent Category:American people of German descent Category:American people of Portuguese descent Category:American male screenwriters Category:Best Actor Academy Award winners Category:Best Actor Empire Award winners Category:Best Drama Actor Golden Globe (film) winners Category:Best Musical or Comedy Actor Golden Globe (film) winners Category:California Democrats Category:California State University, Sacramento alumni Category:Chabot College alumni Category:Converts to Eastern Orthodoxy from Catholicism Category:Greek Orthodox Christians from the United States Category:Film directors from California Category:Former Roman Catholics Category:Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture Screen Actors Guild Award winners Category:Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Screen Actors Guild Award winners Category:People from Concord, California Category:Primetime Emmy Award winners Category:Silver Bear for Best Actor winners Category:Space advocates Category:Writers from Los Angeles, California
STREET SMARTS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew reports from a New York City street.) At the heart of Midtown, you'll find this street that became a Billy Joel album title
52nd Street
The Stranger and 52nd Street  Columbia Records introduced Joel to Phil Ramone, who would produce all of Joel's studio albums from The Stranger (1977) to The Bridge (1986).
3
In 1963, when ZIP codes were assigned, the section of Levittown in Oyster Bay was given a Hicksville, New York ZIP code and has since been part of Hicksville.
All were commercial failures.
Interview with Yetnikoff.
MEL GIBSON: TORTURED THESPIAN: "Revenge" isn't quite the right word for this '99 pic where, when it comes to Mel's torture, let's say "The toes knows"
Payback
He then starred in Ransom, Conspiracy Theory, Lethal Weapon 4, and Payback.
3
I just like telling stories.
The New Yorker.
Grobel, Lawrence.
HISTORIC NAMES: A silent movie title includes the last name of this 18th c. statesman & favorite of Catherine the Great
Grigori Alexandrovich Potemkin
Richard Pipes, Russia under the old regime, page 135  After her affair with her lover and adviser Grigori Alexandrovich Potemkin ended in 1776, he allegedly selected a candidate-lover for her who had the physical beauty and mental faculties to hold her interest (such as Alexander Dmitriev-Mamonov).
3
After the death of the Empress Elizabeth on 5 January 1762 (OS: 25 December 1761), Peter succeeded to the throne as Emperor Peter III, and Catherine became empress consort.
This was only a minuscule number of people compared to the size of the Russian population.
Catherine did initiate some changes to serfdom, though.
WORLD RELIGION: Michael Flatley could be challenged by Nataraja, a Hindu cosmic being whose name means this in Sanskrit
Lord of the Dance
thumb|A 10th century Chola dynasty bronze sculpture of Shiva, the Lord of the Dance at the Los Angeles County Museum of Art.
3
> nadam(dance).
Nataraja is a visual interpretation of Brahman and a dance posture of Lord Shiva.
The metaphor of the cosmic dance thus unifies ancient mythology, religious art and modern physics.
FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE: "Thus spoke" this man, also called Zoroaster, the hero of one of Nietzsche's greatest books
Zarathustra
Zoroaster ( or , from Greek  Zōroastrēs), also known as Zarathustra (;  (Zaraθuštra);  Zartosht,  Zardosht), or as Zarathushtra Spitama, was the founder of Zoroastrianism.
3
The Old Avestan language of the Gathas (which are attributed to the founder himself) is still very close to the Sanskrit of the Rigveda.
--> Citing the authority of the 8th-century al-Kalbi, the 9th- and 10th-century Sunni historian al-Tabari (i.648)Qtd. in .
Mirza Tahir Ahmad, the fourth Caliph of the Ahmadiyya Muslim Community, in his book Revelation, Rationality, Knowledge & Truth views Zoroaster as Prophet of God and describes such the expressions to be a concept which is similar to the concepts in Judaism, Christianity and Islam.
PLUTO: NEVER FORGET!: To the dismay of its fans everywhere, in 2006 Pluto was reclassified as this type of planet
a dwarf planet
thumb|280px|Mosaic of best-resolution images of Pluto from different angles  Pluto (minor-planet designation: 134340 Pluto) is a dwarf planet in the Kuiper belt, a ring of bodies beyond Neptune.
3
On July 14, 2015, the New Horizons spacecraft became the first spacecraft to fly by Pluto.
Each member of the Lowell Observatory was allowed to vote on a short-list of three:
Stern's contention was that, by the terms of the new definition, Earth, Mars, Jupiter, and Neptune, all of which share their orbits with asteroids, would be excluded.
SOLAR SYSTEM TOUR: Guess how big this biggest moon of Saturn is -- scientists don't know because of haze around it
Titan
Titan, Saturn's largest moon, and the second-largest in the Solar System, is larger than the planet Mercury, although less massive, and is the only moon in the Solar System to have a substantial atmosphere.
2
The visible features on Saturn rotate at different rates depending on latitude and multiple rotation periods have been assigned to various regions (as in Jupiter's case).
In 1675, Cassini discovered the gap now known as the Cassini Division.
GREEK MYTHOLOGY: Like father like son--Cronus deposed his father Uranus & this god deposed his father Cronus
Zeus
Name  Uranus is named after the ancient Greek deity of the sky Uranus (), the father of Cronus (Saturn) and grandfather of Zeus (Jupiter), which in Latin became "Ūranus".
3
The average field at the surface is 0.23 gauss (23 µT).
Besides the large-scale banded structure, Voyager 2 observed ten small bright clouds, most lying several degrees to the north from the collar.
At the equator winds are retrograde, which means that they blow in the reverse direction to the planetary rotation.
ARTISTS: Raphael, Titian & da Vinci are considered masters of the period known as the "High" this
Renaissance
known as Raphael (, ), was an Italian painter and architect of the High Renaissance.
2
After his death, the influence of his great rival Michelangelo was more widespread until the 18th and 19th centuries, when Raphael's more serene and harmonious qualities were again regarded as the highest models.
The excellency of this extraordinary man lay in the propriety, beauty, and majesty of his characters, his judicious contrivance of his composition, correctness of drawing, purity of taste, and the skilful accommodation of other men’s conceptions to his own purpose.
WORLD HISTORY: Later the namesake of an African country, he served as prime minister of Cape Colony from 1890 to 1896
Cecil Rhodes
However, the discovery of diamonds around Kimberley and gold in the Transvaal led to a return to instability, particularly because they fuelled the rise to power of the ambitious imperialist Cecil Rhodes.
3
The fact that executive power remained completely in the authority of the British governor did not relieve tensions in the colony between its eastern and western sections.
New York: St. Martin's Press.
ISBN 0-86486-435-3.
SEE THE U.S.A.: Tennessee Williams lived in this Florida city for decades, & a fine arts center there is named for him
Key West
To stimulate his writing he moved often, to various cities including New York, New Orleans, Key West, Rome, Barcelona, and London.
3
Cambridge, Massachusetts: Da Capo Press, 1997, p. 171
His last play went through many drafts as he was trying to reconcile what would be the end of his life.
Not About Nightingales (1938)  Battle of Angels (1940)  I Rise in Flame, Cried the Phoenix (1941)  You Touched Me (1945)
BATTLES: England's King Harold II lost the all-important Battle of Hastings in this year
1066
The Battle of Hastings was fought on 14 October 1066 between the Norman-French army of Duke William II of Normandy and an English army under the Anglo-Saxon King Harold Godwinson, beginning the Norman conquest of England.
3
55–57
94–95
In 1976 the estate was put up for sale and purchased by the government with the aid of some American donors who wished to honour the 200th anniversary of American independence.
NEW YORK CITY: It's the only borough not connected to Manhattan by a bridge
Staten Island
Adjacent counties  Bergen County, New Jersey — west and northwest  Hudson County, New Jersey — west and southwest  The Bronx — north and northeast  Queens — east  Kings County (Brooklyn) — south and southeast  Richmond County (Staten Island) — southwest  National protected areas  African Burial Ground National Monument  Castle Clinton National Monument  Federal Hall National Memorial  General Grant National Memorial  Governors Island National Monument  Hamilton Grange National Memorial  Lower East Side Tenement National Historic Site  Statue of Liberty National Monument (part)  Theodore Roosevelt Birthplace National Historic Site  Neighborhoods  Manhattan's many neighborhoods are not named according to any particular convention.
3
Hermalyn, Gary and Ultan, Lloyd.
Some 20,000 workers crafted the topography to create the English-style pastoral landscape Olmsted and Vaux sought to create.
"It is at a triangular site where Broadway and Fifth Avenue—the two most important streets of New York—meet at Madison Square, and because of the juxtaposition of the streets and the park across the street, there was a wind-tunnel effect here.
ROCK LYRICS: Chuck Berry told this composer to "Roll Over" & "Tell Tchaikovsky the News"
Beethoven
With songs such as "Maybellene" (1955), "Roll Over Beethoven" (1956), "Rock and Roll Music" (1957) and "Johnny B. Goode" (1958), Berry refined and developed rhythm and blues into the major elements that made rock and roll distinctive, with lyrics focusing on teen life and consumerism and utilizing guitar solos and showmanship that would be a major influence on subsequent rock music.
3
By the end of the 1950s, Berry was a high-profile established star with several hit records and film appearances to his name, as well as a lucrative touring career.
In 1986, Taylor Hackford made a documentary film, Hail!
Hail!
COMIC GENIUSES: Dudley Moore was part of this famous show & later parodied its title with "Behind the Fridge"
"Beyond the Fringe"
For The Birds – Cleo Laine and Dudley Moore, (CBS A 2947)  The Theme From "Beyond The Fringe" and All That Jazz, (Collectibles COL 6625)  Live From an Aircraft Hangar (Martine Avenue Productions MAPI 8486)  Songs Without Words, 1991 (GRP/BMG LC 6713)  The First Orchestrations – Dudley Moore and Richard Rodney Bennett, – played by John Bassett and his Band, (Harkit Records HRKCD 8054)  Jazz Jubilee, (Martine Avenue Productions MAPI 1521)  The Dudley Moore Trio at Sydney Town Hall, 2 May 1978 (with Peter Morgan, Bass & Chris Karan, Drums)
3
The film was not a success critically or financially.
Opting to concentrate on the piano, he enlisted Fruchter as an artistic partner.
He played the piano whenever he was there.
OPERETTAS: This composers "Die Fledermaus" was first performed in Vienna in 1874
Johann Strauss
(The Bat) is an operetta composed by Johann Strauss II to a German libretto by  and Richard Genée.
3
At this point Haffner's translation was handed over for adaptation to Richard Genée, who subsequently claimed not only that he had made a fresh translation from scratch but that he had never even met Haffner.
Falke, Eisenstein's friend, arrives to invite him to the ball (Duet: "Come with me to the souper").
(Finale, drinking song: "Happy is he who forgets" followed by Rosalinde’s defence when Frank arrives: "In tête-à-tête with me so late," and Frank’s invitation: "My beautiful, large bird-cage.")  Act 2 A summer house in the Villa Orlovsky  It turns out that Falke, with Prince Orlofsky's permission, is orchestrating the ball as a way of getting revenge on Eisenstein.
"PHIL" IN THE ____: By nationality, the guy in the foreground in the Biblical illustration seen here is a ____ :(David and Goliath)
Philistine
thumb|David and Goliath, a colour lithograph by Osmar Schindler (c. 1888)  Goliath () (; Arabic: جالوت, Ǧālūt (Qur'anic term), جليات Ǧulyāt (Christian term)) or Goliath of Gath (one of five city states of the Philistines) was a giant Philistine warrior defeated by the young David, the future king of Israel, in the Bible's Books of Samuel (1 Samuel 17).
3
Compare 1 Samuel 16:1, "I will send you to Jesse the Bethlehemite (beit-ha’lahmi), for I have found among his sons a king for me."
(The 1960 Italian film David and Goliath starring Orson Welles was not one of these, since that movie was a straightforward adaptation of the Biblical story).
"used for describing a situation in which a small person or organization defeats a much larger one in a surprising way" It is arguably the most famous underdog story.
SAINTS: Saint Adalbert, the "Apostle of the Prussians", became bishop of this Czech capital in 982
Prague
By topic    Religion   Adalbert becomes Bishop of Prague.
2
Asia   Yelu Longxu becomes the sixth emperor of the Liao Dynasty.
The Buyid ruler, 'Adud al-Dawla, establishes what was soon to become the most important hospital of Baghdad.
MINER CLASSICS: This "colorful" Richard Llewellyn novel set in a Welsh mining community was made into a 1941 Oscar-winning film
How Green Was My Valley
Themes Several of his novels dealt with a Welsh theme, the best-known being How Green Was My Valley (1939), which won international acclaim and was made into a classic Hollywood film.
3
Only after his death was it discovered that his claim that he was born in St. Davids, West Wales, was false.
Llewellyn , Richard , 1906-1983What appears to be his birth certificate gives his name as Richard Herbert V Lloyd, see http://www.freebmd.org.uk  In the U.S., Llewellyn won the National Book Award for favourite novel of 1940, voted by members of the American Booksellers Association."Books and Authors", The New York Times, 16 February 1941, page BR12.
Chez Pavan (1959)  Up into the Singing Mountain (1960)  A Man in a Mirror (1964)  Sweet Morn of Judas' Day (1965)  Down Where the Moon is Small (1966)  Bride of Israel My Love (1973)  Hill of Many Dreams (1974)  Green, Green My Valley Now (1975)  At Sunrise, the Rough Music (1976)  Tell Me Now and Again (1977)  A Night of Bright Stars (1979)  I Stand on a Quiet Shore (1982)  Edmund Trothe series  End of the Rug (1969)  But We Didn't Get the Fox (1970)  White Horse to Banbury Cross (1972)  The Night is a Child (1974)   Notes   Category:1906 births Category:1983 deaths Category:Welsh culture Category:Anglo-Welsh novelists Category:National Book Award winners Category:20th-century British novelists Category:British male novelists
OLD KING: The XII Swedish king of this name led & won many battles in the 18th century's "Great Northern War"
Charles
Charles XII led the Swedish army.
1
Since Russian galley fleet was not able to raid the Swedish coast, with exception of Umeå which was plundered on 18 September, fleet supported the advance of the Russian army which led to hastily withdrawal of the Swedish army from Raahe (Brahestad) to Tornio (Torneå).
MYTHOLOGICAL WOMEN: In Egyptian mythology, she was the mother of Horus, the sky god
Isis
The most commonly encountered family relationship describes Horus as the son of Isis and Osiris, and he plays a key role in the Osiris myth as Osiris's heir and the rival to Set, the murderer of Osiris.
3
New York: Oxford University Press, USA.
Horus and the pharaoh Pyramid texts ca.
The Horus falcon is shown upon a standard on the predynastic Hunters Palette in the "lion hunt".
HOT FILMS, COOL FILMS: George Kennedy won an Oscar in part for beating the heck out of Paul Newman in this movie
Cool Hand Luke
Major films Newman starred in Exodus (1960), The Hustler (1961), Hud (1963), Harper (1966), Hombre (1967), Cool Hand Luke (1967), The Towering Inferno (1974), Slap Shot (1977), and The Verdict (1982).
3
The film was a box office failure and the actor would later acknowledge his disdain for it.
The original camp has expanded to become several Hole in the Wall Camps in the U.S., Ireland, France, and Israel.
Supporting Actor - Motion PictureNominated—Southeastern Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting ActorNominated—Toronto Film Critics Association Award for Best Supporting ActorNominated—Utah Film Critics Association Award for Best
ON THE COAST: A 19th c. "Committee of Vigilance" fought the crime that gave part of San Francisco this North Africa-inspired nickname
the Barbary Coast
With hordes of fortune seekers streaming through the city, lawlessness was common, and the Barbary Coast section of town gained notoriety as a haven for criminals, prostitution, and gambling."The miners came in forty-nine, /
3
San Francisco became a consolidated city-county in 1856.
Urban planning projects in the 1950s and 1960s involved widespread destruction and redevelopment of west-side neighborhoods and the construction of new freeways, of which only a series of short segments were built before being halted by citizen-led opposition.
SF Greasecycle is a program to recycle used cooking oil for conversion to biodiesel.
A FAIR TO REMEMBER: The International Exposition Bureau didn't recognize the NYC World's Fair of this year; it was too soon after Seattle 1962
1964
The theme of the 1939 fair was "Building the World of Tomorrow"; at the 1964–65 New York World's Fair, it was "Peace Through Understanding"; at the 1967 International and Universal Exposition in Montreal, it was "Man and His World".
3
1958: In Brussels, the Atomium still stands at the exposition site.
Epcot has many of the characteristics of a typical universal exposition: national pavilions, as well as exhibits concerning technology and/or the future, along with more typical amusement park rides.
In 2007, a Vancouver, British Columbia based group (Expo 17 Inc) publicly unveiled a 51-page proposal to stage a sustainable "hybrid" expo in Montreal, consisting of an expo approved and recognized by the BIE, a horticultural expo, and a housing expo.
BILLIE HOLIDAY: In 1933 John Hammond signed her to this record company that shares its name with a state capital
Columbia
Throughout the 1930s and 1940s, Holiday booked mainstream success with labels such as Columbia Records and Decca Records.
3
Down Beat magazine declared Holiday and Basie the winners.
During the trial, Holiday heard that her lawyer would not come to the trial to represent her. "
Billieholidaysongs.com.
FROM FRANCE: Fames Socialist Eugene V. Debs was named for 2 socially conscious French authors: Eugene Sue & this man
Victor Hugo
Debs was named after the French authors Eugene Sue and Victor Hugo.
3
Biography   Early life   Eugene Debs was born on November 5, 1855, in Terre Haute, Indiana, to Jean Daniel and Marguerite Mari Bettrich Debs, who both immigrated to the United States from Colmar, Alsace, France.
17 (1893) | Vol.
New York: International Publishers, 1948.
AMERICANA: He wrote "The Tell-Tale Heart" when he lived in Philadelphia & a brick house he rented there is an historic site
Edgar Allan Poe
Other historic sites include homes for Edgar Allan Poe, Betsy Ross, and Thaddeus Kosciuszko, early government buildings like the First and Second Banks of the United States, Fort Mifflin, and the Gloria Dei (Old Swedes') Church.
3
In 1793, the largest yellow fever epidemics in U.S. history killed at least 4,000 and up to 5,000 people in Philadelphia, roughly 10% of the city's population.
thumb|right|Italian Market, representing South Philadelphia's Italian heritage.
All but Fitzpatrick are Democrats.
WHERE AM I?: (Kelly of the Clue Crew rides the Maid of the Mist.)  I'm north of the border at Niagara Falls, shared by the United States & this Canadian province
Ontario
Gahnawehtaˀ or Tgahnawęhtaˀ) is the collective name for three waterfalls that straddle the international border between Canada and the United States; more specifically, between the province of Ontario and the state of New York.
2
Altogether  of the Horseshoe Falls was eliminated, including  on the Canadian side.
115–117.
____ AND ____: In 1956 Audrey Hepburn played Natasha Rostov in a nearly 3 1/2 hour film version of this book
War and Peace
thumb|left|Audrey Hepburn in War and Peace (1956)
3
In 1942, Hepburn's uncle, Otto van Limburg Stirum (husband of her mother's older sister, Miesje), was executed in retaliation for an act of sabotage by the resistance movement, while Hepburn's half brother Ian was deported to Berlin to work in a German labour camp.
In 1979, Hepburn took the lead role of Elizabeth Roffe in the international production of Bloodline, re-teaming with director Terence Young (Wait Until Dark).
thumb|Hepburn in Breakfast at Tiffany's (1961) Italian shoe designer Salvatore Ferragamo created a shoe for her and made her ambassador of his fashion house while honouring her in a 1999 exhibition dedicated to the actress titled Audrey Hepburn, a woman, the style.
CELEBRITY SPOUSES: Mrs. Antonio Banderas
Melanie Griffith
Banderas' debut as a director was the poorly received Crazy in Alabama (1999), starring his now ex-wife Melanie Griffith.
3
, that helped spur him on to Hollywood.
In June 2014, Griffith and Banderas released a statement announcing their intention to divorce "in a loving and friendly manner".http://www.abc.net.au/news/2014-06-07/griffith-banderas-announce-loving-and-friendly-divorce/5507558
Shrek Forever
ALBUMS: The soundtrack of this 1988 U2 film included "Angel of Harlem", recorded at Memphis' famed Sun Studios
Rattle and Hum
The Joshua Tree and Rattle and Hum (1986–90)   For their fifth album, The Joshua Tree,so named as a "tribute" to, rather than a "metaphor" for, America (McCormick (2006), p. 186) the band wanted to build on The Unforgettable Fires textures, but instead of out-of-focus experimentation, they sought a harder-hitting sound within the limitation of conventional song structures.
3
Hot Press magazine was influential in shaping the band's future; in May, Paul McGuinness, who had earlier been introduced to the band by the publication's journalist Bill Graham, agreed to be U2's manager.
The first was written about the Troubles in Northern Ireland,McCormick (2006), pp.
In 2006, all four members of the band received ASCAP awards for writing the songs, "I Still Haven't Found
TRAVEL & TOURISM: Sand on the floor of the Virgin Islands' St. Thomas Synagogue commemorates the Israelites' escape from this country
Egypt
The Hebrew Bible etymologizes the name as from yisra "to prevail over" or "to struggle/wrestle with", and el, "God, the divine".Scherman, Rabbi Nosson (editor), The Chumash, The Artscroll Series, Mesorah Publications, LTD, 2006, pages 176–77Kaplan, Aryeh, "Jewish Meditation", Schocken Books, New York, 1985, page 125  The name "Israel" first appears in non-biblical sources c. 1209 BCE, in an inscription of the Egyptian pharaoh Merneptah.
3
Creation Texts in Some Eighth Century Prophets, BRILL, 2003 pp.110-121, esp.144.
Josephus, Antiquities of the Jews XVIII.7.2.
Moses smashes the two tablets and grinds the golden calf into dust, then throws the dust into a stream of water flowing out of Mount Sinai, and forces the Israelites to drink from it.
WHERE HAVE YOU BEEN ALL MY LIFE?: President of Yale, then baseball commissioner ruling on Pete Rose
A. Bartlett Giamatti
http://www.ew.com/ew/article/0,,317951,00.html National League president A. Bartlett Giamatti suspended Rose for 30 days, which was the longest suspension ever levied for an on-field incident involving a manager.
3
He was a member of the Order of DeMolay as a young boy, and was encouraged by his parents to participate in sports.
The streak started quietly, but by the time it had reached 30 games, the media took notice and a pool of reporters accompanied Rose and the Reds to every game.
In a 1996 settlement of the lawsuit, Rose acknowledged that Rubio was his daughter.
CITY OF THE DAY: MILWAUKEE: The high culture of a 19th century immigrant group got Milwaukee the nickname "Deutsche Athen", meaning this
the German Athens
“’The German Athens’ Milwaukee and the Accommodation of Its Immigrants 1836-1860.
3
By 1850, there were seventy-five Poles in Milwaukee County and the US Census indicates that they had a variety of occupations: grocers, blacksmiths, tavernkeepers, coopers, butchers, broommakers, shoemakers, draymen, laborers, and farmers.
Calling I-beams thumb|Discovery World  The Milwaukee Public Museum has been Milwaukee's primary natural history and human history museum for 125 years, with over  of permanent exhibits.
It teaches visitors about the Great Lakes and Wisconsin's maritime history.
CHARITY BEGINS WITH BEER: Besides making light beer, this Milwaukee-based brewery gives the "Tools for Success" to small colleges
Miller
Known for its brewing traditions, major new additions to the city include the Milwaukee Riverwalk, the Wisconsin Center, Miller Park, an internationally renowned addition to the Milwaukee Art Museum, Milwaukee Repertory Theater, and Pier Wisconsin, as well as major renovations to the UW–Milwaukee Panther Arena.
2
Kindergarten was created as a pre-school for children, and sports programs of all levels, as well as music and art were incorporated as elements of the regular school curriculum.
This onshore flow causes cooler temperatures to move inland usually , with much warmer conditions persisting further inland.
HISTORIC LEADERS' LETTERS TO SANTA: "...& one last thing.  If a Spaniard ever topples my rule as the 9th Aztec emperor, I'd like but one thing...revenge!"
Montezuma
Two of the primary architects of the Aztec empire were the half-brothers Tlacaelel and Montezuma I, nephews of Itzcoatl.
3
Dumbarton Oaks, Washington, DC  Although the form of government is often referred to as an empire, in fact most areas within the empire were organized as city-states, known as altepetl in Nahuatl.
To the Mexicas, the Toltecs were the originators of all culture; "Toltecayōtl" was a synonym for culture.
”
HISTORICAL WHAT WERE THEY THINKING?: Note to this Aztec ruler who thought Cortes might be Quetzalcoatl--if he can't spell Quetzalcoatl, he's probably not
Montezuma
Two of the primary architects of the Aztec empire were the half-brothers Tlacaelel and Montezuma I, nephews of Itzcoatl.
3
It was never a true territorial empire controlling a territory by large military garrisons in conquered provinces, but rather controlled its client states primarily by installing friendly rulers in conquered cities, by constructing marriage alliances between the ruling dynasties, and by extending an imperial ideology to its client states.
They were a very efficient agricultural system and could provide up to seven crops a year.
ISBN 0-8061-3144-6.
ARCHITECTURE: Michael Graves designed whimsical Swan & Dolphin Hotels for this Florida theme park's resort area
Walt Disney World
He built many buildings for the Walt Disney Company, including the company headquarters in Burbank, California, Disney's Hotel New York at Disneyland Paris, and the Swan and Dolphin resorts at Walt Disney World.
3
Personal life Graves was born in Indianapolis, Indiana.
The celebrated but controversial building, composed of municipal offices, is subject to an ongoing preservation debate.
After Graves became paralyzed, his use of a wheelchair turned him into a "reluctant health expert", with an increased awareness of accessible design.
FROZEN IN STONE: This country owns the island (Easter Island) where you'll find the guy seen here
Chile
Easter Island (, ) is a Chilean  island in the southeastern Pacific Ocean, at the southeasternmost point of the Polynesian Triangle.
3
However, there are two words pronounced pito in Rapa Nui, one meaning 'end' and one 'navel', and the phrase can thus also mean "the Navel of the World".
Tourism slowed down and private property was restored.
The Polynesian rat, which the original settlers brought with them, played a very important role in the disappearance of the Rapanui palm.
"V" SHALL SEE: Mr. Spock's home planet
Vulcan
Spock's mixed human-Vulcan heritage serves as an important plot element in many of the character's appearances.
2
Star Trek: The Next Generation Spock appears in "Unification" (1991), a two-part episode of Star Trek: The Next Generation.
The pain and inconvenience were so great that when producer Robert H. Justman jokingly proposed plastic surgery, Nimoy momentarily considered doing so.
COLLEGE FOOTBALL: This Dallas bowl game has been played at the same site consecutively longer than any other major bowl game
Cotton Bowl
The Red River Shootout, which pits the University of Texas at Austin against The University of Oklahoma at the Cotton Bowl also brings significant crowds to the city.
3
Swampland and wetlands separating it from South Dallas will in the future be part of the Great Trinity Forest, a subsection of the city's Trinity River Project which is planned to restore and preserve wetlands, newly appreciated for habitat and flood control.
The Church built the Dallas Texas Temple, the first temple in Texas, in the city in 1984.
The Highlands School, a PK–12 Legionary school, is just west of the UD campus and connects to campus by jogging trails.
LOUISIANA: In New Orleans you can jazz things up aboard the steamboat Natchez for a jazz cruise along this river
the Mississippi
Hurricane on the BayouDavid Billings, "New Orleans: A Choice Between Destruction and Reparations", The Fellowship of Reconciliation, November/December 2005Bring New Orleans BackSpike Lee offers his take on Hurricane Katrina, by Damian Dovarganes, Associated Press, July 14, 2006  New Orleans is located in southeastern Louisiana, straddling the Mississippi River.
3
In 1889, the legislature passed a constitutional amendment incorporating a "grandfather clause" that effectively disfranchised freedmen as well as the propertied people of color free before the war.
Most streets in this area fan out from a central point in the city.
The associated levee failures flooded the Mid-City facility storing the red streetcars which normally run on the Riverfront and Canal Street lines.
CHOCOLATEY QUOTES: His play "Arms And The Man" includes the line "Oh, you are a very poor soldier:  a chocolate cream soldier!"
George Bernard Shaw
Arms and the Man is a comedy by George Bernard Shaw, whose title comes from the opening words of Virgil's Aeneid, in Latin: Arma virumque cano ("Of arms and the man I sing").
3
One night, a  Swiss mercenary soldier in the Serbian army, Captain Bluntschli, climbs in through her bedroom balcony window and threatens to shoot Raina if she gives the alarm.
Louka then tells Sergius that Bluntschli is the man whom Raina protected and that Raina is really in love with him.
A second BBC audio version was produced in 1984 and broadcast on BBC Radio 7 in February 2009 starring Andrew Sachs as Captain Bluntschli and Gary Bond as Major Saranoff.
EUROPEAN RIVERS: The largest port on this river is Le Havre
the Seine
Le Havre (; ) is an urban French commune and city in the Seine-Maritime department in the Normandy region of north-western France.
3
It works in partnership with other higher education institutions (INSA Rouen, IEP, IUFM, and Normandy University).
Monseigneur Michel Saudreau, its first bishop, was ordained on 22 September 1974.
The plot of Une maison soufflée aux vents (A house blown to the winds) by Emile Danoën, winner of the Popular Novel Prize in 1951, and its sequel Idylle dans un quartier muré (Idyll in a walled neighbourhood) were located in Le Havre during the Second World War.
JOHN TRAVOLTA FILMS: John was really a "drag" in this 2007 film in which he played Edna Turnblad, a role first made famous by Divine
Hairspray
His acting career declined through the 1980s, but enjoyed a resurgence in the 1990s with his role in Pulp Fiction (1994), and he has since starred in films such as Face/Off (1997), Swordfish (2001), Wild Hogs and Hairspray (both 2007).
2
He then moved to Los Angeles to further his career in show business.
Downturn thumb|left|upright|Travolta in 1983 After Urban Cowboy, Travolta starred in a series of financial and critical failures that sidelined his acting career.
FROM STAGE TO SCREEN: This big bouffant Broadway show became a 2007 film starring a big bouffant John Travolta
Hairspray
His acting career declined through the 1980s, but enjoyed a resurgence in the 1990s with his role in Pulp Fiction (1994), and he has since starred in films such as Face/Off (1997), Swordfish (2001), Wild Hogs and Hairspray (both 2007).
3
In May 2012, an anonymous masseur filed a lawsuit against Travolta citing claims of sexual assault and battery.
Travolta's counsel also stated that his client would be able to prove that he was not in California on the day in question and asserted that Travolta would "sue the attorney and Plaintiff for malicious prosecution" after getting the case thrown out.
"Razzamatazz" 1978
OUR NATION'S CAPITAL: Kids roll eggs across the White House lawn on the Monday after this holiday
Easter
The Portuguese and the Greek (Eastern Orthodox Church) name for Monday reflects this, as do all the days' names except Saturday and Sunday: the Portuguese word for Monday is segunda-feira and the Greek word is Δευτέρα "devtéra" (second in order).
2
Etymology thumb|A depiction of Máni, the personified moon, and his sister Sól, the personified sun, from Norse mythology (1895) by Lorenz Frølich The English noun Monday derived sometime before 1200 from monedæi, which itself developed from Old English (around 1000) mōnandæg and mōndæg (literally meaning "moon's day"), which has cognates in other Germanic languages, including Old Frisian mōnadeig, Middle Low German and Middle Dutch mānendag, mānendach (modern Dutch Maandag), Old High German mānetag (modern German Montag), and Old Norse mánadagr (Swedish and Norwegian nynorsk måndag, Icelandic mánudagur.
Monday in different languages See the main article Week-day names.
SAX: Charlie Parker took the instrument to new heights playing this style of jazz he helped invent
bebop
Parker was a highly influential jazz soloist and a leading figure in the development of bebop, a form of jazz characterized by fast tempos, virtuosic technique and improvisation.
3
This, and the shortened form "Bird", continued to be used for the rest of his life, inspiring the titles of a number of Parker compositions, such as "Yardbird Suite", "Ornithology", "Bird Gets the Worm", and "Bird of Paradise".
By A Soloist First Recordings!
Since 1972, the Californian ensemble Supersax harmonized many of Parker's improvisations for a five-piece saxophone section.
OFFICIAL STATE DINOSAURS & FOSSILS: The Triceratops found in this state's Black Hills won official fossil status
South Dakota
Triceratops remains have subsequently been found in the American states of Montana and South Dakota (in addition to Colorado and Wyoming), and in the Canadian provinces of Saskatchewan and Alberta.
3
Dodson, P.; Forster, C.A.; and Sampson, S.D. (2004) Ceratopsidae.
Theropods from the formation include genera of tyrannosaurids, ornithomimids, troodontids, avialans, caenagnathids, and dromaeosaurids.
By 1933, and his revision of the landmark 1907 Hatcher-Marsh-Lull monograph of all known ceratopsians, he retained his two groups and two unaffiliated species, with a third lineage of T. obtusus and T. hatcheri that was characterized by a very small nasal horn.
AMERICAN HERITAGE DICTIONARY PREFERRED PLURALS: Vertex
vertices
Vertex (Latin: peak; plural vertices or vertexes) may refer to:  Mathematics and computer science Vertex (geometry), an angle point of any shape or angle Vertex (graph theory), a node in a graph Vertex (curve), a local extreme point of curvature Vertex of a representation in finite group theory Vertex (computer graphics), a set of attributes describing a point in space  Physics Vertex (physics), a point where particles collide and interact Vertex (optics), a point where the optical axis crosses a lens surface Vertex operator algebra in conformal field theory Vertex function describing the interaction between a photon and an electron Vertex model in statistical mechanics, a discrete model of a physical system in which weights are associated with vertices of a grid graph.
2
Biology and anatomy Vertex (anatomy), the uppermost surface of the head of an arthropod or vertebrate Vertex (urinary bladder), alternative name of the apex of urinary bladder   Vertex presentation, head-first birth of a baby  Companies Vertex (company), a business services provider Vertex Pharmaceuticals, a biotech company Vertex Inc, an annuity software and business consulting company  Music A song in
In the Groove (video game) Vertex (album), an album by Buck 65 Vertex (band), a band formed in 1996   See also   Virtex (disambiguation)  Vortex (disambiguation)
WHERE AM I?: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew stands stands in front of the famous NASA Vehicle Assembly Building.)  At the Kennedy Space Center, I'm not on Cape Canaveral, but on this nearby island
Merritt Island
Known as Cape Kennedy from 1963 to 1973, it lies east of Merritt Island, separated from it by the Banana River.
3
The city of Cape Canaveral lies just south of the Port Canaveral District."Cargo Destinations Locator Map".
A Presbyterian missionary was wrecked here and lived among the Indians.
Cape Canaveral was chosen for rocket launches to take advantage of the Earth's rotation.
THAT'S COMEDY: In this 2007 movie, Eddie Murphy finds himself agonizingly married to Eddie Murphy
Norbit
Murphy has played multiple roles in Coming to America, Wes Craven's Vampire in Brooklyn, the Nutty Professor films (where he played the title role in two incarnations, plus his character's father, brother, mother, and grandmother), Bowfinger, The Adventures of Pluto Nash, Norbit, and Meet Dave.
3
In 2007, he won the Golden Globe for Best Supporting Actor and received a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for his portrayal of soul singer James "Thunder"
A notable exception to this run of poorly received adult-themed films was the Frank Oz comedy Bowfinger, also starring Steve Martin.
The film also stars Laurence Fishburne and is set to begin pre-production later this year and is supposedly from Paramount Pictures.
WORLD HISTORY: In 405 B.C. Spartan commander Lysander won the final victory over the Athenians in this war
the Peloponnesian War
Lysander ( or ; died 395 BCE, , Lýsandros) was a Spartan admiral who commanded the Spartan fleet in the Hellespont which defeated the Athenians at Aegospotami in 405 BCE.  The following year, he was able to force the Athenians to capitulate, bringing the Peloponnesian War to an end; he organized the dominion of Sparta over Greece in the last decade of his life.
3
(University of Massachusetts/Wikisource)Xenophon, Hellenica.
Lysander commanded the Spartan general Gylippus to undertake this task.
Death
LITERARY CROSSWORD CLUES "G": "Tuesday's child is full of" it(5)
grace
In the folk rhyme Monday's Child, "Tuesday's child is full of grace".
3
The same is true in the Spanish-speaking world.
1875–78.
Wissenschaftliche Buchgesellschaft, 1965.
TV OF THE FUTURE: In a series title, the name of this submarine was followed by "DSV", then by "2032"
seaQuest
Date unknown   Projected return to Earth orbit of object J002E3, the discarded S-IVB third stage of the Apollo 12 Saturn V.   In fiction   Television   The final season of the television series seaQuest DSV, retitled "seaQuest 2032", takes place in the year 2032.
2
Predicted and scheduled events   November   November 13 – Transit of Mercury.
Commercial mining begins on Mars.
GEOGRAPHY: Located on the Danube, Linz is one of this country's major ports
Austria
Linz (; ; ) is the third-largest city of Austria and capital of the state of Upper Austria ().
2
The Stadtwerkstatt is an independent association for culture and was founded in 1979.
There are currently eight different awards to be won at the Crossing Europe Film Festival in categories such as "CROSSING EUROPE Audience Award", the "FEDEORA AWARD for European Documentaries" and the "CROSSING EUROPE AWARD Local Artist".
CLASSIC CARTOON CHARACTERS: (alliterative Hanna-Barbera pooch)
Huckleberry Hound
Next, the studio had its first big hit with The Huckleberry Hound Show in 1958, a syndicated series aired in most markets just before primetime.
3
Laurence Marcus & Stephen R. Hulce (October, 2000). "Scooby Doo, Where Are You".
The 1970s New Saturday morning and prime time cartoons, programs featuring mystery-solving, crime-fighting teenagers with comical pets or mascots and many spinoffs premeried.
Some Hanna-Barbera sounds show up in various sound libraries such as Valentino and Audio Network.
GO FOR THE JUGGLER: (Sofia of the Clue Crew)  Devilstick juggling probably originated in this Asian country, where it's called wakan
China
The National Art Gallery holds a collection of works mostly by Bulgarian authors, while the National Gallery for Foreign Art displays exclusively foreign art, mostly from India, Africa, China and Europe.
3
It is ultimately derived from the Egyptian Kemetic word sbÅ (𓋴𓃀𓄿𓇼𓇳), meaning "star, door, teaching and wisdom" and attested first in the 20th century BC in the tomb of Intef I.  This was a tradition of collection of wise literature, shared between Mediterranean cultures, which was called sophia (σοφία)  in Greek.
After the conquest of the Bulgarian capital Preslav by Sviatoslav I of Kiev and John I Tzimiskes' armies in 970-971, the Bulgarian Patriarch Damyan chose Sofia for his seat in the next year and the capital of Bulgaria was first moved to Sredets.
The Georgi Dimitrov Mausoleum, where Dimitrov's body had been preserved in a similar way to the Lenin mausoleum, was detonated in 1999.
TOP 100 NEWSPAPERS: By their names, it's the frequency of The News in Dayton & The Oklahoman in Oklahoma City
daily
Climate  Oklahoma City has a humid subtropical climate (Köppen: Cfa), with frequent variations in weather daily and seasonally, except during the consistently hot and humid summer months.
2
Oklahoma Christian University, one of the state's private liberal arts institutions, is located just south of the Edmond border, inside the Oklahoma City limits.
Oklahoma Fast Facts and Trivia.
18th CENTURY NOVELS: Oliver Goldsmith described the vicar of this place as "a priest, an husbandman, and the father of a family"
Wakefield
Oliver Goldsmith (10 November 1728 – 4 April 1774) was an Anglo-Irish novelist, playwright and poet, who is best known for his novel The Vicar of Wakefield (1766), his pastoral poem The Deserted Village (1770), and his plays
3
The Good-Natur'd Man (1768) and She Stoops to Conquer (1771, first performed in 1773).
He was graduated in 1749 as a Bachelor of Arts, but without the discipline or distinction that might have gained him entry to a profession in the church or the law; his education seemed to have given him mainly a taste for fine clothes, playing cards, singing Irish airs and playing the flute.
Goldsmith was described by contemporaries as prone to envy, a congenial but impetuous and disorganised personality who once planned to emigrate to America but failed because he missed his ship.
MUSEUMS: The Pima Air & Space Museum in Tucson has a replica of this 1903 Wright Brothers airplane
The Flyer
The Flyer cost less than a thousand dollars, in contrast to more than $50,000 in government funds given to Samuel Langley for his man-carrying Great Aerodrome.
3
Their altitude was about  above the ground.
IBN Editore, 1993.
Stick and Rudder: An Explanation of the Art of Flying.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: James Bay, in Ontario & Quebec, is the southern arm of this larger bay
Hudson Bay
James Bay (, ) is a large body of water on the southern end of Hudson Bay in Canada.
2
Built between 1974 and 1996, the James Bay Project now has a combined generating capacity of 16,021 MW and produces about 83,000,000,000 kWh of electricity each year, about half of Quebec's consumption.
The most common access point for paddlers to this area is Moosonee, at the southern end of James Bay.
IT'S GEOGRAPHIC: Darien is both a mountain range & a province of this country; it's also the former name of the whole isthmus
Panama
Darien may refer to:  Places  Panama Darién Gap, border area between Panama and Colombia Darien scheme, the 17th century failed Scottish colony there Darién National Park Darién Province Gulf of Darién Santa María la Antigua del Darién, town in the present-day Chocó Department of Colombia, founded in 1510 "a peak in Darien", referred to by John Keats in his 1816 poem "On First Looking into Chapman's Homer"  United States Darien, Connecticut Darien, Georgia Darien, Illinois Darien, New York Darien, Wisconsin Darien (town), Wisconsin  People  First name Darien Angadi (1949–1984), British actor Darien Boswell (born 1938), New Zealand rower Darien Brockington (born 1979), American singer Darien Fenton (born 1954), New Zealand politician Darien Ferrer (born 1983), Cuban volleyball player Darien Graham-Smith (born 1975), British journalist Darien Sills-Evans (born 1974), American actor Darien Niamir (born 1990), Canadian Scientist  Surname Georges Darien (1862–1921), French writer  Ships , a turbo-electric refrigerated cargo ship Darien II, World War II refugee ship  Fiction Camila Darién, fictional character in the Mexican television series Pasión Darien Lambert, fictional character in the television series Time Trax (1993-1994) Darien Fawkes, fictional character in the television series The Invisible Man (2000-2002) Darien Maugrim, fictional character in The Fionavar Tapestry novels by Guy Gavriel Kay
1
Darien is a masculine name; variants include Darian and Darion.
COSMOPOLITAN: The Postal Museum in Vaduz, this principality's capital, is a must-visit for stamp collectors
Liechtenstein
thumb|View of Vaduz from space Vaduz (;  or ) is the capital of Liechtenstein and also the seat of the national parliament.
2
Economy and transport Vaduz has a lively tourist industry, despite being one of the very few capital cities in the world without an airport or railway station.
It could take 2 hours by train and 2.30 hours by car.
COURT APPOINTEES: The first to hold this lifetime appointment in England was John Dryden in 1668
Poet Laureate
thumb|upright=1.3|John Dryden by John Michael Wright, 1668 (detail), National Portrait Gallery, London John Dryden (;  – ) was an English poet, literary critic, translator, and playwright who was made Poet Laureate in 1668.
3
In 1650 Dryden went up to Trinity College, Cambridge.
Thus, little is known of the intimate side of his marriage.
by David Hopkins (London: Everyman Paperbacks, 1998)  John Dryden Selected Poems, ed.
EXPLOSIVE MUSIC: In his song "Russians," he wondered "How can I save my little boy from Oppenheimer's deadly toy?"
Sting
Translations into other languages often do not distinguish these two groups.
3
Over a million Russian-speaking immigrants live in Israel,. Haaretz.com.
136,000, or 10 percent of the total population, remain without citizenship.
(2000), "The Genetic Legacy of Paleolithic Homo sapiens sapiens in Extant Europeans: A Y Chromosome Perspective" and in parts of India.
LOUIS, LOUIS: The middle name of this Art Nouveau glasswork artist was Comfort
Tiffany
Hector Guimard's Paris Métro entrances, for example, provided the term Style Métro, the popularity in Italy of Art Nouveau designs from London's Liberty & Co department store resulted in its being known as the Stile Liberty ("Liberty style"), and, in the United States, it became known as the "Tiffany style" due to its association with Louis Comfort Tiffany.
3
Origins thumb|left|upright0.1|Art Nouveau interior at the 1900 Paris Universal Exhibition by Bruno Möhring, German pavilion.
Besides being adopted by artists like Emile Gallé and James Abbott McNeill Whistler, Japanese-inspired art and design was championed by the businessmen Siegfried Bing and Arthur Lasenby Liberty at their storesBefore opening the Maison de l'Art Nouveau, Bing managed a shop specialising in items from Japan; after 1888 he promoted Japanism with his magazine La Japon
1902.
TRAVEL U.S.A.: Waikiki is probably the most famous beach in this U.S. state
Hawaii
Waikīkī (; Hawaiian: ) is a beachfront neighborhood of Honolulu, on the south shore of the island of Oahu, in Hawaii, United States.
3
The beach is actually fairly short, with half of it marked off for surfers.
The project restored the beach to its 1985 shoreline.
NTT DoCoMo also has limited operations here for the convenience of Japanese tourists.
FEMMES FATALES: Ludwig I's infatuation with the dancer Lola Montez helped ensure his loss of this German kingdom
Bavaria
Marie Dolores Eliza Rosanna Gilbert, Countess of LandsfeldBurr, C. Chauncey, Autobiography and lectures of Lola Montez, James Blackwood, London (1860) at Google Books (17 February 1821 – 17 January 1861), better known by the stage name Lola Montez, was an Irish dancer and actress who became famous as a "Spanish dancer", courtesan, and mistress of King Ludwig I of Bavaria, who made her Countess of Landsfeld.
3
After performing in various European capitals, she settled in Paris, where she was accepted in the rather Bohemian literary society of the time, being acquainted with Alexandre Dumas, père, with whom she was rumoured to have had a dalliance.
Next day, the Argus thundered that her performance was 'utterly subversive to all ideas of public morality'.
Trestle Theatre Company created a production titled Lola about the life of Lola Montez.
'80s ROCK: Title of a 1985 Bruce Springsteen hit, or a book about him by Dave Marsh
"Glory Days"
Although the recordings of the E Street Band were shelved, other songs from these sessions would later be released, including "Born in the U.S.A." and "Glory Days".
3
It was recorded with a large ensemble of musicians including only Patti Scialfa, Soozie Tyrell, and The Miami Horns from past efforts.
During this tour, Springsteen and the band made their first real foray in the world of music festivals, headlining nights at the Pinkpop Festival in the Netherlands, Festival des Vieilles Charrues in France, the Bonnaroo Music Festival in the United States and the Glastonbury Festival and Hard Rock Calling in the UK. Several shows on the tour featured full-album presentations of Born to Run, Darkness on the Edge of Town, or Born in the U.S.A.
Born in the U.S.A.| Album of the Year |rowspan=2  |- | style="text-align:center;"|1986 |"Born in the U.S.A."
WOMEN WRITERS: Offred is this title character whose "tale" is told in a Margaret Atwood novel
The Handmaid's Tale
Atwood and science fiction  The Handmaid's Tale received the first Arthur C. Clarke Award in 1987.
3
She quickly founded a company, Unotchit Inc., to develop, produce and distribute her new technologies.
She told the Book of the Month Club: "Oryx and Crake is a speculative fiction, not a science fiction proper.
The texts are going to slumber for 100 years and then they’ll wake up, come to life again.
DRUNK ON SHAKESPEARE: "To my niece: I'll drink to her as long as there is a passage in my throat & drink in Illyria", says Sir Toby in this play
Twelfth Night
In popular culture   William Shakespeare chose a fictionalised Illyria as the setting for his play Twelfth Night.
2
The internal organization of the south Illyrian kingdoms points to imitation of their neighbouring Greek kingdoms and influence from the Greek and Hellenistic world in the growth of their urban centres..
The Roman province of Illyricum replaced the formerly independent kingdom of Illyria.
MAN MEETS TOON: James Baskett got an honorary Oscar for playing this man who sang with the animals in "Song of the South"
Uncle Remus
July 9, 1948) was an American actor known for his portrayal of Uncle Remus, singing the song "Zip-a-Dee-Doo-Dah" in the 1946 Disney feature film Song of the South.
2
Jim Korkis, "The Sad Song of the South", USA Today (accessed 24 August 2013)
AFI
MILITARY MOVIES: 1970:Rod Steiger plays Rod Steiger playing Napoleon in his most famous & last battle
Waterloo
He portrayed Napoleon Bonaparte in Waterloo (1970), a Mexican bandit in Sergio Leone's Duck, You Sucker!
3
After serving in the South Pacific Theater during World War II, he began his acting career with television roles in 1947, and went on to garner critical acclaim for his portrayal of the main character in the teleplay "Marty" (1953).
Mainstream film acclaim (1964–1969)  Shortly after Hands over the City, Steiger agreed to appear in another Italian film, Time of Indifference (1964), in which he starred opposite Claudia Cardinale and Shelley Winters.
In 1975, Steiger portrayed Italian dictator Benito Mussolini in Carlo Lizzani's Last Days of Mussolini, which received a positive critical reception.
LIFE AFTER DEATH: Eugene Atget's 1st wide recognition for photographing this capital was when Man Ray chose his work for publication
Paris
Man Ray Is Dead in Paris at 86; Dadaist Painter and Photographer", The New York Times, November 19, 1976.
2
The two married in 1946 in a double wedding with their friends Max Ernst and Dorothea Tanning.
Any reproduction of an original is motivated by necessity.
IT'S ALL YOUR FAULT: The Taupo Fault Zone on this country's North Island has produced intensive volcanic activity
New Zealand
The North Island or Te Ika-a-Māui is one of the two main islands of New Zealand, separated from the slightly larger but much less populous South Island by Cook Strait.
3
Maps, headings, tables and adjectival expressions use North Island without the.
Northland Auckland Waikato Bay of Plenty Gisborne Taranaki Manawatu-Wanganui Hawkes Bay Wellington  Cities and towns  The North Island has a larger population than the South Island with both the country's largest city, Auckland as well as the capital, Wellington at either ends of the island.
thumb|Map of the North Island showing some of its cities Urban areas of the North Island by populationUrban areaRegionPopulation ()Urban areaRegionPopulation ()1AucklandAuckland    11WanganuiManawatu-Wanganui 2WellingtonWellington    13GisborneGisborne3HamiltonWaikato    13PukekoheAuckland4TaurangaBay of Plenty   14TaupoWaikato5Napier-HastingsHawke's Bay   15MastertonWellington6Palmerston NorthManawatu-Wanganui    16LevinManawatu-Wanganui7RotoruaBay of Plenty    17WhakatāneBay of Plenty8New PlymouthTaranaki    18FeildingManawatu-Wanganui9WhangareiNorthland    19TokoroaWaikato10KapitiWellington    20HaweraTaranaki  Healthcare  Healthcare in the North Island is provided by fifteen District Health Boards (DHBs).
CITY FOLKS: In 1911 he established his reputation as a songwriter with "Alexander's Ragtime Band"
Irving Berlin
right|thumb|200px|Cover, 1911 sheet music "Alexander's Ragtime Band" is a song by Irving Berlin.
2
It might be regarded as a sequel to "Alexander and His Clarinet," which Berlin wrote with Ted Snyder in 1910.
Bob Wills put it on the c&w charts in the same decade.
GREAT BRITS: About 5' 5" in real life, he towers nearly 17 feet above his column in Trafalgar Square
Lord Nelson
Every year on the anniversary of the Battle of Trafalgar (), the Sea Cadet Corps holds a parade in honour of Admiral Lord Nelson and the British victory over the combined fleets of Spain and France at Trafalgar.
3
A number of commemorative statues and sculptures occupy the square but the Fourth Plinth, left empty since 1840, has been host to contemporary art since 1999.
The first tree was  tall, but more recently has been around .
Other Trafalgar Squares A Trafalgar Square in Stepney is recorded in Lockie's Topography of London, published in 1810.
COASTAL COMMUNITIES: Hey Jack, it was the capital of Alta California from 1775 to 1846
Monterey
These included: (a) Sebastián Vizcaíno's expedition in 1602–03 preparatory to colonization planned for 1606–07 which was cancelled in 1608; (b) plans promoted by Father Eusebio Kino who missionized the Pimería Alta from 1687 until his death in 1711, (c) plans by Juan Manuel de Oliván Rebolledo in 1715 resulting in a decree in 1716 for extension of the conquest (of Baja California) which came to nothing; (d) Juan Bautista de Anssa's proposed expedition from Sonora in 1737; (e) a plan by the Council of the Indies in 1744; (f) and the one by Don Fernando Sánchez Salvador, who researched the earlier proposals and suggested the area of the Gila and Colorado Rivers as the locale for forts or presidios preventing the French or the English from "occupying Monterey and invading the neighboring coasts of California which are at the mouth of the Carmel River."Plans for the Occupation of Upper California: A New Look at the "Dark Age" from 1602 to 1769, The Journal of San Diego History, San Diego Historical Society Quarterly, Winter 1978, Volume 24, Number 1The elusive West and the contest for empire, 1713–1763, Paul W. Mapp, Omohundro Institute of Early American History & Culture Alta California was not easily accessible from New Spain: land routes were cut off by deserts and often hostile Native populations and sea routes ran counter to the southerly currents of the distant northeastern Pacific.
3
In 1836, Mexico repealed the 1824 federalist constitution and adopted a more centralist political organization (under the Siete Leyes) that reunited Alta and Baja California in a single California Department (Departamento de las Californias).See "República Centralista (México)" in the Spanish version of Wikipedia
The change, however, had little practical effect in far-off Alta California.
In Northern California, they mainly formed new settlements further inland, especially in the Sacramento Valley, and these immigrants focused on fur-trapping and farming and kept apart from the Californios.
STAR WARS STARS: Count Dracula in several films, he plays Count Dooku in "Attack of the Clones"
Christopher Lee
Count Dooku is a fictional character from the Star Wars franchise, appearing as the primary antagonist in Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones and a supporting antagonist in Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith (portrayed by late Sir Christopher Lee), as well as a recurring antagonist in Star Wars: The Clone Wars (voiced by Corey Burton).
3
After an army of Jedi and clone troopers rescue Obi-Wan, Anakin Skywalker and Padmé, they chase Dooku.
Star Wars: The Clone Wars In the 2008 CGI film Star Wars: The Clone Wars, Count Dooku plots to bring Jabba the Hutt into the folds of the Confederacy by enlisting Jabba's uncle Ziro the Hutt to kidnap Jabba's son Rotta.
Sidious forces Dooku to clean up their trail.
FRENCH LITERATURE: In 1943 this aviator created "The Little Prince"; a year later, his plane disappeared during a mission
Antoine de Saint Exupery
A Talk With Antoine de Saint Exupery: The French Poet, Pilot and Philosopher Describes His Methods of Work, The New York Times, January 19, 1941, p. BR2.
3
I'm all right.
It examined both the novella's New York origins and Saint-Exupéry's creative processes, looking at his story and paintings as they evolved from conceptual germ form into progressively more refined versions, and finally into the book's highly polished first edition.
The Little Prince (Collector's Library), BookDepository.co.uk website.
SPORTS NICKNAMES: Muhammad Ali used this superlative as the title of his 1975 autobiography
"The Greatest"
Nicknamed "The Greatest", Ali was involved in several historic boxing matches.
3
After Ali's title defense against Zora Folley on March 22, he was stripped of his title due to his refusal to be drafted to army service.
In 1963, he released an album of spoken word on Columbia Records titled I Am the Greatest.
From Muhammad Ali.
MERE SMITHS: This actress gives Lisa Simpson her distinctive voice
Yeardley Smith
Voiced by Yeardley Smith, Lisa first appeared on television in The Tracey Ullman Show short "Good Night" on April 19, 1987.
3
The vertical line continues outside of the circle to create one hair point, with two more added towards the back of her head.
Lisa Simpson is the kind of child we not only want our children to be, but also the kind of child we want all children to be.
Still, Smith considers her work on the show a success.
LANDMARKS FOR SALE: Sure, it's 1,815 feet tall, but its elevators can rise at 20 feet per second!  You'll be home in Toronto in no time!
the CN Tower
Toronto is well known for its skyscrapers and high-rise buildings, in particular the tallest free-standing structure in the Western Hemisphere, the CN Tower.
3
As it had been for Upper Canada from 1793, Toronto became the capital of the province of Ontario after its official creation in 1867, the seat of government located at the Ontario Legislature located at Queen's Park.
The Distillery District contains the largest and best-preserved collection of Victorian industrial architecture in North America.
As well, most engage in fundraising to promote research, services and public awareness.
BRUCE WILLIS: The title of the third film in this series starring Bruce Willis as cop John McClane added "With A Vengeance"
Die Hard
He is perhaps best known for his role of John McClane in the Die Hard series, which were critical and financial successes.
2
The film was both a commercial and critical success and helped to increase interest in his acting career.
In Ocean's Twelve (2004), he makes a cameo appearance as himself.
I'M ON CLOUD "NINE": In this comedy, dentist Matthew Perry meets up with hitman Bruce Willis
The Whole Nine Yards
Also in 2000, Willis played Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski in The Whole Nine Yards alongside Matthew Perry.
3
In spite of that, Willis chose not to renew his contract with the company when he decided to stop drinking alcohol in 1988.
Cybill Shepherd wrote in her 2000 autobiography, Cybill Disobedience, that Willis was angry at Director, because the character was written as a "neurotic, petulant actor."
Nominated for a Golden Globe for Best Supporting Actor for In Country 1994:
HUSBAND & WIFE: Bruce Willis can toast her with a demitasse when they celebrate their tenth anniversary November 21, 1997
Demi Moore
He married actress Demi Moore in 1987 and they had three daughters, including Rumer, before their divorce in 2000.
3
These first three installments in the Die Hard series grossed over US$700 million internationally and propelled Willis to the first rank of Hollywood action stars.
Willis was slated to play U.S. Army general William R. Peers in director Oliver Stone's Pinkville, a drama about the investigation of the 1968 My Lai Massacre.
I try to improve my work every time."
TOUGH FACTS: Spanky was part of "Our Gang" & Jiang Qing, Mao's widow, was part of this gang
The Gang of Four
Before Mao's death, the Gang of Four maintained control of many of China's political institutions, including the media and propaganda.
3
Her birth name was Lǐ Shūméng ().
Jiang supported criticism of the film for celebrating counter-revolutionary ideas.
Jiang Qing maintained that all she had done was to defend Chairman Mao.
A COMMUNIST PLOT: His mausoleum in Red Square was designed by Alexei Shchusev in 1930
Lenin
Three square gates existed on this side of the wall, which in the 17th century, were known as: Konstantino-Eleninsky, Spassky, Nikolsky (owing their names to the icons of Constantine and Helen, the Savior and St. Nicholas which hung over them).
3
Red Square () is a city square (plaza) in Moscow, Russia.
The Tsar Cannon was located on the platform of the Lobnoye mesto.
Red Square was considered a sacred place.
FUN WITH COLORS: Coach Scotty Bowman led this team to the NHL's Stanley Cup series 3 times in the 1990s, winning the title twice
Detroit Red Wings
NHL takes over   thumb|right|After winning the Cup, players traditionally skate around holding the trophy above their heads, as Pavel Datsyuk of the Detroit Red Wings does here when that team captured their 11th cup in 2008  The WHL folded in 1926, leaving the NHL as the only league left competing for the Cup.
3
Some traditions by fans include the Calgary "C of Red", and the "Winnipeg White Out".
In April of that year, his elder brother Edward Stanley, 15th Earl of Derby died, and Stanley succeeded him as the 16th Earl of Derby.
Clubs engraved their team names, usually in the form "TEAM NAME" "YEAR WON", on that one ring until it was full in 1902.
MARTIAL ARTISTS: He's been "Above the Law", "Marked for Death", "Hard to Kill" & "Out for Justice"
Steven Seagal
The film stars Steven Seagal as John Hatcher, a former DEA troubleshooter.
3
John arrests one of Screwface's henchmen as the gunfight ends.
The next day, John discovers a strange symbol engraved on a carpet, and with the help of Jamaican voodoo and gang expert Leslie, a detective for the Chicago Police Department, he learns that it is an African blood symbol used to mark their crimes.
Upon returning in Chicago, John displays Screwface's severed head to the Jamaican Posse to get them to end their crimes and leave.
THE GOOD BOOK: In Egypt this young Hebrew slave was owned by Potiphar, captain of the royal guards
Joseph
thumb|right|300px|Joseph and Potiphar's Wife, by Guido Reni 1630 thumb|right|220px|Joseph Accused by Potiphar's Wife, by Rembrandt van Rijn, 1655.
2
In the John Sayles film Matewan, Will Oldham plays a young minister boy who preaches the story of Potiphar to his small town.
In John Keats' poem, "On Fame", Keats calls Fame "Sister-in-law to jealous Potiphar".
GIRLS IN SONG: In various songs, she was a hit for Jimmy Clanton, Shocking Blue, Bananarama, and Frankie Avalon
Venus
Their biggest hit, "Venus", went to No. 1 on the Billboard Hot 100 in February 1970, and the band had sold 13.5 million discs by 1973, but the group disbanded in 1974.
3
It sold over one million copies there by January 1970, and received a gold record awarded by the Recording Industry Association of America.
The official music of Mark Six 1972 Live in Japan (Pink Elephant) 1972 Attila (Pink Elephant) also known as Rock
In The Sea (Japanese title) 1972 Eve and the Apple (Same as Attila with one different track, Polydor) 1973 Dream on Dreamer (Polydor) 1973 Ham (Same as Dream On Dreamer, but with 3 different songs and 6 alternate versions, Pink Elephant) 1974 Good Times (Pink Elephant)  Singles  Year Title US UK AUS NED NOR GER FRA NZ BEL JPN 1967 Love is in The Air / Fix Your Hair Darling - - - - - - - - - - 1968 Lucy Brown is Back in Town / Fix Your Hair Darling - - - 21 - - - - - - 1968
HISTORY SPEAKS!: (Napoleon)  My army defeated a combined Austrian-Russian force at this Czech town on December 2, 1805
Austerlitz
Napoleon shattered this coalition with decisive victories in the Ulm Campaign and a historic triumph at the Battle of Austerlitz, which led to the elimination of the Holy Roman Empire.
3
Napoleon dominated European affairs for over a decade while leading France against a series of coalitions in the Napoleonic Wars.
Napoleon asserted the army would follow him, and Ney replied the army would follow its generals.
Poulos 2000
LITERARY HODGEPODGE: "A Child's Christmas in Wales" by this Welsh poet was published in 1955, 2 years after his death
Dylan Thomas
At the same time the post war period saw the emergence of one of the most notable and popular Welsh writers of the 20th century; Dylan Thomas one of the most innovative poets of his time.
3
Consequently, the Assembly is now able to make laws, known as Acts of the Assembly, on all matters in the subject areas, without needing the UK Parliament's agreement.
Feral goats can be found in Snowdonia.
Davies (2008), p. 532.
COMPUTERAMA: The last name of Charles, who built a precursor to the computer, the analytical engine, in the early 1800s
Babbage
Former Jean-Baptiste Bernadotte, Marshal of France Infante Carlos, Count of Molina (1788–1855) Charles, Count Léon (1806–1881), illegitimate son of Emperor Napoleon I of France and Catherine Eléonore Denuelle de la Plaigne Charles III, Prince of Monaco (1818–1889) founder of the casino in Monte Carlo Infante Carlos, Count of Montemolin (1818–1861) Charles I of Romania (1839–1914) first ruler of the Hohenzollern-Sigmaringen dynasty Carlos, Duke of Madrid (1848–1909) Charles I of Portugal (1863–1908), second to last King of Portugal and Algarves from 1889 to 1908 Charles I of Austria (1887–1922), Emperor of Austria Charles II of Romania (1893-1853) eldest son of Ferdinand I Charles XV of Sweden (1826–1872), king of Sweden, the eldest son of King Oscar I and Josephine of Leuchtenberg Prince Charles of Belgium (1903–1983), second son of King Albert I of Belgium and Queen Elizabeth Archduke Karl Pius of Austria, Prince of Tuscany (1909–1953) Carlos Hugo, Duke of Parma (1930–2010) Juan Carlos I of Spain (b. 1938) former King of Spain Charles, Prince of Wales (b. 1948),  eldest son of Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh  Scientists   Name DescriptionCharles Babbage English mathematician, philosopher, mechanical engineer and computer scientistCharles L. Bennett American astrophysicistCharles Thomas Bolton astronomer who proved the existence of black holesCharles Darwin British naturalistCharles Dawson English archaeologist, involved in the Piltdown Man hoaxCharles Fleming (ornithologist)
3
American congressman and ambassador, grandson of John AdamsCharles Edward Bennett Democratic U.S. Congressman from FloridaCharles Bent first Governor of New Mexico Territory, assassinated in 1847Charles Joseph Bonaparte former U. S. Attorney GeneralCharles Bradlaugh British political activist and militant atheist, founder of the National Secular SocietyCharles Carroll of Carrollton last living signer of the Declaration of Independence (died 1832)Charles Colson U.S. President Nixon's Chief Counsel, involved in the Watergate scandalCharles Magill Conrad former American Secretary of WarCharles Curtis 31st American Vice President, under Herbert HooverCharles G. Dawes 30th American Vice President, under Calvin CoolidgeCharles Devens former U.S. Attorney GeneralCharles de Gaulle French military leader and statesmanJames Charles Evers civil rights activist, older brother of Medgar EversCharles W. Fairbanks 26th American Vice President, under Theodore RooseveltCharles A. Ford American diplomatCharles B. Peatross  politician and judge of the state circuit court in Shreveport, LouisianaCharles Gibbs (Alberta politician) Canadian politician Charles Harper (Mayor) Australian politician Charles Evans Hughes former U.S. Secretary of StateCharles Humphreys Pennsylvania delegate to Continental Congress; refused to sign Declaration of Independence due to his Quaker beliefsChuck Larson current (2008) U.S. ambassador to LatviaCharles Lee (Attorney General) former U. S. Attorney GeneralCharles Mathias (1922–2010) American politicianKarolos Papoulias President of the Hellenic Republic (Greece)Charles Stewart Parnell Irish political leaderCharles Pearson former Solicitor for The City of London and early railway advocateChuck Robb former Governor of Virginia & U.S. SenatorCharlie Rose (congressman) American congressman (Democrat from N.C.)Charles Scott (governor of Kentucky) also George Washington's Chief of Intelligence during the American RevolutionCharles Harding Smith Irish politicianCharles G. Taylor former president of LiberiaCharles Thomson secretary of the Continental CongressCharles Wilson (Texas politician) Texas congressman, subject of 2007 movie Charlie Wilson's War  In religion Saints  There are a number of historical figures known as "Saint Charles", although few are recognized across confessions.
Other Saints of the Roman Catholic Church, canonized after 1900: 1904: Saint Charles Garnier (1606–1649), French Jesuit missionary and martyr 1959: Saint Charles of Sezze (1616–1670) was a Franciscan lay brother.
church leaders  Charles Wesley (1707–1788), co-founder of the Methodist Church Charles Grandison Finney (1792–1875), a leader of the Second Great Awakening in America Charles W. Penrose (1832–1925), leader in The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints Charles Haddon Spurgeon (1834–1892), Reformed Baptist preacher Charles Harrison Mason (1866-1961), Pentecostal preacher and founder of the Church of God in Christ  Nobility See #History above for medieval and early modern royalty and nobility.
OOPS!: In 1542 Jacques Cartier returned to France with fool's gold & quartz, thinking them real gold & these gems
Diamonds
The men also began collecting what they believed to be diamonds and gold, but which upon return to France were discovered to be merely quartz crystals and iron pyrites, respectively — which gave rise to a French expression: "faux comme les diamants du Canada" ("As false as Canadian diamonds").
3
Jacques Cartier set sail for a second voyage on May 19 of the following year with three ships, 110 men, and his two Iroquoian captives.
The Iroquoians no longer made friendly visits or peddled fish and game, but prowled about in a sinister manner.
Its rediscovery has been hailed by archaeologists as the most important find in Canada since the L'Anse aux Meadows rediscovery.
WOMEN'S FIRSTS: Formerly mayor of San Juan, in 2001 Sila Calderon became the first woman governor of this U.S. commonwealth
Puerto Rico
In English, the name most commonly refers to the Puerto Rico's capital city of San Juan, Puerto Rico, or to the various professional sports teams that represent the city.
2
It can also be the short version of San Juan Bautista (John the Baptist).
Other topics that share the name include:    Locations   Argentina   San Juan Province, Argentina  San Juan, Argentina, the capital of that province  San Juan (Iruya), a small village in the Iruya Department of the Salta Province  San Juan River (Argentina), a river in San Juan province   Chile   San Juan de la Costa, commune of Chile   Colombia   San Juan de Arama, a town and municipality in Meta Department  San Juan de Rioseco, a town and municipality in Cundinamarca Department  San Juan del Cesar, town and municipality in La Guajira Department   Costa Rica   San Juan, Costa Rica, in the San José Province   Cuba   San Juan Hill (Cuba)  San Juan de los Yeras (Villa Clara Province)   Dominican Republic   San Juan Province (Dominican Republic)  San Juan de la Maguana   Honduras   San Juan, Intibucá  San Juan, La Paz   Mexico   San Juan, a village in Palizada Municipality, Campeche  San Juan Chamula, Chiapas  San Juan de los Lagos, Jalisco  San Juan de Ulúa, a small island near the port of Veracruz  San Juan del Río, the second city of Querétaro  Nuevo San Juan Parangaricutiro, Michoacán  San Juan River (Veracruz)  San Juan River (Tamaulipas), a river flowing through the states of Coahuila, Nuevo León, and Tamaulipas Oaxaca San Juan Achiutla
ART & ARTISTS: (Alex: Welcome to an outdoor museum of sculptures by Swedish artist Carl Milles)  Carl Milles' early work was influenced by this French sculptor of "The Kiss"
Auguste Rodin
The Kiss may refer to:  Art  The Kiss (Brâncuși sculpture), a 1908 sculpture by Constantin Brâncuși  The Kiss (Hayez painting), an 1859 painting by Francesco Hayez  The Kiss (Klimt painting), a 1907 golden painting by Gustav Klimt  The Kiss (Munch painting), an 1897 oil painting by Edvard Munch  The Kiss (Rodin sculpture), an 1889 sculpture by Auguste Rodin  V-J Day in Times Square, a 1945 photograph by Alfred Eisenstaedt  Le baiser de l'hôtel de ville (The Kiss by the Hôtel de Ville or just The Kiss), a photograph by Robert Doisneau  Film and television  The Kiss (1896 film), a 47-second film reenactment of the last scene of the stage musical The Widow Jones  The Kiss (1914 film), a silent film directed by Ulysses Davis  The Kiss (1929 film), a silent film directed by Jacques Feyder, starring Greta Garbo  The Kiss (1958 film), a short film nominated for an Academy Award  The Kiss (1988 film), a horror film directed by Pen Densham  The Kiss (1992 film), a film with a score by Nathan Wang  The Kiss (1995 film), a pornographic film starring Jenna Jameson  The Kiss, a 2002 short film by the Russo brothers  The Kiss (2003 film), a comedy-drama directed by Gorman Bechard  The Kiss (2004 film) (Dutch: De kus), a Belgian film directed by Hilde Van Mieghem  The Kiss (2007 film), a Japanese crime film  The Kiss, a 2010 short dramatic film directed by Ashlee Page  "The Kiss" (Even Stevens), an episode of Even Stevens  "The Kiss" (Modern Family), an episode of Modern Family  Literature  The Kiss (novel), a novel by Danielle Steel  The Kiss, a memoir by Kathryn Harrison  "The Kiss", a short story by Anton Chekhov  "The Kiss", a short story by Kate Chopin  Music  The Kiss (opera), an 1876 work by Bedřich Smetana "A Kiss", Dargomïzhsky "The Kiss", Philip Green (composer) (1911-1982)  "The Kiss", Joseph Barnby (1838-1896) Albums
2
"The Kiss", a song by The Cure from Kiss Me, Kiss Me, Kiss Me  "The Kiss", a song by Dweezil Zappa from Confessions  "The Kiss", a song by Hooverphonic from Hooverphonic Presents Jackie Cane  "The Kiss", a song by Queen from the Flash Gordon soundtrack album  "The Kiss", a song by The Sea and Cake from The Biz  "The Kiss", a song by Patrick Wolf from The Magic Position  "The Kiss", an instrumental by Trevor Jones & Randy Edelman
The Last of the Mohicans soundtrack album  See also  Kiss (disambiguation)
MOVIE REMAKES: 1940's "The Shop Around the Corner" was the basis for this 1998 Meg Ryan-Tom Hanks romantic comedy
You've Got Mail
The film You've Got Mail (1998) with Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan revolves around two people who dislike each other while developing an anonymous romance by email correspondence.
3
Later, Mr. Matuschek meets with a private investigator who informs him that his suspicions were correct, that his wife is having an affair with one of his employees—Ferencz Vadas.
Cast thumb|upright=1.2|James Stewart and Margaret Sullavan  Margaret Sullavan as Klara Novak  James Stewart as Alfred Kralik  Frank Morgan as Hugo Matuschek  Joseph Schildkraut as Ferencz Vadas  Sara Haden as Flora Kaczek  Felix Bressart as Pirovitch  William Tracy as Pepi Katona  Inez Courtney as Ilona Novotny  Charles Halton as Detective  Charles Smith as Rudy  Sarah Edwards as Customer  Edwin Maxwell as Doctor  Adaptations The Shop Around the Corner was dramatized in two separate half-hour broadcasts of The Screen Guild Theater, first on September 29, 1940, with Margaret Sullavan and James Stewart, second on February 26, 1945, with Van Johnson and Phyllis Thaxter.
Remakes
"GREEN" THINGS: After protecting this territory during WWII, the U.S. offered to buy it, but Denmark refused
Greenland
It is a sovereign state that comprises Denmark and two autonomous constituent countries in the North Atlantic Ocean: the Faroe Islands and Greenland.
3
It is believed that Denmark became Christian for political reasons so as not to get invaded by the rising Christian power in Europe, the Holy Roman Empire, which was an important trading area for the Danes.
The monarch is not answerable for his or her actions, and the monarch's person is sacrosanct."The King shall not be answerable for his actions; his person shall be sacrosanct."
You'll Never Guess Why.
WITH OR WITHOUT U: Natalie Wood found it "in the Grass"
Splendor
July 20, 1938 – November 29, 1981) was an American film and television actress best known for her screen roles in Miracle on 34th Street, Splendor in the Grass, Rebel Without a Cause, The Searchers, and West Side Story.
3
Among the other films made at this time were 1958's Kings Go Forth and Marjorie Morningstar.
I sent her flowers and the dates continued.
Wood and Wagner separated in June 1961 and divorced in April 1962.
TOP "GOD"s: Mario Puzo bestsellers turned into films include "The Cotton Club" & this one
The Godfather
He is known for his novels about the Mafia, most notably The Godfather (1969), which he later co-adapted into a three-part film saga directed by Francis Ford Coppola.
3
Accessed August 10, 2009. "Born one of 12 children, Puzo grew up in Hell's Kitchen on the west side of Manhattan.
In 1950, his first short story, "The Last Christmas", was published in American Vanguard.
The movie received 3 awards of the 11 Academy Award category nominations, including Puzo's Oscar for Best Adapted Screenplay.
I'VE GOT ESPN: (I'm Scott Van Pelt.)  When this ESPN "Big Show" debuted September 7, 1979, fans were told, "You've gone to sports heaven"
SportsCenter
ESPN launched on September 7, 1979, beginning with the first telecast of what would become the channel's flagship program, SportsCenter.
3
30 for 30 started airing in 2009 and continues airing to this day.
The Longhorn Network is a digital cable and satellite television network that was launched on August 26, 2011, focusing on events from the Texas Longhorns varsity sports teams of the University of Texas at Austin.
SNL also parodies ESPN Classic with fake archived obscure women's sports event telecasts from the 1980s (such as bowling, weightlifting and curling), with announcers who know nothing about the sport, and instead focus on the sponsors, which were always for feminine hygiene products.
USA NETWORK: This Emmy-winning series is one of the network's most popularAnd I've been thinking about Natalie, I've become so dependent on her, too dependent.
Monk
In November 2002, the channel debuted Monk, which became one of USA Network's first breakout hit series; the comedy-drama police procedural that starred Tony Shalhoub as Adrian Monk, a former San Francisco police inspector-turned-consultant who suffers from various obsessive-compulsive behaviors that include the ability to pay attention to detail when solving crimes, ran for eight seasons until it ended on December 4, 2009.
3
One tradition on USA was an afternoon lineup of game show reruns mixed in with several original low-budget productions that aired over the years.
NBC Universal officially took over as owner of USA and its sibling cable channels (except for Newsworld International) in 2004.
In 2008, USA announced a new original series
THE EMMYS: 1974 Best Supporting Comedy Actress winner for playing Phyllis Lindstrom on "The Mary Tyler Moore Show"
Cloris Leachman
Mary rents a third floor studio apartment in a Victorian house from acquaintance and downstairs landlady, Phyllis Lindstrom (Cloris Leachman), and she and upstairs neighbor Rhoda Morgenstern (Valerie Harper) become best friends.
3
Initially a comic buffoon in the series, Ted's better nature is gradually revealed as the series unfolds, helped along by his sweet but sometimes perceptive girlfriend Georgette.
Entertainment Weekly also noted that the main characters of 30 Rock mirror those of The Mary Tyler Moore Show.
In 2000, Moore and Harper reprised their roles in a two-hour ABC TV-movie, Mary and Rhoda.
THE HECUBA, YOU SAY: Hecuba lays a guilt trip on this eldest son for going into his final combat
Hector
These children included several major characters of Homer's Iliad such as the warriors Hector and Paris and the prophetess Cassandra.
2
705, write of her as the daughter of the Thracian king Cisseus.
Polydorus, the youngest son of Priam and Hecuba, is sent to King Polymestor for safekeeping, but when Troy falls, Polymestor murders Polydorus.
MYTH-ELLANY: He disguised himself as a female named Pyrrha, which means "red-haired girl", not "tendon boy"
Achilles
"Pyrrha" was, possibly, the name used by Achilles while hiding among the king of Skyros' daughters.
3
those thrown by Deucalion became men.
Themis tells Pyrrha that she must cast the bones of her mother to successfully reproduce.
Pyrrha was evidently named after her red hair.
SECRETARIES OF DEFENSE: Melvin Laird, Elliot Richardson & James Schlesinger
Richard Nixon
He was a U.S. congressman from Wisconsin before serving as Secretary of Defense from 1969 to 1973 under President Richard Nixon.
3
Laird did not shrink from centralized management where he found it useful or warranted.
After Watergate,  this proved implausible.
Melvin Laird and the Foundation of the Post-Vietnam Military, 1969-1973 Office of the Secretary of Defense  |-  Category:1922 births Category:American military personnel of World War II Category:American people of the Vietnam War Category:American Presbyterians Category:Lake Forest Academy alumni Category:Carleton College alumni Category:Living people Category:Members of the United States House of Representatives from Wisconsin Category:Nixon administration cabinet members Category:Omaha politicians Category:People from Marshfield, Wisconsin Category:People from Omaha, Nebraska Category:Presidential Medal of Freedom recipients Category:Recipients of the Purple Heart medal Category:United States Navy officers Category:United States Secretaries of Defense Category:Wisconsin Republicans Category:Wisconsin State Senators Category:Republican Party members of the United States House of Representatives Category:George Washington University trustee
GETTIN' FRIENDLY WITH MADONNA: Follow the bouncing ball: Madonna dated Rodman, who wed Electra, who once got cozy with this "purple" rocker
Prince
thumb|right|180px|Electra at the Tomb of Agamemnon, Frederic Leighton c. 1869 In Greek mythology, Electra (; , Ēlektra) was the daughter of King Agamemnon and Queen Clytemnestra, and thus princess of Argos.
3
(Odyssey, iii.
The Furies, appeased by the reunion of the family, abated their persecution.
Electra on Azalea Path is the title of Sylvia Plath's poem published in 1959, in reference to the Electra Complex  Comics  In the Marvel Comics universe, the character Elektra Natchios is partly based on Electra.
MAJOR GENERALS: For sure he was a major general at Fort Sumter; that bit  about inventing baseball...
Abner Doubleday
At about 7:00 A.M., Captain Abner Doubleday, the fort's second in command, was given the honor of firing the Union's first shot, in defense of the fort.
3
After Beauregard had consulted the Confederate Secretary of War, Leroy Walker, he sent the aides back to the fort and authorized Chesnut to decide whether the fort should be taken by force.
Those flown include (1) a 33-star United States flag, (2) a Confederate First National Flag (Stars and Bars), (3) a South Carolina State Flag, (4) a Confederate Second National Flag (Stainless Banner), and (5) a 35-star United States flag.
This display was added to Fort Sumter National Monument in the 1970s.
MYTHOLOGY: Lofty means of escape Daedalus & son Icarus used to flee King Minos
wings
Often depicted in art, Icarus and his father attempt to escape from Crete by means of wings that his father constructed from feathers and wax.
3
The Internet Classics Archive by Daniel C. Stevenson :
Henry Murray having proposed  the term Icarus complex, apparently  found symptoms particularly in mania where a person is fond of heights, fascinated by both fire and water, narcissistic and observed with fantastical or far-fetched imaginary cognition.
Peter Bedrick Books  External links  Category:Greek mythology Category:Accidental deaths from falls Category:Sun myths
NATURAL BORN MILLERS: This 1878 Henry James heroine had Mr. Winterbourne saying, American woman, get away from me
Daisy Miller
In 1878 "Daisy Miller" established his fame on both sides of the Atlantic.
3
He wrote three new plays, two of which were in production when the death of Edward VII on 6 May 1910 plunged London into mourning and theaters closed.
James produced a small but valuable amount of theatrical criticism, including perceptive appreciations of Henrik Ibsen.
Henry James At Work.
"MIND" BLOWERS: In 1987 critic Allan Bloom wrote a bestseller about "The Closing of" this
the American mind
Bloom championed the idea of Great Books education and became famous for his criticism of contemporary American higher education, with his views being expressed in his bestselling 1987 book, The Closing of the American Mind.
3
Bloom, Allan.
Academic Questions 17, no. 1, 54.
Rosenberg, Aubrey.
HAWAII: Once home to Father Damien, this island is so unspoiled that it still has no traffic lights
Molokai
thumb|220px|Father Damien's signature  Father Damien or Saint Damien of Molokai, SS.CC. or Saint Damien de Veuster ( or ; January 3, 1840 –
3
Jan De Volder, The Spirit of Father Damien (San Francisco, Ignatius Press, 2010) p.167  Canonization  In 1977 Pope Paul VI declared Father Damien to be venerable, the first of three steps that lead to sainthood.
The Father Damien Statue on the steps of the State Capitol Building honors him, and a replica is displayed in the National Statuary Hall Collection in the United States Capitol.
Marianne of Molokaʻi was canonized in 2012.
YOU'RE IN THIS FOREIGN COUNTRY IF...: you're lounging in Lima, the capital
Peru
Lima  is the capital and the largest city of Peru.
3
The city is the core of the Lima Metro Area, one of the ten largest metro areas in the Americas.
In contrast to other transit systems in Bogota, Curitiba or Mexico City, the Metropolitana is the first BRT system to operate fueled with natural gas, seeking to contribute to reduce the contamination caused by transit in the city of Lima.http://www.metropolitano.com.pe This system links the principal points of the Lima Metropolitan Area.
The metro system began operating in December 2012 and transported 78,224 people on average on a daily basis.
U.S. CITIES: It's the state where you'll find Scarborough, Waterville & Kittery
Maine
Scarborough (borough), local government district  Scarborough (UK Parliament constituency), which existed from 1295 until 1918, and from 1974 to 1997  Scarborough Castle, located in North Yorkshire   United States   Scarborough, Maine  Scarborough, New York, a hamlet in Briarcliff Manor  Scarborough (Metro-North station), a Metro-North station serving the village  Scarborough Day School, a defunct private school in the hamlet  Scarborough Renaissance Festival in Waxahachie, Texas  Scarborough Beach (Rhode Island) in Narragansett, Rhode Island   People   Scarborough (surname)  Earl of Scarbrough  Ships  HMS Scarborough, the name of several ships of Britain's Royal Navy  Scarborough, an East Indiaman that in 1748 struck what is now known as Scarborough Shoal; she was not wrecked and Philip D'Auvergne, her captain, reported the location of the hitherto unknown hazard  Scarborough (1782 ship), convict transport ship on First Fleet and Second Fleet to New South Wales  Other   Scarborough F.C., a football club formerly based in Scarborough, England  Scarborough Athletic F.C., a football club created by the supporters' trust of the old club  Scarborough Evening News, a local newspaper for Scarborough, England.
2
Scarborough may refer to:   Places   Australia   Scarborough, Western Australia, suburb of Perth  Scarborough, New South Wales  Scarborough, Queensland  Canada  Scarborough, Toronto, a former municipality in the City of Toronto  Scarborough GO Station, a train station of GO Transit in Toronto  Scarborough City Centre, a neighbourhood in Toronto  Scarborough Town Centre, a shopping mall in Toronto  Scarborough Village, a neighbourhood in Toronto  Scarboro, Calgary, a neighbourhood in Calgary, Alberta   New Zealand   Scarborough, New Zealand, a suburb of Christchurch   South Africa   Scarborough, Cape Town, on the west coast of the Cape Peninsula   South China Sea   Scarborough Shoal, a group of islands disputed by the People's Republic of China, the Republic of China and Philippines.
Scarborough
TV SOLE DADS: Widower Fred MacMurray raised Mike, Robbie, Chip & Ernie (go figure!) on this long-running comedy
My Three Sons
Later in his career, he became better known worldwide as Steve Douglas, the widowed patriarch on My Three Sons, which ran on ABC from 1960–1965 and then on CBS from 1965–1972.
3
In another turn in the "not so nice" category, MacMurray played the cynical, duplicitous Lieutenant Thomas Keefer in 1954's The Caine Mutiny.
thumb|right|Star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6421 Hollywood Blvd.
Star Spangled Rhythm (1942) Flight for Freedom (1943) No Time for Love (1943) Above Suspicion (1943) Standing Room
NFL HOME STADIUMS: Sun Devil Stadium
Arizona Cardinals
It has previously been the home of the NFL's Arizona Cardinals, from 1988 to 2005 and was the annual site of the Fiesta Bowl, from 1971 to 2006 and the Cactus Bowl since then.
3
In 1988, 1,700 more seats were added to bring the facility to its current capacity.
Stadium designers had neglected to waterproof the structure when it was built, assuming that a stadium in the desert would not need waterproof concrete.
The few fans who did show up for games were most often rooting for the visiting team, creating what amounted to "home games" on the road for many opposing teams.
NORSE: This Norse god led his brothers in an attack on Ymir, the first giant
Odin
The gods Odin, Vili and Vé fashioned the Earth (elsewhere personified as a goddess; Jörð) from his flesh, from his blood the ocean, from his bones the hills, from his hair the trees, from his brains the clouds, from his skull the heavens, and from his eyebrows the middle realm in which mankind lives, Midgard.
3
High says that the trio took the body into the middle of Ginnungagap and from his flesh fashioned the Earth, from his blood the sea and lakes, from his bones rocks, scree and stones his teeth, molars, and bones.
Davidson (1990:199).
Everyman.
MY HEART BELONGS TO DADDY: His father, John, was in "The Grapes of Wrath" & his daughter is actress Martha Plimpton
Keith Carradine
She is the daughter of actors Keith Carradine and Shelley Plimpton.
3
She has also appeared in The Mosquito Coast (1986), Running on Empty (1988), Parenthood (1989), Raising Hope (2010) and Small Town Murder Songs (2011).
In 2014, Plimpton wrote a lengthy article decrying both U.S. Supreme Court decisions in Burwell v. Hobby Lobby and McCullen v. Coakley and revealing in part that she herself has had an abortion more than once.
Theatre  Broadway Source: PlaybillVault"Martha Plimpton Broadway
MYTHOLOGY & ART: (Jon of the Clue Crew shows a painting on the monitor.)  In Botticelli's "The Birth of Venus", you can see that Venus is being blown ashore by this West Wind
Zephyr
According to his reading of the painting, the scene was inspired by the text in a Homeric hymn published in Florence in 1488 by the Greek refugee Demetrios Chalkokondyles:  Of august gold-wreathed and beautiful Aphrodite I shall sing to whose domain belong the battlements of all sea-loved Cyprus where, blown by the moist breath of Zephyros, she was carried over the waves of the resounding sea on soft foam.
3
Interpretations
Giving added support to this interpretation of Botticelli as a born-again Apelles is the fact that that very claim was voiced in 1488 by Ugolino Verino in a poem entitled "
Moreover, her positioning on the edge of the scallop shell (which cannot be identified as real), would certainly cause it to tip over.
MIDDLE "C": Define-A-Lash from Maybelline is a line of this
mascara
In 1917 the company produced Maybelline Cake Mascara, "the first modern eye cosmetic for everyday use" and Ultra Lash in the 1960s, which was the first mass-market automatic.
3
He adapted it with a chemistry set and produced a product sold locally called lash-in-brow-line.
In 1991, the company adopted its advertising slogan “
During 1989 L'Oreal ceased to test finished products prior to their launch on the market and has committed to developing alternative methods.
TV NOSTALGIA: "The Lawyers" episodes of "The Bold Ones" starred this Big Daddy of "Cat On A Hot Tin Roof" fame
Burl Ives
The original production starred Barbara Bel Geddes, Burl Ives, and Ben Gazzara.
3
Maggie, Brick, Mae, Gooper, and Doc Baugh (the family's physician) decide to tell Big Mama the truth about his illness and she is devastated by the news.
The utterance of it by Brick casts doubt on his denial of a homosexual relationship with Skipper.
Tennessee Williams: A Collection of Critical Essays.
TEENAGE DREAM: On NASA's website, Sally Ride says study math & science if you dream of becoming one of these, like she did
an astronaut
She remains the youngest American astronaut to have traveled to space, having done so at the age of 32.
3
According to Roger Boisjoly, the engineer who warned of the technical problems that led to the Challenger disaster, after the entire workforce of Morton-Thiokol shunned him Ride was the only public figure to show support for him when he went public with his pre-disaster warnings.
NASA announced that it was naming the landing site in honor of Sally Ride.
This was done in 2014 with the christening of the oceanographic research vessel RV Sally Ride (AGOR-28).
A WHITE CATEGORY: The London district of Whitechapel is associated with this infamous killer
Jack the Ripper
The area was the centre of the London Jewish community in the 19th and early 20th century, and the location of the infamous Whitechapel Murders believed to involve Jack the Ripper in the late 1880s.
3
Compared 2011White BritishAsianBlackWhitechapel Population 14,86224.4%49.8%4.4%London Borough of Tower Hamlets31.2%41.2%7.3%  In literature Whitechapel features in Charles Dickens's Pickwick Papers (chapter 22) as the location of the Bull Inn, where the Pickwickians take a coach to Ipswich.
Buses London Buses 15, 25, 106, 115, 135, 205, 254,  339, D3, N15, N205, N253 and N550 all operate within the area.
The London Boroughs of Tower Hamlets & Newham are working with English Heritage and Transport for London to refurbish the historic buildings at this location and improve the market.
I'M DATING MYSELF: I'm excited about this political magazine with Cindy Crawford as Washington on its first cover
George
Washington commonly refers to:   George Washington (1732–1799), first president of the United States  Washington (state), United States  Washington, D.C., the capital of the United States  Washington (name), including a list of people with the given name or surname Washington  Washington may also refer to:  The Washington metropolitan area  A metonym for the Federal government of the United States  Geography United States Cities and communities   Washington, Arkansas  Washington, California, in Nevada County  Washington, Yolo County, California  Washington, Connecticut  Washington, Georgia  Washington, Illinois  Washington, Indiana  Washington, Iowa  Washington, Kansas  Washington, Kentucky  Washington, Louisiana  Washington, Maine  Washington, Massachusetts  Washington, Michigan  Washington, Mississippi  Washington, Missouri  Washington, Nebraska  Washington, New Hampshire  Washington, New Jersey  Washington, New York  Washington, North Carolina  Washington, Oklahoma   Washington, Pennsylvania  Washington, Utah  Washington, Vermont  Washington, Virginia  Washington, West Virginia  Washington, Wisconsin (disambiguation)  Washington Boro, Pennsylvania  Washington County (disambiguation)  Washington Court House, Ohio  Washington Crossing, Pennsylvania  Washington Grove, Maryland  Washington Heights (disambiguation)
1
Washington Mills, New York  Washington Park (disambiguation)
PAINTERS' COLORS: In Washington, D.C.: Vermeer's "Girl with" this color "Hat"
red
Washington, a barangay in Escalante, Negros Occidental, Philippines  Washington, a barangay in San Jacinto, Masbate, Philippines  Washington, a barangay in Surigao City, Philippines  Education  Higher education  University of Washington, Seattle, Washington  Washington Huskies, this school's athletic program  Washington College, Chestertown, Maryland  Washington College (California), formerly in Irvington, Fremont, California, United States  Washington College (Pennsylvania)  Washington College, the original name of Trinity College (Connecticut)  Washington College of Law, at American University, Washington, D.C.  Washington & Jefferson College, Washington, Pennsylvania  Washington University, Baltimore, Maryland  Washington and Lee University, Lexington, Virginia  Washington Female Seminary, Washington, Pennsylvania  Washington State University, Pullman, Washington  Washington University in St. Louis, Missouri  Washington University Bears, athletic teams  George Washington University, Washington, D.C.  Harold Washington College, Chicago, Illinois  Secondary education  Washington High School (disambiguation)  Washington County High School (disambiguation)  Booker T. Washington High School (disambiguation)  George Washington High School (disambiguation)  Lake Washington High School, Kirkland, Washington  Washington College Academy, Limestone, Tennessee  Transportation Railroad stations Union Station (Washington, D.C.), train station in Washington, D.C. Washington station (Missouri), an Amtrak station in Washington, Missouri Washington station (Los Angeles Metro)  Chicago Transit Authority stations  Washington/State (CTA station), closed, in the Red Line subway  Washington/Dearborn (CTA station) in the Blue Line subway  Washington/Wells (CTA station) on the Loop rapid transit system  Washington/Wabash (CTA station)
2
Washington commonly refers to:   George Washington (1732–1799), first president of the United States  Washington (state), United States  Washington, D.C., the capital of the United States  Washington (name), including a list of people with the given name or surname Washington  Washington may also refer to:  The Washington metropolitan area  A metonym for the Federal government of the United States  Geography United States Cities and communities   Washington, Arkansas  Washington, California, in Nevada County  Washington, Yolo County, California  Washington, Connecticut  Washington, Georgia  Washington, Illinois  Washington, Indiana  Washington, Iowa  Washington, Kansas  Washington, Kentucky  Washington, Louisiana  Washington, Maine  Washington, Massachusetts  Washington, Michigan  Washington, Mississippi  Washington, Missouri  Washington, Nebraska  Washington, New Hampshire  Washington, New Jersey  Washington, New York  Washington, North Carolina  Washington, Oklahoma   Washington, Pennsylvania  Washington, Utah  Washington, Vermont  Washington, Virginia  Washington, West Virginia  Washington, Wisconsin (disambiguation)  Washington Boro, Pennsylvania  Washington County (disambiguation)  Washington Court House, Ohio  Washington Crossing, Pennsylvania  Washington Grove, Maryland  Washington Heights (disambiguation)
Washington Terrace, Utah  Washington Township (disambiguation)  Washington-on-the-Brazos, Texas  Washingtonville (disambiguation)  Mount Washington (disambiguation)  New Washington (disambiguation)  Old Washington, Ohio  Other features  Lake Washington, Seattle, Washington  Lake Washington (disambiguation), other lakes with this name  Mount Washington (disambiguation)  Washington Bridge (disambiguation)  Washington Island (disambiguation)  Washington Park (disambiguation)  Outside the United States  Washington, Ontario, Canada  Washington, Tyne and Wear, England  Washington Old Hall, ancestral home of the family of George Washington  Washington, West Sussex, England  New Washington, Aklan, Philippines  Washington Island (Kiribati)  Washington Island (French Polynesia)  Washington, a community in Mahaica-Berbice, Guyana  Washington, a barangay in Catarman, Northern Samar, Philippines
KING & COUNTRY: As part of the "Million Dollar Quartet", Elvis jammed with Jerry Lee Lewis, Carl Perkins & this "Man in Black"
Johnny Cash
Lewis is the last surviving member of Sun Records' Million Dollar Quartet and the Class of '55 album, which also included Johnny Cash, Carl Perkins, Roy Orbison and Elvis Presley.
3
His live performance fees plummeted from $10,000 per night to $250.
His seventh marriage, to Judith Brown, began March 9, 2012.
He has two surviving sons, Ronnie Guy Lewis and Jerry Lee Lewis III, and two daughters, Phoebe Allen Lewis and Lori Lee Lewis.
IKE SPEAKS: Ike telegrammed that the mission of "Allied force was fulfilled at 0241 hours local time" in this month, 1945
May
Ike may refer to:  Weather  Tropical Storm Ike (disambiguation), several storms  Typhoon Ike, in the 1981 Pacific typhoon season, a category 1 typhoon that formed in the South China Sea  Typhoon Ike (1984), the deadliest typhoon of the 1984 Pacific typhoon season  Hurricane Ike (2008), the third-costliest hurricane to ever make landfall in the United States  People  Ike (given name), a given name (including a list of people with the name)  Dwight D. Eisenhower (1890–1969), a five-star general in the United States Army and the 34th President of the United States, known as "Ike"  Technology  Internet Key Exchange, network protocol used by IPSec VPNs  Other uses  Ike (miniseries), 1979 television miniseries about Dwight D. Eisenhower  Ike:
1
Countdown to D-Day, a 2004 American television film  Interstate 290 (Illinois), a portion of which is officially named the Dwight D. Eisenhower Expressway, or "the Ike"  USS Dwight D. Eisenhower (CVN-69), a Nimitz-class supercarrier, also known as the Ike  Ike (Fire Emblem)  See also  I like Ike, a popular slogan around the 1950s, referring to Dwight D. Eisenhower  IKE (disambiguation)
BETTY WHITE: When this man hosted "The Tonight Show" from 1957 to 1962, Betty White was a regular guest
Jack Paar
It has had six official hosts, beginning with Steve Allen (1954–57), followed by Jack Paar (1957–62), Johnny Carson (1962–92), Jay Leno (1992–2009, 2010–14), Conan O'Brien (2009–10), and Jimmy Fallon (2014–present).
3
[See music and announcers below.]
On the rare occasions that both McMahon and Severinsen were away, Newsom would take the announcer's chair and the band would be led by assistant musical director Shelly Cohen.
Rickey Minor was announced as his replacement, and took over on June 7.
MUSIC: He wrote "Rhapsody In Blue" for jazz conductor Paul Whiteman's orchestra
George Gershwin
Using a large ensemble and exploring many styles of music, Whiteman is perhaps best known for his blending of symphonic music and jazz, as typified by his 1924 commissioning and debut of George Gershwin's jazz-influenced "Rhapsody in Blue".
3
Whiteman emphasized the way he had approached the already well-established style of music, while also organizing its composition and style in his own fashion.
Jazz musician and leader of the Mound City Blue Blowers Red McKenzie and cabaret singer Ramona Davies (billed as "Ramona and her Grand Piano") joined the Whiteman group in 1932.
The King's Jesters were also with Paul Whiteman in 1931.
1980s LIT: He wrote the 1987 novel "Alnilam" over a period of 30 years, publishing "Deliverance" in the meantime
James Dickey
The film is based on the 1970 novel of the same name by American author James Dickey, who has a small role in the film as the Sheriff.
3
Deliverance is a 1972 American dramatic thriller film produced and directed by John Boorman, and stars Jon Voight, Burt Reynolds, Ned Beatty and Ronny Cox, with the latter two making their feature film debuts.
Ed clumsily shoots and manages to kill him, accidentally stabbing himself with one of his own spare arrows in the process.
Additional scenes were shot in Salem, South Carolina.
IN THE MOVIES: These title instruments are "dueling" on the "Deliverance" soundtrack
banjos
Widely acclaimed as a landmark picture, the film is noted both for the music scene near the beginning, with one of the city men playing "Dueling Banjos" on guitar with a banjo-playing country boy, that sets the tone for what lies ahead—a trip into unknown and potentially dangerous wilderness—and for its visceral and notorious male rape scene.
3
Lewis is worried that he will be tried for murder in a hostile backwoods community after shooting the rapist from behind.
The film has a number of sparse, brooding passages of music scattered throughout, including several played on a synthesizer.
In 2012, producer Cory Welles and director Kevin Walker decided to make the documentary, The Deliverance of Rabun County, to explore the effects of the landmark film on people in the county.
PROPS: Beefy, a prop bulldog, includes its rubber spiked collar from this Adam Sandler film
Little Nicky
The Waterboy, Little Nicky, Mr. Deeds, Click, The Longest Yard, I Now Pronounce You Chuck and Larry, and Bedtime Stories.
3
He starred in Billy Madison (1995) as a grown, though uneducated, man repeating grades 1–12 to earn back his father's respect, along with the right to inherit his father's multimillion-dollar hotel empire.
October 18, 2002.
In 2009, Sandler starred in Judd Apatow's third directorial feature Funny People as a very successful stand up comedian who finds out he has a terminal illness and he takes a young inexperienced comic (Seth Rogen) under his wing.
ADAM SANDLER: I played tackling machine & H2O enthusiast in this 1998 film
The Waterboy
He is best known for his comedic roles, such as in the films Billy Madison (1995), the sports comedies Happy Gilmore (1996) and The Waterboy (1998), the romantic comedy The Wedding Singer (1998), Big Daddy (1999), and Mr. Deeds (2002), and voicing Dracula in Hotel Transylvania (2012) and Hotel Transylvania 2 (2015).
3
Gold 1999Stan and Judy's Kid Gold 2004Shhh...
1996 Best Comedic Performance Happy Gilmore  Best Fight (vs. Bob Barker)
Comedy Anger Management  2004 Choice Movie Actor – Comedy 50 First Dates  2005 Choice Movie Actor – Comedy
OSCAR, GRAMMY OR BOTH: Steve Martin
Grammy
Since the 1980s, having branched away from stand-up comedy, Martin has become a successful actor, as well as an author, playwright, pianist and banjo player, eventually earning him an Emmy, Grammy and American Comedy awards, among other honors.
3
SNL audience jumped by a million viewers when he made guest appearances and was one of the most successful SNL hosts.
Well (Video)"].
Retrieved May 15, 2010
AT THE INTERNATIONAL CINEPLEX: Bill Murray may have played Bosley but we think fans in Taiwan showed up to see these title "Hot Babes"
Charlie's Angels
thumb|upright|Murray in 2014  During this time Murray still appeared in comedic roles such as Charlie's Angels and Osmosis Jones.
3
Also in 2003, he appeared in a short cameo for Jim Jarmusch's Coffee and Cigarettes, in which he played himself "hiding out" in a local coffee shop.
That same year, Murray announced that he would take a break from acting as he had not had the time to relax since his new breakthrough in the late 1990s.
Murray also had a falling out with film director and longtime collaborator Harold Ramis during the production of Groundhog Day.
IF THEY MARRIED: If Miss Q of "Nikita" fame wed Queen guitarist Brian, Rod Stewart would sing to her as...
Maggie May
Stewart's 1971 solo album Every Picture Tells a Story made him a household name when the B-side of his minor hit "Reason to Believe", "Maggie May", (co-written with Martin Quittenton) started receiving radio play.
3
18–21.
The Jeff Beck Group toured Western Europe in spring 1968, recorded, and were nearly destitute; then assistant manager Peter Grant booked them on a six-week tour of the United States starting in June 1968 with the Fillmore East in New York.
In 2001, he released Human, his only album for Atlantic.
LET IT "SNOW": In 1970 Anne Murray urged it to "spread your tiny wings and fly away"
"Snowbird"
1 on the U.S. charts, and also the first to earn a Gold record for one of her signature songs, "Snowbird" (1970).
3
They have two children - William (born 1976) and Dawn (born 1979), a singer/songwriter and artist who has recorded with her mother a number of times, including the duet "Let There Be Love" in 1999 for Murray's What a Wonderful World album.
Murray and Dawn were featured in a mother-daughter duet of "Nobody Loves Me Like You Do" on Murray's hit 2008 U.S. CD (released in late 2007 in Canada), Anne Murray Duets: Friends & Legends.
Category:1945 births Category:Canadian folk singers Category:Canadian sopranos Category:20th-century Canadian singers Category:21st-century Canadian singers Category:Canadian country singers Category:Canadian female guitarists Category:Canadian memoirists Category:Canadian Music Hall of Fame inductees Category:Canadian schoolteachers Category:Canadian soft rock musicians Category:Capitol Records artists Category:Companions of the Order of Canada Category:EMI Records artists Category:Grammy Award winners Category:Juno Award winners Category:Liberty Records artists Category:Living people Category:Members of the Order of Nova Scotia Category:Musicians from Nova Scotia Category:Musicians from Toronto  Category:People from Cumberland County, Nova Scotia Category:University of New Brunswick alumni Category:Governor General's Performing Arts Award winners Murray, Anne
SUPER ATHLETES: Janet Evans holds the world record in the 400, 800 & 1500-meter freestyle events in this sport
swimming
Biography Born in Fullerton, California, Evans grew up in neighboring Placentia, where she started swimming competitively as a child.
2
Evans won the 400-meter and 800-meter freestyle events at the U.S. National Championships 12 times each, the largest number of national titles in one event by an American swimmer in the 100-year history of the competition.
Retrieved March 16, 2015.
SEAN PENN, THIS IS YOUR MOVIE: Duude!  You were awesome as ultra-stoner Jeff Spicoli in this movie
Fast Times at Ridgemont High
Following his film debut in 1981's drama Taps and a diverse range of film roles in the 1980s, including Fast Times at Ridgemont High, Penn garnered critical attention for his roles in the crime dramas At Close Range (1986) and later Carlito's Way (1993).
3
while his mother is a Catholic of Irish and Italian descent.
Penn questioned whether Bush's twin daughters supported the war in Iraq.
The deal for the interview was brokered by del Castillo.
POETS & POETRY: This poem by Matthew Arnold mentions the French coast & the cliffs of England
Dover Beach
His 1867 poem, "Dover Beach," depicted a nightmarish world from which the old religious verities have receded.
2
Houghton Mifflin Company.
The title of the series consciously echoes Arnold's essay, “
I WROTE THAT!: The novel "The Prince of Tides" & the screenplay thereof
Pat Conroy
The Prince of Tides is a 1991 romantic drama film based on the 1986 novel of the same name by Pat Conroy; the film stars Barbra Streisand and Nick Nolte.
3
It tells the story of the narrator's struggle to overcome the psychological damage inflicted by his dysfunctional childhood in South Carolina.
The father was a shrimp boat operator and, despite being successful at that profession, spent all of his money on frivolous business pursuits, leaving the family in poverty.
They describe Tom Wingo's relationship with his siblings in great detail.
POP CULTURE: This game's new "Warriors of Rock" features narration by Gene Simmons of KISS
Guitar Hero
Simmons also has a large role in the 2010 music video game Guitar Hero: Warriors of Rock.
3
Search what is being mentioned across national TV. Livedash.
I'm a stranger in America.
It was murdered," he added.
I'M GOING TO BE A JUNIOR: We'll show you the money if you know this star's TD dance in "Jerry Maguire" was choreographed by Paula Abdul
Cuba Gooding, Jr.
Jerry Maguire is a 1996 American  romantic comedy-drama sports film written, produced and directed by Cameron Crowe, and stars Tom Cruise, Cuba Gooding, Jr. and Renée Zellweger.
3
Reagan Gomez-Preston also had a minor role in the film as part of the Tidwell family.
Chicago Film Critics Association  Best Supporting Actor (Gooding Jr., won)  Directors Guild of America  Outstanding Directing – Motion Pictures (Crowe, nominated)  Golden Globe Awards  Best Actor – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy (Cruise, won)  Best Film –
Writers Guild of America  Best Screenplay – Original (Crowe, nominated)
THEY USED TO BE IN CHARGE: Ferdinand Marcos
the Philippines
(September 11, 1917 – September 28, 1989) was a Filipino politician, who ruled as President of the Philippines from 1965 to 1986.
3
http://asianjournalusa.com/marcos-fake-medals-redux-part-iii-p10829-168.htm
Snap election, revolution, and exile  In late 1985, in the face of escalating public discontent and under pressure from foreign allies, Marcos called a "snap election" with more than a year left in his term.
but at great cost.
PROSPERO: Prospero is the hero of the play "The Tempest", possibly the last by this playwright
William Shakespeare
Prospero ( ) is a fictional character and the protagonist of William Shakespeare's play The Tempest.
3
Paul Mazursky's film, Tempest (1983), features a Prospero-esque character portrayed by John Cassavetes who is an exile of his own cynical discontent, ego and self-betrayal and who abandons America for a utopian "kingdom" on a secluded Greek isle.
Periodicals
R. Juha sculpted Prospero (2004).
BOX OFFICE BOMBS: There wasn't much repeat business for this 1997 Kevin Costner film; nobody rang twice
The Postman
Less well-liked were the science fiction-post-apocalyptic epics Waterworld (1995) and The Postman (1997), the latter with Costner starring, directing and producing.
3
This was based on a novel of the same name
Also in 2009, he was named the spokesman for NASCAR Day which took place on 15 May.
On September 25, 2004, Costner married his girlfriend of four years, German-American model and handbag designer Christine Baumgartner,Kappes, Serena and Jason Bane "Kevin Costner Marries Girlfriend in Aspen.
UNPACK YOUR ADJECTIVES: Corpulent, or the last name of the creator of the corpulent Nero Wolfe
stout
Nero Wolfe is a fictional character, an armchair detective created in 1934 by American mystery writer Rex Stout.
2
Westchester County district attorney  Ben Dykes — head of Westchester County  detectives  Con Noonan — lieutenant with the New York State Police.
Wolfe comes out of self-imposed retirement to investigate the death of a boyhood friend, who became a famous symphony conductor.
TAKE ME TO YOUR LEADER: Europe:Prime Minister Guy Verhofstadt
Belgium
Guy Maurice Marie Louise Verhofstadt (; born 11 April 1953) is a Belgian politician, who served as the 47th Prime Minister of Belgium from 1999 to 2008.
2
Post-premiership After his premiership he took up the seat of Senator to which he had been elected in 2007.
He is also a member of the Club de Madrid, an independent organization of more than 80 former democratic statesmen.
STAR WARS: The feud between this actress & Shirley MacLaine, her onscreen mom in "Terms of Endearment", is legendary
Debra Winger
In 1983, she won an Oscar for Terms of Endearment, playing Debra Winger's mother.
3
one of five that the film received – and a Golden Globe nomination.
She later said, "I thought I would win for The Apartment, but then Elizabeth Taylor had a tracheotomy."
The Films of Shirley MacLaine.
FILE UNDER "H": One of Ireland's national pastimes is this stick & ball game similar to field hockey
Hurling
In 2003 it represented 34% of total sports attendances at events in Ireland and abroad, followed by hurling at 23%, soccer at 16% and rugby at 8% and the All-Ireland Football Final is the most watched event in the sporting calendar.
3
This subsided following a political agreement in 1998.
Northern Ireland  thumb|left|Parliament Buildings, in Stormont Estate, seat of the Northern Ireland Assembly  Northern Ireland is a part of the United Kingdom with a local executive and assembly which exercise devolved powers.
It was spoken by a few peasants and merchants brought over from England, and was largely replaced by Irish before the Tudor Conquest of Ireland.
GOOD SPORTS: In 1992 this NBA team chose LSU's Shaquille O'Neal as its first round draft pick
the Orlando Magic
He was announced as a nominee for the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame on December 21, 2015.Yahoo Sports  Following his career at Louisiana State University, O'Neal was drafted by the Orlando Magic with the first overall pick in the 1992 NBA draft.
3
"I'm really too old to be trying to outscore 18-year-olds," O'Neal said, referring to the then 23-year-old Howard.
On his own half of the hardwood, O'Neal was a capable defender, named three times to the All-NBA Second Defensive Team.
| style="text-align:left;"| L.A. Lakers | 74 || 74 || 39.5 || style="background:#cfecec;"| .572 || .000 || .513 || 12.7 || 3.7 || .6 || 2.8 || 28.7 |- |style="text-align:left;background:#afe6ba;"| †
HISTORICAL NOVELS: William Styron won a 1968 Pulitzer Prize for his "Confessions of" this slave revolt leader
Nat Turner
Styron was best known for his novels, including:  Lie Down in Darkness (1951), his acclaimed first work, published at age 26;  The Confessions of Nat Turner (1967), narrated by Nat Turner, the leader of an 1831 Virginian slave revolt;  Sophie's Choice (1979), a story "told through the eyes of a young aspiring writer from the South, about a Polish Catholic survivor of Auschwitz and her brilliant but troubled Jewish lover in postwar Brooklyn".
3
Out of this grave and menacing experience, he was later able to write the memoir Darkness Visible (1990), the work Styron became best known for during the last two decades of his life.
Potential
The year 1953 was eventful for Styron in another way.
ABBOTS & COSTELLOS: When Lucky Luciano was deported in 1946, this closest aide of his took control of his crime syndicate
Frank Costello
By 1920, Luciano had met many future Mafia leaders, including Vito Genovese and Frank Costello, his longtime friend and future business partner through the Five Points Gang.
3
He was for many years the boss of the modern Genovese crime family.
He imported Scotch whisky from Scotland, rum from the Caribbean, and whisky from Canada.
Luciano elevated his most trusted Italian associates to high-level positions in what was now the Luciano crime family.
STATE / PRISON: You're off to the land of Lincoln Correctional Center & also Dixon (but no Mason)
Illinois
Places In Canada:  Dixon, Ontario  In the United States of America:  Dixon, California  Dixon, Illinois  Dixon, Greene County, Indiana   Dixon, Indiana and Ohio, an unincorporated community in Allen County, Indiana and Van Wert County, Ohio  Dixon, Iowa  Dixon, Kentucky  Dixon, New Orleans, Louisiana  Dixon, Michigan  Dixon, Missouri  Dixon, Montana  Dixon, Nebraska  Dixon, New Mexico  Dixon, South Dakota  Dixon, Wyoming  Dixon County, Nebraska  Dixon Township, Logan County, North Dakota  Dixon Entrance, part of the Inside Passage between Alaska and Canada  Dixon Lane-Meadow Creek, California  It also appears in the name of:  Dixons Creek, Victoria, Australia  People  Dixon (surname)  Other uses  USS Dixon (AS-37), a U.S. Navy submarine tender  Dixon of Dock Green, BBC TV police series  Dixon Ticonderoga, a pencil manufacturer  See also  Dixon's factorization method  Papapetrou-Dixon equations  Gabe Dixon Band  Dixons (disambiguation)  Dikson (disambiguation)  Dickson (disambiguation)
2
Dixon is an alternative to Dickson.
It is of English origin meaning son of Richard, or Dick's son.
BOXING MOVIES: John Garfield earned an Oscar nomination for playing a corrupt boxer who becomes champ in this 1947 film
Body and Soul
In 1948, he was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor for his starring role in Body and Soul (1947).
3
It was under the guidance of the school's principal—the noted educator Angelo Patri—that he was introduced to acting.
Force of Evil (1948)
Radio appearances  Year  Program  Episode/source 1946 Academy Award  Blood on the Sun  1947  Screen Guild Players  Saturday's Children   References  Further reading  Morris, George.
AUTHORS: "Goblin Market" is one of the finest poems by this sister of Dante Gabriel Rossetti
Christina Rossetti
Poetry and image are closely entwined in Rossetti's work; he frequently wrote sonnets to accompany his pictures, spanning from The Girlhood of Mary Virgin (1849) and Astarte Syriaca (1877), while also creating art to illustrate poems such as "Goblin Market" by the celebrated poet Christina Rossetti, his sister.
3
Treuherz et al.
It was broadcast on BBC Two on Tuesday, 21 July 2009.
Retro me, Sathana!”
MOVIE CO-STARS: This movie based on a Philip Roth novella gave Richard Benjamin & Ali McGraw their first leading roles on film
Goodbye, Columbus
He first gained attention with the 1959 novella Goodbye, Columbus, an irreverent and humorous portrait of American Jewish life for which he received the U.S. National Book Award for Fiction.
3
5, Philip Roth, The Facts: A Novelist's Autobiography, Random House, 2011: "I'm talking about a breakdown.
A more satirical treatment of the patriotism and idealism of the war years is evident in Roth's comic novels, such as Portnoy's Complaint and Sabbath's Theater.
Retrieved March 27, 2012.
"COM": Controversial 1969 Philip Roth novel that was made into a 1972 film
Portnoy's Complaint
U.S. Department of State, U.S. Life, "American Prose, 1945–1990: Realism and Experimentation"  His profile rose significantly in 1969 after the publication of the controversial Portnoy's Complaint, the humorous and sexually explicit psychoanalytical monologue of "a lust-ridden, mother-addicted young Jewish bachelor," filled with "intimate, shameful detail, and coarse, abusive language."Saxton (1974)  Roth is one of the most awarded U.S. writers of his generation: his books have twice received the National Book Award, twice the National Book Critics Circle award, and three times the PEN/Faulkner Award.
3
Influences and themes Much of Roth's fiction revolves around semi-autobiographical themes, while self-consciously and playfully addressing the perils of establishing connections between the author Philip Roth and his fictional lives and voices.
Each of these novels treats aspects of the postwar era against the backdrop of the nostalgically remembered Jewish-American childhood of Nathan Zuckerman, in which the experience of life on the American home front during the Second World War features prominently.
National Book Foundation.
U.S. RIVERS: It flows through Washington, D.C. & on past Mount Vernon
the Potomac
The estate is situated on the banks of the Potomac River in Fairfax County, Virginia, near Alexandria, across from Prince George's County, Maryland.
3
This placement of the cupola is more in the earlier Carolean style than Palladian, and was probably incorporated to improve ventilation of the enlarged attic and enhance the overall symmetry of the structure and the two wings; a similar cupola crowns the Governor's House at Williamsburg, of which Washington would have been aware.
James D. Kornwolf, Georgiana Wallis Kornwolf, Architecture and Town Planning in Colonial North America, Johns Hopkins University Press, Baltimore, 2002 Other sources credit Col.
Little interest was paid to Washington’s offer.
POP MUSIC: B.B. King joined this band on "When Love Comes To Town" on their "Rattle And Hum" album
U2
U2 Rattle and Hum DVD, 1988  King's recording contract was followed by tours across the United States, with performances in major theaters in cities such as Washington, D.C., Chicago, Los Angeles, Detroit, and St. Louis, as well as numerous gigs in small clubs and juke joints of the southern United States.
3
The minister taught King his first three chords.
ISBN 978-0-313-35796-1 : Page 805-6.
King later said that Regal Live "is considered by some the best recording I've ever had . . .
CLASSIC AMERICAN MUSIC: He got an Oscar for "White Christmas" & a Medal of Honor for songs like "God Bless America"
Irving Berlin
"God Bless America" is an American patriotic song written by Irving Berlin in 1918 and revised by him in 1938.
3
Accessed in 2007.
The Flyers even brought Smith in to perform live before Game 6 of the 1974 Stanley Cup Finals on May 19, 1974, and the Flyers won the Cup that day.
but I do want to observe that the lyrics of "God Bless America" have never before seemed to me to contain such an infinity of possible meanings, some tragic, some unspeakably sad, some few still defiantly hopeful".
BAWDY BABES IN BOOKS: In the "Queste Del Saint Graal", Lancelot can't look directly at the Holy Grail because of his affair with her
Guinevere
He typically features as King Arthur's greatest champion, the lord of Joyous Gard and the greatest swordsman and jouster of the age — until his adultery with Queen Guinevere is discovered, causing a civil war exploited by Mordred which brings about the end of Arthur's kingdom.
3
In Chrétien's earliest known work Erec and Enide, the name Lancelot appears as third on a list of knights at King Arthur's court.
The Middle Dutch so-called Lancelot Compilation (The Hague, KB129 A 10) contains seven Arthurian romances folded into the three parts of the cycle.
He sets out for adventure and comes across a castle guarded by the Copper Knight.
MOVING AROUND THE DIAL: As the Fresh Prince, Will Smith moved from west Philly to this ritzy California enclave
Bel-Air
In 1990, his popularity increased dramatically when he starred in the popular television series The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air.
3
Recording and acting career thumb|right|Smith at the Emmy Awards in 1993  Early work Smith started as the MC of the hip-hop duo DJ Jazzy Jeff & The Fresh Prince, with his childhood friend Jeffrey "DJ Jazzy Jeff" Townes as turntablist and producer,Stated on
Retrieved on December 3, 2008.
Smith will play Howard Inlet, a New York advertising executive who succumbs to an deep depression after a personal tragedy.
NO. 1 HITS OF THE '90s: In 1999 Will Smith scored with a No. 1 hit with this film title track featuring Dru Hill & Kool Moe Dee
Wild Wild West
He turned down the role of Neo in The Matrix in favor of Wild Wild West (1999).
3
As of 2014, 17 of the 21 films in which he has had leading roles have accumulated worldwide gross earnings of over $100 million each, five taking in over $500 million each in global box office receipts.
It received $14.4 million in film tax credits from Pennsylvania.
Smith and his brother Harry own Treyball Development Inc., a Beverly Hills-based company named after Trey.
DRAMA: In February 1949 this actor originated the role of Willy Loman in "Death of a Salesman"
Lee J. Cobb
The play starred Lee J. Cobb as Willy Loman, Mildred Dunnock as Linda, Arthur Kennedy as Biff, Howard Smith as Charley and Cameron Mitchell as Happy.
3
Bernard makes Willy contemplate where he has gone wrong as a father.
At the funeral Biff retains his belief that he does not want to become a businessman like his father.
Drama Desk Award for Outstanding Lighting Design —
ENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY: In 1996, as George Clooney hit the big screen in "From Dusk Till Dawn," he was still an "E.R." heartthrob as this doctor
Doug Ross
Clooney made his acting debut on television in 1978, and later gained wide recognition in his role as Dr. Doug Ross on the long-running medical drama ER from 1994 to 1999, for which he received two Primetime Emmy Award nominations.
3
Clooney lost an arbitration vote 2–1, and withdrew from the union over the decision.
In his acceptance speech, Clooney said that "Don and I … stand here before you as failures.
He purchased the  house in 1995 through his George Guilfoyle Trust.
THE COEN BROTHERS: The Coens were nominated for a 2000 screenwriting Oscar for this film that starred George Clooney
O Brother, Where Art Thou?
After leaving ER, Clooney starred in the commercially successful films The Perfect Storm (2000), a disaster drama, and O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000), a Coen brothers' adventure comedy.
3
At the 2006 Academy Awards, Clooney was nominated for Best Director and Best Original Screenplay for Good Night, and Good Luck, as well as Best Supporting Actor for Syriana.
In March 2012, Clooney was featured with Martin Sheen and Brad Pitt in a performance of Dustin Lance Black's play, '8'—a staged reenactment of the federal trial that overturned California's Prop 8 ban on same-sex marriage—as attorney David Boies.
Clooney was married to actress Talia Balsam from 1989 to 1993.
WORLD HISTORY: No one really knows what this French girl, who saved Orleans, looked like; maybe like Leelee Sobieski or Milla Jovovich
Joan of Arc
She starred as the heroine and martyr in Besson's The Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc (1999).
3
Since 1998, Jovovich has been an "international spokesmodel" for L'Oréal cosmetics.
The second version of "Gentleman Who Fell", a homage to Maya Deren's short film Meshes of the Afternoon (1943), was subsequently played on MTV. Jovovich toured the United States during most of 1994 to promote the album, opening for Toad the Wet Sprocket and Crash Test Dummies, as well as playing smaller acoustic sets.
The actress also gave a speech in which she thanked Gorbachev, saying that when she and her family left the Soviet Union in 1980 they were sadly sure that they would never see their relatives again and that thanks to him they have been reunited.
BODIES OF WATER: The island of Corregidor guards the entrance to this Phillippine bay
Manila Bay
Corregidor Island, locally called Isla ng Corregidor, is an island located at the entrance of Manila Bay in southwestern part of Luzon Island in the Philippines.
3
From that site he launched two successive attacks against Manila, commanded either by Limahong himself or the Japanese Sioco.
The battle for the recapture of Corregidor occurred between 16 and 26 February 1945, in which American and Filipino forces liberated the island fortress from Japanese soldiers.
Pacific War Memorial thumb|250px|Marker of the Pacific War Memorial Standing on the highest part of Corregidor's Topside is the Pacific War Memorial, which was built by the United States Government to honor the Filipino and American soldiers who participated in World War II.  It was completed in 1968 at the cost of three million dollars.
LITERARY STUPID ANSWERS: One night Wilkie Collins saw a woman in flowing white robes, inspiring the opening of this novel
The Woman in White
His best-known works are The Woman in White (1859), No Name (1862), Armadale (1866), and The Moonstone (1868), considered the first modern English detective novel.
3
Collins went on a walking tour of Cornwall with artist Henry Brandling in July and August 1850.
Collins's novel The Dead Secret was serialised in Household Words from January to June 1857 and published in volume form by Bradbury & Evans.
Armadale, the first and only of Collins's major novels of the 1860s to be serialised in a magazine other than All the Year Round, provoked strong criticism, generally centred upon its transgressive villainess Lydia Gwilt, and provoked in part by Collins's typically confrontational preface.
FUNNY WESTERNS: In this 1948 film, Bob Hope played a dentist who marries "Calamity" Jane Russell
The Paleface
Early films such as The Cat and the Canary (1939) and The Paleface (1948) were financially successful and were praised by critics, and by the mid-1940s, with his radio program getting good ratings as well, he became one of the most popular entertainers in the United States.
3
Though his career as a film star effectively ended in 1972, Hope made a few cameo appearances in films into the 1980s.
Many people considered him as an enabler of the war and a member of the system that made it possible.
Critical reception  left|thumb|With sidekick Jerry Colonna in 1940 Hope was praised for his comedy timing, specializing in one-liners and rapid-fire delivery of jokes.
THAT'S JUST DUCKY: "Ducks are a dabbling" is a line of poetry included in this Kenneth Grahame work
The Wind in the Willows
Kenneth Grahame ( ; 8 March 1859 – 6 July 1932) was a British writer, most famous for The Wind in the Willows (1908), one of the classics of children's literature.
2
He is buried in Holywell Cemetery, Oxford.
The book was a hit and is still enjoyed by adults and children today, whether in book form or in the films, while Toad remains one of the most celebrated and beloved characters of the book.
QUESTIONS: In a 1988 film Bob Hoskins must enter Toontown to answer this title question
Who Framed Roger Rabbit
His work included lead roles in The Long Good Friday (1980), Mona Lisa (1986), Who Framed Roger Rabbit (1988), Mermaids (1990), and Super Mario Bros. (1993), and supporting performances in Brazil (1985), Hook (1991), Nixon (1995), Mrs. Henderson Presents (2005), A Christmas Carol (2009), Made in Dagenham (2010) and Snow White and the Huntsman (2012).
3
Robert William "Bob" Hoskins (26 October 1942 – 29 April 2014) was an English actor known for playing Cockneys and gangsters.
"Marketing Communications: Contexts, Strategies, and Applications".
Financial Times Prentice Hall"Much-loved British actor Bob Hoskins dies age 71".
JACK LEMMON FILMS: In "The China Syndrome", Lemmon played the executive of this type of plant
Nuclear power plant
The China Syndrome is a 1979 American thriller film that tells the story of a television reporter and her cameraman who discover safety coverups at a nuclear power plant.
3
The film was released on March 16, 1979, 12 days before the Three Mile Island nuclear accident in Dauphin County, Pennsylvania.
Godell leaves for the hearings but is chased by the goons waiting outside his home.
He grabs a gun from a security guard and forces everyone out, including his friend and co-worker Ted Spindler (Brimley).
CLICHES: This regretful 5-word sentence is a Thomas Wolfe book title
You Can't Go Home Again
Two Wolfe novels, The Web and the Rock and You Can't Go Home Again, were edited posthumously by Edward Aswell of Harper & Brothers.
3
Soon afterward, Wolfe returned to Europe and ended his affair with Mrs. Bernstein.
He returned to America and published a story based on his observations ("I Have a Thing to Tell You") in The New Republic.
Wolfe wrote to Aswell that while he had focused on his family in his previous writing, he would now take a more global perspective.
"S.A."s: A founding member of OPEC
Saudi Arabia
As of 2016, OPEC's members are Algeria, Angola, Ecuador, Indonesia, Iran, Iraq, Kuwait, Libya, Nigeria, Qatar, Saudi Arabia (the de facto leader), United Arab Emirates, and Venezuela.
2
(Within their sovereign territories, the national governments of OPEC members are able to impose production limits on both government-owned and private oil companies.)
On 10 September 2008, a production dispute occurred when the Saudis reportedly walked out of a negotiating session where rival members voted to reduce OPEC output.
ANCIENT ROME: The first book of this Roman poet's "Ars Amatoria", or "Art of Love", instructs its readers how to find a lover
Ovid
Mike Schutte |TKO |7 |January 26, 1976 |align=left| City Hall, Durban, Kwa-Zulu Natal |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Mike Schutte |PTS |10 |November 29, 1975 |align=left| Rand Stadium, Johannesburg, Gauteng |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| John Dino Denis |UD |10 |September 30, 1975 |align=left| Providence Civic Center, Providence, Rhode Island |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Wendell Joseph |UD |10 |August 29, 1975 |align=left| Saint Thomas, United States Virgin Islands |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Walter "Snake" White |SD |11 |March 7, 1975 |align=left| Curtis Hixon Hall, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Mike Quarry |UD |10 |January 3, 1975 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left|Earl Perrer |KO |6 |October 10, 1974 |align=left| Saint Thomas, United States Virgin Islands |align=left| |- |No Contest | |align=left| Eddie Owens |NC |9 |August 12, 1974 |align=left| Roberto Clemente Coliseum, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Vicente Rondon |TKO |2 |June 6, 1974 |align=left| Curtis Hixon Hall, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Draw | |align=left| Jose Manuel Urtain |PTS |8 |March 1, 1974 |align=left| Madrid, Community of Madrid |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Pedro Agosto |PTS |12 |December 17, 1973 |align=left| Roberto Clemente Coliseum, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| George Foreman |KO |1 |September 1, 1973 |align=left| Nihon Budokan, Tokyo |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Clyde Brown |KO |3 |June 28, 1973 |align=left| Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Terry Daniels |UD |10 |November 21, 1972 |align=left| Sahara Tahoe, Stateline, Nevada |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tony Ventura |TKO |2 |October 2, 1972 |align=left| Estadio Sixto Escobar, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Charley Polite |KO |1 |July 14, 1972 |align=left| Ponce, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Jose Manuel Urtain |UD |10 |April 3, 1972 |align=left| Hiram Bithorn Stadium, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Brian O'Melia |PTS |10 |February 14, 1972 |align=left| Hiram Bithorn Stadium, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| "Big" Robie Harris |SD |10 |October 29, 1971 |align=left| Anaheim Convention Center, Anaheim, California |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Jose Rondon |PTS |10 |May 1, 1971 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tommy Sheehan |KO |5 |February 25, 1971 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Jose Rondon |UD |10 |February 1, 1971 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Manuel "Pulgarcito" Ramos |PTS |10 |October 26, 1970 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Bill Hardney |KO |3 |August 24, 1970 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tommy Howard |KO |7 |July 27, 1970 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Jack O'Halloran |PTS |10 |May 25, 1970 |align=left| Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Moses Harrell |KO |2 |April 20, 1970 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tommy Grant |TKO |1 |April 7, 1970 |align=left| Municipal Auditorium, San Antonio, Texas |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Abe "Tiger" Brown |TKO |2 |March 31, 1970 |align=left| Sam Houston Coliseum, Houston, Texas |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tommy Howard |PTS |10 |March 18, 1970 |align=left| Citrus Bowl, Orlando, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Mike Bruce |PTS |10 |January 20, 1970 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| George "Moonport Mauler" Holden |TKO |4 |December 4, 1969 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Charles Cyril Clark |KO |3 |November 18, 1969 |align=left| Sam Houston Coliseum, Houston, Texas |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Abe "Tiger" Brown |KO |2 |November 13, 1969 |align=left| Fort Homer W. Hesterly Armory, Tampa, Florida |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Bowie Adams |TKO |3 |October 3, 1969 |align=left| Estadio Country Club, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Jack Bodell |PTS |10 |July 14, 1969 |align=left| Nottingham Ice Stadium, Nottingham, Nottinghamshire |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Chuck Wepner |PTS |10 |June 22, 1969 |align=left| Hiram Bithorn Stadium, San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Al Banks |PTS |10 |April 19, 1969 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Jack O'Halloran |PTS |10 |March 15, 1969 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Al Singletary |KO |10 |February 13, 1969 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Pedro Agosto |KO |12 |November 19, 1968 |align=left| San Juan, Puerto Rico |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Charlie "Emperor" Harris |KO |8 |May 20, 1968 |align=left| Audubon Ballroom, New York City |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Al Singletary |PTS |10 |April 15, 1968 |align=left| Audubon Ballroom, New York City |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Charley Polite |UD |8 |March 23, 1968 |align=left| Boston Arena, Boston, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Al Singletary |KO |7 |October 2, 1967 |align=left| Audubon Ballroom, New York City |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| James J. Johnson |PTS |8 |August 21, 1967 |align=left| Audubon Ballroom, New York City |align=left| |- |Draw | |align=left| Moses Harrell |PTS |8 |July 20, 1967 |align=left| Portland Exposition Building, Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Herman Harris |TKO |10 |June 5, 1967 |align=left| Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Loss | |align=left| Hal Carroll |SD |8 |April 24, 1967 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| James J. Johnson |UD |8 |March 27, 1967 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Don Waldheim |SD |4 |March 22, 1967 |align=left| Madison Square Garden, New York City |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Al Brooks |UD |6 |March 13, 1967 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Billy Muse |PTS |6 |March 2, 1967 |align=left| Portland Exposition Building, Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Tony Burwell |PTS |8 |January 16, 1967 |align=left| Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Joe Webb |KO |2 |January 9, 1967 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Abe Walden |PTS |6 |December 19, 1966 |align=left| Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Felix Viera |TKO |2 |December 16, 1966 |align=left| Madison Square Garden, New York City |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Abe Walden |TKO |5 |October 24, 1966 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left|Bill Haderman |KO |5 |October 20, 1966 |align=left| Portland Exposition Building, Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left|George Ford |KO |2 |October 17, 1966 |align=left| Mechanics Hall, Worcester, Massachusetts |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left|Wayne Webb |KO |2 |September 8, 1966 |align=left| Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left|John Hitts |KO |1 |August 4, 1966 |align=left| Portland Exposition Building, Portland, Maine |align=left| |- |Win | |align=left| Sam Sellers |PTS |4 |June 20, 1966 |align=left| Pittsburgh Civic Arena, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania |align=left| |}  See also  List of famous Puerto Ricans Sports in Puerto Rico  References  External links    Category:1946 births Category:Living people Category:People from Vega Baja, Puerto Rico Category:Puerto Rican boxers Category:Puerto Rican sportspeople Category:Male boxers
3
José "King" Roman (born December 17, 1946) is a Puerto Rican former boxer who was Puerto Rico's regional heavyweight champion.
He used to work at a Sweetbay Supermarket in Tampa, Florida.
Ossie Ocasio and Fres Oquendo also challenged for the world's heavyweight championship, both are also from Puerto Rico.
McGRAW-HILL: While Faith Hill hails from Mississippi, Tim McGraw grew up in Richland Parish in this state
Louisiana
In the days immediately following Hurricane Katrina, Hill and her husband, Tim McGraw, who was raised in Louisiana, joined groups taking supplies to Gulfport, Mississippi.
3
She then achieved mainstream and crossover success with her next two albums, Faith (1998) and Breathe (1999).
After a stint selling T-shirts, Hill became a secretary at a music publishing firm.
It's a lot of work to support a record, so I just want it to be ... really great.
HISTORICAL TV: Part One of this military miniseries saw David Schwimmer treating his WWII paratroopers harshly
Band of Brothers
He was then cast in the miniseries Band of Brothers (2001) as Herbert Sobel.
3
Encouraged by his school drama teacher to further his acting, he flew to Chicago for an acting workshop.
He noted that the experience was both "enlightening and exhilarating".
For his performance, Schwimmer received critical reviews.
THE NEW 7 WONDERS OF THE WORLD: (Sarah of the Clue Crew stands near a Wonder in Peru.) One of the most impressive & mysterious structures at this ancient site is the Intihuatana pyramid, whose name means "hitching post of the sun"
Machu Picchu
thumb|right|The citadel of Machu Picchu, an iconic symbol of pre-Columbian Peru In the 15th century, the Incas emerged as a powerful state which, in the span of a century, formed the largest empire in pre-Columbian America with their capital in Cusco.
3
The Andes mountains run parallel to the Pacific Ocean; they define the three regions traditionally used to describe the country geographically.
Perú Siglo XXI", series of 11 working papers describing sectorial long-term forecasts, Grade, Lima, Peru, 1986-1987.
Peru
DRAMA: A brother & sister argue over the fate of a piano in this Pulitzer-winning play by August Wilson
The Piano Lesson
Work Wilson's best known plays are Fences (1985) (which won a Pulitzer Prize and a Tony Award), The Piano Lesson (1990) (a Pulitzer Prize and the New York Drama Critics' Circle Award), Ma Rainey's Black Bottom, and Joe Turner's Come and Gone.
3
In 1980 he received a fellowship for The Playwrights' Center in Minneapolis.
It follows the Joe Louis/Billy Conn fight in 1940 and the loss of values attendant on the Great Migration to the urban North.
The streets that Balboa walked were his own private ocean, and Balboa was drowning.
HISTORIC QUOTATIONS: On July 13, 1859 he told Horace Greeley, "I have fifteen wives; I know no one who has more"
Brigham Young
Sending dispatches back to be published in the Tribune, Greeley took the Overland Trail, reaching Salt Lake City, where he conducted a two-hour interview with the Mormon leader, Brigham Young, the first newspaper interview Young had given.
3
Leading against the corruption of Grant's Republican administration, Greeley was the new Liberal Republican Party's candidate in the 1872 U.S. presidential election.
"
Lincoln supposedly asked a Tribune correspondent, "What in the world is the matter with Uncle Horace?
IT'S GOOD TO BE "KING": In this 1996 film comedy, Woody Harrelson takes an Amish bowling prodigy under his wing
Kingpin
Some notable film characters include basketball hustler Billy Hoyle in White Men Can't Jump, one-handed bowler Roy Munson in Kingpin, Haymitch Abernathy in The Hunger Games film series, Tallahassee in Zombieland, serial killer Mickey Knox in Natural Born Killers, magazine publisher Larry Flynt in The People vs. Larry Flynt, and country singer Dusty in A Prairie Home Companion.
3
Advocacy work thumb|Harrelson in 2004  Drug reform/green industry Harrelson is an enthusiast and supporter for the legalization of marijuana and hemp.
Now You See Me 2 Merritt McKinney Filming 2016
Supporting Actor - Motion Picture
JAZZ: In Woody Allen's "Sweet And Lowdown", Sean Penn idolizes this great gypsy jazz guitarist
Django Reinhardt
The film tells the story, set in the 1930s, of a fictional jazz guitarist named Emmet Ray (played by Sean Penn) who regards himself as the second greatest guitarist in the world (after jazz icon Django Reinhardt) who falls in love with a mute woman (Samantha Morton).
3
Bjorkman, Stig, ed.
Morton's nomination was especially notable, considering the fact that she does not utter a single word of dialogue in the film.
In addition to her Oscar nomination, Morton's performance was met with critical acclaim, with Salon.com critic Stephanie Zacharek saying that she "quietly explodes [the film]...
ON BROADWAY: Simone, the daughter of singer Nina Simone, took over the title role in this Elton John & Tim Rice show in 2002
Aida
An Academy Award, Golden Globe Award, Tony Award and Grammy Award-winning lyricist, Rice is best known for his collaborations with Andrew Lloyd Webber, with whom he wrote Joseph and the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat, Jesus Christ Superstar and Evita, with Björn Ulvaeus and Benny Andersson of ABBA, with whom he wrote Chess, and for additional songs for the 2011 West End revival of The Wizard of Oz, and for his work for Walt Disney Studios with Alan Menken (Aladdin, Beauty and the Beast, King David), Elton John (The Lion King, Aida, The Road to El Dorado) and Ennio Morricone.
3
He later attended the Sorbonne in Paris for a year.
On 15 and 22 October 2011 Rice was guest presenter for the BBC Radio 2 show Sounds of the 60s, standing in for regular presenter Brian Matthew who was unwell.
Co-produced, with Andrew Powell, Elaine Paige's 1981 self-titled album Occasional panellist on the BBC Radio 4 panel game
THE HOLLYWOOD WALK OF FAME: You don't have to "Imagine" that this musician's star is in front of Capitol Records...that's where it is
John Lennon
New artists included John Lennon, Helen Reddy, Anne Murray, Skylark (Canadian band), April Wine, Blondie,  Bloodrock,   Burning Spear, Buzzcocks, David Bowie, Kim Carnes,  Rosanne Cash, Max Webster,  Lee Clayton,  Natalie Cole, The Goose Creek Symphony, Sammy Hagar, The Knack, Maze,  Mink DeVille,  Juice Newton,   Raspberries, Minnie Riperton, Diana Ross, Sweet, The Specials, The Sylvers, Ten Wheel Drive, The Stranglers, Tavares, George Thorogood,  Triumvirate,   Little River Band,   Wings and The Persuasions.
3
Around this time they were added J. Holiday, the main artist for Capitol Music Group as they had become frequent collaborators.
Steve Barnett, previously an employee of Columbia Records, was recruited to run the division.
Capitol tried to strike gold again with another spoken word album, one made from the 1970 film Cromwell, starring Richard Harris and Alec Guinness, but neither the film nor album were successful.
WE LOVE BROADWAY: There are gory goings-on in "The Lieutenant of Inishmore", a black comedy set in this country's Aran Islands
Ireland
thumb|Map of Ireland, with the Aran Islands highlighted thumb|The Aran Islands, on the west coast of Ireland  The Aran Islands (—pronunciation: ) or The Arans (na hÁrainneacha—) are a group of three islands located at the mouth of Galway Bay, on the west coast of Ireland.
3
The 1,200 inhabitants primarily speak Irish, the language used in local placenames.
Location and access  The approaches to the bay between the Aran Islands and the mainland are as follows:   North SoundAn Súnda ó Thuaidh (more accurately Bealach Locha Lurgan) lies between Inishmore and Lettermullen, County Galway.
Adapted to the absence of luxuries that many parts of the Western world had enjoyed for decades and in some cases, centuries.
GOVERNMENT & POLITICS: In 1990 Douglas Wilder became the USA's first elected black governor after winning election in this state
Virginia
Lawrence Douglas Wilder (born January 17, 1931) is an American politician, who served as the second African American to be elected as governor of Virginia and first African-American governor of any state since Reconstruction.
3
At the Battle of Pork Chop Hill, he and two other men found themselves cut off from their unit, but they bluffed nineteen Chinese soldiers into surrendering, for which Wilder was awarded the Bronze Star Medal.
During his tenure as governor, Wilder worked on crime and gun control initiatives.
The next governor elected was Republican George Allen.
GENESIS: His 12-volume "A Study Of History" probed the genesis, growth & decline of the world's great civilizations
Arnold Toynbee
31, 1955; What the Book is For: How the Book Took Shape (a pamphlet written upon completion of the final volumes of A Study of History) and a comment written in response to the articles by Edward Fiess and Pieter Geyl (originally published in Journal of the History of Ideas, vol. 16, 1955.)  Arnold Toynbee suggests that the civilisation as a whole is the proper unit for the study of history, not the nation state, which he suggests is just a part of a larger whole.
3
1946)This first abridgement by Somervell has been translated into Arabic, Danish, Dutch, Finish, French, German, Gujarati, Hindi, Italian, Japanese, Norwegian, Portuguese, Serbo-Croat, Spanish, Swedish, and Urdu.
He suggests a list of 21 civilisations, and an additional 5 "arrested civilisations", but when one examines this list it seems to be very arbitrary at times where one civilisation ends and a new one starts.
Jacquetta Hawkes considers these two aspects of the same civilisation (which she calls Mino-Mycenaean, a finding that would be supported by Leonard Robert Palmer from his studies of Linear B).
SEASONAL ACTING: This actress from "The Poseidon Adventure" & "A Patch of Blue" passed away in January 2006
Shelley Winters
Shelley Winters won the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress, her second win for the award, following her victory in 1959 for The Diary of Anne Frank.
3
Rose-Ann's friend, Sadie, is also a prostitute, and while lamenting the loss of her youth, she realizes that Selina can be useful in their business.
Selina tells him that she loves him, and knows that he is black, and that it does not matter to her.
See also List of American films of 1965  References  External links
6 DEGREES OF KEVIN BACON: Cindy Crawford was in "Fair Game" with William Baldwin, who did this medical school thriller with Kevin
Flatliners
William Joseph Baldwin (born February 21, 1963) is an American actor, producer, and writer known for his starring roles in such films as Flatliners (1990), Backdraft (1991), Sliver (1993), Fair Game (1995), Virus (1999), Double Bang (2001), as Johnny 13 in Danny Phantom (2004–2007), Art Heist (2004), The Squid and the Whale (2005), as himself in Forgetting Sarah Marshall (2008), as Senator Patrick Darling in the drama series Dirty Sexy Money (2007–2009), Justice League: Crisis on Two Earths (2010), as William van der Woodsen on Gossip Girl until December 2012, and as Gordon Flint on Parenthood.
3
He portrayed Chicago firefighter Brian McCaffrey in Backdraft.
Baldwin was cast in the second season of Parenthood to play a boss and love interest for several episodes.
Filmography + Film Year Title Role Notes1989The Preppie Murder  Robert Chambers TV movieBorn on the Fourth of July  U.S. Marine –
INTERNATIONAL: Oil up with some serious sunscreen as you trek to Alice Springs, the center of this nation's vast "Red Centre"
Australia
Alice Springs  (Arrernte: Mparntwe) is the third largest town in the Northern Territory, Australia.
1
Alice Springs' population of Aboriginal residents is overrepresented as offenders in violent crimes, accounting for over three quarters of assault offenders.http://www.aic.gov.au/publications/current%20series/special/1-20/004.html Assaults are common in Aboriginal town camps and 95 per cent of people in the town fleeing domestic violence are indigenous.http://www.abc.net.au/7.30/content/2012/s3528915.htm
REMEMBERING TED KENNEDY: Destined for a political career, Ted Kennedy was born Feb. 22, 1932, the 200th anniv. of this president's birth
George Washington
John asked to be the newborn's godfather, a request his parents honored, though they did not agree to his request to name the baby George Washington Kennedy (the newborn had been born on the first president's 200th birthday); they named him after their father's assistant instead.
3
33–35.
One of Kennedy's biggest battles in the Senate came with Reagan's July 1987 nomination of Judge Robert Bork to the U.S. Supreme Court.
Kennedy's mother Rose died in January 1995 at the age of 104.
PEOPLE: Christine Todd Whitman was elected the 50th governor of this state in 1993
New Jersey
Christine "Christie" Todd Whitman (born September 26, 1946) is an American Republican politician and author who served as the 50th Governor of New Jersey from 1994 to 2001, and was the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency in the administration of President George W. Bush from 2001 to 2003.
3
The decline in the tax burden made it likely that the issue of tax revenue shortfall would be addressed later.
The New York Times.
Whitman stepped down in protest against such demand by the White House, she said.
A WOMAN OF THE WORLD: She was in Kenya when she learned she had become queen on February 6, 1952
Elizabeth II
ISBN 1741047730  In 1952, Queen Elizabeth II and her husband Prince Phillip were on holiday at the Treetops Hotel in Kenya when her father, King George VI, died in his sleep.
3
Don Nanjira, Daniel (2010) African Foreign Policy and Diplomacy:
In 2012, the nation placed 139th out of 176 total countries in the CPI, with a score of 27/100.
There is much celebration and a graduation ceremony at the end of KG3 when the children are ready to join class one in primary school.
LANGUAGES: An official language of Kenya, its name means "coast people"
Swahili
Swahili culture and trade (1st century–19th century)
3
The "Big Five" game animals of Africa, that is the lion, leopard, buffalo, rhinoceros, and elephant, can be found in Kenya and in the Masai Mara in particular.
thumb|left|The Kenya–Uganda railway near Mombasa, about 1899.
Since the election riots, the government and civil society organisations started programmes to avoid similar disasters in the future, said Agnes R. M. Aboum – executive director of TAABCO Research and Development Consultants in Nairobi – in the magazine D+C Development and Cooperation.
INVENTIONS: Name shared by a Beatles album title & a 1835 invention of Samuel Colt
revolver
He founded Colt's Patent Fire-Arms Manufacturing Company (today, Colt's Manufacturing Company), and made the mass production of the revolver commercially viable.
3
With the money he made from the sales of the Walkers and a loan from his cousin, banker Elisha Colt, Colt bought the machinery and tooling from Blake to build his own factory: Colt's Patent Fire-Arms Manufacturing Company factory at Hartford.
However, Colt's lawyers doubted that this suit would have been successful and the case was resolved with a settlement of $15,000.
Later versions contained his entire signature which was used in many of his advertisements as a centerpiece, using his celebrity to guarantee the performance of his weapons.
CALENDARS: This "Oldest Living Teenager" has a calendar with daily "American Bandstand" trivia
Dick Clark
American Bandstand is an American music-performance show that aired in various versions from 1952 to 1989 and was hosted from 1956 until its final season by Dick Clark, who also served as producer.
3
The program was broadcast live, weekday afternoons and, by 1959, the show had a national audience of 20 million.
50th Anniversary   thumb|American Bandstands 50th anniversary reunion in 2002.
American Bandstand was a daily ritual for many teenagers throughout the nation.
ACTORS' ALMA MATERS: 20 years after attending Gonzaga University in Spokane, Washington, he won an Oscar in 1945
Bing Crosby
Among the most notable are statues of St. Ignatius, St. Joseph, St. Aloysius, and alumnus Bing Crosby.
3
thumb|800px|center|360° panorama on the campus of Gonzaga University  Organization and administration thumb|upright|College Hall  The 2014–15 operating budget is $246.7 million, with an annual payroll of $75 million.
The university's men's basketball team, which did not make its first appearance in the NCAA tournament until 1995 (more than a decade after NBA Hall of Fame player and Gonzaga alum John Stockton graduated), has made the regional finals of the NCAA tournament (the "Elite Eight") in 1999, re-appearing in the tournament every year since ().
owner of the Minnesota Twins  Robert Spitzer, SJ – Jesuit priest, philosopher, educator and author  Kevin Waters – Jesuit priest, composer, educator  Jim Wickwire –
"E"COLLEGEY: Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute has majors in 14 types of this, including aeronautical
engineering
Rensselaer is organized into six main schools within which there are thirty-seven departments: the School of Architecture; School of Engineering; School of Humanities, Arts, and Social Sciences; School of Information Technology and Web Science; School of Science; and the Lally School of Management & Technology.
3
The Houston Field House (1949) was reassembled, after being moved in pieces from its original Rhode Island location.
On October 4, 2008, the university celebrated the grand opening of the Experimental Media and Performing Arts Center (EMPAC) situated on the west edge of campus.
RPI has around twenty intramural sports organizations, many of which are broken down into different divisions based on level of play.
THE WOMEN OF TEXAS: This Miss Texas went on to become Miss America of 1971 & first lady of Kentucky in 1980
Phyllis George
right|thumb|120px|Bess Myerson, Miss America 1945 right|thumb|120px|Lee MeriwetherMiss America 1955 right|thumb|120px|Phyllis George, Miss America 1971 right|thumb|120px|Vanessa L. Williams, Miss America 1984 right|thumb|120px|Erika Harold, Miss America 2003 right|thumb|120 px|Nina Davuluri, Miss America 2014   1921–1967
3
She also participated in one of the last USO-Miss America tours in Vietnam.
She thus cut short her Miss America tour and instead traveled with the Anti-Defamation League.
It would also be the last time Russell served as host.
NOVELS, BOOKS & LITERATURE: Helen Graham is "The Tenant of Wildfell Hall" in a novel by this youngest Bronte sister
Anne Brontë
The Tenant of Wildfell Hall is the second and final novel by the English author Anne Brontë.
3
When his friends depart Arthur pines openly for his paramour and derides his wife.
She adores her only son and tries to marry off her daughters as soon as possible.
Arthur continues drinking even after he injures himself falling from a horse, which eventually leads to his death.
CHINA TOWNS: Kunming, the terminus of this WWII road, is still serviced by it
Burma Road
It was important during World War II as a Chinese military center, American air base, and transport terminus for the Burma Road.
3
It has a large and elaborate network of waterways and winding paths, with broad, lotus-covered pools and overhanging willows.
Kunming's government has begun to acknowledge the growing influence of consumer spending on economic growth.
Kunming aims to build a city run by solar energy  Suntech Power announced in December 2008 that it is jointly constructing a solar energy project with Yunnan Provincial Power Investment and other investors.
WORLD RELIGION: By definition, the Hashemites are either direct or collateral descendants of this prophet
Muhammad
Their eponymous ancestor is Hashim ibn Abd Manaf, great-grandfather of the Islamic prophet, Muhammad.
2
In 1908, Hussein bin Ali was appointed to the Emirate of Mecca.
Prince Zeid bin Hussein, who moved to Jordan when his brother's grandson, King Faisal II of Iraq, was overthrown and murdered in a coup in 1958.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: Subtitles of books in this 19th century series include "A Tale", "The Inland Sea" & "The First War-Path"
Leatherstocking Tales
Cooper's Leatherstocking Tales about Natty Bumppo (which includes The Last of the Mohicans) were popular both in the new country and abroad.
3
Depression era writers included John Steinbeck (1902–1968), notable for his novel The Grapes of Wrath.
In 1794 the novel was reissued in Philadelphia under the title, Charlotte Temple.
Another neglected and challenging postwar American novelist, albeit one who wrote much shorter works, was John Hawkes, whose often surreal, visionary fiction addresses themes of violence and eroticism and experiments audaciously with narrative voice and style.
WE LOVE THE THEATRE: Son of a gun!  Bernadette Peters won her second Tony in 1999, for playing Annie Oakley in this musical revival
Annie Get Your Gun
The New York Times, February 28, 1999, p. AR5, accessed March 28, 2008 Peters is particularly noted for her roles on the Broadway stage, including in the musicals Mack and Mabel, Sunday in the Park with George, Song and Dance, Into the Woods, Annie Get Your Gun and Gypsy.
3
Follies.
Ross, Blake. "
Rolling Stone Magazine, February 18, 1982, pp. 10-13, re-printed at redknotstudio.com, accessed February 24, 2012 (note: author not shown, see Fong-Torres, Ben)
SHAKESPEARE'S SMALL PARTS: Nym, a minor character, is a follower of this stout fellow in "The Merry Wives of Windsor"
Falstaff
thumb|The title page of the 1619 quarto (the False Folio): A most pleasant and excellent conceited comedy, of Sir John Falstaffe, and the merry wiues of Windsor.
2
Fenton chides the parents for trying to force Anne to marry men she did not love and the parents accept the marriage and congratulate the young pair.
Arthur Sullivan composed incidental music for use in Act V of an 1874 production at the Gaiety Theatre, London, which was also used in the 1889 Haymarket Theatre production.
GRANDFATHERS: George du Maurier, grandfather of this "Rebecca" author, was quite an author himself
Daphne du Maurier
He was the father of actor Gerald du Maurier and grandfather of the writers Angela du Maurier and Dame Daphne du Maurier.
3
He was brought up to believe that his aristocratic grandparents fled France during the Revolution, leaving vast estates behind in France, to live in England as émigrés.
Among several other novels he illustrated was Misunderstood by Florence Montgomery in 1873.The Feminist Companion to Literature in English, eds Virginia Blain, Patricia Clements and Isobel Grundy (London: Batsford, 1990), p. 752.
Writer thumb|George du Maurier in the middle of his career.
VIETNAM: The large "S" shape that is Vietnam juts out into this sea with a directional name
South China Sea
The country is bordered by China to the north, Laos to the northwest, Cambodia to the southwest, and Malaysia across the South China Sea to the southeast.
3
Retrieved 30 June 2013.Human Events.
Vietnam is the world's second largest exporter of coffee.
Vietnam has participated in the Summer Olympic Games since 1952, when it competed as the State of Vietnam.
TUESDAY: Tuesday was Oscar-nominated for her role in this 1977 Diane Keaton film
Looking For Mr. Goodbar
She became an accomplished dramatic performer, starring in Looking for Mr. Goodbar (1977) and received Academy Award nominations for Reds (1981), Marvin's Room (1996) and Something's Gotta Give (2003).
3
Her next two films with Allen, Sleeper (1973) and Love and Death (1975), established her as a comic actor.
Also in 1996, Keaton starred as Bessie, a woman with leukemia, in Marvin's Room, an adaptation of the play by Scott McPherson.
Keaton also directed the film, despite claiming in a 1996 interview that she would never direct herself in a film, saying "as a director, you automatically have different goals.
AT THE MOVIES: Diane Keaton succumbs to a mysterious murderer in this morbid 1977 study of the singles-bar scene
Looking for Mr. Goodbar
She became an accomplished dramatic performer, starring in Looking for Mr. Goodbar (1977) and received Academy Award nominations for Reds (1981), Marvin's Room (1996) and Something's Gotta Give (2003).
3
It was an adventure for me.
In Baby Boom, Keaton starred as a Manhattan career woman who is suddenly forced to care for a toddler.
She played a fanatical nun in the religious drama Sister Mary
ROAMIN' WITH THE ROMANS: Founded by the Romans as Aquae Sulis, this British city is still a popular health & holiday resort
Bath
alt=Photograph of the Baths showing a rectangular area of greenish water surrounded by yellow stone buildings with pillars.
3
There is some dispute as to whether these new buildings were private dwellings or were associated with servicing the pilgrims to the temple.
There was also a ribbon development along the northern road outside the walls and cemeteries beyond.
From the later 3rd century on, the Western Roman Empire and its urban life declined.
RECORD ALBUMS: Quincy Jones produced his "Thriller" album & his "Bad" one, too
Michael Jackson
Jones was the producer, with Michael Jackson, of Jackson's albums Off the Wall (1979), Thriller (1982), and Bad (1987), as well as being the producer and conductor of the 1985 charity song "We Are the World".
2
The first episode features him in the studio, producing "I Knew I Loved you" for Celine Dion.
It Might as Well Be Swing (1964).
MOVIE PHONE: Colin Farrell is trapped by sniper (& caller) Kiefer Sutherland in this thriller
Phone Booth
He then starred in Schumacher's psychological thriller Phone Booth (2002) and the American thrillers S.W.A.T. and The Recruit (both 2003), establishing his international box-office appeal.
3
The actor was more successful in 2006 with his role opposite Jamie Foxx in Michael Mann's action crime drama, Miami Vice.
Michael Phillips of the Los Angeles Times wrote that Farrell brought "massive, slobby relish" to his role as Sudeikis's cocaine-fiend boss.
Their relationship ended in mid-2010.
OPERA: Part of this Rossini opera takes place on the shores of Lake Lucerne
William Tell
Gioacchino Rossini uses this in his Overture to William Tell Section A: Sunrise over the Alps.
3
Steamers and other passenger boats ply between the different villages and towns on the lake.
thumb|left|View of the Urnersee from near Morschach in Uri, southwards, with Bauen on the left shore on the right Lake Lucerne is singularly irregular and appears to lie in four different valleys, all related to the conformation of the adjoining mountains.
At the eastern end of the Gersauerbecken, where the containing walls of the lake-valley are directed from east to west, it is joined at an acute angle by the arm of Uri, or the Urnersee, lying in the northern prolongation of the deep cleft that gives a passage to the Reuss, between the Uri Alps and the Glarus Alps.
MOVIES BY THE NUMBERS: Richard Lester directed both "The Three Musketeers" & this 1974 follow-up
The Four Musketeers
However his biggest commercial successes in this period were The Three Musketeers and its sequel The Four Musketeers.
3
Superman In the 1970s, Lester directed a wide variety of films, including the disaster film Juggernaut, Robin and Marian, starring Sean Connery and Audrey Hepburn and the period romance Cuba, also starring Connery.
Soderbergh wrote a 1999 book, Getting Away With It, which consists largely of interviews with Lester.
Superman II (1980)
FACTS & FIGURES: There are 88 of these, which run alphabetically from Andromeda to Vulpecula
constellations
Hevelius did not regard the fox and the goose to be two separate constellations, but later the stars were divided into a separate Anser and Vulpecula.
3
It was identified in the seventeenth century, and is located in the middle of the Summer Triangle (an asterism consisting of the bright stars Deneb, Vega and Altair).
Notable features thumb|left|200px|The constellation Vulpecula as it can be seen by the naked eye.
This means that it is also classified as a radio galaxy.
SCULPTURE: Alexander Calder called these creations "four-dimensional drawings"
Mobiles
mobiles” by Marcel Duchamp, a French pun meaning both "motion" and "motive."Alexander Calder, Romulus and Remus (1928) Guggenheim Collection.
3
Hayes, Margaret Calder, Three Alexander Calders: A Family Memoir.
"I was not very sure what this term meant, but I thought I'd better adopt it," he later wrote in his autobiography.
In 2010, his metal mobile Untitled (Autumn Leaves), sold at Sotheby's New York for $3.7 million.
HOSPITALS: This city's Johns Hopkins hospital opened on May 7, 1889; today, it's part of a $5 billion medical system
Baltimore
December 24, 1873) was an American entrepreneur, abolitionist and philanthropist of 19th-century Baltimore, Maryland.
2
The Racial Record of Johns Hopkins University in the Journal of Blacks in Higher Education, No. 25, Autumn, 1999, pp.
See also The Racial Record of Johns Hopkins University in the Journal of Blacks in Higher Education, No. 25, Autumn, 1999, pp. 42–43/ JSTOR  Johns Hopkins, Maryland State Archives  "The History of African Americans @ Johns Hopkins University" See in particular the chronology and the paper by Danton Rodriguez.
THE 17th CENTURY: In 1647 astronomer Johannes Hevelius published the 1st detailed atlas of this heavenly body
the moon
Daintith, John, Biographical Encyclopedia of Scientists, CRC Books, 1994, ISBN 0-7503-0287-9 at Google Books  Hevelius made observations of sunspots, 1642–1645, devoted four years to charting the lunar surface, discovered the Moon's libration in longitude, and published his results in Selenographia, sive Lunae descriptio (1647), a work which entitles him to be called "the founder of lunar topography."
3
Encyklopedyja powszechna S. Orgelbranda:nowe stereotypowe odbicie, vols 5-6 page 243.
After gymnasium, where he was taught by Peter Crüger, Hevelius in 1630 studied jurisprudence at Leiden, then travelled in England and France, meeting Pierre Gassendi, Marin Mersenne and Athanasius Kircher.
thumb|upright|left|Johannes Hevelius and wife Elisabeth making observations  A halo phenomenon was observed by many in Gdańsk and described by Hevelius to pastor Georg Fehlau of St. Mary's church, titled Siebenfältiges Sonnenwunder oder sieben Nebensonnen, so in diesem 1661 Jahr den 20.
TOUGH SCIENCE: This element, symbol Mg, occurs naturally in such minerals as dolomite & brucite
magnesium
Military MG, a prefix typically used for machine gun model designations (for example, "MG42" and "MG3") Major General, a military rank used by many countries; the specific "MG" abbreviation is used in the United States Medal for Gallantry (MG), an Australian military decoration, introduced in 1991  Nations .mg, the Internet country code top-level domain for Madagascar Madagascar, ISO 3166-1 country code (MG) Malagasy language (mg), the national language of Madagascar Minas Gerais (MG), a Brazilian state Mongolia, FIPS 10-4 country code (MG)  Science and technology Magnesium, symbol for the chemical element (Mg) Michaelis-Gutmann bodies (M-G bodies), concentrically layered basophilic inclusions in the urinary tract Monoglyceride, or monoacylglycerol Motor-generator (M-G), a device for converting electrical power to another form Myasthenia gravis (MG), an autoimmune disease mg (editor) (mg), an Emacs-compatible Unix text editor  Transportation The MG Car Company Limited (1924–2005), a now defunct British automobile manufacturer  MG Motor (2006-present), MG Cars now owned by SAIC  MG, IATA code for Champion Air (1995–), an American charter airline   MG, code for the Swiss mountain railway known as Monte Generoso railway  Units of measurement Multiples of the base unit of mass gram,  Milligram (mg), 10−3 gram  Megagram (Mg), 106 grams Multiples of a unit of magnetic field Gauss (unit), Milligauss (mG), equivalent to 1.0 × 10−7 tesla  Megagauss (MG), 100 teslas  Category:Two-letter disambiguation pages
2
MG, Mg, or mg and variants may refer to:  Education Main gauche (m.g.
, French), a term indicating "left hand" in piano music Matematička gimnazija, a Belgrade special school, elementary and high school, for those gifted in mathematics, physics and ICT  Entertainment and media  MG (The Perhapanauts), a character in The Perhapanauts comics  Memphis Group (M.G.), from the band Booker T. & the M.G.'s fronted by Booker T. Jones  MG Select, a house duo music production from Chicago named after Marc Mitchell and George Jackson  The MG's (album), an album recorded by Booker T.'s band  Match Game (MG) (1962–1969; 1973–1979; 1983–1984; 1990–1991), an American television game show  MG (Martin Gore album) an album recorded by Martin Gore, the primary songwriter for the band Depeche Mode  Middle Grade, that is, suitable for ages 8 - 12.
NICKNAMES: (Hi there.  I’m George Jones.)  You know, early in my career, a deejay gave me this nickname because he thought I resembled a certain American marsupial
"Possum"
Deejay Gordon Baxter told Nick Tosches that Jones acquired the nickname "possum" while working there: "One of the deejays there, Slim Watts, took to calling him George P. Willicker Picklepuss Possum Jones.
3
Like the old saying goes, it takes time to heal things and they've been healed quite a while."
In 2013, Robbie Robertson told Uncut, "
His dependence on drugs and alcohol reduced him to a 170-pound shell.
ROCK-Y: Michael Stipe formed this "Man on the Moon" band in Athens, Georgia
R.E.M.
He was the lead singer of the alternative rock band R.E.M. from their formation in 1980 until their dissolution in 2011.
3
Stipe had planned a collaboration with friend, Kurt Cobain of Nirvana, in 1994; partly in an attempt to lure Cobain away from his home and his drug addiction.
Full cast and crew  In 1998 he worked on Single Cell Pictures, a film production company which released several arthouse / indie movies.
Stipe has made a number of acting appearances on film and on television.
NATIONAL "VELVET": Bobby Vinton revived this Tony Bennett song & took it to No. 1 in 1963
Blue Velvet
Bennett's recording of "Blue Velvet" was also very popular and attracted screaming teenaged fans at concerts at the famed Paramount Theater in New York (Bennett did seven shows a day, starting at 10:30 a.m.) and elsewhere.
3
Anna had been born in the U.S. shortly after her parents also emigrated from the Calabria region in 1899.
She had invited Bob Hope to the show.
pp.
THE 13 COLONIES: This colony was granted to Sir George Carteret who had been lt. governor of one of the Channel Islands
New Jersey
He was also one of the original Lords Proprietor of the former British colony of Carolina and New Jersey.
2
George Carteret also had Charles II proclaimed King in Saint Helier on 17 February 1649, after the execution of his father, Charles I. Charles II never forgot this gesture.
He then went into exile in France, where he was imprisoned in 1657 and then exiled from there, after which he went to Venice.
RAILROAD TIES: The Trans-Siberian RR, the world's longest track, covers 5,700 miles from Nakhodka to this capital
Moscow
However, Nakhodka has been declared a free economic zone, and the governments in both Moscow (federal) and Vladivostok (regional) have seemed interested in opening the city further to foreign investment.
3
When the Soviet government decided to build a harbor in the area in the 1930s, a number of small settlements were founded, which were merged as a work settlement in the 1940s.
Local industry also took a hit during the 1998 Russian financial crisis.
Nakhodka is also an important transport junction where goods from Japan are transferred from ships onto the Russian railway system, including the Trans-Siberian Railway portion of the Eurasian Land Bridge.
ANCIENT GREECE: The serfs of this warlike city-state were called Helots
Sparta
The helots (; , heílotes) were a subjugated population group that formed the main population of Laconia and Messenia, the territory controlled by Sparta.
2
Histories, 8, 28-29.
Additionally, a helot revolt in Laconia is unlikely, and Messenians would not likely have taken refuge at Cape Taenarus.
FROM BOOK TO TV: Pamela Sue Martin, who played this sleuth, left her show when it was merged with the Hardy Boys
Nancy Drew
Pamela Sue Martin (born January 5, 1953) is an American actress best known for playing Nancy Drew on The Hardy Boys/Nancy Drew Mysteries TV series and Fallon Carrington Colby on the ABC nighttime soap opera Dynasty.
2
In 1984, Martin, who has long been involved in environmental causes, appeared in a public service announcement to help save pink dolphins in the Amazon River.
Martin owns a theatre company in Idaho.
AMERICAN HISTORY: He related the story of Pocahontas in his "General History of Virginia" in 1624
John Smith
In a well-known historical anecdote, she is said to have saved the life of an Indian captive, Englishman John Smith, in 1607 by placing her head upon his own when her father raised his war club to execute him.
3
Later portraits often portrayed her as more European in appearance.
Purchas, Samuel.
Retrieved February 18, 2011.
BROADWAY: It's not easy for this "Beauty and the Beast" heroine to trip the light fantastic: her ball gown weighs more than 40 lbs.
Belle
Belle: A Retelling of Beauty and the Beast by Cameron Dokey, and Spirited by Nancy Holder, both part of the Once Upon A Time series.
3
Cambridge: Cambridge UP, 2002. it is based on the second version of the tale.
Roses & Thorns :
The film, which relied on moderate animation techniques but was mostly faithful to the original tale, featured classical compositions as opposed to an original soundtrack, featuring the works of many well-known popular composers.
MADISON AVE.: Ad man Cliff Freeman came up with this catchphrase delivered by Clara Peller in Wendy's commercials
"Where's the beef?"
Clara Peller (August 4, 1902 – August 11, 1987), was a manicurist and  American character actress who, at the age of 81, starred in the 1984 "Where's the beef?" advertising campaign for the Wendy's fast food restaurant chain, created by the Dancer Fitzgerald Sample advertising agency.
3
However, after the Prego commercial aired on television in 1985, Wendy's management decided to terminate her contract, contending that the Prego commercial implies "that Clara found the beef at somewhere other than Wendy's restaurants".Time Magazine, Investments: An Affirmative Action; Advertising
: It's Over There, in the Spaghetti 1 April 1985 In announcing the dismissal, Wendy's Denny Lynch stated, "Clara can find the beef only in one place, and that is Wendy's".Clara Peller, Advertising Mascots-People, TVacres.com Peller's response was short and swift: "I've made them millions, and they don't appreciate me."
References Notes  External links     Clara Peller at graveyards.com    Category:1902 births Category:1987 deaths Category:Actresses from Chicago, Illinois Category:American film actresses Category:American television actresses Category:Jewish American actresses Category:Wendy's International Category:20th-century American actresses
MEMORABLE CONCERTS: On Aug. 14, 2010 the English Baroque soloists presented all 6 of this master's Brandenburg Concertos
Bach
right|thumb|220px|Johann Sebastian Bach  The Brandenburg Concertos by Johann Sebastian Bach (BWV 1046–1051, original title: Six Concerts à plusieurs instruments)Johann Sebastian Bach's Werke, vol.19: Kammermusik, dritter band, Bach-Gesellschaft, Leipzig; ed.
3
Modern performance approaches range from simply playing the cadence with minimal ornamentation (treating it as a sort of "musical semicolon"), to inserting movements from other works, to cadenzas varying in length from under a minute to over two minutes.
The outer movements use the ritornello form found in many instrumental and vocal works of the time.
Ars Rediviva, Milan Munclinger, 1977 New Czech Radio recordings, Brandenburg Concertos in MP3 and FLAC Musica Florea, Musica Florea, Marek Štryncl, 2006 – free download; for updated information to this Czech Radio webpage see (Czech) An animated version of the Third Concerto on YouTube.
BOOKS & AUTHORS: Leon Uris titled Book I of this novel "Beyond Jordan"
Exodus
His two bestselling books were Exodus (published in 1958) and Trinity (published in 1976)."Author Leon Uris Dies at 78", The Elyria (Ohio) Chronicle Telegram, June 25, 2003, p. A8.
2
He derived his surname from Yerushalmi, meaning "man of Jerusalem".
thumb|left|Uris in Israel in the 1950s Coming out of the service, he worked for a newspaper, writing in his spare time.
ROCK LEGENDS: His solo in Led Zeppelin's "Stairway To Heaven" has been called the greatest guitar solo ever
Jimmy Page
It was composed by guitarist Jimmy Page and vocalist Robert Plant for the band's untitled fourth studio album (often called Led Zeppelin IV).
3
Composition The song consists of several distinct sections, beginning with a quiet introduction on a finger-picked six-string guitar and four recorders in a Renaissance music style (ending at 2:15) and gradually moving into a slow electric middle section (2:16–5:33), then a long guitar solo (5:34–6:44), before the faster hard rock final section (6:45 to 7:45), ending with a short vocals-only epilogue.
In total, over one million copies have been sold.
(AP) "Does Satan Lurk in the Backward Playing of Records?" St. Petersburg Independent 24 May 1982: 3A  Following the claims made in the television program, California assemblyman Phil Wyman proposed a state law that would require warning labels on records containing backward masking.
AGRICULTURE: Pyrethrum, extracted from a type of chrysanthemum, is a natural one of these pest controllers
insecticide
Pyrethrum is also the name of a natural insecticide made from the dried flower heads of Chrysanthemum cinerariifolium and Chrysanthemum coccineum.
3
thumb|Tanacetum cinerariifoliumT. cinerariifolium is called the Dalmatian chrysanthemum, denoting its origin in that region of the Balkans (Dalmatia).
Some Pesticides Permitted in Organic Gardening, by Laura Pickett Pottorff, Colorado State University Cooperative Extension, January 5, 2010.
Companion planting
GOVERNORS AT STATEHOOD: Edmund Randolph
Virginia
Edmund Jennings Randolph (August 10, 1753 September 12, 1813) was an American attorney, the seventh Governor of Virginia, the second Secretary of State, and the first United States Attorney General.
2
When Jefferson resigned as Secretary of State in 1793, Randolph succeeded him to the position.
Mrs. Randolph having related some incident, her husband hastily exclaimed: “That is mere gossip.
NAME THE YEAR: Gary Gilmore executed,"Roots" airs on U.S. TV,Elvis dies
1977
Gary Mark Gilmore (December 4, 1940 – January 17, 1977) was an American criminal who gained international notoriety for demanding the execution of his death sentence for two murders he committed in Utah.
3
Gilmore, Mikal.
Two weeks later he was back in court on another car theft charge.
In a five-to-four decision, the US Supreme Court refused to hear his mother's claim.
TELEVISION: John Ritter appeared as the minister who married Ted & Georgette on this classic sitcom
The Mary Tyler Moore Show
The Bob Crane Show Hornbeck Episode: "Son of the Campus Capers" 1975 Petrocelli John Oleson Episode: "Chain of Command" 1975 Barnaby Jones Joe Rockwell Episode: "The Price of Terror" 1975 The Streets of San Francisco John 'Johnny' Steiner Episode: "Murder by Proxy" 1975 The Night That Panicked America Walter Wingate ABC film 1975 The Mary Tyler Moore Show Reverend Chatfield Episode: "Ted's Wedding" 1975 The Rookies Hap Dawson Episode: "Reluctant Hero" 1975 1976 Rhoda Vince Mazuma  Jerry Blocker "Chest Pains" "Attack on Mr. Right" 1976 Starsky & Hutch Tom Cole Episode:  "The Hostages" 1976 Phyllis Paul Jameson Episode: "The New Job" 1977–1984 Three's Company Jack Tripper 174 episodes 1977, 1983 The Love Boat Ben Cummins / Dale Riley/Reinhardt  3 episodes 1978 Ringo Marty Movie 1978 Leave Yesterday
3
Personal life
Lethal Vows Dr. David Farris 2000 Panic Dr. Josh Parks 2000 Lost in the Perishing Point Hotel Christian Therapist 2000 Tripfall Tom Williams 2000 Terror Tract Bob Carter Segment: Make Me an Offer 2001 Nuncrackers Narrator Direct-to-video 2002 Tadpole Stanley Grubman 2002 Man of the Year Bill 2003 Manhood Eli 2003 Bad Santa Bob Chipeska Posthumously released.
My Father Grew Up Paul NBC film 1991 Anything
FORMER CHILD STARS: The all-kid gangster movie "Bugsy Malone" starred Scott Baio & this girl who later won 2 Oscars
Jodie Foster
Career In 1976, Baio played the title character Bugsy Malone in the cult children’s gangster musical directed by Alan Parker, which also co-starred Jodie Foster.
3
The New York Daily News published Michelle Caruso's article "A Goodbye as the Sun Sets in the West" (June 12, 2004) which mentioned Baio, who had been seated near former UK Prime Minister Lady Thatcher.
His posting, “Taxes are DONE...
That should feed, house & provide medical for a few lazy non working people at my expense.
THE HOLE TRUTH: The Aubrey Holes are a circle of 56 pits found at this monumental site on Salisbury Plain
Stonehenge
thumb|Stonehenge, the most famous antiquity on Salisbury Plain Salisbury Plain is a chalk plateau in central southern England covering ."Salisbury Plain", Encyclopaedia Britannica.
2
Military personnel from the UK and around the world spend some 600,000-man days on the plain every year.
Other important breeding species include buzzard, barn owl, long-eared owl, nightingale, stonechat, whinchat, wheatear, corn bunting and, on occasion, Montagu's harrier.
JOEL SCHUMACHER: (Schumacher reads his clue.)  This 1925 Lon Chaney movie was slient; the 2004 movie I directed wth the same title is definitely not
The Phantom of the Opera
Some notable films he has directed include The Incredible Shrinking Woman (1981), St. Elmo's Fire (1985), The Lost Boys (1987), Cousins (1989), Falling Down (1993), The Client (1994), Batman Forever (1995), A Time to Kill (1996), Batman & Robin (1997), Flawless (1999), Phone Booth (2003), Veronica Guerin (2003), The Phantom of the Opera (2004) and The Number 23 (2007).
3
Movies After first working in the fashion industry, he realized his true love was in filmmaking.
After back-to-back Grisham and Batman films, Schumacher decided to reinvent his career with darker, lower-budget fare like 8MM with Nicolas Cage, and Flawless with Robert De Niro.
Batman
GEOGRAPHY: The main street of Interlaken in this country affords a spectacular view of the Jungfrau peak
Switzerland
Representations in art   References   External links       Category:Alpine four-thousanders Category:Bernese Alps Category:Bern–Valais border Category:Mountains of Switzerland Category:Mountains of the Alps Category:Mountains of the canton of Bern Category:Mountains of Valais Category:World Heritage Sites in Switzerland Category:Four-thousanders of Switzerland
3
thumb|left|The Jungfrau and the valley of Lauterbrunnen from Interlaken The Jungfrau is the westernmost and highest point of a gigantic 10 km wall dominating the valleys of Lauterbrunnen and Grindelwald.
Another tunnel leads outside to a flat, snow-covered area, where one can walk around and look down to the Konkordiaplatz and the Aletsch Glacier, as well as the surrounding mountains.
Some rocks jut out close to the top, but the actual peak consists of a nearly level ridge of frozen snow falling away on either side like a house-top with an excessively steep roof.
I'M GETTING MARRIED!: Alexandra Wentworth (2001)
George Stephanopoulos
Wentworth is married to George Stephanopoulos, ABC News Chief Anchor correspondent and former political adviser to the Clinton administration.
2
Ali attended the Dana Hall School for Girls in Wellesley, Massachusetts, and later, she graduated from Bard College in Annandale-on-Hudson, New York.
2013: Breathe
MOVIES: He played Jack Frost, who's trying to take over Christmas in "The Santa Clause 3: The Escape Clause"
Martin Short
Jack Frost appears as the primary antagonist in The Santa Clause 3: The Escape Clause played by Martin Short.
3
Background   Jack Frost is traditionally said to leave the frosty, fern-like patterns on windows on cold winter mornings (window frost or fern frost) and nipping the extremities in cold weather.
Frost also functions as a trademark character for the game-developer Atlus and as a mascot of the Megami Tensei series, in which it learns mainly Ice skills.
Music  Jethro Tull has a song titled "Jack Frost and the Hooded Crow".
AUTHORS: A 19th century Boston Unitarian minister, he was the grandnephew of Nathan Hale
Edward Everett Hale
Nathan Hale was also the uncle of orator and statesman Edward Everett (the other speaker at Gettysburg) and the grand-uncle of Edward Everett Hale (quoted above), a Unitarian minister, writer, and activist noted for social causes including abolitionism.
3
thumb|Nathan Hale as depicted in bronze (1890) by Frederick William MacMonnies at the Brooklyn Museum  Nathan Hale (June 6, 1755 – September 22, 1776) was an American soldier and spy for the Continental Army during the American Revolutionary War.
Hanging site thumb|British hang spy Nathan Hale in New York City, 1776.
”
FIRST NOVELS: Larry McMurtry took the title of this first novel from William Butler Yeats' famous epitaph
Horseman, Pass By
His novels include Horseman, Pass By (1962), The Last Picture Show (1966) and Terms of Endearment (1975), which were adapted into films earning 26 Academy Award nominations (10 wins).
3
Used bookstore businesses While at Stanford he became a rare-book scout, and during his years in Houston managed a book store there called the Bookman.
1990: Buffalo Girls (fictionalised bio of Calamity Jane) - adapted for TV as Buffalo Girls  1994: Pretty Boy Floyd (with Diana Ossana) (fictionalised bio of titular gangster)
Somebody's Darling (Jill Peel/Joe Percy)
POTPOURRI: Snaketown on the Gila River in this state is the best-studied village of the Hohokam culture
Arizona
The Hohokam () were an ancient Native American culture centered on the present-day US state of Arizona.
3
Although the particulars of the practice changed somewhat, the Hohokam cremation tradition remained dominant until around 1300.
can be significant geographic barriers for human communities, likely reducing the frequency of contact with other groups.
The Hohokam: Desert Farmers and Craftsmen.
EASTER PARADE: Oberammergau, Germany is home to a famous one of these performances that dramatize the Easter story
Passion Play
The town is famous for its production of a Passion Play, its woodcarvers, and the NATO School.
3
the barracks were taken over by the Messerschmitt company as a research and development site;  of tunnels were bored into the neighboring Laber mountain for engine production facilities, and a winter sports hotel was also taken over.
In all, Messerschmitt had 500 employees in the design department and about 1,300 more in the factory.
Play  melody for the tongue twister round  Oberammergau - Russian site  Category:Garmisch-Partenkirchen (district)
FATHERS-IN-LAW: United Farm Workers president Arturo Rodriguez' father-in-law was this man who died in 1993
César Chávez
It originated from the merger of two workers' rights organizations, the Agricultural Workers Organizing Committee (AWOC) led by Filipino organizer Larry Itliong, and the National Farm Workers Association (NFWA) led by César Chávez and Dolores Huerta.
3
In 1903, Japanese and Mexican farm workers attempted to come together to fight for better wages and better working conditions.
Visit the United Farm Workers Collections at the Reuther Library.
Bardacke, Frank.
SENATORS BY STATE: Wayne Allard & Ben Nighthorse Campbell
Colorado
Alan Wayne Allard (born December 2, 1943) is a member of the Republican Party, and was a United States Senator from Colorado.
3
These reforms became some of the first to be passed by the Republican controlled Congress in 1995 and were the key to their platform.
The amendment failed to advance to the House.
On January 15, 2007
U.S. RIVERS: The many dams on this river in Washington & Oregon include Chief Joseph, Rock Island & Bonneville
the Columbia
Dramatists (1918) I. 377 As the East is to the West..or the Aborigines of America to the Columbians of this generation, so is that line to this line.
3
The same goes for countries that speak french, or spanish, etc.
Thus, I agree with you that generalizing canadians with the term anglo-saxon is innapropriate, unless talking about specific segments or subpopulations where the anglo-saxon heritage is more proeminent.
At any rate, use of "U.S." in adjectival form is grey because English permits use of nouns as modifiers, and several phrases are in common use: for example, "United States dollar", "United States Senator", "U.S. Army"; for all of which the distinct -ian form would be used for many countries (Canadian Armed Forces, Australian dollar).
U.S. IMPORTS: For peat's sake, 99% of the peat imported by the U.S. comes from this neighbor
Canada
I know most "US"ers would disagree, but I've always felt that it was presumptuous of us to call ourseleves Americans as if people from Canada and Mexico, etc. were not.
3
Well, this "discussion" has lost its charm for me.
Michael Z. 05:45, 2004 Aug 24 (UTC)
I think United States as an adjective in the context you suggested is a perfectly valid term, and certainly better than Usian (something you might see on some other websites).
WE HAWK OLD INVENTIONS: In December 1877 editors of Sci. American checked out his cylinder phonograph; the sentimental value alone is huge!
Edison
Discussion moved from Village Pump, 17 Oct 2004   "United States" being used as an adjective   I've noticed there are several people who are using "United States" as an adjective, as in Thomas Edison was a United States inventor.
3
--Jiang Some Canadians do say they are American, meaning "North American," but only if they are extremely sympathetic to the United States, much moreso than Canadians are normally.
Do you think that the apostoles were 'actually' called John, Peter, Luke or Mark?
It was not until recently that "americans" born with black skin were called "Afro-americans".
THE MILITARY: Foreign country in which the most American soldiers are stationed
Germany
Thats the equivalent of saying that only people born in Germany are europeans.
3
What is the consensus of Wikipedia concerning the naming of the nationality of people of the United States?
Similar, calling someone a "US citizen" is just saying that they are a citizen of the legal entity of the US gov't, whereas calling someone an "American" is saying that they're actually American by nationality - even if they aren't legally a US citizen per se (like if they gave such up in one way or another, or never had such due to living primarily within an American cultural context but not having been born in the US or having gotten naturalized).
Kosebamse 17:54, 16 Oct 2004 (UTC)  In Canada, "American" does not refer to people from the continent(s), it refers to people from the United States.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL INFORMATION: As Deputy A.G. 1997-2001, he made a controversial recommendation of a presidential pardon for Marc Rich
Eric Holder
She stepped down before the investigation was finished and was replaced by James Comey, who was critical of Clinton's pardons and of then-Deputy Attorney General Eric Holder's pardon recommendation.
3
He helped run the company's operations in Cuba, Bolivia, and Spain.
With Rich a fugitive, Davis sold Rich's interest to Rupert Murdoch for $250 million in March 1984.
Former President Jimmy Carter, a fellow Democrat, said, "I don't think there is any doubt that some of the factors in his pardon were attributable to his large gifts.
4-LETTER MAGAZINES: Carey Lowell wrote about Deepak Chopra for this Conde Nast magazine of personal well-being
Self
Chopra himself is estimated to be worth over $80 million as of 2014.Rowe 2014, madly, deeply Deepak Chopra.
3
Chopra left the TM movement in 1994 and founded the Chopra Center for Wellbeing.
In 2001, ABC News aired a show segment on the topic of distance healing and prayer.
English professor George O'Har writes that Chopra is as an exemplification of the fact that human beings need "magic" in their lives, and places "the sophistries of Chopra" alongside the emotivism of Oprah Winfrey, the special effects and logic of Star Trek, and the magic of Harry Potter.
U.S. STAMPS: Julia de Burgos, a celebrated poet of this U.S. commonwealth, was honored on a 2010 stamp
Puerto Rico
July 6, 1953) was a poet from Puerto Rico.
2
Shortly after their arrival in Cuba, Burgos' relationship with Jimenes Grullón began to show tension.
Isabel Cuchí Coll published a book about Burgos titled Dos Poetisas de América: Clara Lair y Julia de Burgos.
1974: John Connally "got" trouble from campaign contributions he "got" from producers of this product
Milk
284–285  Indictment, trial and acquittal In July 1974, Connally was indicted for allegedly pocketing $10,000 for influencing a milk price decision by Texas lawyer Jake Jacobsen."Connally
3
Schulman added that Henry Kissinger, Nixon's National Security Advisor, noted that Connally was the only cabinet member that Nixon did not disparage behind his back, and that this was high praise indeed.^ Bruce Schulman: The Seventies: The Great Shift in American Culture, Society, and Politics, Da Capo Press  Democrats for Nixon thumb|right|150px|Connally on August 15, 1971 thumb|right|Connally's signature, as used on American currency Connally stepped down as treasury secretary in 1972 to head "Democrats for Nixon", a group funded by Republicans.
Ashman, Connally, pp.
Bush's status as a challenger to Reagan was at first heightened by his victory in Iowa.
UNUSUAL TV CHARACTERS: As Jonathan on "Highway To Heaven", Michael Landon was one of these beings on probation
Angel
In Highway to Heaven, he played a probationary angel (who named himself Jonathan Smith) whose job was to help people in order to earn his wings.
3
In 1976, Landon wrote and directed an auto-biographical movie, The Loneliest Runner, which was nominated for two Emmys.
Two years later, Landon returned to that same series in "The White Warrior".
As Little House on the Prairie executive producer, Landon hired five sets of real-life siblings to appear on the show: Melissa and Jonathan Gilbert (Laura Ingalls and Willie Oleson), Lindsay and Sidney Greenbush (Carrie Ingalls), Matthew and Patrick Labyorteaux (Albert Quinn Ingalls and Andy Garvey), Brenda and Wendi Turnbaugh (Grace Ingalls), and Jennifer and Michele Steffin (Rose Wilder).
MODERN HISTORY: On July 27, 1953 the armistice to end this war was signed at Panmunjom
Korea
Panmunjom, now located in North Hwanghae Province, is an abandoned village just north of the de facto border between North and South Korea, where the 1953 Korean Armistice Agreement that paused the Korean War was signed.
3
The building where the armistice was signed still stands, though it is north of the Military Demarcation Line, which runs through the middle of the Demilitarized Zone.
The JSA is often metonymously referred to as Panmunjom.
Those prisoners who refused to return to their countries were allowed to live under a neutral supervising commission for three months.
CARIBBEAN CAPITALS: Willemstad, the capital of Curacao, has an 18th century fort named for this European capital
Amsterdam
The Curaçao synagogue was built by Sephardic Portuguese Jews from Amsterdam and Recife, Brazil.
3
The city centre, with its unique architecture and harbour entry, has been designated a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
Schlumberger, the world's largest oil field services company is incorporated in Willemstad.
Although it is still in use, these days most road traffic now uses the Queen Juliana Bridge built in 1967 (rebuilt 1974) which arches high over the bay further inland.
SOCIAL TYPES: A "man on the street" is an ordinary Joe; a bon vivant is a "man about" this
town
In geography  Joe, North Carolina, a town in the USA  Joe Branch, a river in Tennessee  In idioms  Average Joe, an ordinary person  Cup of Joe, American slang for a cup of coffee  Other uses  Jōe, a garment worn by Shinto priests  Joe 1, American codename for the first Soviet nuclear weapon test   Joe 4, American codename for the first Soviet test of a thermonuclear weapon  Joensuu Airport,  Liperi, Finland (IATA airport code: JOE)  See also  Joey (disambiguation) Jo (disambiguation)
2
Joe is a given name or nickname originating from any of several names, such as:  Joseph (name)  Josephina (disambiguation)  Josiah (given name)   Joel (given name)     Jonah (given name)   Giovanni (name), Italian spelling of the nickname is Giò  Joe may also refer to:  In arts, entertainment, and media  Film and television  Joe (1970 film), starring Peter Boyle  Joe (2013 film), starring Nicolas Cage   Joe, a British TV series airing from 1966 to 1971   Joe 90, a 1968 British television series   Joe, a 2002 Canadian animated short about Joe Fortes  Music and radio  Joe (singer), R&B singer Joe Lewis
Thomas  "Joe" (Inspiral Carpets song)  "Joe" (Red Hot Chili Peppers song)   "Joe", a song on their album To the Faithful Departed by The Cranberries  Joe FM (disambiguation), any of several radio stations  Print  Joe (magazine), periodical developed originally for Kenyan youth  In computing  Joe's Own Editor, a text editor for Unix systems  Joe, an object-oriented Java computing framework based on Sun's Distributed Objects Everywhere project
MYTHOLOGY: We don't know if Tim Allen has a pet name for this tool, but Thor called his Mjollnir--Thunderbolt
hammer
right|thumb|Thor's Battle Against the Jötnar  (1872) by Mårten Eskil Winge In Norse mythology, Thor (; from Old Norse Þórr) is a hammer-wielding god associated with thunder, lightning, storms, oak trees, strength, the protection of mankind, and also hallowing, healing and fertility.
3
Larrington (1999:82—83).
At Thor's final threat, Loki gives in, commenting that only for Thor will he leave the hall, for "I know alone that you do strike", and the poem continues.
Larrington (1999:97–98).
CONDUCTORS: Saying "Music, like peas, should not be canned", Sergiu Celibidache was famous for his refusal to make these
Recordings
Celibidache frequently refused to release his performances on commercial recordings during his lifetime claiming that a listener could not obtain a "transcendental experience" outside of the concert hall.
3
1991: Tchaikovsky: Symphony No. 6 “Pathetique”; Roméo et Juliette (Arkadia)  1994: Bruckner: Symphony No. 7 (Andromeda)  1994: Brahms: Symphony Nos. 3 & 4 (Fonit-Cetra Italia)  1994: Brahms: Symphony No. 2 & Haydn Variations, Op.
2000: Bruckner: Symphony No. 3 (Deutsche Grammophon)   2000: Bruckner: Symphony No. 4 (Deutsche Grammophon)  2000: Bruckner: Symphony No. 5 (Rehearsal) (Deutsche Grammophon)  2000: Bruckner: Symphony No. 5; Mozart: Symphony No. 35 (Deutsche Grammophon)   2000: Franck: Symphony in D; Hindemith: Mathis der Mahler (Deutsche Grammophon)   2000: Richard Strauss: Till Eulenspiegel; Don Juan; Shostakovich: Symphony No. 9 (Deutsche Grammophon)  2000: Schubert: Symphony No. 8 "Unfinished"; Tchaikovsky: Nutcracker Suite (Aura Classics)  2000: Sibelius: Symphonies Nos. 2 & 5 (Deutsche Grammophon)  2001: Sergiu Celibidache (Classica d'Oro)  2001: Sergiu Celibidache et la Philharmonie de Berlin (Tahra)  2001: Shostakovich: Symphony No. 7 "Leningrad" (Classica d'Oro)  2002: Prokofiev: Symphonies Nos. 1 & 5; Violin Concerto No. 1 (Classica d'Oro)  2003: Mendelssohn: Symphony No. 4 "Italian"; Bizet: Symphony in C (Archipel)  2004: Bach: Mass in B minor (EMI Classics)  2004: Bruckner: Symphonies Nos.
: Sergiu Celibidache Conducts (Artists)  n.d.
U.S. STATES: This state has a Lake Sidney Lanier about 25 miles north of Stone Mountain
Georgia
Stone Mountain is a quartz monzonite dome monadnock and the site of Stone Mountain Park in Stone Mountain, Georgia.
2
pp.
Atlanta's Stone Mountain: A Multicultural History (2011)
CLASSICAL MUSIC: Richard Chamberlain played him in "The Music Lovers", which featured his piano concerto No. 1, heard here
Tchaikovsky
The Deputy Jerry Episode: "Edge of Doubt" 1961 Whispering Smith Chris Harrington Episode: "Stain of Justice" 1963 Twilight of Honor David Mitchell  1965 Joy in the Morning Carl Brown  1967 The Portrait of a Lady Ralph Touchett 8 episodes 1968 Petulia David Danner  1969 The Madwoman of Chaillot Roderick  1970 Julius Caesar Octavius Caesar/Augustus  1970 The Music Lovers Tchaikovsky  1972 The Woman I Love King Edward VIII TV movie 1972 Lady Caroline Lamb Lord Byron  1973 The Three Musketeers Aramis 1974 The Lady's Not For Burning Thomas Mendip TV movie / filmed play 1974 The Last of the Belles F. Scott Fitzgerald TV movie 1974 The Towering InfernoRoger Simmons  1974 The Four Musketeers Aramis  1975 The Count of Monte Cristo Edmond Dantes TV movieNominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Miniseries or a Movie 1975 The Christmas Messenger Christmas Messenger Short film 1976 The Slipper and the Rose Prince Edward  1977 The Last Wave David Burton Nominated—Australian Film Institute Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role 1977 The Man in the Iron Mask Philippe and Louis XIV TV movie 1978 The Swarm Dr. Hubbard  1978-1979 Centennial Alexander McKeag 12 episodesNominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Television Series Drama 1980 Shōgun Pilot-Major John Blackthorne 5 episodesGolden Globe Award for Best Actor – Television Series
3
George Richard Chamberlain (born March 31, 1934)California Births, 1905 - 1995, George Richard Chamberlain is an American stage and screen actor and singer, who became a teen idol in the title role of the television show Dr. Kildare (1961–66).
In 1952, Chamberlain graduated from Beverly Hills High School and later attended Pomona College (class of 1956).Pomona College Alumni Directory 2000, p. 40.
Chamberlain's singing ability also led to some hit singles in the early 1960s, including the "Theme from Dr. Kildare" entitled "Three Stars Will Shine Tonight", which struck No.
COLLEGIATE SPORTS NICKNAMES: University of Oklahoma
Sooners
Following the Sooners' 2000 football national-championship season the university experienced an increase in college applicants and admissions.
3
North campus
South of student housing is Timberdell Road, the approximate southern boundary of the University.
The campus student radio station, the WIRE, broadcasts over the Internet.
1970s TV: John Houseman reprised his role as Prof. Charles Kingsfield on this TV series based on a 1973 film
The Paper Chase
He is perhaps best known for his role as Professor Charles W. Kingsfield in the film The Paper Chase (1973), for which he won the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor.
2
By all accounts, Welles was shocked by the panic that ensued.
When RKO threatened to eliminate the payment of salaries by December 31 if no progress had been made, Welles announced that he would pay his cast out of his own pocket.
GOOD WILL SHAKESPEARE: Will's children Hamnet & Judith were these, like Dromio & Dromio in "The Comedy of Errors"
Twins
The Comedy of Errors tells the story of two sets of identical twins that were accidentally separated at birth.
3
Adriana reappears with henchmen, who attempt to bind the Syracusans.
All exit into the abbey to celebrate the reunification of the family.
The second also took place on "Innocents' Day," but ten years later: 28 December 1604, at Court.
'70s MOVIES: By escorting Randy Quaid to Prison in 1973, Jack Nicholson & Otis Young carried out this title task
The Last Detail
He was nominated for a Golden Globe Award, BAFTA Award and an Academy Award for his role in The Last Detail.
3
On May 5, Quaid dropped his lawsuit.
The two were released on bail that evening.
In 2011, Evi produced a low-budget docudrama, Star Whackers, starring Randy, which ruminated upon the allegedly existent criminal conspiracy.
FELONIOUS MONKS: AKA Saloth Sar, he was a novice monk in Cambodia before becoming infamous for "Killing Fields"
Pol Pot
Documents uncovered from the Soviet archives after 1991 reveal that the North Vietnamese attempt to overrun Cambodia in 1970 was launched at the explicit request of the Khmer Rouge and negotiated by Pol Pot's then second in command, Nuon Chea.
3
Antiquity, 85(328) Prehistoric artefacts are often found during mining activities in Ratanakiri.
thumb|King-Father Norodom Sihanouk's funeral procession  Peace efforts began in Paris in 1989 under the State of Cambodia, culminating two years later in October 1991 in a Paris Comprehensive Peace Settlement.
Fair trade exports
MOVIE REMAKES: In this movie's 2005 incarnation, the role of the girl, Ann Darrow, was played by Naomi Watts
King Kong
Her subsequent films include David O. Russell's comedy I Heart Huckabees (2004), the 2005 remake of King Kong, the crime-thriller Eastern Promises (2007) and the Tom Tykwer-directed thriller The International (2009).
3
Watts next starred and co-produced with director/screenwriter Scott Coffey her film, the semi-autobiographical drama Ellie Parker (2005), which depicted the struggle of an Australian actress in Hollywood.
Her next film, the Woody Allen comedy You Will Meet a Tall Dark Stranger, opened at the 2010 Cannes Film Festival on 15 May 2010.
Also in 2010, she starred as Valerie Plame in the film Fair Game, which opened at the Cannes Film Festival in 2010, and was later released in the United States on 5 November 2010.
SEEING STARS: In 1994 this funny man could be seen in "The Mask", "Dumb and Dumber" & "Ace Ventura: Pet Detective"
Jim Carrey
Ace Ventura: Pet Detective (or simply Ace Ventura, or also simply Pet Detective) is a 1994 American comedy detective film directed by Tom Shadyac, and co-written by and starring Jim Carrey.
3
Later, Podacter mysteriously falls to his death from his apartment, which Robinson and Ventura go to investigate.
Finkle had missed the potentially game-winning field goal kick at the end of Super Bowl XVII, causing the Dolphins to lose the game and ruining his football career.
The film's popularity spawned a 1995 sequel, Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls, with Carrey returning in the lead role.
OF EDEN: This astrophysicist won the Pulitzer Prize for exploring the human brain in "The Dragons of Eden"
Carl Sagan
The Dragons of Eden: Speculations on the Evolution of Human Intelligence is a Pulitzer Prize-winningThe Pulitzer Prizes: 1978 Winners 1977 book by Carl Sagan.
3
Skoyles, John & Sagan, Dorion.
Up from Dragons: The Evolution of Human Intelligence.
The Cosmic Calendar reappears in the Cosmos television series.
THE SCHOOL OF HARD KNOCKS: An Alfred University study found that 80% of college athletes experienced this sometimes brutal type of initiation
Hazing
Prior to Klein's death, in 1978, student Chuck Stenzel died in a hazing-related incident at Alfred's Klan Alpine fraternity.
3
The origin of the name "Alfred" is uncertain.
State records which might have verified the connection between the Saxon king and the university were lost in a fire in 1911.
Internationally acclaimed artist and Alfred University alumnus, Robert C. Turner is named after this gallery space.
OF "E" DEN: When Mary Todd Lincoln was First Lady, the White House was still known as this "Mansion"
Executive
It has now been gratefully accepted by many historians and biographers and been used to flesh out the President and First Lady's personalities behind the scenes in the Executive Mansion and been used as the basis for several motion pictures and TV mini-series during the late 20th and early 21st Centuries.
2
Mary began living with her sister Elizabeth Porter Edwards in Springfield, Illinois in October 1839.
Lincoln was regarded as the first "western" president, and critics described Mary's manners as coarse and pretentious.
OUR FOUNDING FATHERS: In early April 1775 William Dawes, Samuel Prescott & this man rode to warn Patriots to move military stores from Concord
Paul Revere
William Dawes, Jr. (April 6, 1745 – February 25, 1799) was one of several men and a womanPaul Revere's Ride by David Hackett Fischer who alerted colonial minutemen of the approach of British army troops prior to the Battles of Lexington and Concord at the outset of the American Revolution.
3
Also during the war, Dawes worked as a quartermaster in central Massachusetts.
In 1896 Helen F. Moore, dismayed that William Dawes had been forgotten, penned a parody of Longfellow's poem.
Dawes's passage through the area is represented by bronze horseshoes embedded in the sidewalk, as hoofprints, accompanied by an inscription giving his name and the date (inaccurately stated as April 19, 1775), and by historical displays."The American Revolution Comes to Cambridge, Part II (Note 3) Retrieved 1 December 2012  Descendants
HOLD THE FORT: This great Apache warrior died at Fort Sill in Oklahoma in 1910 & was buried there
Geronimo
Yale U Press, 2008, p.298  thumb|upright|Geronimo
3
Schroeder believes the Arivaipa were a separate people in pre-reservation times.
"maternal grandmother", -tsúyé "maternal grandfather", -chʼiné "paternal grandmother", -nálé "paternal grandfather".
Hoijer, Harry.
AMERICAN ARTISTS: In 1916 Alfred Stieglitz exhibited her paintings at 291, his NYC gallery; 8 years later he married her
Georgia O'Keeffe
He was married to painter Georgia O'Keeffe.
3
At the time there were two photographic clubs in New York, the Society of Amateur Photographers and the New York Camera Club.
Gradually Strand’s interest waned, and Stieglitz’s escalated.
She knew of her husband's interest in Norman but thought it was just another of his infatuations.
"U" GOT IT!: In "The Last of the Mohicans" he shook his tomahawk at Magua & shouted, "Stay; Dog of the Wyandots!"
Uncas
Among the caravan guarding the women are the frontiersman Natty Bumppo, the Major Duncan Heyward, and the Indians Chingachgook and Uncas, the former of whom is the novel's title character.
3
Upon a second refusal, he sentences the prisoners to death; but Hawk-eye and the Mohicans rescue all four, and lead them to a dilapidated building that was involved with a battle between the Indians and the British some years ago.
Cooper promised Stanley "that a book should actually be written, in which these caves should have a place; the, idea of a romance essentially Indian in character then first suggesting itself to his mind."
The James Fenimore Cooper Society – extensive collection of material about Cooper, in particular many scholarly articles on him and his work  The Last of the Mohicans at Open Library   Fort William Henry Museum Fort William Henry: The Siege & Massacre Last of the Mohicans Outdoor Drama  Category:1826 novels Category:Novels by James Fenimore Cooper Category:19th-century novels Category:19th-century American novels Category:French and Indian War Category:Novels adapted into comics Category:American novels adapted into films Category:Novels adapted into operas Category:Novels adapted into plays Category:Novels adapted into radio programs Category:Novels adapted into television programs Category:Novels set in the American colonial era Category:Seven Years' War Category:1757 in fiction Category:Novels set in the 18th century
ART: Melted watches dot the landscape in this Spaniard's "The Persistence of Memory"
Salvador Dali
Salvador Dali.
3
It epitomizes Dalí's theory of "softness" and "hardness", which was central to his thinking at the time.
One can observe that the creature has one closed eye with several eyelashes, suggesting that the creature is also in a dream state.
Dalí also produced various lithographs and sculptures on the theme of soft watches late in his career.
CLASSIC SITCOMS: He played Tony on "Taxi", Tony on "Who's The Boss?" & Tony on "Hudson Street"
Tony Danza
Produced by Embassy Television (later Embassy Communications and ELP Communications), in association with Hunter-Cohan Productions and Columbia Pictures Television, the series starred Tony Danza as a retired major league baseball player who relocates to Fairfield, Connecticut to work as a live-in housekeeper for a divorced advertising executive, played by Judith Light.
3
While the show was shelved for an extended amount of time in early 1984, Danza was arrested for fighting in a New York bar after a fellow patron made a rude remark about his female companion.
Impact  Critical reception
, debuted in 2007 on Polsat, starring Małgorzata Foremniak and Bogusław Linda.
PRUSSIA: Prussia got its start as the German district of this, found in the title of Bach concertos
Brandenburg
Prussia () () was a historic state originating out of the Duchy of Prussia and the Margraviate of Brandenburg, and centered on the region of Prussia.
2
There was also a two-house parliament.
Its incorporation of "Red Berlin" and the industrialised Ruhr Area – both with working class majorities –
NORTH & SOUTH: On April 14, 1865, General Robert Anderson raised the same flag he'd lowered over this port four years before
Fort Sumter
Governor of South Carolina Robert Anderson (Civil War) (1805–1871), Union commander at Fort Sumter at the start of the American Civil War Robert H. Anderson (1835–1888), Confederate officer (brigadier general) in the American Civil War Robert Anderson (Medal of Honor) (1843–1900), U.S. Navy sailor and Medal of Honor recipient Robert Anderson (Australian general) (1865–1940), Australian World War I brigadier general  Sports Robert Anderson (MCC cricketer) (1811–1891), English cricketer, played for Hertfordshire 1835–36 and MCC 1837–41 Robert Anderson (American cricketer) (born 1893), American cricketer Robert Anderson (New Zealand cricketer) (born 1948), New Zealand cricketer, played nine Tests and two One Day Internationals for New Zealand Robert Anderson (rugby union) (circa 1900 – circa 1979), Australian rugby player Robert Anderson (Australian rules footballer) (born 1959), Australian rules footballer  Other Robert Anderson (mathematician) (fl.
2
1810s–1820s), mayor of Williamsburg, Virginia Robert Stirling Hore Anderson (1821–1883), Irish-born Australian colonial politician Robert M. Anderson (1824–1878), Lieutenant Governor of California Robert H. Anderson (politician) (c. 1831–1879), American politician in New York Sir Robert Anderson, 1st Baronet (1837–1921), Irish businessman and Lord Mayor of Belfast Robert Anderson (Scotland Yard official) (1841–1918), lawyer, British intelligence officer and London CID chief, in charge during the Jack the Ripper murders Robert Alexander Anderson (mayor) (1858–1916), Canadian politician in British Columbia Robert Newton Anderson (1871–1948), MP in the Northern Ireland Parliament for Londonderry Robert P. Anderson (1906–1978), United States judge in Connecticut Robert B. Anderson (1910–1989), businessman, politician, and U.S. Secretary of the Treasury Robert Anderson (diplomat) (1922–1996), United States Ambassador to Morocco Robert Anderson (New Zealand politician) (1936–1996), New Zealand politician Robert T. Anderson (born 1945), American politician, Lieutenant Governor of Iowa Rob Anderson (politician) (born 1977), Canadian politician in Alberta  Military Robert Anderson (Revolutionary War) (1741–1813), Revolutionary general and Lt.
1830s), Scottish inventor Robert King Anderson (1861–1950), Canadian politician, physician and teacher Robert Anderson (Hollywood, Florida community leader) (1912–1998), banker and community leader in Hollywood, Florida Robert Orville Anderson (1917–2007), American businessman and philanthropist Robert Marshall Anderson (1933–2011), Episcopal bishop of Minnesota Robert Charles Anderson (born 1944), American biochemist and genealogist Robert Anderson (murderer) (1966–2006), American executed for killing a 5-year-old girl in Texas  See also Bob Anderson (disambiguation) Bobby Anderson (disambiguation) Robert Andersson (water polo) (1886–1972), Swedish water polo player, diver, and freestyle swimmer Robert Andersson (handballer) (born 1969), Swedish Olympic handball player Robert Andersson (footballer) (born 1971), Swedish footballer Robban Andersson (born 1974), Swedish TV personality
"MOORE" OR "LES": His "A Visit From St. Nicholas" was first published anonymously on December 23, 1823 in the Troy Sentinel
Clement Clarke Moore
"A Visit from St. Nicholas", more commonly known as "The Night Before Christmas" and "Twas the Night Before Christmas" from its first line, is a poem first published anonymously in 1823, and later attributed to Clement Clarke Moore, who acknowledged authorship in 1837.
3
Four hand-written copies of the poem are known to exist, and three are in museums, including the New-York Historical Society library.
Furthermore, Kaller claims that Foster cherry-picked only the poems that fit his thesis and that many of Moore's unpublished works have a tenor, phraseology and meter similar to A Visit.
In the Barney and the Backyard Gang special, "Waiting for Santa", Barney reads the story to Michael and Amy, whom he has befriended, while Santa himself is in the living room of the house doing his usual work.
BROADWAY MUSICALS: Michael Flatley choreographed, but did not appear in, this musical celebration of Irish culture when it premiered in 2000
Riverdance
He became internationally known for Irish dance shows Riverdance, Warlords, Lord of the Dance, Feet of Flames, and Celtic Tiger.
3
After graduating from Brother Rice High School, on Chicago's Southwest Side, he opened a dance school, but later closed it down to focus on performing.
the youngest person at that time ever to receive this accolade.
In other media Flatley and his work have been referenced and parodied in a wide variety of media, including television shows such as Mystery Science Theater 3000, Friends, Family Guy, Britain's Got Talent, I'm Alan Partridge, 3rd Rock from the Sun, and Celebrity Deathmatch, and movies such as Dudley Do-Right and The Boondock Saints, as well as The Simpsons episode The Father, the Son, and the Holy Guest Star.
ART: Edward Steichen led the movement to recognize as art these images, whose name means "drawn with light"
photographs
His photos of gowns for the magazine Art et Décoration in 1911 are regarded as the first modern fashion photographs ever published.
3
Together Stieglitz and Steichen opened the Little Galleries of the Photo-Secession, which eventually became known as 291 after its address.
While the print appears to be a color photograph, the first true color photographic process, the autochrome process, was not available until 1907.
Only three known versions of the Pond—Moonlight are still in existence and, as a result of the hand-layering of the gums, each is unique.
THEATER: Michael Kidd & Agnes De Mille were the 1st 2 people to win Tony Awards in this category
Choreography
She was not invited to recreate her choreography for either Brigadoon (1954) or Carousel (1956).
3
As a child, she had longed to dance, but dance at this time was considered more of an activity, rather than a viable career option, so her parents refused to allow her to dance.
References Notes  Further reading     Memoirs, anecdotes about famous performing artists.
External links       American Ballet Theatre bio. and list of works Kennedy Center bio.
AFRICAN-AMERICAN LIT: His 1962 novel "Another Country" is noted for its frank depiction of various sexual & interracial relationships
James Baldwin
Another Country may refer to:   Another Country (novel), a 1962 novel by American writer James Baldwin  Another Country (play), a 1981 play by English playwright Julian Mitchell
1
Another Country (film), a 1984 film adaptation of Mitchell's play, with Rupert Everett and Colin Firth  Another Country, a 1993 single by Mango Groove  Another Country, a 1986 song by Redgum on their album Midnight Sun  Another Country (Cassandra Wilson album), 2012  Another Country (The Chieftains album), 1992  Another Country (Tift Merritt album), 2007  Another Country (Rod Stewart album), 2015
MULTIPLY BY 5, DIVIDE BY 2, ADD 3: 60
153
(King 5098) (12/57)  "Do The Cha Cha Cherry"/"The Feeling Is Real" (King 5131) (4/58)  "Tell The Truth"/"Double Or Nothing" (King 5141) (6/58)  "Don't Let It Be Vain"/"The Slummer The Slum" (King 5153) (10/58)  "The Real Thing"/"Your Only Love" (King 5162) (11/58)  "Miracle of Love"/"I
3
Most of their big R&B hits were recorded from 1952 to 1953 and written by guitarist Lowman "Pete" Pauling; later cover versions of the band's songs hit the Top 40, including "Dedicated to the One I Love" (the Shirelles, the Mamas & the Papas), "Tell the Truth" (Ray Charles), and "Think" (James Brown & The Famous Flames).
Health problems forced Eugene Tanner onto disability in the years before his death on December 29, 1994.
Up" (King 5082) (10/57)  "Dedicated to the One I Love"/"Don't Be Ashamed"
5 SELLABLE WORDS: You can have this type of "head", "conscience" or, selling a property with no liens against it, "title"
clear
Shortly thereafter, the air cleared when Winston-Salem's Royals became the "5" Royales and Detroit's Royals became The Midnighters.
3
In addition to heartfelt odes like "Dedicated to the One I Love," Pauling also wrote comic and risque tunes, including "Monkey Hips and Rice," later the title of a two-CD anthology of the group's music released by Rhino Records in 1994.
Ironically, both artists would have hits at King working with Rock & Roll Hall of Fame producer Ralph Bass, becoming good friends and routinely competing in battles of the bands at clubs like Atlanta's Royal Peacock in that city's Sweet Auburn section.
Ballard's group gained fame for originating "The Twist", later a monster dance craze and hit for Chubby Checker, and for its risque series of "Annie" songs, including "Work With Me Annie" and "Annie Had a Baby."  With King, "Think" and "Tears of Joy" became hits for the "5" Royales in 1957, while some of their lesser-known tracks from this period are now critically acclaimed as innovative.
SCULPTURE: A Cellini masterpiece shows this Greek hero holding the head of Medusa
Perseus
Medusa was beheaded by the hero Perseus, who thereafter used her head, which retained its ability to turn onlookers to stone, as a weapon until he gave it to the goddess Athena to place on her shield.
2
ISBN 0-253-20865-3Stephenson, A. G. (1997). "Endless the Medusa: a feminist reading of Medusan imagery and the myth of the hero in Eudora Welty's novels."Garber, p. 7.
One example is that of the flag and emblem of Sicily, together with the three legged trinacria.
MYTHICAL TOOLS & ACCESSORIES: He used his mirror shield to keep from turning to stone as he battled Medusa
Perseus
Medusa was beheaded by the hero Perseus, who thereafter used her head, which retained its ability to turn onlookers to stone, as a weapon until he gave it to the goddess Athena to place on her shield.
3
If not, it is from the same root, and is formed after the participle.
Roger Lancelyn Green suggests in his Tales of the Greek Heroes written for children that Athena used the aegis against Atlas.
43–56.
ORGANIZATIONS: Founded by Father Michael J. McGivney in 1881, it's the world's largest Catholic family fraternal service organization
the Knights of Columbus
He founded the Knights of Columbus at a local parish to serve as a mutual aid and fraternal insurance organization, particularly for immigrants and their families.
3
A miracle attributed to the intercession of McGivney is under investigation at the Vatican.
If canonized, he would be the first American-born priest to gain that recognition.
Legacy  1989, the York Catholic District School Board in Ontario, Canada founded a school named Father Michael McGivney Catholic Academy in his honor.
CONTEMPORARY AUTHORS: His grandfather Thomas Gore was a senator from Oklahoma
Gore Vidal
Gore, who was blind, was the maternal grandfather of author Gore Vidal.
3
Yet Gore later opposed America's entry into the war even after American involvement began.
He unsuccessfully opposed providing manpower for the military by conscription, saying it would create "an army of conscripted slackers."
When Franklin D. Roosevelt took office as President, Gore at first supported his New Deal policies but later feuded with him.
WORLD HISTORY: Mindon, as emperor of this country, set up a new capital in 1857 at Mandalay
Burma
Mandalay ( or ;  ) is the second-largest city and the last royal capital of Burma.
2
Myanmar recent opening stance on tourism means the airport is now receiving a growing number of visitors from Bangkok.
Speaks' version was widely recorded.
SPORTS: What Gary Player plays professionailly
golf
Gary Player DMS, OIG (born 1 November 1935) is a South African professional golfer, widely regarded as one of the greatest players in the history of golf.
3
Results timeline {| cellpadding="3" cellspacing="0" border="1" style="font-size: 95%; border: #aaa solid 1px; border-collapse: collapse;" |- style="background:#eeeeee;" !align="left"|Tournament !1986 !1987 !1988 !1989
|align="center"|NYF |align="center"|NYF |align="center"|NYF |align="center"
style="background:yellow;"|T8 |align="center" style="background:yellow;"|5 |align="center"|T16 |align="center"|T19 |align="center"|T60 |align="center"|T31 |align="center"|T20 |align="center"|T39 |align="center"|T43 |- |[[U.S. Senior Open]] |align="center" style="background:yellow;"|T3 |align="center" style="background:yellow;"|T8 |align="center" style="background:yellow;"|T3 |align="center"|T17 |align="center"|T13 |align="center"|T19 |align="center"|T60 |align="center"|T21 |align="center"|DNP |align="center"|DNP |- |[[The Tradition]] |align="center" style="background:yellow;"|2 |align="center"|T15 |align="center"|T20 |align="center"|T17 |align="center"|T27 |align="center"|T17 |align="center"
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: It's been said that this country "has but one hero, William Tell, and he is a myth"
Switzerland
thumb|450px|Tell is arrested for not saluting Gessler's hat (mosaic at the Swiss National Museum, Hans Sandreuter, 1901) William Tell (in the four languages of Switzerland: ; ; ; ) is a folk hero of Switzerland.
3
John Wilkes Booth, the assassin of Abraham Lincoln, was inspired by Tell.
The reason for the ban is not known, but may been related to the failed assassination attempt in 1938 by young Swiss Maurice Bavauddpa: Hitler verbot Schillers "Tell", news agency announcement of a speech by Rolf Hochhuth, May 11, 2004.
is the earliest known parallel to the Tell legend.
NAMES IN THE NEWS: Hilda Solis has her work cut out for her as the new Secretary of this Cabinet department
Labor
Solis previously served as the 25th United States Secretary of Labor from 2009 to 2013, as part of the administration of President Barack Obama.
2
The couple lives in a modest house in El Monte, California, not far from where she grew up.
She described herself as "a big believer that government, if done right, can do a lot to improve the quality of people's lives".
AFRICAN HISTORY: In 1963 Ahmed Ben Bella became the first president of this north African country
Algeria
Ahmed Ben Bella ( ; 25 December 1916 – 11 April 2012) was an Algerian socialist soldier and revolutionary who was the first President of Algeria from 1963 to 1965.
2
He failed his brevet exam, and subsequently dropped out of school.
He was demobilised after the fall of France but joined a regiment of Moroccan tirailleurs (infantry) with whom he saw service throughout the Italian campaign.
THEATRE: HOW NOVEL!: "Sari" if you missed the British musical "The Far Pavillions", based on a novel set in this Asian country
India
The sari is usually worn over a petticoat (called 'parkar' (परकर) in Marathi  or lehenga in the north; pavadai in Tamil, pavada (or occasionally langa) in Malayalam, Kannada and Telugu, chaniyo, parkar, ghaghra, or ghagaro in the west; and shaya in eastern India), with a fitted upper garment commonly called a blouse (ravike in South India and choli elsewhere).
1
(korial) - Murshidabad, West Bengal  Tant Saree - Farshganj, West Bengal  Murshidabad Silk – West Bengal  Baluchari Silk – Bishnupur, Bankura West Bengal  Kantha silk & cotton saree –
'50s FICTION: This sizzling bestseller from Grace Metalious spawned a movie & a prime time soap
Peyton Place
Grace Metalious (born Marie Grace DeRepentigny, September 8, 1924 – February 25, 1964) was an American author, best known for her controversial novel Peyton Place, which stayed on The New York Times bestseller list for 59 weeks.
2
Hours before her death she was convinced by her final lover, John Rees, to sign a will leaving her entire estate to him, with the understanding that he would take care of her children.
Her family was able to invalidate the will, but her estate proved to be insolvent from years of lavish living, overgenerosity towards "friends", and embezzlement by an agent.
THE NEW YORK TIMES MOVIES: A.O. Scott said this film about Aron Ralston "pins you down, shakes you up, and leaves you glad to be alive"
127 Hours
He survived a canyoneering accident in southeastern Utah in 2003, during which he amputated his own right forearm with a dull pocketknife in order to extricate himself from a dislodged boulder,  which had him trapped in Blue John Canyon for five days and seven hours (127 hours).
3
He had the goal of climbing all of Colorado's "fourteeners"—peaks over  altitude, of which there are 59; solo and during winter (a feat that had never been recorded before).
In 2005, Ralston became the first person to climb all 59 ranked and/or named Colorado's 'fourteeners' solo in winter, a project he started in 1997 and resumed after the amputation in Blue John Canyon.
The episode aired on February 23, 2011, on NBC.  Ralston provides his voice on The Simpsons episode "Treehouse of Horror XXII" as the voice on the other end of Homer's phone when he calls for help after getting trapped in a similar situation to Ralston himself."Fox Details ‘
CUT: For the "Bootleg" director's cut he added 35 more minutes to his "Almost Famous"
Cameron Crowe
Almost Famous is a 2000 comedy-drama film written and directed by Cameron Crowe and starring  Billy Crudup, Kate Hudson, and Patrick Fugit.
3
— experiences that are shared by William Miller, the baby-faced main character of the film.
Archie on The Uncool.com.
Billy Crudup ("Russell Hammond") - lead guitar  Jason Lee ("Jeff Bebe") - lead singer  John Fedevich ("Ed Vallencourt") - drums  Mark Kozelek ("Larry Fellows") - bass guitar  Other personnel  Peter Frampton  Mike McCready  Jon Bayless  Ben Smith  Gordon Kennedy  Marti Frederiksen –
THE JOCK: Mike Eruzione led the U.S. men's ice hockey team to the Olympic gold medal in this year, the last time the U.S. team won
1980
He is best known as the captain of the 1980 Winter Olympics United States national team that defeated the Soviet Union in the famous "Miracle on Ice" game, in which he scored the game-winning goal.
3
He can't take away the memory.
He was a technical consultant for the 1981 film Miracle on Ice, and said "we all know the movie will never be able to equal what happened."
" Stan does not believe him until Roger takes him to a team reunion at La Quinta Inns and Suites and Stan gets to see his team heroes Jim Craig, Mark Johnson and Eruzione.
QUESTS: In a 1930 Sam Spade novel, everyone's on the hunt for this object that once belonged to the Knight's Templar
the Maltese Falcon
Sam Spade is a fictional private detective and the protagonist of Dashiell Hammett's 1930 novel, The Maltese Falcon.
1
Spade was played by Ricardo Cortez in the first film version in 1931.
I SERVED IN HIS CABINET: Secretary of Health & Human Services Kathleen Sebelius
Barack Obama
After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.
3
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.
Resignation On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor.
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing.
"EVE"NING: It's the "A" in JA, the youth organization begun in 1919 to teach young people about American business
Achievement
Japanese language, ISO 639-1 alpha-2 Ja (Indic), a glyph in the Brahmic family of scripts Ja (Javanese) (ꦗ), a letter in the Javanese script  Name Ja Rule, an American rapper Jonathan Avildsen, known as JA ONE JA (TV series), a Danish television show  Other Ja (genus), a genus of beetles in the family Carabidae Chrysler JA platform, a platform of vehicles made by Chrysler Jane's Addiction, the American alternative rock band Japan (NATO country code) Jasmonic acid, a plant hormone Judge Advocate Judge of Appeal Junior Achievement B&H Airlines (IATA airline designator JA) Ja (unit), a unit of measurement of length in Korea Japan Agricultural Cooperatives, in Japan  British Rail Class 73/0 electro-diesel locomotives (Pre-TOPS classification JA) Jamiat Ahle Hadith a political party in Pakistan   See also  YA (disambiguation)  Category:Two-letter disambiguation pages
1
JA, Ja, jA,  or ja may refer to:  Linguistics Ja, grammatical particle meaning "yes" in most Germanic languages (including informal English) Ja, I in many Slavic languages Я (Ya), a Cyrillic letter, pronounced /ja/
NO. 1 ALBUMS OF THE '90s: This band's 1993 "In Utero" album vowed, "Frances Farmer will have her revenge on Seattle"
Nirvana
The Nirvana song "Frances Farmer Will Have Her Revenge on Seattle", written by fellow Washington native, Kurt Cobain, was named after Farmer and appears on the band's 1993
3
By January 1943, she failed to pay the rest of the fine and a bench warrant was issued for her arrest.
In 1962 Farmer appeared in a Purdue University production of Anton Chekhov's The Seagull and then, in 1965, Farmer played the role of "Claire Zachanassian" in the university's production of Friedrich Dürrenmatt's The Visit; the latter production has been described in the following manner:
Pinnacle Books, 1979.
FICTIONAL BOYFRIENDS: As Frau Blucher in "Young Frankenstein" she spoke the line, "Yes, yes he was my boyfriend"
Cloris Leachman
The supporting cast includes Teri Garr, Cloris Leachman, Marty Feldman, Peter Boyle, Madeline Kahn, Kenneth Mars, Richard Haydn and Gene Hackman.
3
Upon reading his grandfather's private journals, Frederick is so captivated that he decides to resume his grandfather's experiments in re-animating the dead.
Frederick recaptures the monster and locks the two of them in a room, where he calms the monster's homicidal tendencies with flattery and fully acknowledges his own heritage, shouting out emphatically, "My name is Frankenstein!"
Los Angeles Times, August 1, 2010.
ISLANDS: This island, called "The Rock," had the first lighthouse on the West Coast
Alcatraz
The Rock commonly refers to:  Dwayne Johnson, professional wrestler and actor also known as "The Rock"  The Rock or Alcatraz Island, small island in San Francisco Bay, California, United States  The Rock (film), 1996 film starring Sean Connery and Nicolas Cage, directed by Michael Bay  The Rock or The Rocks may also refer to:  Buildings  Prudential Center, Newark, nicknamed "The Rock" due to Prudential Financial's logo  "The Rock", nickname for New York City's Rockefeller Center  Memorial Stadium (Indiana), on the Indiana University campus  The Rock (stadium), a football ground in Rhosymedre, Wales and home to Cefn Druids A.F.C.  The Rock (building), a tower in Amsterdam  The Rocks, Albany, a residence in Albany, Western Australia  "The Rock," a nickname for the Knute Rockne Memorial athletic facility on the University of Notre Dame  "The Rock," a nickname for Kidd Brewer Stadium at Appalachian State University  Music
1
Gibraltar, often referred to as The Rock, from The Rock of Gibraltar  Corregidor, an island in the Philippines  Monaco-Ville, the old town of Monaco and one of its administrative divisions, known locally as Le Rocher'' (The Rock)  Niue, an island in the South Pacific, near Tonga, commonly referred to as "The Rock (of Polynesia)"   Ayers Kaserne, a closed U.S. Army Cold War military post in Kirch-Göns, Germany  Sports  The Rock (rugby team) or Atlantic Rock, a rugby union team based in St. John's, Newfoundland & Labrador, Canada  The Rocks or Glasgow Rocks, a British basketball team  "The Rock," nickname of the athletic teams of Slippery Rock University of Pennsylvania  Other uses  The Rock (film), 1996 film starring Sean Connery and Nicolas Cage, directed by Michael Bay  The Rock or Chicago, Rock Island and Pacific Railroad, former Class I railroad in the United States  The Rocks, Inc., U.S. military officers' organization  The Rock (play), T.S. Eliot's 1934 pageant play  The Rock (radio station), a New Zealand rock music radio network  The Rock (Northwestern University), a landmark at Northwestern University in Evanston, Illinois  The Rock (Michigan State University), a boulder on the campus of Michigan State University  See also    Rock (disambiguation)
ORGANIZATIONS: "Music Man" composer Meredith Willson wrote the song "Banners And Bonnets" for this organization
the Salvation Army
He honored The Salvation Army with a musical tribute, "Banners and Bonnets".
3
He also became the musical director for The Big Show, a prestigious comedy-variety program hosted by actress Tallulah Bankhead and featuring some of the world's most respected entertainers.
Oates, p. 164
But He Doesn't Know the Territory (1959).
AMERICAN GOVERNMENT: It's no secret that William Colby, William Casey & William Webster have all headed this agency
the CIA
Before and during the  Vietnam War, Colby served as chief of station in Saigon, chief of the CIA's Far East Division, and head of the Civil Operations and Rural Development effort, as well as overseeing the Phoenix Program.
3
While in Vietnam, Colby focused intensively on building up Vietnamese capabilities to combat the Viet Cong insurgency in the countryside.
Schlesinger appointed him head of the clandestine branch in early 1973.
President Ford, advised by Henry Kissinger and others concerned by Colby's controversial openness to Congress and distance from the White House, replaced Colby late in 1975 with George H.W. Bush during the so-called Halloween Massacre in which Secretary of Defense Schlesinger was also replaced (by  Donald Rumsfeld).
WHAT THE "H"?: Olympic event won twice by Jackie Joyner-Kersee
the heptathlon
She had red-shirted during the 1983-1984 academic year to concentrate on the heptathlon for the 1984 Summer Olympics .She also was the first women to win a gold in the long jump.(Sometimes called Jackie Joyner Kersee)  She scored 1,167 points during her collegiate career, which places her 19th all time for the Bruins games.
3
The silver and bronze medalists were Sabine John and Anke Vater-Behmer, both of whom were representing East Germany.
She was sixth in the long jump (21-10.75) at the Olympic Trials.
Joyner-Kersee, Jackie, and Sonja Steptoe.
WOMEN WRITERS: J.K. Rowling wrote her first novel at a cafe in this Scottish capital
Edinburgh
Scottish & Newcastle plc was a brewing company headquartered in Edinburgh, Scotland which expanded significantly from its home base to become an international business with beer volumes growing almost tenfold.
3
In 1960 it merged again this time with Newcastle Breweries to form Scottish & Newcastle.
In February 2005, Scottish & Newcastle and Carlsberg UK finalised a joint venture to carry out Technical Services work in the UK. Service Dispense Equipment Limited (SDEL) was formed from the dispense assets of both businesses.
The acquisition was completed on 29 April 2008 as S&N's shares were delisted from the London Stock Exchange.
CHRISTIAN ROCK: This wife of Vince Gill has had many Christian rock hits, including "Find A Way"
Amy Grant
thumb|Amy Grant and Vince Gill at a 2004 concert to show support for U.S. military men and women.
3
In 1979 Gill joined Pure Prairie League as lead singer, recording three albums with the band.
Don't know that I want one."Profile, theBoot website; retrieved August 15, 2013.
The accident placed him in a coma for three months and left him with non-reversible brain damage.
BOOKS & AUTHORS: His 2009 novel "The Lost Symbol" once again features protagonist Robert Langdon
Dan Brown
Professor Robert Langdon is a fictional character created by author Dan Brown for his novels Angels & Demons (2000), The Da Vinci Code (2003), The Lost Symbol (2009), and Inferno (2013).
3
As professor at Harvard University, he teaches religious iconology and the fictional field of symbology.
In the last few sentences of Angels & Demons, Vittoria Vetra asks him if he has ever had a divine experience.
They inform him that Saunière has been murdered and they would like his immediate assistance at the Louvre to help them solve the crime.
HEADWEAR: Of low, medium or high, the crown on a Stetson ten-gallon hat
high
It had a wide brim, a high crown to keep an insulating pocket of air on the head, and was used to carry water.
3
Snyder, Jeffrey B. (1997) Stetson Hats and the John B. Stetson Company 1865-1970 pg 40 ISBN 0-7643-0211-6  Stetson made an unusually large hat from felt he made from hides collected on the trip, and wore the hat for the remainder of the expedition.
Hat sales suffered during the Depression years, but Stetsons remained ubiquitous until Americans' embrace of headwear faded after WWII.
In addition, on April Fools' Day, 2011, the U.S. Army released a humorous statement that the official black beret of the Army would be replaced by stetsons.
IT'S AN L.A. THING: Good times are Bruin in this district, home to UCLA, where John Wooden was a "wizard"
Westwood
Nicknamed the "Wizard of Westwood," as head coach at UCLA he won ten NCAA national championships in a 12-year period, including an unprecedented seven in a row.
2
Furious with Wooden, Lacy quit the team three days later, telling the Los Angeles Times "I've never enjoyed playing for that man.
He kept to a monthly ritual—health permitting—on the 21st of every month, when he would visit her crypt in the mausoleum, then write a love letter to her.
HOMECOMING: (Hi, I'm Shawn Colvin)  My album "A Few Small Repairs" featured this Grammy-winning song about an awkward return
"Sunny Came Home"
In 1996, Colvin released her "platinum status" album A Few Small Repairs  and in 1997 the success of her single "Sunny Came Home" firmly catapulted her into the mainstream after spending four weeks at the number one spot on the Adult Contemporary chart.
3
Early and personal life Colvin was born in Vermillion, South Dakota and spent her youth in London, Ontario and Carbondale, Illinois.
She learned to play guitar at the age of 10 and grew up listening to her father's collection of music, which included artists such as Peter Seeger and the Kingston Trio.
After becoming a mother Colvin released the album Holiday Songs and Lullabies in 1998 and in 2001 released another album called Whole New
YOU DON'T KNOW JACK NICHOLSON: Jack went hot tubbing with Kathy Bates in the movie "About" this retiree
Schmidt
She was also nominated for an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress for About Schmidt (2002).
3
Bates' first feature film role was the 1971 Miloš Forman comedy Taking Off (credited as "Bobo Bates"), wherein she sings an original song "Even Horses Had Wings".
He tells Alan that after a life of womanizing and debauchery, he was sent to hell and condemned to spend eternity in a woman's body.
She has been confirmed for the fifth season American Horror Story: Hotel where she is to be playing Iris, the hotel's manager who hates Sarah Paulson's character Hypodermic Sally.
HOME FROM THE HOUSE: Speaker Boehner goes home to this state, where he put himself through Xavier University working as a janitor
Ohio
Xavier University ( ) is a co-educational Jesuit, Catholic university located in Cincinnati, Ohio, United States.
3
Fenwick Place opened for the 2011–2012 academic year.
Smith is also home to Xavier's MBA programs and Xavier's Entrepreneurial Center.
Henry Heimlich, "inventor" of Heimlich Maneuver.
THAT '70s SHOW: It starred Angie Dickinson as Sgt. Pepper Anderson
Police Woman
From 1974 to 1978,  Dickinson starred as Sergeant Leann "Pepper" Anderson in the NBC crime series Police Woman, for which she received Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Television Series Drama and three Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Drama Series nominations.
3
Taking a cue from her publisher father, she had intended to be a writer.
She joined a star-studded Arthur Penn/Sam Spiegel production, The Chase (1966), along with Marlon Brando, Jane Fonda, Robert Redford, and Robert Duvall.
They remained a married couple for 15 years, though late in their marriage, they had a period of separation where each dated other people.
AUTHOR, AUTHOR: From 1845 to 1847 he lived in a cabin he built on the shore of Walden Pond
Henry David Thoreau
The reservation was designated a National Historic Landmark in 1962 for its association with the writer Henry David Thoreau (1817–62), whose two years living in a cabin on its shore provided the foundation for his most famous work, Walden; or, Life in the Woods.
2
A famous example of a kettle hole, it was formed by retreating glaciers 10,000–12,000 years ago.
Description The Walden Pond Reservation is located south of Massachusetts Route 2 and (mostly) west of Massachusetts Route 126 in Concord and Lincoln, Massachusetts.
BETTER KNOWN AS: Robert Parker took this outlaw alias from his mentor; his partner took his from a city where he was jailed
Butch Cassidy
Robert Parker may refer to: Sir Robert Parker, 1st Baronet (c. 1655–1691), English politician; Member of Parliament for Hastings, 1679–1685 Robert Parker, Baron Parker of Waddington (1857–1918), British law lord Robert Parker (dancer), British dancer, principal dancer at Birmingham Royal Ballet Robert Parker (historian) (born 1950), Wykeham Professor of Ancient History at Oxford University Robert Parker (judge) (1796–1865), lawyer, judge and politician in New Brunswick Robert Parker (minister) (1564–1614), English Puritan scholar and divine Robert Parker (Music Producer) Electronic musician from Stockholm, Sweden Robert Parker (musician) (1847–1937), New Zealand organist, choirmaster and conductor Robert Parker (singer) (born 1930), American R&B singer Robert Parker (sound engineer) (1936–2004), Australian sound engineer and broadcaster Robert Parker (water polo) (born 1987), British water polo player Robert A. Parker (born 1936), astronaut Robert B. Parker (1932–2010), author of the Spenser detective novels Robert D. Parker, American businessman Robert Henry Parker (born 1932), British accounting scholar R. Hunt Parker (1892–1969), American jurist Robert Ladislav Parker, American geophysicist and mathematician Robert LeRoy Parker (1866–1908?), birth name of Butch Cassidy Robert M. Parker, Jr. (born 1947), American wine critic Robert Manley Parker (born 1937), American judge Robert Townley Parker, British Member of Parliament for Preston Robert W. Parker (born 1960), American composer Robert W. Parker (general), U.S. Air Force general Col.
1
Robert Parker, ring name of wrestler Robert Fuller Johnson v. Parker defendant, employer of John Casor  See also Rob Parker (disambiguation) Bobby Parker (disambiguation) Bob Parker (disambiguation) Bert Parker (disambiguation)
THE MARINE CORPS: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):Island on which the action depicted here took place: (the raising of the flag on Mount Suribachi)
Iwo Jima
Mount Suribachi (JPN.: , Suribachiyama) is a 169 m high mountain at the southwest end of the island Iwo Jima (now officially Iō-tō) in the northwest Pacific Ocean, under the administration of Ogasawara Subprefecture, Tokyo Metropolis, Japan.
2
Geology Geologically, the mountain is a cinder cone of andesite, formed by volcanic activity.
In the spring of 1945, the major battle between Japan and the United States broke out.
THE PULITZER PRIZE FOR POETRY: The 1948 prize went to "The Age of Anxiety" by this poet, whose initials stood for Wystan Hugh
Auden
Random House)  The Age of Anxiety: A Baroque Eclogue (1947; first UK edition, 1948) is a long poem in six parts by W. H. Auden, written mostly in a modern version of Anglo-Saxon alliterative verse.
2
Quant, Malin, Rosetta, and Emble – to explore and develop his themes.
External links
AWKWARD: After flubbing the oath of office, this Chief Justice redid it with Barack Obama later that week
Roberts
Presidency (2009–present)  First days thumb|Barack Obama takes the oath of office administered by Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. at the Capitol, January 20, 2009|alt=Photograph  The inauguration of Barack Obama as the 44th President took place on January 20, 2009.
3
In mid-1981, Obama traveled to Indonesia to visit his mother and half-sister Maya, and visited the families of college friends in Pakistan and India for three weeks.
The Council is currently chaired by Senior Advisor to the President Valerie Jarrett.
Guns Are Our Shared Responsibility" New York Times.
AFTER: After "The Pelican Brief" in 1992, he followed up with "The Client" in 1993
John Grisham
The Pelican Brief is a legal-suspense thriller written by John Grisham in 1992.
3
Darby shows the brief, which becomes known as the "Pelican Brief" to Thomas Callahan, her law professor and lover.
Meanwhile, the president and his Chief of Staff, Fletcher Coal, try to cover up the White House's connection to Mattiece.
External links
THE ARTS: "Maria Stuarda" by Donizetti (libretto by Bardari) is this type of work
opera
Maria Stuarda (Mary Stuart) is a tragic opera (tragedia lirica), in two acts, by Gaetano Donizetti, to a libretto by Giuseppe Bardari, based on Andrea Maffei's translation of Friedrich Schiller's 1800 play Maria Stuart.
3
Retrieved 15 September 2013
Seeing him, Elizabeth exclaims "you are hastening the execution" and signs the death warrant.
2nd edition.
A STAR IS REBORN?: He kicked around as the author of "The Power and the Glory" before he was Kicking Bird in "Dances with Wolves"
Graham Greene
The Power and the Glory (1940) is a novel by British author Graham Greene.
3
name=brennan>Brennan, Michael.
In The Power and the Glory, he identified the region's northern border as the U.S. and its southern border as the sea, when Tabasco's northern border is actually the Bay of Campeche and its southern border is Chiapas to the south.
The mestizo encounters the priest again in the prison, but prefers to wait for the right moment to betray him, which he does when leading him to the dying American.
TV PARENTS: George Segal plays Jack Gallo, publisher of Blush magazine & Laura San Giacomo's dad on this sitcom
Just Shoot Me
On television, he is best known for his roles as Jack Gallo on Just Shoot Me! (1997–2003) and as Albert "Pops" Solomon on The Goldbergs (2013–present).
3
He states: "I started off with the ukulele when I was a kid in Great Neck.
He was loaned to Warner Bros for Mike Nichols' classic adaptation of the Edward Albee play Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?
Television  thumb|left|Segal (left) with The Goldbergs cast, 2014 Segal starred as Biff Loman in a notable television adaptation of Death of a Salesman in 1966 and also starred as George in a 1968 adaptation of Of Mice and Men.
BOOKS: Lemony Snicket's "A Series of Unfortunate Events" books chronicle the lives of these 3 orphans
the Baudelaires
After Olaf's plan to steal the Baudelaires' fortune fails, Olaf begins to doggedly hunt the children down, bringing about the death of several characters.
3
Retrieved July 11, 2014.
For example, in The Ersatz Elevator, a book in Jerome and Esmé Squalor's library was titled Trout,
Players take turns drawing a card from either the draw pile or the top card from the discard pile in hopes of completing their sets.
R.E.M.: The video for "Losing My Religion" was banned in Ireland but given 6 awards by this network
MTV
Built on a mandolin riff, "Losing My Religion" was an unlikely hit for the group, garnering heavy airplay on radio as well as on MTV due to its critically acclaimed music video.
3
It charted at number 19 on the UK Singles Chart, and peaked at No.
Rolling Stone.
"Losing My Religion" alone earned several nominations, including Record of the Year and Song of the Year.
THE FABULOUS FIFTIES: This beauty is seen here, reigning as Miss America 1955, long before she co-starred on "Barnaby Jones"
Lee Meriwether
Barnaby Jones is a television detective series starring Buddy Ebsen and Lee Meriwether as a father and daughter-in-law who run a private detective firm in Los Angeles, California.
3
Barnaby Jones at Nostalgia Central  Until the cancellation of Cannon, the characters of both series moved back and forth between the two shows.
Broadcast history  Season  Time slot 1 (1973)
DVD releases On February 16, 2010, CBS DVD (distributed by Paramount) released season one of Barnaby Jones on DVD in Region 1 for the first time.
ATOMIC WEIGHTS: The atomic number of manganese, or a speed Sammy Hagar just can't drive
55
He afterwards launched a successful solo career, scoring an enduring hit in 1984 with "I Can't Drive 55".
3
Red.
The tracks which appeared on the album were recorded live, but crowd noise was removed during the mixing process to create the feel of a studio album.
The Waboritas (2003, 2004–2009, 2010–present)  Vic Johnson - guitar (1997–2003, 2004–2009, 2010-)  Mona Gnader - bass (1997–2003, 2004–2009, 2010-)  David Lauser - drums (1981–1985, 1987, 1993, 1997–2003, 2004–2009, 2010-)  Former band members  Guitar  David Lewark (1976–1977)  Gary Pihl (1977–1985)  Glen Campbell  (ex Juicy Lucy)  Bass  Bill Church (1976–1985)  Jonathan Pierce (1993, 1997)  Drums  Scott Mathews (1976–1977)  Chuck Ruff (1977–1980)  Denny Carmassi (1977, 1997)  Billy Carmassi  Keyboards  Alan Fitzgerald (1976–1979)  Geoff Workman (1980)  Jesse Harms (1984–1985, 1987, 1997–2003)  References  External links  Official Sammy Hagar Website Van Halen News Desk Sammy Hagar & Van Halen news Sammy Hagar Discography    Sammy Hagar's Political Contributions    Category:1947 births Category:20th-century American singers Category:21st-century American singers Category:American heavy metal guitarists Category:American heavy metal singers Category:American male singer-songwriters Category:American rock singers Category:American rock songwriters Category:American male songwriters Category:Chickenfoot members Category:Hagar Schon Aaronson Shrieve members Category:Living people Category:Montrose (band) members Category:People from Salinas, California Category:Planet Us members Category:Rock and Roll Hall of Fame inductees Category:Sammy Hagar & the Waboritas members Category:SEMA members Category:Singers from California Category:Van Halen members
SHIRLEY MacLAINE: When William Peter Blatty was writing this horror novel in the early '70s, he based the mother on Shirley, a close friend
The Exorcist
The Exorcist, written in 1971, is his most well-known novel; he also wrote the screenplay for the film adaptation, for which he won an Academy Award, and wrote and directed the sequel, The Exorcist III.  His most recent works include the novels Elsewhere (2009), Dimiter (2010), and Crazy (2010).
3
He lived at 28 different addresses during his childhood because of constant evictions by landlords for nonpayment of rent.
To promote his first book, Which Way to Mecca, Jack?
A meditation on God's existence described by one critic as "The Marx Brothers Meets Spellbound" and greeted as a "masterpiece" by movie critic Jerry Stein
I DRINK YOUR MILKSHAKE: Walgreens invented this shake made with barley-infused milk; the double chocolate kind is popular
a malted
In 1922, the company introduced a malted milkshake, which led to it establishing ice cream manufacturing plants.
3
The deal was expected to be finalized by September 1, 2012.
According to Jo Natale, Wegmans director of media relations, “
In Chicago, their flagship market, they teamed up with either Eagle Food Centers or Dominick's Finer Foods, usually with a "walkthru" to the adjoining store and often sharing personnel.
POETS: Many of the poems of his 1896 collection "A Shropshire Lad" were written prior to his ever having visited the county
Housman
A Shropshire Lad is a collection of sixty-three poems by the English poet Alfred Edward Housman (26 March 1859 – 30 April 1936).
1
Unattainable love leaves the lad helpless and lost (XIII-XVI).
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: John Mahoney, who plays Martin Crane on this sitcom, was born in England; he moved to the U.S. when he was 19
Frasier
He played Martin Crane in the American sitcom Frasier on NBC from 1993 to 2004.
1
My Dad Says as homophobic retired naval officer Lt.
KID LIT: A game of hide & seek leads Peter, Susan, Edmund & Lucy into this land that's "always winter & never Christmas"
Narnia
Lucette (French) Lúcia (Portuguese) Lucía (Spanish) Lucia  (Danish), (English), (Finnish), (German), (Italian), (Norwegian), (Romanian), (Slovak), (Swedish) Luciana (Italian), (Portuguese), (Spanish) Lucida (French) Lucie (Czech), (French) Luciella (Italian) Lucienne (French) Lucija (Croatian), (Slovene) Lucila (Spanish) Lusi (Turkish) Lucilla (Italian) Lucille (English), (French) Lucinda (English), (Portuguese) Lucinde (French) Lucita (Spanish) Łucja (Polish) Lucy (English) Lucyna (Polish) Luz (Spanish) Luzi (German) Luzia (German), (Portuguese) Luzie (German) Luziya (Russian) Lusine (Armenian) Liosibhe (Irish)  People  Surname  Autherine Lucy, first black student to attend the University of Alabama  Charles Lucy, English historical painter of the Victorian era  Donny Lucy, baseball player  Gary Lucy, English television actor and model  Sir Henry Lucy JP, an English journalist and humorist  Jeffrey Lucy, former Chairman of the Australian Securities and Investments Commission  Judith Lucy, Australian comedian  Julie Ashton-Lucy, international field hockey umpire from Queensland, Australia  Sir Thomas Lucy, builder of Charlecote Park in 1558  Tom Lucy, international rower  William Lucy, English clergyman  Given name   Lucy (Australopithecus) (c. 3,000,000 BCE), fossil also known as AL 288-1  Saint Lucy (283–304), Christian saint and martyr  Lucille Ball (1911–1989), American actress and comedian remembered for her character "Lucy"  Lucy DeCoutere, actress, best known for playing "Lucy" on the Trailer Park Boys  Shannon Spruill (born 1975), American professional wrestler who used the stage name "Lucy Furr"  Lucy Durack, Australian actress and singer  Lucy Hale, American actress  Lucy Hockings, New Zealand born television presenter on BBC World News  Lucy Jones, American seismologist  Lucy Liu, American actress  Lucy Parsons, American labor organizer, radical socialist and anarchist communist  Lucy Qinnuayuak, Inuit Canadian artist  Lucy Temerlin (1964–1987), a chimpanzee known for her use of American Sign Language  Lucy Stone (1818-1893), American activist  Fictional characters  Lucy Pevensie in the Chronicles of Narnia book series and the film series adaptation  Lucy van Pelt in the Peanuts cartoon series and broader franchise  Lucy/Nyu in the manga Elfen Lied  Lucy Ricardo, the star character of I Love Lucy  Lucy Romalotti in the American soap opera The Young and the Restless  Lucy Honeychurch, the protagonist of A Room with a View and its film adaptations.
3
Lucy is also an American, Australian, Canadian, English, Irish, Scottish, Welsh and French surname.
Feminine name variants Luiseach (Irish) Lučija, Лучија (Serbian) Lucy, Люси (Bulgarian) Lutsi, Луци  (Macedonian) Lutsija, Луција  (Macedonian) Liùsaidh (Scottish Gaelic) Liucija (Lithuanian) Liucilė (Lithuanian) Lūcija (Latvian) Lleucu (Welsh) Llúcia (Catalan) Loukia, Λουκὶα (Greek) Luca (Hungarian) Luce (French), (Italian)
Lucy Fields in the television series Grey's Anatomy  Lucy Fernandez in the Degrassi series.
HOLLYWOOD SQUARES: Hey, lady!  In 1963, as Julius Kelp in "The Nutty Professor", he played a square
Jerry Lewis
The Nutty Professor is a 1963 American comic science fiction feature film produced, directed, co-written (with Bill Richmond) and starring Jerry Lewis.
3
His real identity now revealed, Kelp gives an impassioned speech, admitting his mistakes and seeking forgiveness.
Eventually, Kelp's formerly henpecked father chooses to market the formula (a copy of which Kelp had sent to his parents' home for safekeeping), endorsed by the strait-laced president of the university who proclaims, "It's a gasser!"
The Nutty Professor, Special Edition, commentary.
AIRLINE LOGOS: Under founder Walter Varney, its predecessor company launched commercial air service in the U.S.
United Airlines
thumb|Walter T. Varney, founder of predecessors of United and Continental Airlines, 1921 Walter Thomas Varney (December 26, 1888 in San Francisco, California – January 25, 1967 in Santa Barbara, California)Varney Santa Barbara DCT or Obit Accessed 21 June 2007 was an American aviation pioneer who founded forerunners of two major U.S. airlines, United AirlinesUnited Airlines Website,Era 2: 1926 - 1933 and Continental Airlines.
3
Varney served as a pilot in the Aviation Section, U.S. Signal Corps during World War I.
Varney, following a five company merger, sold the much expanded Varney Air Group in 1930 to United Aircraft and Transport.
Later years and death  In his later years, he suffered from chronic pulmonary emphysemia, chronic bronchitis, and valvular heart disease.
HELLO FODDER: The field of this in which Holden Caulfield imagined himself could have been grown for feed
rye
Holden Caulfield (born c.1932) is the fictional teenage protagonist and narrator of author J. D. Salinger's 1951 novel The Catcher in the Rye.
3
It is this cynicism that causes him to distance himself from other people, despite wanting connection as well.
An earlier version of this story, titled "Are You Banging
Caulfield family in other works "Last Day of the Last Furlough" relates the final day of Babe Gladwaller before he leaves to fight in World War II. Gladwaller spends part of the day with his little sister before Vincent Caulfield (later renamed D.B. in the novel) arrives.
SPANNING THE GLOBE: The Venus Beach Hotel is at Paphos on this Mediterranean isle where Venus is said to have come out of the sea
Cyprus
Paphos  ( ; ) is a coastal city in the southwest of Cyprus and the capital of Paphos District.
1
Bibliotheke, iii.14.3.
FAMOUS HUMANITARIANS: After WWII, this Boys Town founder served as a consultant in setting up youth programs in Korea & Japan
Father Flanagan
Media  Boys Town (film), a 1938 film about Father Flanagan and his work, starring Spencer Tracy and Mickey Rooney, with Henry Hull and Leslie Fenton  Boystown (film), an unrelated 2007 Spanish comedy film  See also  Girls Town, films  Boys Town, an organization
2
Boys Town or Boystown may refer to:  Places  Boystown, Chicago, a gay village in the Lakeview neighborhood of Chicago, Illinois, USA  Boystown, County Wicklow, a civil parish in County Wicklow, Ireland  Boys Town, Nebraska, a suburb of Omaha, Nebraska, USA, and the headquarters of the Boys Town organization  Boy's Town (prostitution), a district in a Mexican border city that is formally designated for legalized prostitution  Boyztown, a gay and underage red-light district in Pattaya, Thailand Schools  Boys' Town (Engadine), a residential school for boys with behavioural issues in Engadine, New South Wales, Australia  Boys' Town Public School, an English medium school in Nashik, Maharashtra, India  Sports  Boys' Town F.C., a Jamaican football club.
Boys' Town Cricket Club, a Jamaican football club in the capital Kingston.
NOVELISTS: He dictated his last novel, "The Brothers Karamazov", to his wife who took it down in shorthand
Dostoevsky
The death of his son brought Dostoevsky to the Optina Monastery later that year.
3
When Dmitri returns from his failed dealing in the neighboring town, he escorts Grushenka to her benefactor's home, but quickly discovers she deceived him and left early.
Dmitri begs for Katerina to visit him in the hospital, where he is recovering from an illness before he is due to be taken away.
the play was published by Dramatists Play Service, dramatized by L.A. Theatre Works, and later broadcast on NPR on the NPR Playhouse series.
CURRENT GOVERNORS: Frank Keating
Oklahoma
Francis Anthony "Frank" Keating (born February 10, 1944) is an American politician from Oklahoma.
2
The same year he finished law school, Keating was made a Special agent for the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Novak, Robert.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: A Maverick preacher & a swashbuckling Civil War General founded Drake University in this capital of Iowa
Des Moines
Drake University is a private, co-educational university located in Des Moines, Iowa, United States.
3
The University consists of six colleges:   College of Arts and Sciences  College of Business and Public Administration  School of Education  School of Journalism and Mass Communication  Law School  College of Pharmacy and Health Sciences  Rankings For the 2015-16 academic year, Drake  University placed third in the midwest region of the U.S. News & World Report's rankings of master's universities.
Drake’s first football field, Haskins Field, opened on October 11, 1905 with a 17-0 loss to Iowa.
Drake’s football history continued on 1928 when Drake defeated Simpson College 41-6 in what is believed to be the first night football game west of the Mississippi River.
THE CIVIL WAR: He once wrote his daughter, "Traveler is my only companion; I may say my only pleasure"
Robert E. Lee
The Traveler (novel), 2005 novel by John Twelve Hawks The Traveler: An American Odyssey in the Himalayas, 1993 book by Eric Hansen The Traveller (1954 novel), time-travel story by Richard Matheson Traveller (novel), 1988 historical novel by Richard Adams about General Robert E. Lee's horse of the same name Traveler (novel series), a series of post-apocalyptic novels written by multiple writers under the pseudonym D. B. Drumm The Traveller; or, a Prospect of Society, poem by Oliver Goldsmith The Traveller (character), the hero of James Herbert's graphic novel, The City Travelers, group of social outcasts in the novel Earthworks Travelers, fictional characters from The Pendragon Adventure series by D. J. MacHale  Music
1
Traveler or traveller may refer to:  one who travels, especially to distant lands   Sociology  Drifter (person), a person who is continually travelling without a home or job Rogue (vagrant) Vagabond (person) Vagrancy (people) Itinerant, a person who travels from place to place with no fixed home Nomad, a person who does not stay long in the same place, a wanderer Perpetual traveler, a traveller / migrant who is not considered a legal resident of any country Tourist, a person who is travelling or visiting a place for pleasure  People English Travellers (disambiguation) Scottish Travellers, a broad term referring to indigenous Highland Traveller's Ceàrdannan or other groups Showmen, people involved in funfairs and the like New Age travellers, groups of people who often espouse New Age and/or hippie beliefs, and usually travel between music festivals and fairs Rainbow Travellers Indigenous Norwegian Travellers, itinerant ethnic minority group in Norway Irish Travellers or Pavees, traditionally nomadic people of Irish origin living predominantly in Ireland and Great Britain Norwegian and Swedish Travellers, a traditionally nomadic people in Scandinavia, sometimes related to the Romani people Romani people, ethnic group living mostly in Europe, who trace their origins to medieval India Kale (Welsh Romanies)  Places Traveler Mountain, a mountain in Maine; the highest peak is called "The Traveler"  The arts  Film The Traveler (1974 film), an Iranian drama directed by Abbas Kiarostami Traveller (1981 film), an Irish film starring Davy Spillane Traveller (1997 film), a 1997 American film starring Bill Paxton and Mark Wahlberg Traveller (1999 film), a 1999 Brazilian film The Traveller (2009 film), an Egyptian film directed by Ahmed Maher The Traveler (2010 film), an American horror film starring Val Kilmer Traveller (2012 film), Linde Nijland's official music video by Sam Chegini  Literature
ANIMALS IN LITERATURE: This first sister of Peter Rabbit married Benjamin Bunny
Flopsy
Peter, his mother, Mrs. Josephine Rabbit, as well as his sisters, Flopsy, Mopsy, and Cotton-tail live in a rabbit hole that has a human kitchen, human furniture, as well as a shop where Mrs. Rabbit sells various items.
3
Borders devastated by the night or year." (MacDonald 40) and the bunnies come by asking him for spare cabbage.
The Peter Rabbit (rather than other Beatrix Potter characters) stories and merchandise are very popular in Japan: many Japanese visit the Lake District after becoming familiar with Potter's work at an early age at school.
An animated/live-action adaptation of the Peter Rabbit character, produced by Sony Pictures Animation, is scheduled to be released on March 23, 2018.
CITIZEN KANE: It's Kane's full name
Charles Foster Kane
Kane (American band), American Southern rock band Big Daddy Kane, rapper Kane West (aka Gus Lobban), Kero Kero Bonito member and solo electronic music producer  Fictional characters Charles Foster Kane, lead character in the film Citizen Kane Will Kane, lead character the film High Noon Kane (fantasy), fantasy character created by Karl Edward Wagner Kane (Command & Conquer), character in the Command & Conquer video game series Kane, a character in the Doctor Who story, Dragonfire Kane, a character in the Outlanders science fiction novel series Kane, one of the title characters in Kane & Lynch: Dead Men Kane (wrestler), ring name of American professional wrestler Glenn Jacobs Kane, early ring name of professional wrestler Lash Huffman, better known as Stevie Ray Captain Terror (Daniel "Dan" Kane)
2
Kane or KANE may refer to:  Places Kane, Illinois, village Kane County, Illinois Kane, Pennsylvania, founded by American Civil War general Thomas L. Kane Kane County, Utah Anoka County-Blaine Airport's ICAO airport code Kane (ancient city), Turkey  Music Kane (Dutch band), Dutch rock band.
Killer Kane, a villain character in the Buck Rogers film series Reverend Henry Kane, a fictional villain from the Poltergeist film series Lord Kane of Runefaust, from the video game Shining Force Kane Family, family in the Kane Chronicles book series by Rick Riordan Kane (comics), the main character of the eponymous comic book series by Paul Grist Garrison Kane, a Marvel Comics character  People with the surname  See Kane (surname)  People with the given name Kane Evans, Australian professional rugby league footballer Kane Ferdinand, Irish footballer Kane Hodder, American actor and stuntman Kane Waselenchuk, Canadian racquetball player Kane Williamson, a New Zealand cricketer Chelsea Kane Staub, American actress, known professionally as Chelsea Kane  Other Kane (musical instrument), Japanese bell Kane (video game), 1986 home computer game published by Mastertronic KANE (AM), radio station licensed to New Iberia, Louisiana, United States Kāne, major Hawaiian god Kāne Milohai, minor Hawaiian god  See also Cane (disambiguation) Cain (disambiguation) Kain (disambiguation) Kaine, comic book character from Marvel, a clone of Spider-Man Danity Kane, American R&B and Pop group Citizen Kane, movie Kane & Abel by Jeffrey Archer, book
IT HAPPENED IN MAY: 1931:This 102-story building is officially dedicated in New York City
the Empire State Building
thumb|left|A construction worker on top of the Empire State Building as it was being built in 1930.
3
New York City's higher education network comprises over 120 colleges and universities, including Columbia University, New York University, and Rockefeller University, which have been ranked among the top 35 in the world.
|work=[[The
> and [[Major League Soccer]].<ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.hoovers.com/company-information/cs/company-profile.Major_League_Soccer_LLC.0432cbf68c309307.html |title=Major League Soccer, L.L.C. Company Information |publisher=Hoovers, Inc |accessdate=May 18, 2013}}</ref
SMITH: Betty Smith wrote about young Francie Nolan in her novel "A Tree Grows in" this New York City borough
Brooklyn
The five boroughs – Brooklyn, Queens, Manhattan, the Bronx, and Staten Island – were consolidated into a single city in 1898.
3
thumb|left|New Amsterdam, centered in the eventual Lower Manhattan, in 1664, the year England took control and renamed it "New York".|alt=A painting of a coastline dotted with red roof houses and a windmill, with several masted ships sailing close to shore under blue sky.
Major tabloid newspapers in the city include: ''[[Daily News (New York)|The New York Daily News]]'', which was founded in 1919 by [[Joseph Medill Patterson]]<ref>{{cite web |url=http://www.britannica.com/EBchecked/topic/412434/New-York-Daily-News |title=New York Daily News (American newspaper)
|publisher=Britannica.com
MURDER, SHE WROTE: This female P.I. investigates murder & mayhem in books by Sara Paretsky
VI Warshawski
I start each VI Warshawski book convinced I can’t do it’, The Guardian, 7 August 2015.
3
Sarah Crown, Sara Paretsky interview: ‘
ISBN 978-0-7394-5594-4 Bleeding Kansas (2008)
ISBN 978-0-399-15674-8 Breakdown (2012)
PULLING RANK: In Catholic ministry, priest is right below bishop & this rank is right below priest
deacon
The Protestant, Archdeacon Philpot, who was put to death in 1555, was held to be very obstinate on this point (see the edition of his works published by the Parker Society); and among many similar controversies of a later date may be mentioned that between Dr. Bishop, subsequently vicar Apostolic, and Dr. Abbot, afterwards Bishop of Salisbury, regarding the "Catholicke Deformed", which raged from 1599 to 1614.[http://www.newadvent.org/cathen/03449a.htm]  [[User:Lima|Lima]] 13:24, 22 December 2005 (UTC)  I believe the term "catholic" when it was first used in the 4th century was to describe what was then one church.
3
This "universal" interpretation is mentioned in the [[Nicene Creed]] and the [[Apostles' Creed]].''
This also means that when Episcopal or Anglican clerics convert to the Catholic Church, they must be ordained again according to Catholic rites."
Why would these 'indiscriminating' people, whoever they are, use the term for all Christians when they believe that the Roman Catholic Church is "only one denomination within that Church?"
SOPRANOS: Cecilia Bartoli recorded obscure arias by this composer, some of which recycle "Four Seasons" tunes
Vivaldi
Work in baroque music  In addition to Mozart and Rossini, Bartoli has spent much of her time performing and recording baroque and early classical era music of such composers as Gluck, Vivaldi, Haydn and Salieri.
3
Early career  Bartoli was born in Rome.
She often performs with the baroque Ensemble Il Giardino Armonico.
The couple married in 2011 after 12 years together.
MIKE TV: Darren McGavin, Rob Estes & Stacy Keach have all played this chain-smoking private investigator
Mike Hammer
Filmography + Film Year Title Role Notes 1987 Student Exchange Beach Television film 1988 Perfect People Monty Television film 1988 Uninvited Corey Direct-to-video 1989 Thunderboat Row  Television film 1989 Phantom of the Mall: Eric's Revenge Peter Baldwin 1989 Trapper Country War Ryan Cassidy 1990 Checkered Flag Mike Reardon Television film 1992 Aces: Iron Eagle III Doyle 1992 Lady Against the Odds Martin Anderson Television film 1994 Come Die with Me: A Mickey Spillane's Mike Hammer Mystery Mike Hammer Television film 1996 Sweet Temptation Billy Stone Television film 1996  Erik Eriksen Television film 1997 Close to Danger Adam Television film 1998 Terror in the Mall Glen Savoy Television film 2000 Nostradamus Michael Nostrand 2000  Sam (younger) Television film 2002 Counterstrike ATF Special Agent Thomas Kellogg Television film 2005 I Do, They Don't Jim Barber Television film 2006 How to Go Out on a Date in Queens Artie 2011 Edge of the Garden Brian Connor Television film 2012 Hello Herman Chet Clarkson 2012 Tailor Made Murder Randy Williams Television film  + Television Year Title Role Notes 1986 CBS Schoolbreak Special Billy Episode: "Have You Tried Talking to Patty?"
3
In May 2008, Estes was cast as Harry Wilson in 90210 on The CW.
Personal life Estes attended Santa Monica High School and is a graduate of the University of Southern California where he was a member of the Alpha Tau Omega fraternity.
1986–1987 Days of Our Lives Glenn Gallagher Unknown episodes 1988 My Sister Sam  Episode: "The Wrong Stuff" (unaired) 1988 Simon & Simon John Channing Episode: "First, Let's Kill All the Lawyers" 1989 Heartland Brian Episode: "Gus Sees a Dead Guy" 1989 21 Jump Street Darryl Episode: "Say It Ain't So, Pete" 1989  Curly Episode: "A Good Day to Die" 1991 Zorro Monty Episode: "The New Zorro" 1991–1995 Silk Stalkings Sgt.
MODERN NOVELS: At the end of this Pat Conroy novel, Tom Wingo whispers, "Lowenstein, Lowenstein"
The Prince of Tides
Two of his novels, The Prince of Tides and The Great Santini, were made into Oscar-nominated films.
2
- New York: Marshall Cavendish.
Know this: I love you with my heart and always will.
20th CENTURY BOOKS: Over a decade before Friedan's "The Feminine Mystique", this woman wrote "The Second Sex"
Simone de Beauvoir
The Second Sex () is a 1949 book by the French existentialist Simone de Beauvoir.
3
Beauvoir, pp.
The discovery of sex is a "phenomenon as painful as weaning" and she views it with disgust.
1005–1035.
THE NATIONAL WOMEN'S HALL OF FAME: Membership tripled after Wilma Mankiller became the 1st woman chief of this Native American nation
the Cherokee
April 6, 2010) was the first female chief of the Cherokee Nation.
3
Mankiller and Wallis, p. 9
Mankiller and Wallis, p. 63, 70, 102  In 1963, at the age of 17, Mankiller married Hector Hugo Olaya de Bardi, an Ecuadorian college student.
Her first book, Mankiller: A Chief and Her People, an autobiography, became a national bestseller.
THE HENRY FORD MUSEUM: In Chicago in 1936, Oscar Mayer introduced the car with this highly descriptive name
Wienermobile
thumb|right|Wienermobile in Gilford, New Hampshire Shares of Kraft foods were first offered to the public via an initial public offering in 2001.
3
In 1904, Oscar Mayer began branding its meats to capitalize on their popularity, beginning an industry-wide trend.
In 1906, Oscar Mayer & Co. was among the first to volunteer to join the newly created federal meat inspection program.
References  External links  Oscar Mayer Homepage        Category:Brand name hot dogs Category:Brand name meats Category:Companies based in Chicago, Illinois Category:Kraft Foods brands Category:Sausage companies Category:Companies established in 1883
ART & ARTISTS: Elaine de Kooning, Willem's painter wife, wrote "The Spirit of" this 2-word art movement of the 1940s & '50s
Abstract Expressionism
In Paleolithic art she found the roots of Abstract Expressionism, since they have the same improvisational processes and spontaneous technique.
3
She produced a diverse body of work over the course of her lifetime, including sculpture, etchings, and work inspired by cave drawings, all in addition to her many paintings.
These series of paintings were shown at the Fischbach Gallery in November 1988.
NYC;
THE CHUM BUCKET: On "How I Met Your Mother", this pal played by Neil Patrick Harris wanted to "flight-suit up" & "penguin-suit up"
Barney Stinson
He is known for playing Barney Stinson in the television comedy series How I Met Your Mother (2005–2014), for which he was nominated for four Emmy Awards, and for his role as the title character in Doogie Howser, M.D. (1989–1993).
3
Stage
As a result of his critically acclaimed performance in Cabaret, Harris was named the top-drawing headliner in the role of the Emcee by GuestStarCasting.com, outranking fellow celebrity stars John Stamos and Alan Cumming.
In an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, Harris said his relationship with Burtka began in 2004.
STRAIT GUY: If you're on Cape Chelyuskin in this country, you'll have to cross the Vilkitsky Strait to get the the Arctic Ocean
Russia
thumb|right|250px|Location of Cape Chelyuskin at the northern end of the Taymyr Peninsula Cape Chelyuskin () is the northernmost point of the Eurasian continent (and indeed of any continental mainland), and the northernmost point of mainland Russia.
2
The Maud continued eastwards into the Laptev Sea and the men were instructed to wait for the freeze-up of the Kara Sea and then sledge southwestwards towards Dikson carrying Amundsen's mail.
It was renamed the "E. K. Fyodorov Hydrometeorological Observatory" in 1983.
THE SMALL SCREEN: [Hi, I'm Sharon Case]  The creators of this daytime soap, which I joined in 1994, first considered calling it "The Innocent Years"
The Young and the Restless
In 1994, she stepped into the role of Sharon Newman on the CBS daytime soap opera The Young and the Restless, which she still plays presently.
3
Oscar Award nominee Jesse Friedman heavily praised the film, and encouraged people to watch it.
It was just so upsetting to the audience."
The line was designed to have a "piece for everybody" which could be worn on any occasion.
LITERARY HOUSES: In this Anne Tyler novel, a travel writer breaks his leg & moves into his siblings' home
The Accidental Tourist
She has published 20 novels, the best known of which are Dinner at the Homesick Restaurant (1983), The Accidental Tourist (1985), and Breathing Lessons (1988).
3
In addition to her novels, Tyler has published short stories in The New Yorker, The Saturday Evening Post, Redbook, McCall's, and Harper's, but they have never been published as a collection.
She has frequently noted Tyler’s themes with regard to family and marriage.
Reviewing Noah's Compass, Kakutani states that “the central concern of most of this author’s characters has always been their need to define themselves in terms of family — the degree to which they see themselves as creatures shaped by genetics, childhood memories and parental and spousal expectations, and the degree to which they are driven to embrace independent identities of their own.
FAMOUS SHAMUS: Robert B. Parker introduced this one-named P.I. in 1974's "The Godwulf Manuscript"
Spenser
His most famous works were the 40 novels written about the private detective Spenser.
3
Parker received a PhD in English literature from Boston University in 1971.Author Profile: Robert B. Parker from BookReporter.com  His dissertation, titled "The Violent Hero, Wilderness Heritage and Urban Reality," discussed the exploits of fictional private-eye heroes created by Dashiell Hammett, Raymond Chandler, and Ross Macdonald.
Dacus, Chris.
http://www.amazon.com/Stoic-Western-Hero-Westerns-Part-ebook/dp/B006C2C7H4/ref=sr_1_1?s=digital-text&ie=UTF8&qid=1378170886&sr=1-1&keywords=chris+dacus
ILLUSTRATORS: Illustrator Sidney Paget, not his creator, gave this character his deerstalker cap
Sherlock Holmes
thumb|Sidney Edward Paget|alt=Photograph of Sidney Paget, dressed in a suit and looking to his right Sidney Edward Paget (4 October 1860 – 28 January 1908) was a British illustrator of the Victorian era, best known for his illustrations that accompanied Arthur Conan Doyle's Sherlock Holmes stories in The Strand magazine.
1
(The curved calabash pipe was added by the stage actor William Gillette; see, Smoking pipe (tobacco)#Calabash.)
THAT SPORTS VENUE HAS GOT TO GO!: On December 20, 2008 this city's RCA Dome was no longer dome, sweet dome
Indianapolis
RCA Dome (originally Hoosier Dome) was a domed stadium, located in Indianapolis, Indiana, and the home of the Indianapolis Colts NFL franchise for 24 seasons (1984–2007).
3
Smithsonian January 1988  The stadium was originally named the Hoosier Dome until 1994 when RCA paid $10 million for the naming rights for 10 years, with two 5-year options to RCA at a cost of $3.5 million if invoked.
Before that, the maximum seating for a football crowd was 60,272.
The Dome hosted an AMA Supercross Championship round from 1992 to 2008.2015 AMA Supercross media guide  Many memorable concerts took place in the "Hoosier Dome" such as Farm Aid in 1990 (Elton John, Guns n Roses, Lou Reed, John Mellencamp, CSN&Y, Willie Nelson, Iggy Pop, Don Henley & Bonnie Raitt to name a few), Monsters of Rock (Van Halen, Metallica, Scorpions, etc), 1987 Pink Floyd reunion, Rolling Stones, The Monsters of Rock Festival and Farm Aid 5.
BETTER "RED": Jeff Foxworthy says, "If your dad walks you to school because you're in the same grade, you might be" one of these
a redneck
Known for his "You might be a redneck" one-liners, Foxworthy has released six major-label comedy albums.
3
His grandfather, James Marvin Camp, was a fireman in Hapeville for more than 30 years.
When he told his mother that he wanted to go down to the local sanctuary to accept Christ as his Lord and Savior, his mother, who felt he was too young, told him to wait until he had a firmer understanding of the undertaking.
Foxworthy was also a potential investor in two episodes of Shark Tank, where moneyed entrepreneurs decide if they will invest in new products, ideas and the like from those requesting funding in exchange for a percentage of ownership.
U.S. PRESIDENTS: His half-brother Lawrence served in the British navy under Admiral Edward Vernon
George Washington
Mount Vernon, the home of the first American president George Washington, was named after Vernon, since Washington's elder brother served under Edward Vernon, and gave it his name.
3
His first command was the , part of the fleet of Admiral Sir Cloudesley Shovell.
However a later operation against Cartagena de Indias was a failure.
The rest of the Royal Navy rapidly followed Vernon's lead, supposedly calling the new drink "grog" after Vernon's nickname "Old Grog", attributed to his habitual wearing of a grogram coat.
MYTHOLOGY: Part hippopotamus & part woman, the Egyptian goddess Taweret had the tail of this alligator relative
a crocodile
Taweret is depicted in her standard form with a crocodile on her back and a small upright crocodile in her right hand.
3
However, Taweret and her fellow hippopotamus goddesses of fertility should not be confused with Ammit, another composite hippopotamus goddess who gained prominence in the New Kingdom.
Taweret was featured in other myths as well during these later periods.
Often these vessels had openings through the nipples, emphasizing Taweret's maternal aspects.
CRAC: You can sign off with TTFN, this "for now"
Ta Ta
TTFN is an initialism for a colloquial valediction, 'ta ta for now', based on 'ta ta', an informal 'goodbye', approximately equivalent to 'bye bye' but in an easier meaning it means 'goodbye for now'.
3
"Ta-ta for now" was brought into popular use in the UK in 1940 in the weekly radio comedy It's That Man
Memorable quotes for Batman, "Better Luck Next Time" (1966) on Internet Movie Database  In Winnie the Pooh and the Blustery Day, a 1968 Disney featurette, the voice of Tigger was performed by Paul Winchell, whose wife Jean Freeman suggested that he ad-lib the line.
However, the phrase does not appear in the original books by A. A. Milne.
LITERARY HODGEPODGE: Mr. Pecksniff in his "Martin Chuzzlewit" was such a hypocrite that pecksniffery became a synonym for hypocrisy
Charles Dickens
The Life and Adventures of Martin Chuzzlewit (commonly known as Martin Chuzzlewit) is a novel by Charles Dickens, considered the last of his picaresque novels.
3
But his grandfather is now under Pecksniff's control and rejects him.
The last part was double-length.
I mean, it's rubbish, that bit."
ONE-HIT WONDERS: 1955's "Earth Angel" was the only earthly hit for this ornithological quartet
The Penguins
"Earth Angel" (occasionally referred to as "Earth Angel (Will You Be Mine)") is a song by American doo-wop group the Penguins.
2
Although the song was going to be overdubbed with additional instrumentation, the original demo version became an unexpected hit, quickly outstripping its A-side.
Billboard called the record a "Best Buy" for the R&B charts, and Cashbox in Canada gave it its "Award o' the Week".
FAMOUS WOMEN: (Hi, I'm Alyssa Milano)  In 1999 Mary Jo Buttafuoco wrote a letter to the courts to release this girl whom I played in a 1993 TV movie
Amy Fisher
Although Milano feared that viewers would only recognize her as "the girl from Who's the Boss?", she was noticed by the media, which helped her land the role of Amy Fisher in the high-profile TV movie Casualties of Love: The Long Island Lolita Story, one of three TV films based on Fisher's shooting of Mary Jo Buttafuoco.
3
Career  1984–96
The film, which focuses on a group of young runaway and homeless teenagers,Brod, Doug (January 22, 1993).
Cosmopolitan.
WHERE YA FROM, CONGRESSMAN?: 2006 House Majority Leader John Boehner
Ohio
On October 29, 2015, prior to the voting of a new Speaker, Boenher's farewell speech included his intent to resign as representative for Ohio's 8th congressional district, effective at the end of the month.
2
While as Majority Leader he was second-in-command behind Speaker Dennis Hastert, as Minority Leader he was the leader of the House Republicans.
Financial crisis On September 18, 2008, Congressman Boehner attended a closed meeting with congressional leaders, then-Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson and Federal Reserve Chairman Ben Bernanke, and was urged to craft legislation to help financially troubled banks.
EASY ON THE EYES: It's a tossup whether this actress was at her loveliest in "The Fabulous Baker Boys" or "Tequila Sunrise"
Michelle Pfeiffer
In desperation, they take on a female singer, Michelle Pfeiffer, who revitalizes their careers, causing the brothers to re-examine their relationship with each other and with their music.
2
She tries to tell him how good a player he is, but he's unwilling to admit his regrets to her.
It transports you.
PLAYWRIGHTS: While working at the International Shoe Company, he met a man named Stanley Kowalski, a name he would later use in a play
Tennessee Williams
Stanley Kowalski is a fictional character in Tennessee Williams' play A Streetcar Named Desire.
3
Enraged, Stanley overpowers and rapes her.
This final assault on what she had left of her dignity sends Blanche over the edge into a nervous breakdown.
Weeks later, Stella has Blanche committed to a mental institution at Stanley's insistence.
STATES' HIGHEST POINTS: Mount Arvon on the Upper Peninsula
Michigan
|thumb|View from Mount Arvon to Lake Superior Mount Arvon, elevation , located in L'Anse Township, Baraga County, is the highest natural point in the U.S. state of Michigan.
2
Like nearby Arvon Township, Mount Arvon takes its name from the deposits of slate in the area which were reminiscent of those around Caernarfon in Wales.
Mount Arvon is part of the Huron Mountains.
GAME SHOW NETWORK: The regular & "Plus" versions of this game were hosted by Allen Ludden; the "Super" version, by Bert Convy
Password
Allen Ellsworth Ludden (October 5, 1917 – June 9, 1981) was an American television personality, emcee and game show host, perhaps most well known for having hosted various incarnations of the game show Password between 1961 and 1980.
3
New York, NY:
He also hosted the original pilot for The Joker's Wild and hosted a talk-variety show, Allen Ludden's Gallery.
In late October 1980, he slipped into a coma while on vacation.
SITCOMS: (Hi, I'm Lauren Graham from "The Gilmore Girls")  I played Valerie, on an episode of this sitcom, who put Jerry on speed dial after only 2 dates
Seinfeld
She played a graduate student who caught the eye of Dick on 3rd Rock from the Sun, Richard's overly-optimistic girlfriend on Caroline in the City, and Jerry's speed-dial ranking girlfriend on Seinfeld.
3
She appeared in various commercials for products such as Dimetapp and Lean Cuisine and hosted free preview weekends on The Movie Channel.
The production closed June 14, playing 113 shows and 28 previews.
In July 2012, Graham was a guest judge in the first episode of Season 10 of the reality television series Project Runway.
BOGIE & BACALL SPEAK!: In this film, Bogie told Conrad Veidt, "Your business is politics. Mine is running a saloon"
Casablanca
Hans Walter Conrad Veidt (22 January 1893 – 3 April 1943) was a German actor best remembered for his roles in films such as The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari (1920), The Man Who Laughs (1928), and, after being forced to migrate to Britain by the rise of Nazism in Germany, his English-speaking roles in The Thief of Bagdad (1940), and, in Hollywood,  Casablanca (1942).
3
Veidt also appeared in Magnus Hirschfeld's film Anders als die Andern (Different from the Others, 1919).
He moved to Hollywood in the late 1920s and made a few films, but the advent of talking pictures and his difficulty with speaking English led him to return to Germany.
Their daughter, Vera Viola Maria, called Viola, was born on 10 August 1925.
COLOR MY WORLD: In 1973's top single, Tony Orlando and Dawn sing of tying this "Around the old oak tree"
Yellow ribbon
They had several songs which were major hits including "Candida", "Knock Three Times", and "Tie a Yellow Ribbon Round the Ole Oak Tree".
3
The group hosted a variety program, "The Tony Orlando and Dawn Show" on CBS from 1974–76, and then broke up in 1978.
Ronald Reagan unsuccessfully challenged Gerald Ford, for the presidential nomination that year but came back in 1980 to claim the presidency itself.
US #28, CB #18  (with 'Wind')  "I'll Hold Out My Hand" (1969)
THE CONTINENT...: ...where the Latter-Day Saints believe that Zion or New Jerusalem will be built
North America
Latter Day Saint  In the Latter Day Saint movement, the New Jerusalem is viewed as a physical kingdom that will be built in North America,Joseph Smith, 1842, Wentworth Letter.
3
The Book of Ezekiel contains the first record of the New Jerusalem.
First, do not grieve excessively over Jerusalem.
I of Ethiopia, Power of the Trinity, is from the tribe of the Lion of Judah; Ethiopia is the new Jerusalem, Zion left to Ethiopia with Solomon and Makeda better known as Queen of Sheba son Menelik readion in this book Kebra Nagast   The Eastern Orthodox Church teaches that the New Jerusalem is the City of God that will come down from heaven in the manner described in the Book of the Apocalypse (Revelation).
RUSSIAN WRITERS: He insisted "The Cherry Orchard" was "A comedy, in places even a farce"; some may disagree
Anton Chekhov
thumb|Scene from Act 3 of the first run Moscow Art Theatre production  The Cherry Orchard (Russian: Вишнëвый сад, Romanized as Vishnevyi sad) is the last play by Russian playwright Anton Chekhov.
3
While presented with options to save the estate, the family essentially does nothing and the play ends with the sale of the estate to the son of a former serf; the family leaves to the sound of the cherry orchard being cut down.
Synopsis  Act I  The play opens in the early morning hours of a cool day in May in the nursery of Lyubov Andreyevna Ranevskaya's ancestral estate, somewhere in the provinces of Russia just after the turn of the 20th Century.
She says that if she had money she would move as far away from him as possible.
ANIMALS IN LITERATURE: Russell, a fox, appears in "The Nun's Priest's Tale" of this Chaucer work
The Canterbury Tales
thumb|right|250px|Chanticleer and the Fox in a mediaeval manuscript miniature  The Nun's Priest's Tale is one of The Canterbury Tales by the Middle English poet Geoffrey Chaucer.
3
She assures him that he only suffers from indigestion and chides him for paying heed to a simple dream.
The fox tries in vain to convince the wary rooster of his repentance; it now prefers the safety of the tree and refuses to fall for the same trick a second time.
The Nun's Priest elaborates his slender tale with epic parallels drawn from ancient history and chivalry and spins it out with many an excursus, giving a display of learning which, in the context of the story and its characters, can only be comic and ironic.
I'VE GOT A LITTLE LISZT: Cosima, Liszt's daughter with a countess who wrote under the pen name Daniel Stern, married this "Ring" cyclist
Wagner
Cosima Littlewood, young actress who played Adele in the 2006 mini series Jane Eyre Cosima von Bülow Pavoncelli Cosima Wagner Lady Cosima Windsor, born 2010, daughter of Alexander Windsor, Earl of Ulster and 22nd in line of succession to the British throne.
3
Cosima is a feminine given name, the feminine version of the name Cosimo.
It is derived from the Greek word meaning "order, decency."
ISBN 978-0-312-35220-2  Category:Feminine given names
OLD (REALLY OLD) PHOTOS: Britain's Roger Fenton is known as the first war photographer, capturing quiet moments in this 1850s conflict
the Crimean War
It is likely that in autumn 1854, as the Crimean War grabbed the attention of the British public, that some powerful friends and patrons - among them Prince Albert and Duke of Newcastle, Secretary of State for War - urged Fenton to go the Crimea to record the happenings.
3
Early life Fenton was born in Crimble Hall, Rochdale, Lancashire, on 28 March 1819.
Post Crimea  Undaunted by the lack of commercial success for his Crimean photographs, Fenton remained driven with great energy to perfect his art and to record meaningful and artistic images.
For Fenton and many of his colleagues, this was conclusive proof of photography's diminished status, and the pioneers drifted away.
TV MISGUIDED: Bobby didn't die... he's in my shower!  Pam realized the previous year was only a dream on this series
Dallas
The Waterboy  Bobby Caffey, from the TV series Third Watch  Bobby Cobb, in the TV series Cougartown  Bobby Crocker from Kojak  Bobby Dawson from CSI: Crime Scene Investigation  Bobby Deerfield, a movie starring Al Pacino  Bobby Drake, Iceman from the X-Men comics  Bobby Donnell, in The Practice  Bobby Ewing, a character from the TV series Dallas    Bobby Glover, a character in the TV series Little Bill  Bobby Hill (King of the Hill), a TV character  Bobby Pendragon, the main character in the series The Pendragon Adventure  Bobby Generic, a character in the animated series Bobby's World  Bobby Munson in Sons of Anarchy  Bobby Simone, in NYPD Blue  Bobby, in Stephen Sondheim's musical Company  Ricky Bobby, the main character in the movie Talladega Nights: The Ballad of Ricky Bobby  Bobby Singer in the TV series Supernatural  Bobby Wheeler (Taxi), a TV character  Robert Goren ("Bobby"), in Law & Order: Criminal Intent  See also  Bobby pin  Bobby sock  Robert (disambiguation)  Bob (disambiguation)  Rob (disambiguation)  Robby (disambiguation)  Robbie (disambiguation)
2
Bobby is a nickname for Robert, Roberta, Robin, or Babu.
Bobby or Bobbie may also refer to:   Bobby (given name)  Bobby, slang for a constable in British law enforcement  Bobby, British railway term for a signalman  Bobby (rapper), from South Korea   Bobby (actress), from Bangladesh  K. S. Ravindra, Indian screenwriter also known as Bobby  Bobby (software), used to validate websites  Dogs  Greyfriars Bobby, a legendary 19th century Scottish dog  Bobbie, a British regimental dog involved in the Battle of Maiwand  Silverton Bobbie, an American dog that walked 2,800 miles to find its owners  Film, TV, entertainment  Bobby (1973 film), a Bollywood movie  Bobby (2002 film), a Tollywood film  Bobby (2006 film), a film about the day Robert F. Kennedy was assassinated  Music  BOBBY (band), an American indie-folk-psychedelic music group  BOBBY (album), their eponymous debut album  Bobby (album), by Bobby Brown  Bobby, soundtrack album to the 2006 film  Goldener Bobby, an award given by the Verband Deutscher Tonmeister  Songs  "Bobby", a song by Barbara McNair 1957  "Bobby", a song by Carmen McRae 1972  "Bobby", a song by Eve Boswell 1958  "Bobby", a song by GFOTY 2013  "Bobby", a song by Jerry Harrison 1988  "Bobby", a song by Neil Scott (Neil Bogart) 1961  "Bobby", a song by Pete Rodriguez y Su Conjunto   "Bobby", a song by Ricky Valance 1961  "Bobby", a song by Robin Ward 1964  Fictional characters  Bobby, title character in the animated TV show Bobby's World  Bobby Baccalieri, in the HBO series The Sopranos  Bobby Brady, in The Brady Bunch  Bobby Breckinridge, in Degrassi   Bobby Bond, best friend of King Kong on The King Kong Show   Bobby Boucher, lead character in the film
THE WAR OF 1812: As he was carried below, mortally wounded, Capt. James Lawrence of the Chesapeake ordered, "don't" do this
give up the ship
He is probably best known today for his last words or "dying command" "Don't give up the ship!", which is still a popular naval battle cry, and which was invoked by Oliver Hazard Perry's personal battle flag, adopted to commemorate his dead friend.
3
vol.2 (Washington, DC.: US Government Printing Office, 1992), p. 559.
Two months later he took command of the frigate Chesapeake, then preparing for sea at Boston.
In addition, the U.S. Navy has named five ships USS Lawrence.
LET'S ROCK!: His Top 40 career lasted 4 decades, from No. 1 "Diana" in 1957 to No. 40 "Hold Me 'Til the Morning Comes" in 1983
Paul Anka
Diana may refer to :   Persons   Diana (mythology), ancient Roman goddess of the moon, the hunt, and chastity  Diana (given name), people with the given name Diana, including  Diana, Princess of Wales (1961–1997), first wife of Charles, Prince of Wales   Places and jurisdictions  in Africa  Diana (Numidia), an Ancient city, former bishopric and present Latin Catholic titular see in Algeria  Diana, Madagascar, a region in Madagascar  Diana's Peak, the highest point on the island of Saint Helena  in America  Diana, New York, a town in Lewis County, New York, United States  in Asia  Diana, Iraq, a village in northern Iraq  in Europe  Diana Strait, strait in the Kuril Islands, Russia  Diana Fortress, ancient Roman castrum in Serbia  Diana, Silesian Voivodeship, a village in south Poland   Astronomy   78 Diana, an asteroid  Diana (crater), a crater on the Moon   Fiction and Media    Books  Diana (pastoral romance), a 1559 text by Jorge de Montemayor Diana, a British comics series targeted at young girls, published by D. C. Thomson & Co. from 1963 to 1976  Diana, a Roman fortress in the Serbian city of Golubac   Film  Diana (film), a British film about Diana, Princess of Wales, starring Naomi Watts 4 Hearts, a 2008 Portuguese film developed under the title Diana  TV  Diana (TV series), a television series starring Patsy Kensit and Jenny Seagrove Diana (US TV series), a sitcom starring Diana Rigg "Diana" (Spooks), final episode of the 4th series of Spooks, concerning the former Princess of Wales   Music   Diana (band), a rock group from Toronto, Canada  Albums Diana (album), a 1980 Chic-produced album by Diana Ross Diana!, a 1971 Diana Ross TV special, also released as live album  Songs "Diana" (Bryan Adams song) "Diana" (One Direction song) "Diana" (Paul Anka song) "Diana", a song by Wayne Shorter from Herbie Hancock's album VSOP: Tempest in the Colosseum "Diana", a single by Comus from their 1971 album First Utterance   Brands   Diana (swimwear), a swimwear manufacturer   Vessels  Diana (ship), disambiguation: Diana (1840 ship), a 19th-century whaling ship Russian cruiser Diana (1899), a cruiser of the Imperial Russian Navy Russian frigate Diana (1853), a frigate of the Imperial Russian Navy   Acronyms   Democratic Renewal (DIANA), a political party in Greece  DIANA (DIvisive ANAlysis), Divisive Clustering Algorithm  DIANA FEA, a Finite Element Analysis (FEA) solver.
1
DIANA (intermediate language), an IDL-based data structure used in Ada compilers and within the PL/SQL runtime system  DIANA Mayer & Grammelspacher, a German airgun manufacturer   See also   Diane (disambiguation)  Diana camera, an inexpensive toy box camera popular with art photographers  Diana Department Store, a chain of department stores in southern Thailand  Diana Monkey, a West African member of the Old World Monkey superfamily or Cercopithecidae  Diana Motors Company, a Vintage Era automobile company
WORKING WITHOUT ANNETTE: Annette Funicello was not on board when Frankie starred in this 1961 sci-fi "voyage" directed by Irwin Allen
Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea
He also created several popular 1960s science fiction television series, such as Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea, Lost in Space, and Land of the Giants.
3
He put together packages consisting of directors, actors and script, and sold them to film studios.
Both were intended as pilots for new TV series projects, but his small-screen success from the 1960s largely eluded him in the 1970s.
New York: Henry Holt, 1997.
PRIME NUMBER, PLEASE: If you start with 99 bottles of beer on the wall, it's the first prime number you'll be left with after some fall
97
Other meanings of please include:  To "please", as a verb, means to give pleasure or gratification  "Pleasing" means finding an object or person aesthetically attractive or appealing  Please may also refer to:   Music   Albums   Please (Pet Shop Boys album), 1986 Please (Matt Nathanson album), 1993  Songs   "Please" (Toni Braxton song), 2005 "Please" (Robin Gibb song), 2003 "Please" (The Kinleys song), 1997 "Please" (U2 song), 1997 "Please (You Got That...)", a 1993 song by INXS "Please" (Pam Tillis song), 2000 "Please, Please", a song by McFly "Please", a song by The Apples in Stereo from Velocity of Sound "Please", a song by John Cale from Vintage Violence "Please", a song by Lamb from Between Darkness and Wonder "Please", a song by Tom McRae from The Alphabet of Hurricanes "Please", a song by Nine Inch Nails from The Fragile "Please", a song by Paul Hartnoll from The Ideal Condition "Please", a song by Chris Isaak from Speak of the Devil "Please", a song from the 1989 musical Miss Saigon "Please", a song by Pam Tillis from the album Thunder & Roses "Please", a song by Staind from Chapter V "Please", a song by Ludo   Other uses  Please Teacher!, an anime series PLEASE, a keyword in the INTERCAL programming language   See also  Please, Please, Please (disambiguation)
1
Please is a polite expression of request.
THE UNITED STATES OF ADVERTISING: Bausch & Lomb introduced the "Wayfarer" style of these in 1952
sunglasses
Wayfarers (role-playing game)  Ray-Ban Wayfarer, a model of sunglasses  A Wayfarer in China, a 1913 book by Elizabeth Kendall  The Wayfarer, a  painting by Hieronymus Bosch  The Wayfarer (novel), a 1912 novel by Natsume Sōseki  Wayfarer (album), a 1983 album by Jan Garbarek   Wayfarer, a public transport ticket-issuing machine manufactured by Parkeon  The Wayfarers Trio, with Mason Williams, Baxter Taylor and Billy Cheatwood  "Wayfarer", a 2002 song by Hot Water Music from Caution  "The Wayfarer", a 2002 song by Nightwish from Century Child  "Wayfarer", a 2003 song by Kayo Dot from Choirs of the Eye  "Wayfarer" (band), a musical group from Southern Ontario, Canada  "Wayfarer", a 2012 trance track by Audien  See also  Wayfarers Chapel, California  Wayfarer's Walk, England  The Wayfarers' Club, British mountaineering club  Wayfarer Redemption, a series of fantasy novels by Sara Douglass
2
A wayfarer is a person who travels on foot.
Wayfarer may also refer to:   Wayfarer (dinghy), a class of sailboat  Wayfarer, the common name for Viburnum lantana, which commonly grows by ancient roads and tracks in the UK, hence its name.
A CHOIR OF ANGELS: In 1981 Juice Newton revived this 1968 song
"Angel of the Morning"
It spawned three consecutive Top-10 pop hits: "Angel of the Morning" (written by Chip Taylor); "Queen of Hearts"; and an updated version of "The Sweetest Thing (I've Ever Known)" (the original version appeared on the 1975 Silver Spur debut album), which earned Newton the first of several No.
2
From pop to country In 1985, Newton's waning popularity was revitalized with the release of the Old Flame album, which reached No.
In 1995, Newton recorded a double-album of pop duets (which was slated to be sold via infomercial), but the project was riddled with legal issues, resulting in a low-impact, "accidental" release of the "Platinum & Gold" series of duets in the early 2000s (the CD set was released without Newton's permission).
A JOURNEY THROUGH ISRAEL: (Sarah of the Clue Crew is in a boat.)  You can ride in a boat reminiscent of Jesus' time on this sea, beside which he preached and performed miracles like the one of the loaves & fishes
the Sea of Galilee
As Jesus travels towards Jerusalem, in the Perean ministry, he returns to the area where he was baptized, about a third of the way down from the Sea of Galilee along the Jordan (John 10:40–42).
3
The Oxford dictionary of the Christian church.
The main disagreement in contemporary research is whether Jesus was apocalyptic.
Berlin: de Gruyter Press, 1995 p 382 Margaret M. Mitchell writes that although Eusebius reports (Ecclesiastical History'' III 5.3) that the early Christians left Jerusalem for Pella just before Jerusalem was subjected to the final lock down, we must accept that no first hand Christian items from the early Jerusalem Church have reached us.
THE BIBLE: Governor of Judea who asked Jesus, "Art thou the king of the Jews?"
Pontius Pilate
Most scholars agree that Jesus was a Galilean, Jewish rabbi who preached his message orally, was baptized by John the Baptist, and was crucified by the order of the Roman Prefect Pontius Pilate.
3
Teaches primarily about the Kingdom of God, little about himself.
Pilate writes a sign in Hebrew, Latin, and Greek that reads "Jesus of Nazareth, the King of the Jews" (abbreviated as INRI in depictions) to be affixed to Jesus' cross (John 19:19–20), then scourges Jesus and sends him to be crucified.
Meanwhile, Manichaeans, Gnostics, Muslims, Baha'is, and others have found prominent places for Jesus in their religions.
NEW TESTAMENT QUOTES: Upon this Cyrenian "They laid the cross, that he might bear it after Jesus"
Simon
Jesus' neighbors in Nazareth refer to him as "the carpenter, the son of Mary and brother of James and Joses and Judas and Simon" (Mark 6:3), "the carpenter's son" (Matthew 13:55), or "Joseph's son" (Luke 4:22).
3
This short gospel records few of Jesus' words or teachings.
" Encyclopedia Britannica Online.
The Church resolved the issues in ancient councils, which established the Holy Trinity, with Jesus both fully human and fully God.
GOSPEL TRUTH: He'd been dead 4 days before Jesus raised him back to life
Lazarus
He returns near Jerusalem, in Bethany, when he raises Lazarus from the dead, which increases the tension between him and the authorities.
3
After his tomb is found empty on Sunday, the risen Jesus presents himself to his followers.
Observing a Passover custom of the time, Pilate allows one prisoner chosen by the crowd to be released.
The Byzantine Iconoclasm acted as a barrier to developments in the East, but by the ninth century, art was permitted again.
TV TO FILM: Kenny gets killed early on in the 1999 film based on this series
South Park
Combine  Kenny Lofton, baseball outfielder  Kenny Loggins, American singer and songwriter  Kenny Mayne, American sports journalist  Kenny McCormick, fictional character in South Park  Kenny Miller, Derby county footballer playing upfront  Kenny Muhammad, beatbox artist  Kenny Okoro, American football player  Kenny Ortega, film director  Kenny Perry, American professional golfer  Kenny Roberts, former motorcycle racer  Kenny Rogers, American country music singer  Kenny Stucker, American football player  Kenny Vaccaro, American football safety   Kenny Wallace, NASCAR driver  Surname  Anthony Kenny, English philosopher  Enda Kenny, Irish politician  Brett Kenny, Australian rugby league footballer  Brian Kenny (disambiguation)  Elizabeth Kenny, Australian nurse  Gerard Kenny, British-based American composer, pianist and singer  J. E. Kenny, Irish politician  James Kenny (photographer), British photographer  Jason Kenny, English cyclist  Jon Kenny, Irish comedian and actor  Lawrence Kenny, Catholic priest and exorcist  Mark Kenny, former Irish footballer  Matthew Joseph Kenny, Irish politician from Clare  Mick Kenny (Kilkenny hurler), Irish hurler  Nick Kenny (poet)  Nick Kenny (rugby league), Australian rugby league player  Paddy Kenny, British-born Irish footballer  Paddy Kenny (hurler), Irish hurler  Pat Kenny, Irish broadcaster  Seán Kenny (hurler), Irish hurler  Shaun Kenny-Dowall, New Zealand rugby league footballer  Stephen Kenny (footballer), Irish football manager  Tom Kenny, American voice actor  Tom Kenny (hurler), Irish hurler  Thomas Kelly-Kenny General in the Boer war  William Kenny, Irish Unionist MP and Privy Councillor  Fictional characters  Kenny (Beyblade), a character in the anime and manga series Beyblade  Kenny (Tomorrow People), a character in the 1970s science fiction series
3
Kenny is a surname, a given name, and a diminutive of several different given names.
In Ireland, the surname is an Anglicisation of the Irish Ó Cionnaith, sometimes spelled Ó Cionnaoith.
It is also a name from Waterford Cork which derives from MacKenny.
THE STARS: Denebola, a star in the tail of this constellation, is Arabic for "the lion's tail"
Leo
Denebola (β Leo, β Leonis, Beta Leonis) is the third brightest star in the zodiac constellation of Leo.
3
On R. A. Proctor's 1871 star chart of the northern hemisphere it was designated Deneb Aleet.
It has 75% more mass than the Sun, which results in a much higher overall luminosity and a shorter life span on the main sequence.
This star is believed to be a Delta Scuti variable star that exhibits fluctuations in luminosity of 0.025 magnitudes roughly ten times per day.
I'M AUSTRALIAN: During WWII Nobel Prize winner John Cornforth worked on the structure of this antibiotic
penicillin
Career After his arrival at Oxford and during World War II, Cornforth significantly influenced the work on penicillin, particularly in purifying and concentrating it.
2
Hargittai I. and Hargittai M. (2000.)
At the NIMR, Cornforth collaborated with numerous biological scientists, including George Popják, with whom he shared an interest in cholesterol.
LAW REVIEW: In 1817 the first U.S. university law school was established near the Charles River at this school
Harvard
Another point, though possibly academic, is that the poll is based on a fallacy (that both "U.S." vs "US" and the use vs non-use of the Oxford/Harvard comma are based on American vs. British English differences).
3
Violations of the policy could be fixed across all articles with a SQL query and a single dedicated editor.
Indeed, Oxford commas are very much a better style of list.
If there's this much contention over the proposals, I think that's evidence that a better proposal is needed that strives towards unanimity.
"GREAT" EXPECTATIONS: In the newspaper, Marmaduke is a funny one
Great Dane
The strip revolves around the Winslow family and their Great Dane, Marmaduke.
3
: "Marmaduke has arguably spent 50 years retelling the same two jokes –
[...] However, someone explaining Marmaduke – that's funny."CNN Article which mentions Marmaduke
Cambria, CA: Comics Access, 1995.
TV SHOW SUPPORTING CHARACTERS: Mr. Eko, Richard Alpert, Charles Widmore
Lost
Eko or EKO may refer to:   Èkó, an alternative name for the city of Lagos, Lagos State  Eko Atlantic, a city in Lagos State  Mr. Eko, a character from the TV series Lost  EKOenergy, an ecolabel for energy  Eko guitars, an Italian guitar company Eko, John O'Connor (musician), a new age/world music guitarist/ composer.
3
, a German military term  Elko Regional Airport, an airport which has IATA airport code EKO  Eko Fresh (Ekrem Bora), a German rapper.
Lsa, a French rapper  Eko, a character in the animated series Karas  EKO, pseudonym of the Ukrainian satirist and artist Edward Kozak
EKO, Edgeworth-Kuiper Object, see Kuiper Belt  Eko India Financial Services,  an Indian financial service company  w:es:Eko, a soluble cereal brand from Nestlé.  See also  Echo (disambiguation)  Ecco (disambiguation)  *eckō, a clothing brand
RIDING I-10: In this state, the 10 doesn't take that left at Albuquerque, but does hang a sharp right near Las Cruces
New Mexico
Las Cruces could refer to:  Battle of Monte de las Cruces  Las Cruces, California   Las Cruces, Chile  Las Cruces, New Mexico  (New Mexico's second-largest city)  The main campus of New Mexico State University  Las Cruces International Airport in New Mexico  Las Cruces, Los Santos, Panama  Las Cruces, Veraguas, Panama  Las Cruces National Trail, Panama  Las Cruces (band), doom metal band from San Antonio, Texas  Las Cruces Biological Station, Costa Rica, one of the Organization for Tropical Studies (OTS) research stations.
1
br:Cruces es:Cruces
SPORTS: Brothers Phil & Tony Esposito were both named to the hall of fame for this sport
Hockey
Anthony James "Tony O" Esposito (born April 23, 1943) is a retired Canadian-American professional ice hockey goaltender, who played in the National Hockey League, most notably for the Chicago Black Hawks.
3
Still currently the MTU career leader in goals against average (2.55) and second in career saved percentage (.912), Esposito was also a three-time All-WCHA first-team selection.
Esposito had a spectacular season with Chicago, posting a 2.17 GAA and setting a modern day NHL record with fifteen shutouts, for which he won the Calder Trophy as the league's best rookie.
The Black Hawks made it to the Stanley Cup Final, but lost in seven games to Montreal.
COMIC BOOKS: After DC killed off Jason Todd, Tim Drake was written in to become this red-breasted hero
Robin
The character was created by Marv Wolfman and Pat Broderick, and first appeared in Batman #436 (Aug. 1989) as the third character to take on the Robin identity until 2009.
3
thicker... than theirs.
Batman Beyond Unlimited #2 (May 2012)
Collected editions
GEOGRAPHY: Lake Disappointment is a dry salt lake on the edge of this country's Gibson Desert
Australia
thumb|An indication of the general landscape in the Gibson Desert thumb|A four wheel drive in the Gibson Desert  The Gibson Desert, an interim Australian bioregion, covers a large dry area in the state of Western Australia and is still largely in an almost "pristine" state.
1
On the eastern margin of the region, population centres (which include people of European descent) include Warburton, Mantamaru and Warakurna.
BIOGRAPHY: The episode seen here covered this "Ernest" young man of Irish birth
Ernest Shackleton
Ernest may  refer to:  People  Ernest, Margrave of Austria (1027-1075) Ernest, Duke of Bavaria (1373-1438) Archduke Ernest of Austria (1553-1595), son of Maximilian II, Holy Roman Emperor Ernest Augustus, Elector of Brunswick-Lüneburg (1629-1698) Ernest Augustus I of Hanover (1771–1851), King of Hanover, son of King George III of England Prince Ernest Augustus, 3rd Duke of Cumberland and Teviotdale (1845–1923) Ernest Augustus, Prince of Hanover (1914–1987) Ernst August, Prince of Hanover (born 1954) Prince Ernst August of Hanover (born 1983) Ernest Angelo (born 1934), Texas businessman and politician Ernest Benach i Pascual (born 1959), former President of the Catalonian Parliament Ernest Bevin (1881-1951), British Labour Politician Ernest Borgnine (1917–2012), American actor Ernesto "Che" Guevara (1928-1967), an Argentine Marxist revolutionary, physician, author, guerrilla leader, diplomat, and military theorist Ernest Haycox (1899–1950), American writer of westerns Ernest Hemingway (1899–1961), American writer Ernest Hornung (1866-1921), English author and poet Ernest Koliqi (1903-1975),Albanian writer Ernest Lluch (1937–2000), Catalan-Spanish politician Ernest Millington (1916–2009), British politician Charles Ernest Moody (1891–1977), American gospel songwriter and performer Ernest O. Lawrence (1901–1958), American physicist  Ernest Rutherford (1871–1937), chemist Ernest Shackleton (1874–1922), Anglo-Irish explorer Ernest de Silva (1887–1957), Sri Lankan philanthropist Ernest Spybuck, (1883–1949) American Indian autoethnographer Ernest Troubridge (1862–1926), British naval officer Ernest Tubb (1914–1984), American singer and songwriter of country music Ernest Veuve (1843–1916), American Civil War soldier Ernest Walton (1903-1995), Irish physicist and Nobel laureate  Saint Ernest (died 1148), German abbot Ernest II, Duke of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha (1818–1893), the sovereign duke of the Duchy of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha  Surname
3
For the borough, see Ernest, Pennsylvania.
See also   Ern (given name)
Ernst  Ernesto  Ernie (disambiguation), shortened version of Ernest  Earnest (disambiguation)  Category:Masculine given names Category:English masculine given names Category:French masculine given names Category:Slovene masculine given names Category:Polish masculine given names
MOVIE CITIES: 2010, starring Kristen Bell: "When in ____"
Rome
She has since appeared in a number of comedy films, such as Couples Retreat (2009), When in Rome (2010), and You Again (2010).
3
In 2008, she played Sarah Marshall in the comedy film Forgetting Sarah Marshall, which garnered her further recognition.
A remake of the Japanese horror film Kairo, the film grossed US$27.9 million worldwide,; however it garnered negative response from critics.
In 2014, Bell launched a Prizeo campaign offering fans a chance to win a date with her in return for donating to Invisible Children.http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/07/03/kristen-bell-prizeo-date_n_3541988.html  Bell supported and campaigned for Barack Obama during the 2008 United States presidential election.
MOVIE SONGS: Colorful name of Will Ferrell's anchorman who harmonizes to "Afternoon Delight"
Ron Burgundy
Among them have been Cocktail ("Kokomo", sung by The Beach Boys), Glee (where it was mistaken for being a song about the dessert Angel Delight), Get a Life ("Chris Wins a Celebrity"), Good Will Hunting, PCU, Boogie Nights, Lost, The Rules of Attraction, The Spirit of '76, Starsky & Hutch, ER ("No Strings Attached", sung by Abby), Arrested Development (as part of a plot point in the episode "Afternoon Delight"), The Simpsons ("The Fat and the Furriest"), Rules of Engagement, Sports Night, Complete Savages ("Teen Things I Hate About You"), Ugly Betty, Family Guy, Malcolm in the Middle, South Park ("Miss Teacher Bangs a Boy"), Murphy Brown, Entourage, Warehouse 13 (Season 2 Episode 8), and Anchorman: The Legend of Ron Burgundy.
3
It was written by Bill Danoff, one of the members of the band.
Background and writing The title came from the happy hour menu at Clyde's restaurant in Georgetown, Washington, D.C., where Bill Danoff was eating with fellow bandmember Margot Chapman while his then-wife Taffy Danoff was undergoing surgery for cervical cancer.http://patch.com/florida/safetyharbor/grammy-winner-taffy-nivert-settles-in-safety-harbor Danoff enjoyed writing the song and downplayed the somewhat controversial lyrics, saying, "I didn't want to write an all-out sex song ...
I just wanted to write something that was fun and hinted at sex."
THEM'S FIGHTIN' WORDS: "Rock The Casbah" is the biggest hit by this rock group
The Clash
"Rock the Casbah" is a song by the English punk rock band The Clash, released in 1982.
1
YearB-sideFormatLabelCountryNote1982"Rock the Casbah"45 rpm 7"
THE HAYES CODE: Sam & Dave's 1967 hit "Soul Man" was co-written by David Porter & this legendary soul man
Isaac Hayes
Soul Man may refer to:  People Soulman Alex G, nickname of professional wrestler Alex Gibson Soul music aficionado  Music "Soul Man" (song), a 1967 hit song by Sam & Dave written by Isaac Hayes and David Porter "Soulman" (song), a 2010 song by French musician Ben L'Oncle Soul written by Ben L'Oncle Soul, Gabin Lesieur, Freddi Chellaoui Soul Man (album), a 2006 album by X Factor runner-up Andy Abraham The Soul Man!, a 1966 album by Bobby Timmons  Film and television Soul Man (film), a 1986 film starring C. Thomas Howell Soul Man (TV series), a sitcom starring Dan Aykroyd The Soul Man, a sitcom starring Cedric the Entertainer  See also Soul Men (film)
1
The Soulmen, a Slovak rock band
DETENTION: In 1865 he was put in leg irons in a damp Fort Monroe, Virginia cell; his citizenship was posthumously restored in 1978
Jefferson Davis
For two years thereafter, the former Confederate President, Jefferson Davis, was imprisoned at the fort.
3
Traded for work and supplies from the English, they were the first Africans to come ashore on British-occupied land in what would become America.
Several land operations against Confederate forces were mounted from the fort, notably the Battle of Big Bethel in June 1861.
For the next 30 days, they laid siege to Richmond.
TONIGHT--A WORLD PREMIER!: Bruce Golding, this country's premier, is also the MP for West Kingston
Jamaica
Orette Bruce Golding (born 5 December 1947) is a former Jamaican politician who served as eighth Prime Minister of Jamaica from 11 September 2007 to 23 October 2011.
1
He was only two years old in 1949 when his father was first elected as a Member of the House of Representatives for West St. Catherine, a seat that he retained for 22 years until his retirement in 1972.
THEATER: Reel off a list of his works & you'll find "The Real Inspector Hound" & "The Real Thing"
Tom Stoppard
The Real Thing or Real Thing(s) may refer to:  Literature  The Real Thing (play), a play by Tom Stoppard  "The Real Thing" (story), a short story by Henry James  The Real Thing, a collection of humorous essays by Kurt Andersen  "The Real Thing", a short story by Alison Goodman  Music Performers  The Real Thing (UK band), a UK pop group  The Real Thing (Norwegian band), a Norwegian jazz quartet  The Real Thing, an American jazz group fronted by Ray Santisi  Albums
3
The Real Thing (Angela Winbush album), 1989 studio album  The Real Thing (Bo Bice album), or the title song (see below)  The Real Thing (Faith No More album), or the title song  The Real Thing (Dizzy Gillespie album)   The Real Thing (Midnight Oil album), or the title cover version of the Russell Morris song (see below)  The Real Thing (PureNRG album), or the title song  The Real Thing (Taj Mahal album)  The Real Thing (Vanessa Williams album), or the title song (see below)  The Real Thing: In Performance (1964–1981), a video album by Marvin Gaye  The Real Thing: Words and Sounds Vol.
3, an album by Jill Scott, or the title song  Real Thing (The Higgins album), or the title song  Real Things (2 Unlimited album), or the song "The Real Thing" (see below)  Real Things (Joe Nichols album), or the title song  Songs  "The Real Thing" (2 Unlimited song)  "The Real Thing" (ABC song)  "The Real Thing" (Gwen Stefani song)  "The Real Thing" (Jellybean song)  "The Real Thing" (Lisa Stansfield song)  "The Real Thing" (Russell Morris song), also covered by Kylie Minogue  "The Real Thing" (Tony Di Bart song)  "The Real Thing" (Vanessa Williams song)  "Real Things" (song), by Javine  "The Real Thing", by Bo Bice  "The Real Thing", by Tina Britt  "The Real Thing", recorded by Christina Aguilera for Nashville  "The Real Thing", by Kenny Loggins song from Leap of Faith  "The Real Thing", by Kingston Wall from III –
Tri-Logy  "The Real Thing", by Warren Haynes from Live at Bonnaroo  "Real Thing", by Alice in Chains from Facelift  "Real Thing", by KMFDM from Hau Ruck  "Real Thing", by Pearl Jam and Cypress Hill from the Judgement Night film soundtrack  Television and film  The Real Thing (TV series), a French-language Canadian television show  "The Real Thing", an episode of the Australian TV series All Saints  "The Real Thing", an episode of the British TV series Lovejoy  The Real Thing (film), a 2002 Australian film starring Kate Fischer  See also  "Ain't Nothing Like the Real Thing", a song by Marvin Gaye and Tammi Terrell  "Even Better Than the Real Thing", a song by U2  "It's the Real Thing", a song by Angela Winbush  "It's the Real Thing", a Coca-Cola slogan
TV CHARACTERS: Rachel Blanchard as Cher is the way cool trendsetter at Bronson Alcott High on this comedy
Clueless
Blanchard is probably best known for playing the part of Cher Horowitz (originally portrayed by Alicia Silverstone in the film version) on the television series Clueless (based on the 1995 movie of the same name).
3
Rachel Louise Blanchard (born March 19, 1976) is a Canadian actress.
She also played Roxanne on the television series 7th Heaven from 2002 to 2004.
You Afraid of the Dark?2007Golden NymphOutstanding Actress - Comedy SeriesPeep Show2011Gemini AwardBest Performance by an Actress in a Guest Role in a Comedic SeriesCall Me Fitz  References  External links  Category:1976 births Category:20th-century Canadian actresses Category:21st-century Canadian actresses Category:Actresses from Toronto Category:Canadian child actresses Category:Canadian film actresses Category:Canadian television actresses Category:Living people Category:Queen's University alumni
SITCOMS: According to the series title, parcel delivery man Doug Heffernan is the "King of" this
Queens
Douglas Steven "Doug" Heffernan is a fictional character in the American situation comedy The King of Queens.
3
The character is portrayed by Kevin James, whose stand-up comedy provided the comedic themes and general style of the show.
He was All-County in football during his Junior and Senior years.
While dating Carrie, Doug inadvertently landed his final, and longest standing, job as a truck driver for the fictional International Parcel Service (IPS).
DAD TV: Ward Cleaver
Leave It To Beaver
Episode: "Beaver's Library Book" is a fictional character in the American television sitcom Leave It to Beaver.
3
The two dated and went to State college together.
June sometimes places Ward in a position where he is forced to "explain" or apologize for his Uncle Billy.
(ISBN 1886110298), (ISBN 978-1886110298).
EMMY HISTORY: Hug it out!  In 2006 Jeremy Piven won Best Supporting Actor for this HBO comedy
Entourage
He is best known for his role as Ari Gold in the comedy series Entourage, for which he won one Golden Globe Award and three consecutive Emmy Awards.
3
In 1993, he portrayed George Costanza on the show-within-a-show scene in the Seinfeld episode, "The Pilot".
On August 3, 2009, Piven was the guest host of the WWE Raw wrestling program.
Andrews1995 Miami Rhapsody Mitchell Dr. Jekyll and Ms. Hyde Peter Walston Heat Dr. Bob1996 Larger Than Life Walter E=mc2 Prof.
SCULPTURE: "The Dinner Party" by this sculptor who shares her name with an Ill. city has 39 place settings for 39 historical women
Judy Chicago
The Dinner Party is an installation artwork by feminist artist Judy Chicago.
3
Each plate, except the one corresponding to Sojourner Truth, depicts a brightly-colored, elaborately styled vagina-esque form.
Elizabeth I   25.
3 October 2012.
THE GIANTS: It's the Peter Benchley novel about a killer giant squid that menaces the coast of Bermuda
The Beast
Beast was brought to the small screen as a made-for-television film in 1996, under the slightly altered title The Beast.
3
Since his home had no space for an office, Benchley rented a room above a furnace supply company.
The film spawned three sequels, none of which matched the success of the original critically or commercially, two video games, Jaws in 1987 and Jaws Unleashed in 2006; both met with mostly negative critical attention.
Benchley was a member of the National Council of Environmental Defense and a spokesman for its Oceans Program: "[T]he shark in an updated Jaws could not be the villain; it would have to be written as the victim; for, worldwide, sharks are much more the oppressed than the oppressors."
MOVIE TRIVIA: His last film was "Nothing in Common"
Jackie Gleason
It stars Tom Hanks and Jackie Gleason in what would prove to be Gleason's final film role; he was suffering from terminal cancer.
3
His father is well aware of David's playboy nature.
As a peace offering, David offers to take Max to a nightclub to hear some of his favored jazz music.
While there, David accidentally discovers that his father has been dealing with diabetes and his foot has gangrene.
BOOK ENDS: This Twain hero is going to the territory because he doesn't want Aunt Sally to civilize him
Huckleberry Finn
In literature G.K. Chesterton, in his ironically-titled anti-German book The Crimes of England (1915), refers to the wooden likeness of Paul von Hindenburg (described above) as  a "wooden Aunt Sally"  In television Aunt Sally also featured on the BBC Countryfile programme in August 2013  In the season 1 premiere episode of the UK TV series House of Cards (1990), journalist Mattie Storin - in her first conversation with the Chief Whip, Francis Urquhart - confirms she understands Francis' explanation of how newly elected Prime Minister Henry Collingridge is being used as a pawn and set up to take a fall by calling the PM an Aunt Sally  Aunt Sally is played in the British detective television series Midsomer Murders, episode 18, "Dark Autumn"   Aunt Sally appears as a character, portrayed by Una Stubbs, in the  television adaptation of the children's serial Worzel Gummidge, produced by Southern Television for ITV from 1979 to 1981; she is a fairground doll of the type used as a target for throwing competitions but nevertheless considers herself to be of a superior class to Worzel, a scarecrow, and her frustrated suitor  See also  Pub games British folk sports PEMDAS (Please Excuse My Dear Aunt Sally), the order of mathematical operations Scapegoat Straw man The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn (1884) by Mark Twain, in which Aunt Sally is a character who attempts to adopt and "sivilize" Huck Whipping boy  References  External links   WorldWideWords  Aunt Sally –
2
The ball is on a short plinth about 10 cm high and is known as a "dolly".
Cultural references
CRAFTS: Stumpwork, cutwork, and crewelwork are varieties of this textile art
Embroidery
Stumpwork is a style of embroidery where the stitched figures are raised from the surface of the work to form a 3-dimensional effect.
2
This form is then applied to the main body of work by piercing the background fabric with the wires and securing tightly.
The process involves putting down, typically, a layer of foam rubber larger than the intended shape on top of the target material to be decorated.
NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBES: The Penobscot are represented in the legislature of this state where you'll find Penobscot Bay
Maine
Penobscot Bay originates from the mouth of Maine's Penobscot River.
3
The investigation found that the sewage from eleven towns,and effluents of thirteen businesses and one university facility were the chief sources of the pollution.
Criehaven Sears Island Great Spruce Head Nautilus Island Little Deer Isle Deer Isle (Deer Isle, Stonington, Mountainville, Sunrise, Sunset)  Towns along the western side thumb|400px|right|Penobscot Bay near Belfast  Saint George South Thomaston Owls Head Rockland Rockport Camden Lincolnville Northport Belfast Searsport (Penobscot Marine Museum) Stockton Springs Prospect Verona Island  Towns on the eastern side Bucksport Orland Penobscot Castine Brooksville Deer Isle Stonington  Penobscot Bay panorama  thumb|center|800px|A 180° panorama of the Penobscot Bay from near the Belfast/Searsport town line looking SE. Belfast Bay is to the right, Northport on the peninsula, Islesboro on the center horizon, Castine to the left of that, and toward Stockton Springs and the entrance to the Penobscot River are beyond the trees on the far left.
*"Penobscot Bay 10,000 Years Ago."
SOUNDS LIKE SPORTS EQUIPMENT: In 1982 this Austrian-born chef opened Spago on Sunset Boulevard
Wolfgang Puck
Spago is a Wolfgang Puck restaurant located in Beverly Hills, California.
3
Spago opened in 1982 on the Sunset Strip in West Hollywood and moved to Canon Drive in Beverly Hills in 1997.
Spago was awarded two Michelin stars in 2008 and 2009.
Since 2010, the restaurant has been the recipient of the Wine Spectator Grand Award.
SPORTSWRITERS: Roger Kahn mourned Ebbets Field & the Brooklyn Dodgers in this 1971 bestseller
The Boys of Summer
Roger Kahn (born October 31, 1927) is an American author, best known for his 1972 baseball book The Boys of Summer.
2
Past Professors – 2004 – Roger Kahn", State University of New York at New Paltz official website.
The book examines his relationship with his father seen through the prism of their shared affection for the Brooklyn Dodgers.
TELEVISION: Who can resist John Krasinski as prankster Jim Halpert on this sitcom?
The Office
He is known for his role as Jim Halpert on the NBC sitcom The Office.
3
Early life Krasinski was born in Newton, Massachusetts, to Mary Clare (née Doyle), a nurse, and Ronald Krasinski, an internist.http://parade.condenast.com/63847/parade/%EF%BB%BFjohn-krasinskis-vacation-of-a-lifetime/http://www.elle.com/culture/celebrities/a13748/john-krasinski-profile/ His father is Polish-American and his mother is Irish-American.
Then he attended the National Theater Institute in Waterford, Connecticut.
Krasinski also starred as Peter in the indie movie Nobody Walks that was released on September 6, 2012.
GOOD TOMES: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew at the Plaza Hotel in New York City)  This man's second novel, 1922's "The Beautiful and Damned", features scenes in the Plaza's Grill Room
F. Scott Fitzgerald
The Beautiful and Damned, first published by Scribner's in 1922, is F. Scott Fitzgerald's second novel.
3
I think there's a place for the romanticist in literature."Fitzgerald, F. Scott - The Beautiful and Damned, Charles Scribner's Sons, New York, 1922 - pg.
- A Matter of Aesthetics  3. - No Matter!  The first book tells the story of the first meeting and courtship of a beautiful and spoiled couple, Anthony and Gloria, madly in love, with Gloria estatically exclaiming: "mother says that two souls are sometimes created together--and in love before they're born."The
Reception  Louise Field, writing in The New York Times, found the novel showed Fitzgerald to be talented, but labeled him too pessimistic.
THE INTERNATIONAL LANGUAGE OF MATH: If a circle has a radius of 7.3 inches, its circumference in inches is 2 X 7.3 X this
Pi
Three tracks, "Life at a Risk", "Ghetto Zone", and "Ask You Somethin'" do not appear on this album, despite appearing on the original Forgotten Freshness.
3
The Walt Disney Company, owner of the group's label at the time, asked that the lyrics to the original be changed, threatening to not release the album otherwise.
In the beginning of the song, a news brief is played about the actual looting of Northwest Airlines Flight 255 which crashed on I-94 in Detroit in 1987.
Some lyrics from the song are also found on the song "Who Asked You," also on Ringmaster.
OPERA: Tenor Leo Slezak covered a staging mistake in "Lohengrin" by ad-libbing, "What time is the next" this graceful bird
swan
The best-known example is as follows: during a performance of Wagner's Lohengrin, a stage hand sent the swan out too early, before the tenor could hop aboard.
3
Slezak had a versatile repertory which embraced 66 roles.
Recordings Slezak made hundreds of disc and cylinder recordings, beginning in the early 1900s and ending in the 1930s.
Photographs of Leo Slezak  Photo  History of the Tenor - Sound Clips and Narration Leo Slezak ; Victor Catalog listings    Category:1873 births Category:1946 deaths Category:People from Šumperk Category:People from the Margraviate of Moravia Category:Moravian-German people Category:Czech opera singers Category:Heldentenors Category:Operatic tenors
CELEBRITIES' FAVORITE BOOKS: Asked about his favorite books, Kofi Annan had 2: "All the Pretty Horses" & this author's "Siddhartha"
Hermann Hesse
Siddhartha may also refer to:   Siddhartha (novel), a fictional book about the life of a man (not the Buddha) named Siddhartha, by Hermann Hesse  Siddhartha (1972 film), the 1972 film of the book, directed by Conrad Rooks  Sidhartha (1998 film)  Siddharth (2013 film), a 2013 Indian film  Siddhartha (2015 film), a 2015 Indian Kannada film  Siddhartha (opera), opera by Per Nørgård  Siddhartha (musical), an original production by Chu Un Temple and BLIA Cebu  King Siddartha, father of Mahavira, an important figure in Jain history  Siddharta (band), a Slovenian rock band  Siddhartha (American rock band)  Siddhartha (Mexican rock band)  Siddartha University, the first and the only Buddhist university in Nepal  SIDDHARTA, an experiment at DAFNE electron–positron collider in Italy  "Siddhartha", a song by Jerry Cantrell on the album Degradation Trip Volumes 1 & 2   People  Given name  Siddhartha of Kundagrama, father of Mahavira (last Tirthankara in Jainism)  Siddharth (actor) (born 1979), Indian actor  Siddhartha (musician), Mexican musician  Siddharth Anand, Indian film director  Siddhartha Basu, Indian quiz master  Sidharth Bharathan, Malayalam film actor  Siddharth Bhardwaj, winner of MTV Splitsvilla 2  Siddhartha Deb (born 1970), Indian author  Siddharth Haldipur, music director and composer  Siddharth Kak, Indian documentary maker, television producer, and presentet  Siddhartha Khosla, singer, founder of Goldspot  Siddharth Koirala, film actor  Siddharth Lama, Nepali film actor  Siddhartha Mukherjee (born 1970), winner of 2011 Pulitzer Prize for General Nonfiction  Siddharth Sanghvi (born 1977), Indian author  Siddhartha Shankar Ray (born 1920), Indian politician belonging to the Indian National Congress  Sidhartha Siva, Malayalam film actor, director and scenarist  Siddharth Ashvin Shah, American physician, public health scientist and educator of South Asian origin  Siddartha Nepal, Founder of Siddartha000Host  Siddharth Sinha (born 1978), Indian film maker  Siddharth Suchde (born 1985), professional squash player from India  Siddharth Trivedi (born 1982), Indian cricketer who represents Gujarat  Siddharth Varadarajan (born 1965), Strategic Affairs Editor of The Hindu and editor of Gujarat: The Making of a Tragedy  Siddharth Venugopal (born 1985), actor  Siddharth Sinha (born 1985)
2
Siddharth or Siddhartha is the birth name of the founder of Buddhism, Gautama Buddha.
IT Professional, Photographer, Musician and Singer  Surname  Nikhil Siddharth (born 1985), actor in the Telugu film industry in India
I LOST ON JEOPARDY!: Despite being the longest-running "Jeopardy!" champ of all time, he lost to Brad Rutter in the Ultimate ToC
Ken Jennings
In 2011, both Rutter and Ken Jennings (another holder, at various times, of the all-time money winning record for Jeopardy! and for game shows) were routed in a two-day exhibition match against an IBM computer platform developed specifically to compete on Jeopardy!
3
In 19 regular season and tournament games, Rutter has never lost a Jeopardy!
: Watson.
Q: Who is Brad Rutter?"
IDEAS FOR TOURISM CAMPAIGNS: From Koluszki to Kolno, & Wozniki to Strzelce, visit us, but just know we've heard all the jokes already
Poland
Kolno  is a town in northeastern Poland, located in the Podlaskie Voivodeship, about 150 km northeast of Warsaw.
2
The town first belonged to the Masovian Dukes, and then to the Polish crown.
Gertrude Blanch (born Gittel Kaimowitz) was an accomplished Mathematician, who emigrated to the US as a child.
MIDDLE NAMES: It was the middle name of John Astor the hotel builder and his great-grandfather the fur trader
Jacob
John was the youngest of three sons born to John Jacob Astor V (1886—1971) and Violet Mary Elliot-Murray-Kynynmound (1889—1965).
3
John Astor (26 September 1923 — 27 December 1987) was an English politician.
He had two elder brothers, Gavin (1918—1984) and Hugh (1920—1999).
He was educated at Eton College and during World War II served in the Royal Air Force Volunteer Reserve.
THE NON-BEATLES ROCK BAND: Bassist Stefan Lessard & drummer Carter Beauford are the rhythm section of this "Under the Table and Dreaming" band
the Dave Matthews Band
Beauford agreed to perform on a demo, which is how he became involved with the group that was to become the Dave Matthews Band.
3
He unknowingly set up his drums in reverse of whichever performer and set that he had in mind, in an attempt to make the mirrored image of himself match that of the audience's perspective, as he had seen it on stage and TV.
Beauford has a grown daughter from his first marriage.
Having married a second time, he also now has two young children.
YOU'RE SO SPORTY: 2009 began with Lorena Ochoa clubbing the competition as the No. 1 ranked player in this sport
golf
Lorena Ochoa Reyes (Spanish ;born 15 November 1981) is a Mexican professional golfer who played on the U.S.-based LPGA Tour from 2003 to 2010, and was the top-ranked female golfer in the world for over three years, from April 2007 to her retirement in May 2010.
3
As a junior, she captured 22 state events in Guadalajara and 44 national events in Mexico.
Also in 2007, Ochoa became the first woman ever to earn more than $4,000,000 in a single season, surpassing Sörenstam's previous record of $2,863,904.
Proceeds from the tournament help support the Lorena Ochoa Foundation.
ALBEE: Miss Alice is the richest woman in the world in this Albee play
Tiny Alice
It is written as though the story is being read aloud by someone who is also talking to the child listener, with many interpolations by the author, pointing out details in the pictures and asking questions, such as "Which would you have liked the best, do you think, to be a little tiny Alice, no larger than a kitten, or a great tall Alice, with your head always knocking against the ceiling?"The Nursery "Alice", Chapter II There are also additions, such as an anecdote about a puppy called Dash,The Nursery "Alice", Chapter VI and an explanation of the word "foxglove".The Nursery "Alice", Chapter IX
2
It includes 20 of John Tenniel's illustrations from the original book coloured, enlarged and, in some cases, revised.
References  External links
1996: Many major auto racing stars bypassed this race to drive in CART's new U.S. 500 the same day
Indianapolis 500
The U.S. 500 was an automobile race sanctioned by CART on May 26, 1996 at the Michigan International Speedway as an alternative to the 1996 Indianapolis 500.
2
CART had attempted to lure NBC or FOX, but neither deal came through.
Teams and officials also were not keen on racing at the same facility twice in the same season.
STRAIGHT "F"s: Major League coach Jimmie Reese was the master of hitting these fly balls to fielders
Fungos
Reese's main specialty, however, was hitting fungos in practice, using a bat he made himself.
3
In order to avoid the brunt of prejudice against Jewish baseball players, he adopted the name of Jimmie Reese, which he used throughout his baseball career.
Los Angeles Angels (PCL)
Louis Cardinals players Category:St.
BALLET: In the 1960s Maya Plisetskaya succeeded Galina Ulanova as prima ballerina of this company
the Bolshoi
In 1960 she ascended to Ulanova's former title as prima ballerina assoluta of the Bolshoi.
2
Plisetskaya was known for the height of her jumps, her extremely flexible back, the technical strength of her dancing, and her charisma.
A bronze plaque affixed at the square included an engraving: “Maya Plisetskaya Square is named after the outstanding Russian ballerina.
B FOLLOWS A: In a Harry Potter novel, Sirius Black is a convicted murderer who escapes from this island prison in the North Sea
Azkaban
The third novel, Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, follows Harry in his third year of magical education.
3
As Harry develops through his adolescence, he learns to overcome the problems that face him: magical, social and emotional, including ordinary teenage challenges such as friendships, infatuation, romantic relationships, schoolwork and exams, anxiety, depression, stress, and the greater test of preparing himself for the confrontation in the real world that lies ahead, in wizarding Britain's increasingly-violent second wizarding war.
On 28 March 2007, the cover art for the Bloomsbury Adult and Child versions and the Scholastic version were released.
On 20 December 2013, J. K. Rowling announced that she was working on a Harry Potter–based play for which she would be one of the producers.
BAY WATCHING: This Atlantic seaboard state is home to the popular resort area of Buzzards Bay
Massachusetts
thumb|right|400px|Buzzards Bay and surrounding area from orbit (looking southwest) Buzzards Bay is a bay of the Atlantic Ocean adjacent to the U.S. state of Massachusetts.
3
Since 1914, Buzzards Bay has been connected to Cape Cod Bay by the Cape Cod Canal.
Decreases in eelgrass, scallops, and herring have also been noted, but direct cause-and-effect relationships are not clear.
98,000 gallons of oil leaked from a barge.
TALKING HEADS: (Hi, I'm Jodi Applegate)  I was an anchor of the launch of this cable news network backed in part by a software company
MSNBC
She served as an anchorwoman at local stations as well as nationally for MSNBC and NBC News.
3
In the early 1990s, Jodi was a host of Close Up on C-SPAN, a weekly public affairs program that featured a high school student audience.
In 2009, Applegate began work as a fill-in anchor on all-news WCBS radio.
On November 21, 2012, it was announced that Applegate was expecting a baby, which was conceived by way of a gestational surrogate.
FUR-BEARING CREATURES?: Stumpy-tailed feline who gave us an unforgettable portrayal in "Shakes the Clown"
Bobcat Goldthwait
Shakes the Clown is a 1991 American black comedy film directed and written by Bobcat Goldthwait, who performs the title role.
2
As of mid-2011, the movie has a 37% rating on Rotten Tomatoes, based on 19 reviews.
It's the Citizen Kane of Alcoholic Clown Movies!"
MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR.: (Yolanda King speaking)  In 1960 my father, MLK Jr., joined my grandfather as co-pastor of this Baptist church in Atlanta
Ebenezer Baptist Church
She preached in January 2007 to an audience in Ebenezer Baptist Church to be an oasis for peace and love, as well as to use her father's holiday as starting ground for their own interpretations of prejudice.
3
Ramdin, p.37.
Her father admitted that he had never adjusted to bringing up children under "inexplicable conditions".Bruns, p.64.
Alongside the physician that took care of her mother, Dr. Maggie Mermin and her sister, Yolanda told the press that her mother was making progress on a daily basis and was expected to make a full recovery.
STRANGE BREW: On an episode of this show, Samantha gives Darrin a potion she says will fill him with confidence
Bewitched
The name's popularity coincided with the debut in 1964 of the television show Bewitched, which featured as the lead character a young witch named Samantha Stephens.
3
The name has remained consistently popular in the United States since the 1960s.
It ranked as the 15th most popular name for American girls born in 2009.ssa.gov  In Sri Lanka Samantha is used as a masculine given name, being one of the forms of the name of the god Saman.
"I'm Sorry I Haven't A Clue" Samantha Parkington, a character in the American Girl series Sam Puckett, from iCarly  References  Category:English feminine given names
SILENT MOVIES: In this 1924 film, Ernest Torrence played Captain Hook & Betty Bronson the title role
Peter Pan
He played an old codger in the acclaimed classic western The Covered Wagon (1923) and gained attention from his roles in The Hunchback of Notre Dame (1923) as Clopin, king of the beggars, and Betty Bronson in Peter Pan (1924) as the dastardly Captain Hook.
3
Both Ernest and his actor brother David Torrence went to America, in March 1911, directly from Scotland prior to World War I. Focusing instead on a purely acting career, Ernest and his brother developed into experienced players on the Broadway New York stage.
Death Torrence made the transition into talking films very well, starring in Fighting Caravans (1931) with Gary Cooper and Lili Damita.
He was able to play a notable nemesis, Dr. Moriarty, to Clive Brook's Sherlock in Sherlock Holmes (1932) in one of his last roles.
HISTORIC NUMBERS: Its release, just over 2 years ago, was accompanied by the Rolling Stones' "Start Me Up"
Windows 95
It was later discovered that Jagger had agreed prior to leave out the lyrics.salon.com  Microsoft used this song in their Windows 95 marketing campaign, although paying significantly less than the $14 million rumored, it was about $3 million per COO at the time Bob Herbold.
3
The song was at first cut as a reggae-rock track named 'Never Stop', but after dozens of takes the band stopped recording it and it was shelved. "Start Me Up" failed to make the cut for the album, being shelved into the vault.
You see, if they all played the right chords in the right time, went to the chorus at the right time and got to the middle eight together, that was a master.
Pop culture
POTENT POTABLES: French Chablis is made of this grape that produces some of the finest California white wine
Chardonnay
Chablis is made with Chardonnay, a grape that grows particularly well in the region.
3
It lies in the valley of the River Serein.
300px|thumb|left|Chablis town hall  Wine  The village of Chablis gives its name to one of the most famous French white wines.
See also Communes of the Yonne department  References INSEE  Category:Communes of Yonne
HISTORIC AMOURS: This Louis known as "the Well-Beloved" lived up to his name by romancing all 5 of the Nesle sisters
Louis XV
His grandson, Louis de Mailly, had five daughters, of whom four (the Countess of Mailly, the Duchess of Lauragais, the Countess of Vintimille, and the Marquise de la Tournelle, afterwards the Duchess of Châteauroux) were successively, or simultaneously, mistresses of Louis XV.  See also Communes of the Somme department  References INSEE     External links   Nesle official website  Nesle on the Quid website   Category:Communes of Somme
2
Blondel de Nesle (c. 1155 - 1202), French trouvère.
The seigneurie (lordship) of Nesle was elevated to a countship for Charles de Sainte-Maure in 1467 and into a marquisate for Louis de Sainte-Maure in 1546.
SEWING: Ebenezer Butterick is said to have invented the tissue paper type of this
a pattern
In the late 1890s, the company invented a method of identifying each piece (by means of a letter marked on it in a pattern of small holes), which was patented in 1899.
3
The product revolutionized home sewing.
Darts, stitching lines, etc.
thumb|right|Facsimile of the front of the "Deltor" for Butterick pattern #5688 (a skirt for an evening dress), circa 1919  thumb|right|Facsimile of the back of the "Deltor" for Butterick pattern #5688 (a skirt for an evening dress), circa 1919  The process that the Buttericks eventually settled on called for the corrected, graded master patterns to be made into thin cardboard templates.
TV ON TV: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):"(Hi, I'm Wallace Langham)  I quipped with the best of the late night world as Phil, the head writer, on this HBO show"
The Larry Sanders Show
Television career Langham dropped the Ward moniker in the 1990s as he moved to more adult roles, appearing as a regular in the much-hyped but short-lived CBS series WIOU. His big breakthrough came when he was cast as Phil, the cynical staff writer for insecure talk show host Larry Sanders, in HBO's sitcom The Larry Sanders Show.
3
Other work Langham plays Dr. Seeker in the pre-show of the ride Dinosaur in Walt Disney World's Animal Kingdom.
He explains the reason for going back in time and rescuing a stray dinosaur.
Langham was born in Fort Worth, Texas, the son of Sunni, a costume designer, and James Langham, an elevator repairman.
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: Col. Lewis Nicola led a movement to make this man king of America
George Washington
Nicola is most notable for authoring the Newburgh letter, which urged George Washington to assume a royal title.
3
When the American Revolution broke out, Nicola offered his services to the colonial government, which eventually appointed him to various positions with local forces.
Fowler, Jr (2011), Chapter 6 His parents provided him with a strong educational background and bought him a commission in January 1740.
Following the drawing of "Plan", Nicola submitted two papers where he obtained information from the British to Congress: "A Scheme for a Partisan Corps" and "Judicious remarks on a proposed reformation in the Army".
SPORTS: The U.S.O.C. named Dot Richardson this Olympic sport's 1996 Female Athlete of the Year
Softball
Dorothy "Dot" Richardson (born September 22, 1961 in Orlando, Florida) is an American physician and former international softball player, and the head softball coach of the Liberty University softball team.http://www.liberty.edu/flames/index.cfm?PID=10867&CoachID=792&TeamID=2  Education Richardson attended Western Illinois University for one year and the University of California Los Angeles for four years.http://www.dotrichardson.com/aboutdot.html  Richardson has a master's degree in exercise physiology and health from Adelphi University in Garden City, New York.
2
9781609106126   She attended the University of Louisville School of Medicine and received an M.D. degree in 1993.
She was named MVP in the Women's Major Fast Pitch National Championship four times.
WRITE NOW!: He wrote "The Kandy-Kolored Tangerine-Flake Streamline Baby" in one night for Esquire magazine
Tom Wolfe
The Kandy-Kolored Tangerine-Flake Streamline Baby is the title of Tom Wolfe's first collected book of essays, published in 1965.
3
Another characteristic of Wolfe's writing is switching from highly technical or scientific explanations to very colloquial turns of phrase, often within a single sentence.
In .
Retrieved on January 13, 2008.Capouya, Emile.
THE LUCK OF THE "IRISH": Fine examples of this include Tullamore Dew, Old Bushmills & Jameson Distillery Reserve
Irish whiskey
Tullamore Dew is a brand of blended Irish whiskey produced by William Grant & Sons.
3
When Molloy died, Bernard Daly took  charge of the business.
Tullamore DEW Cider Cask was released in June 2015 for sale through airport retail outlets.
Proof66.com
SINATRA: The Arizona radio station Sinatra bought in 1989 was dubbed KFAS, the FAS standing for this
Francis Albert Sinatra
The bossa nova recordings were originally cut for a follow-up to the widely acclaimed Francis Albert Sinatra & Antonio Carlos Jobim.
3
Some of Sinatra's less mainstream albums hadn't performed well, and anxieties drove the creation of this hybrid.
A few 8 track versions of Sinatra–Jobim did survive, and are now eagerly sought after by collectors.http://www.8trackheaven.com/archive/sinatra.html  Track listing "Drinking Water" (Vinicius de Moraes, Antônio Carlos Jobim, Norman Gimbel)  – 2:35 "Someone to Light Up My Life" (de Moraes, Jobim, Gene Lees)  – 2:37 "Triste" (Jobim)  – 2:40 "Don't Ever Go Away" ("Por Causa de Voce") (Ray Gilbert, Dolores Durán, Jobim)  –
arranger (tracks 1–7)
LITERARY THRILLERS: FBI agent Alex Cross tangles with villains known as the Wolf & the Weasel in his "London Bridges"
James Patterson
Alex Cross is a fictional character created by author James Patterson.
3
When John is kidnapped by the Audience Killer in Double Cross, Alex worries deeply for his friend and later rescues him.
She was murdered in a drive-by shooting and the killer was never found.
While on their next date in Los Angeles, Jamilla reveals that she has met another man, while not cheating on him, and is realizing that their long-distance relationship cannot work, whether or not they are in love.
WRITERS NAMED JAMES: "Cross", a 2006 bestseller, is his 12th thriller featuring Alex Cross
James Patterson
Alex Cross is a fictional character created by author James Patterson.
3
Nana Mama  Alex was raised by his grandmother, Regina "Nana Mama" Cross.
Terrified and desperate, Cross must give this mad man what he wants if he has any chance of saving the most important people in his life.
They kidnap Sampson and lead Cross and Stone to a building where they reveal themselves.
HERE'S WALDO: In a 1975 film this actor was just great as "The Great Waldo Pepper"
Robert Redford
Set during 1926–1931, the film stars Robert Redford as a disaffected World War I veteran pilot who missed the opportunity to fly in combat and his sense of dislocation post-war in the America of the early 1920s.
3
He crashes on his third attempt, and the crowd rushes out of the stands to see the wreckage.
Several aerial scenes were also filmed over the Sebring, Florida, Airport (also known for the 12 Hours of Sebring, a Le Mans-style endurance car race).
ISBN 978-0-451-22468-2.
TV PAST & PRESENT: Until his 1979 death, Jack Soo played Det. Nick Yemana, who made coffee for the 12th Precinct on this sitcom
Barney Miller
He is best known for his role as Detective Nick Yemana on the television sitcom Barney Miller.
3
Jack Soo (October 28, 1917 – January 11, 1979) was a Japanese American actor.
Jack was first broadcast across America by Jack Benny on November 27, 1962, as the street-wise talent agent in "Jack Meets Japanese Agent".
The Wackiest Ship in the Army Shiru  Episode:
AUTHORS: "Oliver Twist" & "A Tale of Two Cities" are among the classic novels by this British author
Charles Dickens
A Tale of Two Cities (1859) is a novel by Charles Dickens, set in London and Paris before and during the French Revolution.
3
The lower classes do not have any agency in this metaphor: they simply react to the behaviour of the aristocracy.
Wife of Jerry Cruncher.
Character List SparkNotes:
LANDS DOWN UNDER: Head south on the causeway linking Malaysia to this island nation that was once a part of it
Singapore
Peninsular Malaysia shares a land and maritime border with Thailand and maritime borders with Singapore, Vietnam, and Indonesia.
2
Sabah and Sarawak have considerably more autonomy than the other states, most notably having separate immigration policies and controls, and a unique residency status.
Malaysia hosts a population of refugees and asylum seekers numbering approximately 171,500.
CLEO POTPOURRIO: Tamara Dobson played this secret agent in 2 1970s films
Cleopatra Jones
Though she appeared in a few films in Hollywood, she became best known for her title roles in the 1973 Blaxploitation film Cleopatra Jones and its 1975 sequel Cleopatra Jones and the Casino of Gold.
2
Dobson is also recognized by the Guiness book of world records as the "Tallest Leading Lady in Film", standing at 6 foot 2 inches.
Is That You?
SITCOM MOMS: As Carol on this series, Florence Henderson was mom to a whole lot of kids
The Brady Bunch
In her six decades of show business, she is best known for her starring role as matriarch Carol Brady on the ABC sitcom The Brady Bunch from 1969 to 1974.
3
During that time, she hosted a cooking show on TNN called Country Kitchen, and also did ads for Prange's, a former Wisconsin department store chain.
Henderson studied hypnotherapy and is a certified hypnotherapist.
Since the 2000s, she has been a more public benefactor of the Sisters of St. Benedict in Ferdinand, Indiana; some of the Nuns were her teachers during her early education.
U.S. WINTER OLYMPIANS: Life has its ups & downs for Travis Mayer, a 2002 medalist in the event named for these little hills on the slopes
moguls
He won the silver medal in the moguls competition at the 2002 Winter Olympics and also competed in the 2006 Winter Olympics.
3
Travis Mayer (born February 22, 1982 in Buffalo, New York) is an olympic-level Freestyle Skier.
In The Complete Book of the Winter Olympics: 2010 Edition.
p. 302.
MEXICO: This resort city is famous for the cliff divers of La Quebrada
Acapulco
In order to protect Mexico from the attacks of English, French and Dutch pirates, as well as the Crown's revenue, only two ports were open to foreign trade—Veracruz on the Atlantic and Acapulco on the Pacific.
3
Mexico has the fifteenth largest nominal GDP and the eleventh largest GDP by purchasing power parity.
Emanuel Leutze.
The Federal District is a special political division that belongs to the federation as a whole and not to a particular state, and as such, has more limited local rule than the nation's states.
THE UNITED STATES OF MEXICO: A Yale-educated economist, he's the president of Mexico
Ernesto Zedillo
End of one-party rule (2000–present) In December 1994, a month after Salinas was succeeded by Ernesto Zedillo, the Mexican economy collapsed, with a rapid rescue package authorized by the U.S. President, Bill Clinton, and major macroeconomic reforms started by President Zedillo, the economy rapidly recovered and growth peaked at almost 7% by the end of 1999.
3
The constitution establishes three levels of government: the federal Union, the state governments and the municipal governments.
They also have their own civil and judicial codes.
In May 2009, Mexico's National Institute of Genomic Medicine issued a report on a genomic study of 300 mestizos from the states of Guerrero, Sonora, Veracruz, Yucatán, Zacatecas, and Guanajuato.
LUNCH COUNTER LINGO: Number that Mel might have called out to say "We're all out of it"
86
New Albany in Vintage Postcards, p. 2; ISBN 978-0-7385-3386-5  Lunch counters were often found in other dimestores, like Newberry's, S. H. Kress, H.L. Green, W.T. Grant, McLellan's or McCrory's.
3
The intent of the lunch counter in a store was to both profit from taking care of hungry shoppers and attract people to the store more often in the hopes that they might buy some merchandise or cross two errands off their list in one location.
Typical foods served were hot and cold sandwiches (e.g., ham and cheese, grilled cheese, BLT, patty melt, egg salad), soups, pie, ice cream (including sundaes, ice cream sodas and milkshakes), soda, coffee and hot chocolate.
These involved Black Americans and their supporters sitting at the lunch counter in areas designated for "whites only", insisting that they be allowed to purchase and be served food or beverages.
McCARTNEY: "Silly Love Songs" was a No. 1 hit for Paul & this band in 1976
Wings
"Silly Love Songs" is a song written by Paul McCartney and performed by Wings.
3
The song, written in response to music critics accusing him of writing only "silly love songs", also features disco overtones.
It was also the group's second of three number ones on the Easy Listening chart.
36 on the "all-time" charts.
GET YOUR FACTS STRAIGHT: Finland's pres. is Tarja Halonen; Taraji P. Henson was Queenie, the adoptive mom in "The Curious Case of" him
Benjamin Button
In 2005, she starred in Hustle & Flow and played Queenie in David Fincher's The Curious Case of Benjamin Button (2008), for which she received a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress.
3
She noted in an interview that, "Queenie is the embodiment of unconditional love."
Keep them inside, where it's safe and warm."
Critics' Choice Television Awards Best Actress in a Drama Series   Primetime Emmy Awards Outstanding Lead Actress in a Drama Series  Teen Choice AwardsChoice TV Actress: Drama  Choice TV: Chemistry <small>(shared with Trai Byers, Bryshere Y. Gray, Terrence Howard & Jussie Smollett)   Television
OLD COMMERCIALS: Bucky, one of these animals, pushed Ipana toothpaste
Beaver
Marketing of Ipana used a Disney-created mascot named Bucky Beaver in the 1950s.
2
European New Product Report.
Section: The Home Forum.
SPORTS FOR DUMMIES: "Baseball for Dummies" is by this Hall of Fame Reds second baseman & "Sunday Night Baseball" analyst
Joe Morgan
History The series debuted in 1990, and from its inception through 2010  featured the broadcast team of play-by-play commentator Jon Miller and color commentator Joe Morgan.
3
In an essential trade deal, following the hiring of Valentine as the Boston Red Sox manager, his predecessor Terry Francona was hired to join Shulman and Hershiser for the 2012 season.
On April 29, 2007, a canceled broadcast occurred between the Chicago Cubs and St. Louis Cardinals when Cardinals relief pitcher Josh Hancock was killed in a car accident earlier in the day at 12:35 A.M. while driving under the influence.
However, 1998 was the first year of ESPN's contract to air Sunday Night Football through the entire season, as opposed to the second half of the year as in previous years, and the NFL games took precedence.
DISNEY FILMS BY SONGS: "Baby Mine" & "Pink Elephants on Parade"
Dumbo
Pink Elephants on Parade is the name of a segment, and the song played therein, from the Disney animated feature film Dumbo in which Dumbo and Timothy Q. Mouse, after accidentally becoming intoxicated (after drinking water spiked with Champagne), see pink elephants sing, dance, and play marching band instruments during a hallucination sequence.
3
The American Film Institute catalog of motion pictures produced in the United States, Volume 1 University of California Press.
pp.
663.
SO. CAL.: In 1929 most of the canals Abbot Kinney added to this community were filled in
Venice
Kinney is best known for his "Venice of America" development in Los Angeles.
2
This report and others led to the Mission Indian Act of 1891, which created a commission to seek to establish or confirm reservations in Southern California.
In 1887, Kinney established the nation's first forestry station in Rustic Canyon on  of land donated by Santa Monica co-founder John P. Jones (also a U.S. Senator from Nevada), and Arcadia Bandini de Stearns Baker.
20th CENTURY AUTHORS: Ancestors of this elusive modern author protested after Hawthorne used their name in "The House of the Seven Gables"
Thomas Pynchon
Background thumb|House of the Seven Gables in Salem, Massachusetts c. 1915 The novel begins:  The Pyncheon family actually existed and were ancestors of American novelist Thomas Pynchon.
3
The characters abandon the old house and start a new life in the countryside, free from the burdens of the past.
Hawthorne: A Life.
Wineapple, Brenda.
THE NEW YORK TIMES ENTERTAINMENT: Nytimes.com lauded Hamish Linklater, who plays Julia Louis-Dreyfus' brother Matthew on this sitcom
The New Adventures of Old Christine
Hamish Linklater (born July 7, 1976) is an American actor, known for playing Matthew Kimble in The New Adventures of Old Christine and Andrew Keanelly in The Crazy Ones.
3
Early life Linklater was born in Great Barrington, Massachusetts, the son of Kristin Linklater and James Lincoln Cormeny.http://www.legacy.com/obituaries/nytimes/obituary.aspx?pid=169008608
In 2011, he starred with Miranda July in The Future.
Pushing Daisies John Joseph Jacobs Episode: "Girth" 2009 Ugly Betty Evan York Episode: "Blue on Blue" 2012  Dave Cooper 4 episodes 2012 Law & Order: Special Victims Unit David Morris Episode: "Manhattan Vigil" 2012–2013  David LaGuardia 2 episodes 2013  Jerry Dantana 6 episodes 2013–2014  Andrew Keanelly 22 episodes  References  External links  Hamish Linklater at TV.com  Category:1976 births Category:20th-century American male actors Category:21st-century American male actors Category:American male film actors Category:American male stage actors Category:American Shakespearean actors Category:American male television actors Category:American people of Scottish descent Category:American people of Swedish descent Category:Amherst College alumni Category:Living people Category:Male actors from Massachusetts Category:People from Great Barrington, Massachusetts Category:American people of English descent Category:American people of German descent Category:American people of Irish descent Category:American people of Flemish descent
GIFTS FOR EVERYONE: Proposed by historian Edouard de Laboulaye, it was presented to the U.S. for its centennial
the Statue of Liberty
One is a traditional folk song and the other is a pop song by Neil Diamond (he performed it live on nationwide television at the rededication of the Statue of Liberty in 1986).
3
Nohat 22:16, 24 March 2006 (UTC)
Wikipedia already suffers from systemic bias, see WP:CSB, this change would be counter productive to the efforts to combat it.
Nohat 21:39, 30 March 2006 (UTC)  3.
YOU GOTTA SERVE SOMEBODY: Composed largely of American pilots, the Lafayette Escadrille flying squadron served during this war
the First World War
This fact actually had much to do with the First World War... — Saxifrage ✎ 23:36, 31 March 2006 (UTC)  So we are begining to see agreement emerging. 'America' & 'American' actually refer to some sort of collective culture enjoyed within the U.S.A. , it does not refer to the actual country (whether the geographic area or any official body).
3
Continent-wide references need to be explicit to avoid confusion, not the other way around. "The American president" is not going to to be confused with the "president" of North America. "American companies" is not going to be assumed to mean all businesses in the Western hemisphere.
By stating the status quo in terms that no one but you and Markb agree is the status quo, and urging those of us who want American to be a useful word for attributes of the US to vote "change", you're trying to game the system, so that, if no clear consensus emerges, you win.
older ≠ wiser 20:15, 26 March 2006 (UTC)  'U.S.' can be used as an adjective. 'U.S. Politics' or 'United States Politics' for example.
AUSTRALIA: It's the basic unit of currency of Australia
Australian Dollar
The Australian dollar is the currency for the nation, including Christmas Island, Cocos (Keeling) Islands, and Norfolk Island, as well as the independent Pacific Island states of Kiribati, Nauru, and Tuvalu.
3
The dingo was introduced by Austronesian people who traded with Indigenous Australians around 3000 BCE. Many animal and plant species became extinct soon after first human settlement, including the Australian megafauna; others have disappeared since European settlement, among them the thylacine.
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development There is a state-based system of vocational training, known as TAFE, and many trades conduct apprenticeships for training new tradespeople.
p. xii.
"LAND" HO!: Australia's second-largest state in area, it's nearly 5 times the size of Japan
Queensland
Separate colonies were carved from parts of New South Wales: South Australia in 1836, Victoria in 1851, and Queensland in 1859.Davison, Hirst and Macintyre, p. 464.
3
Retrieved 5 January 2008.
Mainland Aboriginal Australians' spirituality is known as the Dreamtime and it places a heavy emphasis on belonging to the land.
Jupp, pp.
STAR MOVIES: 5 years before "E.T.", little Cary Guffey tried to befriend extraterrestrials in this Spielberg film
Close Encounters of the Third Kind
He is best remembered for his debut in the role of Barry Guiler in the film Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977).
1
Guffey made his last onscreen appearance in the 1985 miniseries North and South.
THAT'S IN BRITOONICA: Britannica notes that his owner Shaggy was "one of the first serial abusers of the word 'like'"
Scooby-Doo
Shaggy & Scooby-Doo Get a Clue!
2
Robi also usually calls Scooby "Rooby Roo" due to misunderstanding Scooby's voice.
Supporting characters  Agent 3 (voiced by Frank Welker): Agent 3 is a timid, but honest agent.
BIRDS: The tiny vestigial wings of this New Zealand bird are hidden in its feathers
Kiwi
thumb|left|upright|The endemic flightless kiwi is a national icon.|alt=Kiwi amongst sticks The forests were dominated by birds, and the lack of mammalian predators led to some like the kiwi, kakapo and takahē evolving flightlessness.
3
At some point, a group of Māori migrated to the Chatham Islands (which they named Rēkohu) where they developed their distinct Moriori culture.
About 25 million years ago, a shift in plate tectonic movements began to contort and crumple the region.
Other outdoor pursuits such as cycling, fishing, swimming, running, tramping, canoeing, hunting, snowsports and surfing are also popular.
POUR ME A STIFF ONE: Invented in Cuba, a mojito is made with lime juice, club soda, sugar, ice, mint leaves & this kind of alcohol
rum
CNN: "Cuba eases travel restriction for citizens" by Ben Brumfield October 16, 2012 |Until now, Cubans had to pay $150 for an exit visa.
3
Recent years have seen a trend toward more private sector employment.
The religious landscape of Cuba is also strongly defined by syncretisms of various kinds.
Writers such as Nicolás Guillén and Jose Z. Tallet focused on literature as social protest.
ELTON JOHN: Elton's 1982 song "Empty Garden (Hey Hey Johnny)" was a tribute to this slain man
John Lennon
In 1974, MCA released his Greatest Hits album, a UK and US number one which is certified Diamond by the RIAA for sales of 16million copies in the US.  In 1974, a collaboration with John Lennon took place, resulting in Lennon appearing on Elton John's single cover of the Beatles' "Lucy in the Sky with Diamonds", the B-side of which was Lennon's "One Day at a Time." In return, John was featured on "Whatever Gets You thru the Night" on Lennon's Walls and Bridges album.
3
The album reached number two in the UK, and spawned the hit singles "Rocket Man" and "Honky Cat".Stephen Thomas Erlewine [ Honky Chateau (Bonus Track) – Elton John] AllMusic both of which were recorded at Trident Studios in London.
In 1986, he played the piano on two tracks on the heavy metal band Saxon's album Rock the Nations.
In 2000, he admitted to spending £30million in just under two years—an average of £1.5million a month.
POP THE QUESTION: Elton John won his first Grammy as a solo artist for this song from "The Lion King"
"Can You Feel The Love Tonight"
At the 67th Academy Awards ceremony, The Lion King soundtrack provided three of the five nominees for the Academy Award for Best Song, which he won with "Can You Feel the Love Tonight".
3
The 1975 autobiographical album Captain Fantastic and the Brown Dirt Cowboy debuted at number one in the US, the first album ever to do so, and stayed at the top for seven weeks."Elton Expands 'Captain Fantastic' With Live Tracks".
Billboard.
orchestrations  Lesley Duncan –
CLASSIC POP GROUPS: When this group was inducted into the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame, Mike Love gave the acceptance speech
The Beach Boys
Michael Edward "Mike" Love (born March 15, 1941) is an American musician, singer, songwriter, and activist who is a member and co-founder of the Beach Boys.
1
2001: Summertime Cruisin'' (with Bruce Johnston)  Singles  1967: "Gettin' Hungry" (with Brian Wilson)
FILM STARS: He says he based his role as Garth in "Wayne's World" partly on his brother Brad
Dana Carvey
The sketch centered on a local public-access television program in Aurora, Illinois, hosted by Wayne Campbell (Mike Myers, the same actor from "Wayne's Power Minute"), an enthusiastic and sardonic long-haired metalhead, and his timid and sometimes high-strung, yet equally metal-loving sidekick and best friend, Garth Algar (Dana Carvey).
3
Arguably the most memorable appearance of the sketch featured Wayne and Garth in a jam session with their idols, the rock band Aerosmith, performing an extended, hard rock version of the "Wayne's World" theme song, written by Myers and SNL music director G.E. Smith.
"Gawain's Word", a regular segment on the children's educational show Between the Lions, takes inspiration from both the "Wayne's World" sketch and its theme song.
Phil Hartman's "Cable 10 Public Access" introduction preceded the segment, in tradition with other reprised sketches (Church Chat, The Continental, etc.)  2015 SNL reprise In 2015, Myers and Carvey reprised their roles for the 40th anniversary of Saturday Night Live.
HERBS & SPICE GIRLS: The uniquely dressed Herb Tarlek hung out with Les Nessman & Dr. Johnny fever at this title radio station (on TV)
WKRP in Cincinnati
Herbert Ruggles Tarlek, Jr. is a character on the television situation comedy WKRP in Cincinnati (1978–1982).
3
Herb is best known for his atrocious taste in clothes.
Jennifer Marlowe intervenes on Herb's behalf on several occasions, both in personal matters (such as trying to convince Herb's wife to accept him back during a brief separation) and in his professional foul-ups (such as trying to save Herb's job by attempting to deceive a dissatisfied client, who ultimately turned out to be sympathetic).
One writer, Peter Torokvei, said that horribly flawed characters like Herb were more interesting to write for than a more self-assured character like Jennifer Marlowe.
DO TELL THE HOTEL: Episodes of this British sitcom included "The Hotel Inspectors" & "Basil the Rat"
Fawlty Towers
"The Hotel Inspectors" is the fourth episode of the BBC sitcom Fawlty Towers.
3
While Mr. Hutchinson is requesting to reserve the television to watch a documentary he is interested in, he says something which makes Basil's hair stand on end: "In my professional activities I am in constant contact with hotels.
Mr. Walt reveals he is actually an outboard motors salesman, and consoles Basil.
Uncredited:
WORDS WE DON'T USE ENOUGH: Accented on the first syllable, it means divine wisdom; on the second syllable, the divine Ms. Loren
Sophia
Loren is a personal name for both males and females and may refer to:  First name  Loren Acton (born 1936), American physicist and astronaut  Loren C. Ball (born 1948), amateur astronomer who has discovered more than 100 asteroids  Loren M. Berry (1888–1980), American businessman  Loren Bouchard (born 1970), American television writer and director  Loren Cameron (born 1959), American photographer  Loren Carpenter (born 1947), American computer graphics researcher and developer  Loren Coleman (born 1947), American scientist and author  Loren L. Coleman (born 1947), American science-fiction writer  Loren W. Collins (1838–1912), American jurist and politician  Loren Mazzacane Connors (born 1949), American musician  Loren Crabtree (born 1940), American academic and chancellor  Loren Cunningham (born 1936), American missionary organizer  Loren Dean (born 1969), American actor  Loren C. Dunn (1930–2001), American general authority of the LDS Church  Loren Eiseley (1907–1977), American scientist and writer  Loren D. Estleman (born 1952), American author  Loren Galler-Rabinowitz (born 1986), American ice dancer  Loren Graham (born 1933), American historian of science   Loren Horsley (born 1977), New Zealand actress  Loren Legarda (born 1960), Filipino journalist and politician  Loren Leman (born 1950), American politician  Loren Nerell (born 1960), Composer, ethnomusicologist, gamelan musician  Loren Meyer (born 1972), American professional basketball player  Loren Miller (disambiguation), multiple people, including:  Loren Miller (activist), American civic reformer and libertarian activist  Loren Miller (judge) (1903–1967), American judge in the California Superior Court  Loren Mosher (1933–2004), American psychiatrist   Loren Murchison (1898–1979), American athlete  Loren Pope (1910–2008), American writer   Loren Roberts (born 1955), American golfer  Loren Rowney (born 1988), Australian racing cyclist  Loren Schoenberg (born 1958), American musician and historian  Loren B. Sessions (1827–1897), New York politician  Loren Shriver (born 1944), American pilot and astronaut  Loren A. Smith (born 1944), American federal judge on the United States Court of Federal Claims  Loren Toews (born 1951), American football player  Loren Wiseman, American board game designer and developer  Loren H. White (1863–1923), New York politician  Surname  Donna Loren (born 1947), American actress  Eric Loren, American actor  Giselle Loren, American voice actor  Josie Loren (born March 19, 1987), American actress  Sophia Loren (born 1934), Italian actress  Todd Loren (1960-1992), American comic book publisher  Trinity Loren (1964-1998), American porn star  Fiction  Lt.
1
Loren Singer, played by Nanci Chambers, was a main character in the hit TV-series JAG  Loren Smith (character), fictional character in the Dirk Pitt novels by Clive Cussler  See also  Loran (disambiguation) Lauren (disambiguation) Lorenz (disambiguation) Lorenzo (disambiguation) Lorne (disambiguation) Laurence Lawrence (disambiguation) Lauren (disambiguation) Lori (disambiguation) Laura (disambiguation) Lora (disambiguation)
REAL LANDS: This country off Africa's coast is made up of the Barlavento island group & the Sotavento island group
Cape Verde
Portugal's overseas presence in Sub-Saharan Africa (most notably in Angola, Cape Verde, Mozambique, Guinea-Bissau and São Tomé and Príncipe) lasted from the 16th century to 1975, after the Estado Novo regime was overthrown in a military coup in Lisbon.
3
Ironworking was fully established by roughly 500 BC in many areas of East and West Africa, although other regions didn't begin ironworking until the early centuries AD. Copper objects from Egypt, North Africa, Nubia, and Ethiopia dating from around 500 BC have been excavated in West Africa, suggesting that Trans-Saharan trade networks had been established by this date.
Historical survey: Slave societies, Encyclopædia Britannica.
The improved stability and economic reforms have led to a great increase in foreign investment into many African nations, mainly from China, which has spurred quick economic growth in many countries, seemingly ending decades of stagnation and decline.
INVENTIVE MINDS: In the 1930s inventive minds at Warner's introduced the A, B, C & D cup sizes for these
bras
The 12" objective lens was polished by Brashear Co.
3
In the decades after World War II, it also entered the heavy equipment industry with its acquisition of the Gradall brand.
Warner & Swasey was one of the premier brands in heavy turret lathes between the 1910s and 1960s.
In July 1950, Gradall manufacturing operations were moved to New Philadelphia, Ohio, where it continues, in 2011, as Gradall Industries, Inc., a global manufacturer of telescopic boom excavators and industrial maintenance machinery..
POETS & POETRY: Robert Frost ended his "Mending Wall" with this famous phrase about barriers
fences make good neighbors
He notes twice in the poem that "something there is that doesn’t love a wall" (1, 35), but his neighbor replies twice with the proverb, "Good fences make good neighbors" (27, 45).
2
It opens Frost's second collection of poetry, North of Boston, published in 1914 by  David Nutt, and it has become "one of the most anthologized and analyzed poems in modern literature".
The narrator, a New England farmer, contacts his neighbor in the Spring to rebuild the stone wall between their two farms.
THE PAPARAZZI LOVE...: This object of Borat's affection who, in 2008, had a romantic Valentine's Day performing at a Paris strip club
Pamela Anderson
At a hotel, Borat, just out of the bath, sees Azamat masturbating over a picture of Pamela Anderson in the Baywatch booklet.
3
Retrieved on 17 March 2007.
He received equivalent awards from the San Francisco Film Critics Circle, the Utah Film Critics Association, the Toronto Film Critics Association, and the Online Film Critics Society.2006 San Francisco Film Critics Circle Awards, San Francisco Film
How could you do that movie?"
KID IN PLAY: In 1991 11-year-old Daisy Eagan became the youngest female Tony winner, for "The Secret" this
Garden
In 1991 she won the Tony Award for Best Performance by a Featured Actress in a Musical for playing Mary Lennox in The Secret Garden.
2
Corsello, Bill. "The Youngest Tony Award-Winners" tonyawards.com, May 21, 2013  In 1992, Eagan sang "Broadway Baby" in the concert Sondheim: A Celebration at Carnegie Hall."Special Events, Concerts, and Benefit Performances" sondheimguide.com, accessed December 24, 2015  She appeared in the Blank Theater Company production of The Wild Party in 2005 in Los Angeles as the street waif,Brandes, Phillip.
Daisy Eagan, Patrick Comer" New York Times, August 31, 2003 they divorced in 2006.
4-LETTER VERBS: TV game show host Martindale
Wink
William Martindale (1840–1902), pharmacist and founding editor of Martindale: The Extra Pharmacopoeia  Wink Martindale, game show host  Places Martindale, Cumbria, England Martindale, St. Catharines, Ontario Martindale, Texas Martindale, Calgary, a neighbourhood Martindale (C-Train), a C-Train station in the neighbourhood Martindale, Eastern Cape, a farming community near Bathurst in South Africa Martindale (NYCRR station), a former railway station in Hillsdale, New York Martindale Hall a Georgian-style mansion near Mintaro, South Australia on the site of Martindale sheep station  Science Martindale, unit for measuring abrasion resistance of textiles  Publications  Martindale: The Complete Drug Reference, a medicines information resource  LexisNexis Martindale-Hubbell (commonly referred to as Martindale-Hubbell), a catalogue of lawyers in the United States.
2
Martindale can refer to:  People  Adam Martindale, a leading 17th century English Presbyterian minister  Doug Martindale, Canadian politician  Elijah Martindale  Henry C. Martindale Congressman from New York.
James B. Martindale  John H. Martindale, Union general.
"W"RITERS: Service aboard a minesweeper in World War II gave this author the background he needed to write "The Caine Mutiny"
Herman Wouk
The Caine Mutiny is a 1951 Pulitzer Prize–winning novel by Herman Wouk.
3
Ordered to escort low-lying landing craft to their line of departure, the  Caine instead drops a yellow dye marker to mark the spot, and hastily leaves the battle area.
Communications officer Lieutenant Thomas Keefer, an intellectual and initially portrayed as a sympathetic character, plants the suggestion that Queeg might be mentally ill in the mind of the Caine's executive officer, Lieutenant Stephen Maryk.
Keefer is sent home after the war ends, ashamed of his cowardly behavior during the kamikaze attack.
THE FILM THAT ALMOST WAS: Nicole Kidman dropped out of playing Brad Pitt's wife in this film; you may have heard Angelina Jolie got the part
Mr. & Mrs. Smith
She continued her successful action-star career with Mr. & Mrs. Smith (2005), Wanted (2008), and Salt (2010), and received critical acclaim for her performances in the dramas A Mighty Heart (2007) and Changeling (2008), which earned her a nomination for an Academy Award for Best Actress.
3
The film was not well received by critics; Chicago Sun-Times critic Roger Ebert noted that Jolie "finds a certain warmth in a kind of role that is usually hard and aggressive; she seems too nice to be [a mobster's] girlfriend, and maybe she is."
For the second consecutive year, Jolie won a Golden Globe Award and was nominated for an Emmy Award.
In January 2011, she established the Jolie Legal Fellowship, a network of lawyers and attorneys who are sponsored to advocate the development of human rights in their countries.
